

BOOKS BY ERNEST HEMINGWAY
The Complete Short Stories
The Garden of Eden
Dateline: Toronto
The Dangerous Summer
Selected Letters
The Enduring Hemingway
The Nick Adams Stories
Islands in the Stream
The Fifth Column and Four Stories of the Spanish Civil War
By-Line: Ernest Hemingway
A Moveable Feast
Three Novels
The Snows of Kilimanjaro and Other Stories
The Hemingway Reader
The Old Man and the Sea
Across the River and into the Trees
For Whom the Bell Tolls
The Short Stories of Ernest Hemingway
To Have and Have Not
Green Hills of Africa
Winner Take Nothing
Death in the Afternoon
In Our Time
A Farewell to Arms
Men Without Women
The Sun Also Rises
The Torrents of Spring
The
Complete
Short Stories of
Ernest Hemingway

SCRIBNER
1230 Avenue of the Americas
New York, NY 10020
This book is a work of fiction. Names, characters, places, and incidents
either are products of the author’s imagination or are used fictitiously.
Any resemblance to actual events or locales or persons, living or dead,
is entirely coincidental.
Copyright © 1987 by Simon & Schuster Inc.
All rights reserved, including the right of reproduction in
whole or in part in any form.
SCRIBNER and design are trademarks
of Macmillan Library Reference USA, Inc., used under license
by Simon & Schuster, the publisher of this work.
Library of Congress Gilahging-in-Publication Data
Hemingway Ernest, 1899-1961.
[Short stories]
The complete short stories of Ernest Hemingway / Ernest
Hemingway.—Finca Vigía ed.
p. cm.
I. Title.
PS3515E37A15 1991
813′.52—dc20 90-26241
CIP
ISBN-13: 978-1-4165-8729-3
ISBN-10: 1-4165-8729-2
Visit us on the World Wide Web:
http://www.SimonSays.com
Contents
Foreword
Publisher’s Preface
PART I “The First Forty-nine”
Preface to “The First Forty-nine”
The Short Happy Life of Francis Macomber
The Capital of the World
The Snows of Kilimanjaro
Old Man at the Bridge
Up in Michigan
On the Quai at Smyrna
Indian Camp
The Doctor and the Doctor’s Wife
The End of Something
The Three-Day Blow
The Battler
A Very Short Story
Soldier’s Home
The Revolutionist
Mr. and Mrs. Elliot
Cat in the Rain
Out of Season
Cross-Country Snow
My Old Man
Big Two-Hearted River: Part I
Big Two-Hearted River: Part II
The Undefeated
In Another Country
Hills Like White Elephants
The Killers
Che Ti Dice La Patria?
Fifty Grand
A Simple Enquiry
Ten Indians
A Canary for One
An Alpine Idyll
A Pursuit Race
Today Is Friday
Banal Story
Now I Lay Me
After the Storm
A Clean, Well-Lighted Place
The Light of the World
God Rest You Merry, Gentlemen
The Sea Change
A Way You’ll Never Be
The Mother of a Queen
One Reader Writes
Homage to Switzerland
A Day’s Wait
A Natural History of the Dead
Wine of Wyoming
The Gambler, the Nun, and the Radio
Fathers and Sons
PART II Short Stories Published in Books or
Magazines Subsequent to “The First Forty-nine”
One Trip Across
The Tradesman’s Return
The Denunciation
The Butterfly and the Tank
Night Before Battle
Under the Ridge
Nobody Ever Dies
The Good Lion
The Faithful Bull
Get a Seeing-Eyed Dog
A Man of the World
Summer People
The Last Good Country
An African Story
PART III Previously Unpublished Fiction
A Train Trip
The Porter
Black Ass at the Cross Roads
Landscape with Figures
I Guess Everything Reminds You of Something
Great News from the Mainland
The Strange Country
Foreword
WHEN PAPA AND MARTY FIRST RENTED in 1940 the Finca
Vigía which was to be his home for the next twenty-two years until his death, there was still a real
country on the south side. This country no longer exists. It was not done in by middle-class real estate
developers like Chekhov’s cherry orchard, which might have been its fate in Puerto Rico or Cuba
without the Castro revolution, but by the startling growth of the population of poor people and their
shack housing which is such a feature of all the Greater Antilles, no matter what their political
persuasion.
As children in the very early morning lying awake in bed in our own little house that Marty had
fixed up for us, we used to listen for the whistling call of the bobwhites in that country to the south.
It was a country covered in manigua thicket and in the tall flamboyante trees that grew along the
watercourse that ran through it, wild guinea fowl used to come and roost in the evening. They would
be calling to each other, keeping in touch with each other in the thicket, as they walked and scratched
and with little bursts of running moved back toward their roosting trees at the end of their day’s
foraging in the thicket.
Manigua thicket is a scrub acacia thornbush from Africa, the first seeds of which the Creoles
say came to the island between the toes of the black slaves. The guinea fowl were from Africa too.
They never really became as tame as the other barnyard fowl the Spanish settlers brought with them
and some escaped and throve in the monsoon tropical climate, just as Papa told us some of the black
slaves had escaped from the shipwreck of slave ships on the coast of South America, enough of them
together with their culture and language intact so that they were able to live together in the wilderness
down to the present day just as they had lived in Africa.
Vigía in Spanish means a lookout or a prospect. The farmhouse is built on a hill that commands
an unobstructed view of Havana and the coastal plain to the north. There is nothing African or even
continental about this view to the north. It is a Creole island view of the sort made familiar by the
tropical watercolors of Winslow Homer, with royal palms, blue sky, and the small, white cumulus
clouds that continuously change in shape and size at the top of the shallow northeast trade wind, the
brisa.
In the late summer, when the doldrums, following the sun, move north, there are often, as the heat
builds in the afternoons, spectacular thunderstorms that relieve for a while the humid heat, chubascos
that form inland to the south and move northward out to the sea.
In some summers, a hurricane or two would cut swaths through the shack houses of the poor on
the island. Hurricane victims, damnificados del ciclón, would then add a new tension to local
politics, already taut enough under the strain of insufficient municipal water supplies, perceived
outrages to national honor like the luridly reported urination on the monument to José Marti by
drunken American servicemen and, always, the price of sugar.
Lightning must still strike the house many times each summer, and when we were children there
no one would use the telephone during a thunderstorm after the time Papa was hurled to the floor in
the middle of a call, himself and the whole room glowing in the blue light of Saint Elmo’s fire.
During the early years at the finca, Papa did not appear to write any fiction at all. He wrote
many letters, of course, and in one of them he says that it is his turn to rest. Let the world get on with
the mess it had gotten itself into.
Marty was the one who seemed to write and to have kept her taste for the high excitement of their
life together in Madrid during the last period of the Spanish Civil War. Papa and she played a lot of
tennis with each other on the clay court down by the swimming pool and there were often tennis
parties with their friends among the Basque professional jai alai players from the fronton in Havana.
One of these was what the young girls today would call a hunk, and Marty flirted with him a little and
Papa spoke of his rival, whom he would now and again beat at tennis by the lowest form of cunning
expressed in spins and chops and lobs against the towering but uncontrolled honest strength of the
rival.
It was all great fun for us, the deep-sea fishing on the Pilar that Gregorio Fuentes, the mate, kept
always ready for use in the little fishing harbor of Cojimar, the live pigeon shooting at the Club de
Cazadores del Cerro, the trips into Havana for drinks at the Floridita and to buy The Illustrated
London News with its detailed drawings of the war so far away in Europe.
Papa, who was always very good at that sort of thing, suggested a quotation from Turgenev to
Marty: “The heart of another is a dark forest,” and she used part of it for the title of a work of fiction
she had just completed at the time.
Although the Finca Vigía collection contains all the stories that appeared in the first
comprehensive collection of Papa’s short stories published in 1938, those stories are now well
known. Much of this collection’s interest to the reader will no doubt be in the stories that were
written or only came to light after he came to live at the Finca Vigía.
—JOHN, PATRICK, AND GREGORY HEMINGWAY 1987
Publisher’s Preface
THERE HAS LONG BEEN A NEED FOR A complete and up-to-date
edition of the short stories of Ernest Hemingway. Until now the only such volume was the omnibus
collection of the first forty-nine stories published in 1938 together with Hemingway’s play The Fifth
Column. That was a fertile period of Hemingway’s writing and a number of stories based on his
experiences in Cuba and Spain were appearing in magazines, but too late to have been included in
“The First Forty-nine.”
In 1939 Hemingway was already considering a new collection of stories that would take its
place beside the earlier books In Our Time, Men Without Women , and Winner Take Nothing . On
February 7 he wrote from his home in Key West to his editor Maxwell Perkins at Scribners
suggesting such a book. At that time he had already completed five stories: “The Denunciation,” “The
Butterfly and the Tank,” “Night Before Battle,” “Nobody Ever Dies,” and “Landscape with Figures,”
which is published here for the first time. A sixth story, “Under the Ridge,” would appear shortly in
the March 1939 edition of Cosmopolitan.
As it turned out, Hemingway’s plans for that new book did not pan out. He had committed
himself to writing three “very long” stories to round out the collection (two dealing with battles in the
Spanish Civil War and one about the Cuban fisherman who fought a swordfish for four days and four
nights only to lose it to sharks). But once Hemingway got underway on his novel—later published as
For Whom the Bell Tolls—all other writing projects were laid aside. We can only speculate on the
two war stories he abandoned, but it is probable that much of what they might have included found its
way into the novel. As for the story of the Cuban fisherman, he did eventually return to it thirteen
years later when he developed and transformed it into his famous novella, The Old Man and the Sea.
Many of Hemingway’s early stories are set in northern Michigan, where his family owned a
cottage on Waloon Lake and where he spent his summers as a boy and youth. The group of friends he
made there, including the Indians who lived nearby, are doubtless represented in various stories, and
some of the episodes are probably based at least partly on fact. Hemingway’s aim was to convey
vividly and exactly moments of exquisite importance and poignancy, experiences that might
appropriately be described as “epiphanies.” The posthumously published “Summer People” and the
fragment called “The Last Good Country” stem from this period.
Later stories, also set in America, relate to Hemingway’s experiences as a husband and father,
and even as a hospital patient. The cast of characters and the variety of themes became as diversified
as the author’s own life. One special source of material was his life in Key West, where he lived in
the twenties and thirties. His encounters with the sea on his fishing boat Pilar, taken together with his
circle of friends, were the inspiration of some of his best writing. The two Harry Morgan stories,
“One Trip Across” (Cosmopolitan, May 1934) and “The Tradesman’s Return” (Esquire, February
1936), which draw from this period, were ultimately incorporated into the novel To Have and Have
Not, but it is appropriate and enjoyable to read them as separate stories, as they first appeared.
Hemingway must have been one of the most perceptive travelers in the history of literature, and
his stories taken as a whole present a world of experience. In 1918 he signed up for ambulance duty
in Italy as a member of an American Field Service unit. It was his first transatlantic journey and he
was eighteen at the time. On the day of his arrival in Milan a munitions factory blew up, and with the
other volunteers in his contingent Hemingway was assigned to gather up the remains of the dead. Only
three months later he was badly wounded in both legs and hospitalized in the American Red Cross
hospital in Milan, with subsequent outpatient treatment. These wartime experiences, including the
people he met, provided many details for his novel of World War I, A Farewell to Arms. They also
inspired five short story masterpieces.
In the 1920s he revisited Italy several times; sometimes as a professional journalist and
sometimes for pleasure. His short story about a motor trip with a friend through Mussolini’s Italy,
“Che Ti Dice La Patria?,” succeeds in conveying the harsh atmosphere of a totalitarian regime.
Between 1922 and 1924 Hemingway made several trips to Switzerland to gather material for
The Toronto Star. His subjects included economic conditions and other practical subjects, but also
accounts of Swiss winter sports: bobsledding, skiing, and the hazardous luge. As in other fields.
Hemingway was ahead of his compatriots in discovering places and pleasures that would become
tourist attractions. At the same time, he was storing up ideas for a number of his short stories, with
themes ranging from the comic to the serious and the macabre.
Hemingway attended his first bullfight, in the company of American friends, in 1923, when he
made an excursion to Madrid from Paris, where he was living at the time. From the moment the first
bull burst into the ring he was overwhelmed by the experience and left the scene a lifelong fan. For
him the spectacle of a man pitted against a wild bull was a tragedy rather than a sport. He was
fascinated by its techniques and conventions, the skill and courage required by the toreros, and the
sheer violence of the bulls. He soon became an acknowledged expert on bullfighting and wrote a
famous treatise on the subject. Death in the Afternoon. A number of his stories also have bullfighting
themes.
In time, Hemingway came to love all of Spain—its customs, its landscapes, its art treasures, and
its people. When the Spanish Civil War broke out in the last week of July 1936, he was a staunch
supporter of the Loyalists, helping to provide support for their cause and covering the war from
Madrid as a correspondent for the North American Newspaper Alliance. Out of the entirety of his
experiences in Spain during the war he produced seven short stories in addition to his novel, For
Whom the Bell Tolls, and his play. The Fifth Column. It was one of the most prolific and inspired
periods of his writing career.
In 1933, when his wife Pauline’s wealthy uncle Gus Pfeiffer offered to stake the Hemingways to
an African safari, Ernest was totally captivated by the prospect and made endless preparations,
including inviting a company of friends to join them and selecting suitable weapons and other
equipment for the trip.
The safari itself lasted about ten weeks, but everything he saw seems to have made an indelible
impression on his mind. Perhaps he regained, as the result of his enthusiasm and interest, a childlike
capacity to record details almost photographically. It was his first meeting with the famous white
hunter Phillip Percival, whom he admired at once for his cool and sometimes cunning
professionalism. At the end of the safari, Hemingway had filled his mind with images, incidents, and
character studies of unique value for his writings. As the harvest of the trip he wrote the nonfiction
novel Green Hills of Africa, and some of his finest stories. These include “The Short Happy Life of
Francis Macomber” and “The Snows of Kilimanjaro” as well as “An African Story,” which appeared
as a story within a story in The Garden of Eden, a novel published posthumously in May 1986.
In spite of the obvious importance of the Paris years on Hemingway’s development as a writer,
few of his short stories have French settings. He was aware of that fact and in his preface to A
Moveable Feast wistfully mentions subjects that he might have written about, some of which might
have become short stories.
During World War II Hemingway served as a war correspondent covering the Normandy
invasions and the liberation of Paris. It seems that he also assembled a group of extramilitary scouts
keeping pace with the retreating Germans. The balance between fiction and nonfiction in his stories of
the period, including the previously unpublished “Black Ass at the Cross Roads,” may never be
determined.
Toward the end of his life Hemingway wrote two fables for the child of a friend, “The Good
Lion” and “The Faithful Bull,” which were published by Holiday in 1951 and are reprinted here. He
also published two short stories in The Atlantic Monthly, “Get a Seeing-Eyed Dog,” and “A Man of
the World” (both December 20, 1957).
We have grouped seven previously unpublished works of fiction at the back of the book. Four of
these represent completed short stories; the other three comprise extended scenes from unpublished,
uncompleted novels.
All in all, this Finca Vigía edition contains twenty-one stories that were not included in “The
First Forty-nine.” The collection is named for Hemingway’s home in San Francisco de Paula, Cuba.
He lived at Finca Vigía (“Lookout Farm”) on and off during the last two decades of his life. The finca
was dear to his heart and it seems appropriate now that it should contain a major portion of his life
work, which was even more dear.
—CHARLES SCRIBNER, JR.
Part I
“The First Forty-nine”
Preface to
“The First Forty-nine”
THE FIRST FOUR STORIES ARE THE LAST ones I have written.
The others follow in the order in which they were originally published.
The first one I wrote was “Up in Michigan,” written in Paris in 1921. The last was “Old Man at
the Bridge,” cabled from Barcelona in April of 1938.
Beside The Fifth Column, I wrote “The Killers,” “Today Is Friday,” “Ten Indians,” part of The
Sun Also Rises and the first third of To Have and Have Not in Madrid. It was always a good place
for working. So was Paris, and so were Key West, Florida, in the cool months; the ranch, near Cooke
City, Montana; Kansas City; Chicago; Toronto, and Havana, Cuba.
Some other places were not so good but maybe we were not so good when we were in them.
There are many kinds of stories in this book. I hope that you will find some that you like.
Reading them over, the ones I liked the best, outside of those that have achieved some notoriety so
that school teachers include them in story collections that their pupils have to buy in story courses,
and you are always faintly embarrassed to read them and wonder whether you really wrote them or
did you maybe hear them somewhere, are “The Short Happy Life of Francis Macomber,” “In Another
Country,” “Hills Like White Elephants,” “A Way You’ll Never Be,” “The Snows of Kilimanjaro,”
“A Clean, Well-Lighted Place,” and a story called “The Light of the World” which nobody else ever
liked. There are some others too. Because if you did not like them you would not publish them.
In going where you have to go, and doing what you have to do, and seeing what you have to see,
you dull and blunt the instrument you write with. But I would rather have it bent and dull and know I
had to put it on the grindstone again and hammer it into shape and put a whetstone to it, and know that
I had something to write about, than to have it bright and shining and nothing to say, or smooth and
well-oiled in the closet, but unused.
Now it is necessary to get to the grindstone again. I would like to live long enough to write three
more novels and twenty-five more stories. I know some pretty good ones.
ERNEST HEMINGWAY
1938
The Short Happy Life of
Francis Macomber
IT WAS NOW LUNCH TIME AND THEY WERE all sitting under the
double green fly of the dining tent pretending that nothing had happened.
“Will you have lime juice or lemon squash?” Macomber asked.
“I’ll have a gimlet,” Robert Wilson told him.
“I’ll have a gimlet too. I need something,” Macomber’s wife said.
“I suppose it’s the thing to do,” Macomber agreed. “Tell him to make three gimlets.”
The mess boy had started them already, lifting the bottles out of the canvas cooling bags that
sweated wet in the wind that blew through the trees that shaded the tents.
“What had I ought to give them?” Macomber asked.
“A quid would be plenty,” Wilson told him. “You don’t want to spoil them.”
“Will the headman distribute it?”
“Absolutely.”
Francis Macomber had, half an hour before, been carried to his tent from the edge of the camp in
triumph on the arms and shoulders of the cook, the personal boys, the skinner and the porters. The
gun-bearers had taken no part in the demonstration. When the native boys put him down at the door of
his tent, he had shaken all their hands, received their congratulations, and then gone into the tent and
sat on the bed until his wife came in. She did not speak to him when she came in and he left the tent at
once to wash his face and hands in the portable wash basin outside and go over to the dining tent to sit
in a comfortable canvas chair in the breeze and the shade.
“You’ve got your lion,” Robert Wilson said to him, “and a damned fine one too.”
Mrs. Macomber looked at Wilson quickly. She was an extremely handsome and well-kept
woman of the beauty and social position which had, five years before, commanded five thousand
dollars as the price of endorsing, with photographs, a beauty product which she had never used. She
had been married to Francis Macomber for eleven years.
“He is a good lion, isn’t he?” Macomber said. His wife looked at him now. She looked at both
these men as though she had never seen them before.
One, Wilson, the white hunter, she knew she had never truly seen before. He was about middle
height with sandy hair, a stubby mustache, a very red face and extremely cold blue eyes with faint
white wrinkles at the corners that grooved merrily when he smiled. He smiled at her now and she
looked away from his face at the way his shoulders sloped in the loose tunic he wore with the four big
cartridges held in loops where the left breast pocket should have been, at his big brown hands, his old
slacks, his very dirty boots and back to his red face again. She noticed where the baked red of his
face stopped in a white line that marked the circle left by his Stetson hat that hung now from one of the
pegs of the tent pole.
“Well, here’s to the lion,” Robert Wilson said. He smiled at her again and, not smiling, she
looked curiously at her husband.
Francis Macomber was very tall, very well built if you did not mind that length of bone, dark,
his hair cropped like an oarsman, rather thin-lipped, and was considered handsome. He was dressed
in the same sort of safari clothes that Wilson wore except that his were new, he was thirty-five years
old, kept himself very fit, was good at court games, had a number of big-game fishing records, and
had just shown himself, very publicly, to be a coward.
“Here’s to the lion,” he said. “I can’t ever thank you for what you did.”
Margaret, his wife, looked away from him and back to Wilson.
“Let’s not talk about the lion,” she said.
Wilson looked over at her without smiling and now she smiled at him.
“It’s been a very strange day,” she said. “Hadn’t you ought to put your hat on even under the
canvas at noon? You told me that, you know.”
“Might put it on,” said Wilson.
“You know you have a very red face, Mr. Wilson,” she told him and smiled again.
“Drink,” said Wilson.
“I don’t think so,” she said. “Francis drinks a great deal, but his face is never red.”
“It’s red today,” Macomber tried a joke.
“No,” said Margaret. “It’s mine that’s red today. But Mr. Wilson’s is always red.”
“Must be racial,” said Wilson. “I say, you wouldn’t like to drop my beauty as a topic, would
you?”
“I’ve just started on it.”
“Let’s chuck it,” said Wilson.
“Conversation is going to be so difficult,” Margaret said.
“Don’t be silly, Margot,” her husband said.
“No difficulty,” Wilson said. “Got a damn fine lion.”
Margot looked at them both and they both saw that she was going to cry. Wilson had seen it
coming for a long time and he dreaded it. Macomber was past dreading it.
“I wish it hadn’t happened. Oh, I wish it hadn’t happened,” she said and started for her tent. She
made no noise of crying but they could see that her shoulders were shaking under the rose-colored,
sun-proofed shirt she wore.
“Women upset,” said Wilson to the tall man. “Amounts to nothing. Strain on the nerves and one
thing’n another.”
“No,” said Macomber. “I suppose that I rate that for the rest of my life now.”
“Nonsense. Let’s have a spot of the giant killer,” said Wilson. “Forget the whole thing. Nothing
to it anyway.”
“We might try,” said Macomber. “I won’t forget what you did for me though.”
“Nothing,” said Wilson. “All nonsense.”
So they sat there in the shade where the camp was pitched under some wide-topped acacia trees
with a boulder-strewn cliff behind them, and a stretch of grass that ran to the bank of a boulder-filled
stream in front with forest beyond it, and drank their just-cool lime drinks and avoided one another’s
eyes while the boys set the table for lunch. Wilson could tell that the boys all knew about it now and
when he saw Macomber’s personal boy looking curiously at his master while he was putting dishes
on the table he snapped at him in Swahili. The boy turned away with his face blank.
“What were you telling him?” Macomber asked.
“Nothing. Told him to look alive or I’d see he got about fifteen of the best.”
“What’s that? Lashes?”
“It’s quite illegal,” Wilson said. “You’re supposed to fine them.”
“Do you still have them whipped?”
“Oh, yes. They could raise a row if they chose to complain. But they don’t. They prefer it to the
fines.”
“How strange!” said Macomber.
“Not strange, really,” Wilson said. “Which would you rather do? Take a good birching or lose
your pay?”
Then he felt embarrassed at asking it and before Macomber could answer he went on, “We all
take a beating every day, you know, one way or another.”
This was no better. “Good God,” he thought. “I am a diplomat, aren’t I?”
“Yes, we take a beating,” said Macomber, still not looking at him. “I’m awfully sorry about that
lion business. It doesn’t have to go any further, does it? I mean no one will hear about it, will they?”
“You mean will I tell it at the Mathaiga Club?” Wilson looked at him now coldly. He had not
expected this. So he’s a bloody four-letter man as well as a bloody coward, he thought. I rather liked
him too until today. But how is one to know about an American?
“No,” said Wilson. “I’m a professional hunter. We never talk about our clients. You can be quite
easy on that. It’s supposed to be bad form to ask us not to talk though.”
He had decided now that to break would be much easier. He would eat, then, by himself and
could read a book with his meals. They would eat by themselves. He would see them through the
safari on a very formal basis—what was it the French called it? Distinguished consideration—and it
would be a damn sight easier than having to go through this emotional trash. He’d insult him and make
a good clean break. Then he could read a book with his meals and he’d still be drinking their whisky.
That was the phrase for it when a safari went bad. You ran into another white hunter and you asked,
“How is everything going?” and he answered, “Oh, I’m still drinking their whisky,” and you knew
everything had gone to pot.
“I’m sorry,” Macomber said and looked at him with his American face that would stay
adolescent until it became middle-aged, and Wilson noted his crew-cropped hair, fine eyes only
faintly shifty, good nose, thin lips and handsome jaw. “I’m sorry I didn’t realize that. There are lots of
things I don’t know.”
So what could he do, Wilson thought. He was all ready to break it off quickly and neatly and
here the beggar was apologizing after he had just insulted him. He made one more attempt. “Don’t
worry about me talking,” he said. “I have a living to make You know in Africa no woman ever misses
her lion and no white man ever bolts.”
“I bolted like a rabbit,” Macomber said.
Now what in hell were you going to do about a man who talked like that, Wilson wondered.
Wilson looked at Macomber with his flat, blue, machine-gunner’s eyes and the other smiled back
at him. He had a pleasant smile if you did not notice how his eyes showed when he was hurt.
“Maybe I can fix it up on buffalo,” he said. “We’re after them next, aren’t we?”
“In the morning if you like,” Wilson told him. Perhaps he had been wrong. This was certainly the
way to take it. You most certainly could not tell a damned thing about an American. He was all for
Macomber again. If you could forget the morning. But, of course, you couldn’t. The morning had been
about as bad as they come.
“Here comes the Memsahib,” he said. She was walking over from her tent looking refreshed and
cheerful and quite lovely. She had a very perfect oval face, so perfect that you expected her to be
stupid. But she wasn’t stupid, Wilson thought, no, not stupid.
“How is the beautiful red-faced Mr. Wilson? Are you feeling better, Francis, my pearl?”
“Oh, much,” said Macomber.
“I’ve dropped the whole thing,” she said, sitting down at the table. “What importance is there to
whether Francis is any good at killing lions? That’s not his trade. That’s Mr. Wilson’s trade. Mr.
Wilson is really very impressive killing anything. You do kill anything, don’t you?”
“Oh, anything,” said Wilson. “Simply anything.” They are, he thought, the hardest in the world;
the hardest, the cruelest, the most predatory and the most attractive and their men have softened or
gone to pieces nervously as they have hardened. Or is it that they pick men they can handle? They
can’t know that much at the age they marry, he thought. He was grateful that he had gone through his
education on American women before now because this was a very attractive one.
“We’re going after buff in the morning,” he told her.
“I’m coming,” she said.
“No, you’re not.”
“Oh, yes, I am. Mayn’t I, Francis?”
“Why not stay in camp?”
“Not for anything,” she said. “I wouldn’t miss something like today for anything.”
When she left, Wilson was thinking, when she went off to cry, she seemed a hell of a fine
woman. She seemed to understand, to realize, to be hurt for him and for herself and to know how
things really stood. She is away for twenty minutes and now she is back, simply enamelled in that
American female cruelty. They are the damnedest women. Really the damnedest.
“We’ll put on another show for you tomorrow,” Francis Macomber said.
“You’re not coming,” Wilson said.
“You’re very mistaken,” she told him. “And I want so to see you perform again. You were
lovely this morning. That is if blowing things’ heads off is lovely.”
“Here’s the lunch,” said Wilson. “You’re very merry, aren’t you?”
“Why not? I didn’t come out here to be dull.”
“Well, it hasn’t been dull,” Wilson said. He could see the boulders in the river and the high bank
beyond with the trees and he remembered the morning.
“Oh, no,” she said. “It’s been charming. And tomorrow. You don’t know how I look forward to
tomorrow.”
“That’s eland he’s offering you,” Wilson said.
“They’re the big cowy things that jump like hares, aren’t they?”
“I suppose that describes them,” Wilson said.
“It’s very good meat,” Macomber said.
“Did you shoot it, Francis?” she asked.
“Yes.”
“They’re not dangerous, are they?”
“Only if they fall on you,” Wilson told her.
“I’m so glad.”
“Why not let up on the bitchery just a little, Margot,” Macomber said, cutting the eland steak and
putting some mashed potato, gravy and carrot on the down-turned fork that tined through the piece of
meat.
“I suppose I could,” she said, “since you put it so prettily.” “Tonight we’ll have champagne for
the lion,” Wilson said. “It’s a bit too hot at noon.”
“Oh, the lion,” Margot said. “I’d forgotten the lion!” So, Robert Wilson thought to himself, she is
giving him a ride, isn’t she? Or do you suppose that’s her idea of putting up a good show? How
should a woman act when she discovers her husband is a bloody coward? She’s damn cruel but
they’re all cruel. They govern, of course, and to govern one has to be cruel sometimes. Still, I’ve seen
enough of their damn terrorism.
“Have some more eland,” he said to her politely.
That afternoon, late, Wilson and Macomber went out in the motor car with the native driver and
the two gun-bearers. Mrs. Macomber stayed in the camp. It was too hot to go out, she said, and she
was going with them in the early morning. As they drove off Wilson saw her standing under the big
tree, looking pretty rather than beautiful in her faintly rosy khaki, her dark hair drawn back off her
forehead and gathered in a knot low on her neck, her face as fresh, he thought, as though she were in
England. She waved to them as the car went off through the swale of high grass and curved around
through the trees into the small hills of orchard bush.
In the orchard bush they found a herd of impala, and leaving the car they stalked one old ram
with long, wide-spread horns and Macomber killed it with a very creditable shot that knocked the
buck down at a good two hundred yards and sent the herd off bounding wildly and leaping over one
another’s backs in long, leg-drawn-up leaps as unbelievable and as floating as those one makes
sometimes in dreams.
“That was a good shot,” Wilson said. “They’re a small target.”
“Is it a worth-while head?” Macomber asked.
“It’s excellent,” Wilson told him. “You shoot like that and you’ll have no trouble.”
“Do you think we’ll find buffalo tomorrow?”
“There’s a good chance of it. They feed out early in the morning and with luck we may catch
them in the open.”
“I’d like to clear away that lion business,” Macomber said. “It’s not very pleasant to have your
wife see you do something like that.”
I should think it would be even more unpleasant to do it, Wilson thought, wife or no wife, or to
talk about it having done it. But he said, “I wouldn’t think about that any more. Any one could be upset
by his first lion. That’s all over.”
But that night after dinner and a whisky and soda by the fire before going to bed, as Francis
Macomber lay on his cot with the mosquito bar over him and listened to the night noises it was not all
over. It was neither all over nor was it beginning. It was there exactly as it happened with some parts
of it indelibly emphasized and he was miserably ashamed at it. But more than shame he felt cold,
hollow fear in him. The fear was still there like a cold slimy hollow in all the emptiness where once
his confidence had been and it made him feel sick. It was still there with him now.
It had started the night before when he had wakened and heard the lion roaring somewhere up
along the river. It was a deep sound and at the end there were sort of coughing grunts that made him
seem just outside the tent, and when Francis Macomber woke in the night to hear it he was afraid. He
could hear his wife breathing quietly, asleep. There was no one to tell he was afraid, nor to be afraid
with him, and, lying alone, he did not know the Somali proverb that says a brave man is always
frightened three times by a lion; when he first sees his track, when he first hears him roar and when he
first confronts him. Then while they were eating breakfast by lantern light out in the dining tent, before
the sun was up, the lion roared again and Francis thought he was just at the edge of camp.
“Sounds like an old-timer,” Robert Wilson said, looking up from his kippers and coffee. “Listen
to him cough.”
“Is he very close?”
“A mile or so up the stream.”
“Will we see him?”
“We’ll have a look.”
“Does his roaring carry that far? It sounds as though he were right in camp.”
“Carries a hell of a long way,” said Robert Wilson. “It’s strange the way it carries. Hope he’s a
shootable cat. The boys said there was a very big one about here.”
“If I get a shot, where should I hit him,” Macomber asked, “to stop him?”
“In the shoulders,” Wilson said. “In the neck if you can make it. Shoot for bone. Break him
down.”
“I hope I can place it properly,” Macomber said.
“You shoot very well,” Wilson told him. “Take your time. Make sure of him. The first one in is
the one that counts.”
“What range will it be?”
“Can’t tell. Lion has something to say about that. Don’t shoot unless it’s close enough so you can
make sure.”
“At under a hundred yards?” Macomber asked.
Wilson looked at him quickly.
“Hundred’s about right. Might have to take him a bit under. Shouldn’t chance a shot at much over
that. A hundred’s a decent range. You can hit him wherever you want at that. Here comes the
Memsahib.”
“Good morning,” she said. “Are we going after that lion?”
“As soon as you deal with your breakfast,” Wilson said. “How are you feeling?”
“Marvellous,” she said. “I’m very excited.”
“I’ll just go and see that everything is ready.” Wilson went off. As he left the lion roared again.
“Noisy beggar,” Wilson said. “We’ll put a stop to that.”
“What’s the matter, Francis?” his wife asked him.
“Nothing,” Macomber said.
“Yes, there is,” she said. “What are you upset about?”
“Nothing,” he said.
“Tell me,” she looked at him. “Don’t you feel well?”
“It’s that damned roaring,” he said. “It’s been going on all night, you know.”
“Why didn’t you wake me,” she said. “I’d love to have heard it.”
“I’ve got to kill the damned thing,” Macomber said, miserably.
“Well, that’s what you’re out here for, isn’t it?”
“Yes. But I’m nervous. Hearing the thing roar gets on my nerves.”
“Well then, as Wilson said, kill him and stop his roaring.”
“Yes, darling,” said Francis Macomber. “It sounds easy, doesn’t it?”
“You’re not afraid, are you?”
“Of course not. But I’m nervous from hearing him roar all night.”
“You’ll kill him marvellously,” she said. “I know you will. I’m awfully anxious to see it.”
“Finish your breakfast and we’ll be starting.”
“It’s not light yet,” she said. “This is a ridiculous hour.”
Just then the lion roared in a deep-chested moaning, suddenly guttural, ascending vibration that
seemed to shake the air and ended in a sigh and a heavy, deep-chested grunt.
“He sounds almost here,” Macomber’s wife said.
“My God,” said Macomber. “I hate that damned noise.”
“It’s very impressive.”
“Impressive. It’s frightful.”
Robert Wilson came up then carrying his short, ugly, shockingly big-bored .505 Gibbs and
grinning.
“Come on,” he said. “Your gun-bearer has your Springfield and the big gun. Everything’s in the
car. Have you solids?”
“Yes.”
“I’m ready,” Mrs. Macomber said.
“Must make him stop that racket,” Wilson said. “You get in front. The Memsahib can sit back
here with me.”
They climbed into the motor car and, in the gray first daylight, moved off up the river through the
trees. Macomber opened the breech of his rifle and saw he had metal-cased bullets, shut the bolt and
put the rifle on safety. He saw his hand was trembling. He felt in his pocket for more cartridges and
moved his fingers over the cartridges in the loops of his tunic front. He turned back to where Wilson
sat in the rear seat of the doorless, box-bodied motor car beside his wife, them both grinning with
excitement, and Wilson leaned forward and whispered,
“See the birds dropping. Means the old boy has left his kill.”
On the far bank of the stream Macomber could see, above the trees, vultures circling and
plummeting down.
“Chances are he’ll come to drink along here,” Wilson whispered. “Before he goes to lay up.
Keep an eye out.”
They were driving slowly along the high bank of the stream which here cut deeply to its boulderfilled bed, and they wound in and out through big trees as they drove. Macomber was watching the
opposite bank when he felt Wilson take hold of his arm. The car stopped.
“There he is,” he heard the whisper. “Ahead and to the right. Get out and take him. He’s a
marvellous lion.”
Macomber saw the lion now. He was standing almost broadside, his great head up and turned
toward them. The early morning breeze that blew toward them was just stirring his dark mane, and the
lion looked huge, silhouetted on the rise of bank in the gray morning light, his shoulders heavy, his
barrel of a body bulking smoothly.
“How far is he?” asked Macomber, raising his rifle.
“About seventy-five. Get out and take him.”
“Why not shoot from where I am?”
“You don’t shoot them from cars,” he heard Wilson saying in his ear. “Get out. He’s not going to
stay there all day.”
Macomber stepped out of the curved opening at the side of the front seat, onto the step and down
onto the ground. The lion still stood looking majestically and coolly toward this object that his eyes
only showed in silhouette, bulking like some super-rhino. There was no man smell carried toward
him and he watched the object, moving his great head a little from side to side. Then watching the
object, not afraid, but hesitating before going down the bank to drink with such a thing opposite him,
he saw a man figure detach itself from it and he turned his heavy head and swung away toward the
cover of the trees as he heard a cracking crash and felt the slam of a .30-06 220-grain solid bullet that
bit his flank and ripped in sudden hot scalding nausea through his stomach. He trotted, heavy,
bigfooted, swinging wounded full-bellied, through the trees toward the tall grass and cover, and the
crash came again to go past him ripping the air apart. Then it crashed again and he felt the blow as it
hit his lower ribs and ripped on through, blood sudden hot and frothy in his mouth, and he galloped
toward the high grass where he could crouch and not be seen and make them bring the crashing thing
close enough so he could make a rush and get the man that held it.
Macomber had not thought how the lion felt as he got out of the car. He only knew his hands
were shaking and as he walked away from the car it was almost impossible for him to make his legs
move. They were stiff in the thighs, but he could feel the muscles fluttering. He raised the rifle,
sighted on the junction of the lion’s head and shoulders and pulled the trigger. Nothing happened
though he pulled until he thought his finger would break. Then he knew he had the safety on and as he
lowered the rifle to move the safety over he moved another frozen pace forward, and the lion seeing
his silhouette flow clear of the silhouette of the car, turned and started off at a trot, and, as Macomber
fired, he heard a whunk that meant that the bullet was home; but the lion kept on going. Macomber shot
again and every one saw the bullet throw a spout of dirt beyond the trotting lion. He shot again,
remembering to lower his aim, and they all heard the bullet hit, and the lion went into a gallop and
was in the tall grass before he had the bolt pushed forward.
Macomber stood there feeling sick at his stomach, his hands that held the Springfield still
cocked, shaking, and his wife and Robert Wilson were standing by him. Beside him too were the two
gun-bearers chattering in Wakamba.
“I hit him,” Macomber said. “I hit him twice.”
“You gut-shot him and you hit him somewhere forward,” Wilson said without enthusiasm. The
gun-bearers looked very grave. They were silent now.
“You may have killed him,” Wilson went on. “We’ll have to wait a while before we go in to
find out”
“What do you mean?”
“Let him get sick before we follow him up.”
“Oh,” said Macomber.
“He’s a hell of a fine lion,” Wilson said cheerfully. “He’s gotten into a bad place though.”
“Why is it bad?”
“Can’t see him until you’re on him.”
“Oh,” said Macomber.
“Come on,” said Wilson. “The Memsahib can stay here in the car. We’ll go to have a look at the
blood spoor.”
“Stay here, Margot,” Macomber said to his wife. His mouth was very dry and it was hard for
him to talk.
“Why?” she asked.
“Wilson says to.”
“We’re going to have a look,” Wilson said. “You stay here. You can see even better from here.”
“All right.”
Wilson spoke in Swahili to the driver. He nodded and said, “Yes, Bwana.”
Then they went down the steep bank and across the stream, climbing over and around the
boulders and up the other bank, pulling up by some projecting roots, and along it until they found
where the lion had been trotting when Macomber first shot. There was dark blood on the short grass
that the gun-bearers pointed out with grass stems, and that ran away behind the river bank trees.
“What do we do?” asked Macomber.
“Not much choice,” said Wilson. “We can’t bring the car over. Bank’s too steep. We’ll let him
stiffen up a bit and then you and I’ll go in and have a look for him.”
“Can’t we set the grass on fire?” Macomber asked.
“Too green.”
“Can’t we send beaters?”
Wilson looked at him appraisingly. “Of course we can,” he said. “But it’s just a touch
murderous. You see, we know the lion’s wounded. You can drive an unwounded lion—he’ll move on
ahead of a noise—but a wounded lion’s going to charge. You can’t see him until you’re right on him.
He’ll make himself perfectly flat in cover you wouldn’t think would hide a hare. You can’t very well
send boys in there to that sort of a show. Somebody bound to get mauled.”
“What about the gun-bearers?”
“Oh, they’ll go with us. It’s their shauri. You see, they signed on for it. They don’t look too
happy though, do they?”
“I don’t want to go in there,” said Macomber. It was out before he knew he’d said it.
“Neither do I,” said Wilson very cheerily. “Really no choice though.” Then, as an afterthought,
he glanced at Macomber and saw suddenly how he was trembling and the pitiful look on his face.
“You don’t have to go in, of course,” he said. “That’s what I’m hired for, you know. That’s why
I’m so expensive.”
“You mean you’d go in by yourself? Why not leave him there?”
Robert Wilson, whose entire occupation had been with the lion and the problem he presented,
and who had not been thinking about Macomber except to note that he was rather windy, suddenly felt
as though he had opened the wrong door in a hotel and seen something shameful.
“What do you mean?”
“Why not just leave him?”
“You mean pretend to ourselves he hasn’t been hit?”
“No. Just drop it.”
“It isn’t done.”
“Why not?”
“For one thing, he’s certain to be suffering. For another, some one else might run onto him.”
“I see.”
“But you don’t have to have anything to do with it.”
“I’d like to,” Macomber said. “I’m just scared, you know.”
“I’ll go ahead when we go in,” Wilson said, “with Kongoni tracking. You keep behind me and a
little to one side. Chances are we’ll hear him growl. If we see him we’ll both shoot. Don’t worry
about anything. I’ll keep you backed up. As a matter of fact, you know, perhaps you’d better not go. It
might be much better. Why don’t you go over and join the Memsahib while I just get it over with?”
“No, I want to go.”
“All right,” said Wilson. “But don’t go in if you don’t want to. This is my shauri now, you
know.”
“I want to go,” said Macomber.
They sat under a tree and smoked.
“Want to go back and speak to the Memsahib while we’re waiting?” Wilson asked.
“No.”
“I’ll just step back and tell her to be patient.”
“Good,” said Macomber. He sat there, sweating under his arms, his mouth dry, his stomach
hollow feeling, wanting to find courage to tell Wilson to go on and finish off the lion without him. He
could not know that Wilson was furious because he had not noticed the state he was in earlier and
sent him back to his wife. While he sat there Wilson came up. “I have your big gun,” he said. “Take it.
We’ve given him time, I think. Come on.”
Macomber took the big gun and Wilson said:
“Keep behind me and about five yards to the right and do exactly as I tell you.” Then he spoke in
Swahili to the two gun-bearers who looked the picture of gloom.
“Let’s go,” he said.
“Could I have a drink of water?” Macomber asked. Wilson spoke to the older gun-bearer, who
wore a canteen on his belt, and the man unbuckled it, unscrewed the top and handed it to Macomber,
who took it noticing how heavy it seemed and how hairy and shoddy the felt covering was in his hand.
He raised it to drink and looked ahead at the high grass with the flat-topped trees behind it. A breeze
was blowing toward them and the grass rippled gently in the wind. He looked at the gun-bearer and
he could see the gun-bearer was suffering too with fear.
Thirty-five yards into the grass the big lion lay flattened out along the ground. His ears were
back and his only movement was a slight twitching up and down of his long, black-tufted tail. He had
turned at bay as soon as he had reached this cover and he was sick with the wound through his full
belly, and weakening with the wound through his lungs that brought a thin foamy red to his mouth each
time he breathed. His flanks were wet and hot and flies were on the little openings the solid bullets
had made in his tawny hide, and his big yellow eyes, narrowed with hate, looked straight ahead, only
blinking when the pain came as he breathed, and his claws dug in the soft baked earth. All of him,
pain, sickness, hatred and all of his remaining strength, was tightening into an absolute concentration
for a rush. He could hear the men talking and he waited, gathering all of himself into this preparation
for a charge as soon as the men would come into the grass. As he heard their voices his tail stiffened
to twitch up and down, and, as they came into the edge of the grass, he made a coughing grunt and
charged.
Kongoni, the old gun-bearer, in the lead watching the blood spoor, Wilson watching the grass for
any movement, his big gun ready, the second gun-bearer looking ahead and listening, Macomber close
to Wilson, his rifle cocked, they had just moved into the grass when Macomber heard the bloodchoked coughing grunt, and saw the swishing rush in the grass. The next thing he knew he was running;
running wildly, in panic in the open, running toward the stream.
He heard the ca-ra-wong! of Wilson’s big rifle, and again in a second crashing carawong! and
turning saw the lion, horrible-looking now, with half his head seeming to be gone, crawling toward
Wilson in the edge of the tall grass while the red-faced man worked the bolt on the short ugly rifle and
aimed carefully as another blasting carawong! came from the muzzle, and the crawling, heavy, yellow
bulk of the lion stiffened and the huge, mutilated head slid forward and Macomber, standing by
himself in the clearing where he had run, holding a loaded rifle, while two black men and a white man
looked back at him in contempt, knew the lion was dead. He came toward Wilson, his tallness all
seeming a naked reproach, and Wilson looked at him and said:
“Want to take pictures?”
“No,” he said.
That was all any one had said until they reached the motor car. Then Wilson had said:
“Hell of a fine lion. Boys will skin him out. We might as well stay here in the shade.”
Macomber’s wife had not looked at him nor he at her and he had sat by her in the back seat with
Wilson sitting in the front seat. Once he had reached over and taken his wife’s hand without looking at
her and she had removed her hand from his. Looking across the stream to where the gun-bearers were
skinning out the lion he could see that she had been able to see the whole thing. While they sat there
his wife had reached forward and put her hand on Wilson’s shoulder. He turned and she had leaned
forward over the low seat and kissed him on the mouth.
“Oh, I say,” said Wilson, going redder than his natural baked color.
“Mr. Robert Wilson,” she said. “The beautiful red-faced Mr. Robert Wilson.”
Then she sat down beside Macomber again and looked away across the stream to where the lion
lay, with uplifted, white-muscled, tendon-marked naked forearms, and white bloating belly, as the
black men fleshed away the skin. Finally the gun-bearers brought the skin over, wet and heavy, and
climbed in behind with it, rolling it up before they got in, and the motor car started. No one had said
anything more until they were back in camp.
That was the story of the lion. Macomber did not know how the lion had felt before he started his
rush, nor during it when the unbelievable smash of the .505 with a muzzle velocity of two tons had hit
him in the mouth, nor what kept him coming after that, when the second ripping crash had smashed his
hind quarters and he had come crawling on toward the crashing, blasting thing that had destroyed him.
Wilson knew something about it and only expressed it by saying, “Damned fine lion,” but Macomber
did not know how Wilson felt about things either. He did not know how his wife felt except that she
was through with him.
His wife had been through with him before but it never lasted. He was very wealthy, and would
be much wealthier, and he knew she would not leave him ever now. That was one of the few things
that he really knew. He knew about that, about motor cycles—that was earliest—about motor cars,
about duck-shooting, about fishing, trout, salmon and big-sea, about sex in books, many books, too
many books, about all court games, about dogs, not much about horses, about hanging on to his money,
about most of the other things his world dealt in, and about his wife not leaving him. His wife had
been a great beauty and she was still a great beauty in Africa, but she was not a great enough beauty
any more at home to be able to leave him and better herself and she knew it and he knew it. She had
missed the chance to leave him and he knew it. If he had been better with women she would probably
have started to worry about him getting another new, beautiful wife; but she knew too much about him
to worry about him either. Also, he had always had a great tolerance which seemed the nicest thing
about him if it were not the most sinister.
All in all they were known as a comparatively happily married couple, one of those whose
disruption is often rumored but never occurs, and as the society columnist put it, they were adding
more than a spice of adventure to their much envied and ever-enduring Romance by a Safari in what
was known as Darkest Africa until the Martin Johnsons lighted it on so many silver screens where
they were pursuing Old Simba the lion, the buffalo, Tembo the elephant and as well collecting
specimens for the Museum of Natural History. This same columnist had reported them on the verge at
least three times in the past and they had been. But they always made it up. They had a sound basis of
union. Margot was too beautiful for Macomber to divorce her and Macomber had too much money for
Margot ever to leave him.
It was now about three o’clock in the morning and Francis Macomber, who had been asleep a
little while after he had stopped thinking about the lion, wakened and then slept again, woke suddenly,
frightened in a dream of the bloody-headed lion standing over him, and listening while his heart
pounded, he realized that his wife was not in the other cot in the tent. He lay awake with that
knowledge for two hours.
At the end of that time his wife came into the tent, lifted her mosquito bar and crawled cozily
into bed.
“Where have you been?” Macomber asked in the darkness.
“Hello,” she said. “Are you awake?”
“Where have you been?”
“I just went out to get a breath of air.”
“You did, like hell.”
“What do you want me to say, darling?”
“Where have you been?”
“Out to get a breath of air.”
“That’s a new name for it. You are a bitch.”
“Well, you’re a coward.”
“All right,” he said. “What of it?”
“Nothing as far as I’m concerned. But please let’s not talk, darling, because I’m very sleepy.”
“You think that I’ll take anything.”
“I know you will, sweet.”
“Well, I won’t.”
“Please, darling, let’s not talk. I’m so very sleepy.”
“There wasn’t going to be any of that. You promised there wouldn’t be.”
“Well, there is now,” she said sweetly.
“You said if we made this trip that there would be none of that. You promised.”
“Yes, darling. That’s the way I meant it to be. But the trip was spoiled yesterday. We don’t have
to talk about it, do we?”
“You don’t wait long when you have an advantage, do you?”
“Please let’s not talk. I’m so sleepy, darling.”
“I’m going to talk.”
“Don’t mind me then, because I’m going to sleep.” And she did.
At breakfast they were all three at the table before daylight and Francis Macomber found that, of
all the many men that he had hated, he hated Robert Wilson the most.
“Sleep well?” Wilson asked in his throaty voice, filling a pipe.
“Did you?”
“Topping,” the white hunter told him.
You bastard, thought MaComber, you insolent bastard.
So she woke him when she came in, Wilson thought, looking at them both with his flat, cold eyes.
Well, why doesn’t he keep his wife where she belongs? What does he think I am, a bloody plaster
saint? Let him keep her where she belongs. It’s his own fault.
“Do you think we’ll find buffalo?” Margot asked, pushing away a dish of apricots.
“Chance of it,” Wilson said and smiled at her. “Why don’t you stay in camp?”
“Not for anything,” she told him.
“Why not order her to stay in camp?” Wilson said to Macomber.
“You order her,” said Macomber coldly.
“Let’s not have any ordering, nor,” turning to Macomber, “any silliness. Francis,” Margot said
quite pleasantly.
“Are you ready to start?” Macomber asked.
“Any time,” Wilson told him. “Do you want the Memsahib to go?”
“Does it make any difference whether I do or not?”
The hell with it, thought Robert Wilson. The utter complete hell with it. So this is what it’s going
to be like. Well, this is what it’s going to be like, then.
“Makes no difference,” he said.
“You’re sure you wouldn’t like to stay in camp with her yourself and let me go out and hunt the
buffalo?” Macomber asked.
“Can’t do that,” said Wilson. “Wouldn’t talk rot if I were you.”
“I’m not talking rot. I’m disgusted.”
“Bad word, disgusted.”
“Francis, will you please try to speak sensibly,” his wife said.
“I speak too damned sensibly,” Macomber said. “Did you ever eat such filthy food?”
“Something wrong with the food?” asked Wilson quietly.
“No more than with everything else.”
“I’d pull yourself together, laddybuck,” Wilson said very quietly. “There’s a boy waits at table
that understands a little English.”
“The hell with him.”
Wilson stood up and puffing on his pipe strolled away, speaking a few words in Swahili to one
of the gun-bearers who was standing waiting for him. Macomber and his wife sat on at the table. He
was staring at his coffee cup.
“If you make a scene I’ll leave you, darling,” Margot said quietly.
“No, you won’t.”
“You can try it and see.”
“You won’t leave me.”
“No,” she said. “I won’t leave you and you’ll behave your self.”
“Behave myself? That’s a way to talk. Behave myself.”
“Yes. Behave yourself.”
“Why don’t you try behaving?”
“I’ve tried it so long. So very long.”
“I hate that red-faced swine,” Macomber said. “I loathe the sight of him.”
“He’s really very nice.”
“Oh, shut up,” Macomber almost shouted. Just then the car came up and stopped in front of the
dining tent and the driver and the two gunbearers got out. Wilson walked over and looked at the
husband and wife sitting there at the table.
“Going shooting?” he asked.
“Yes,” said Macomber, standing up. “Yes.”
“Better bring a woolly. It will be cool in the car,” Wilson said.
“I’ll get my leather jacket,” Margot said.
“The boy has it,” Wilson told her. He climbed into the front with the driver and Francis
Macomber and his wife sat, not speaking, in the back seat.
Hope the silly beggar doesn’t take a notion to blow the back of my head off, Wilson thought to
himself. Women are a nuisance on safari.
The car was grinding down to cross the river at a pebbly ford in the gray daylight and then
climbed, angling up the steep bank, where Wilson had ordered a way shovelled out the day before so
they could reach the parklike wooded rolling country on the far side.
It was a good morning, Wilson thought. There was a heavy dew and as the wheels went through
the grass and low bushes he could smell the odor of the crushed fronds. It was an odor like verbena
and he liked this early morning smell of the dew, the crushed bracken and the look of the tree trunks
showing black through the early morning mist, as the car made its way through the untracked, parklike
country. He had put the two in the back seat out of his mind now and was thinking about buffalo. The
buffalo that he was after stayed in the daytime in a thick swamp where it was impossible to get a shot,
but in the night they fed out into an open stretch of country and if he could come between them and
their swamp with the car, Macomber would have a good chance at them in the open. He did not want
to hunt buff with Macomber in thick cover. He did not want to hunt buff or anything else with
Macomber at all, but he was a professional hunter and he had hunted with some rare ones in his time.
If they got buff today there would only be rhino to come and the poor man would have gone through
his dangerous game and things might pick up. He’d have nothing more to do with the woman and
Macomber would get over that too. He must have gone through plenty of that before by the look of
things. Poor beggar. He must have a way of getting over it. Well, it was the poor sod’s own bloody
fault.
He, Robert Wilson, carried a double size cot on safari to accommodate any windfalls he might
receive. He had hunted for a certain clientele, the international, fast, sporting set, where the women
did not feel they were getting their money’s worth unless they had shared that cot with the white
hunter. He despised them when he was away from them although he liked some of them well enough at
the time, but he made his living by them; and their standards were his standards as long as they were
hiring him.
They were his standards in all except the shooting. He had his own standards about the killing
and they could live up to them or get some one else to hunt them. He knew, too, that they all respected
him for this. This Macomber was an odd one though. Damned if he wasn’t. Now the wife. Well, the
wife. Yes, the wife. Hm, the wife. Well he’d dropped all that. He looked around at them. Macomber
sat grim and furious. Margot smiled at him. She looked younger today, more innocent and fresher and
not so professionally beautiful. What’s in her heart God knows, Wilson thought. She hadn’t talked
much last night. At that it was a pleasure to see her.
The motor car climbed up a slight rise and went on through the trees and then out into a grassy
prairie-like opening and kept in the shelter of the trees along the edge, the driver going slowly and
Wilson looking carefully out across the prairie and all along its far side. He stopped the car and
studied the opening with his field glasses. Then he motioned to the driver to go on and the car moved
slowly along, the driver avoiding warthog holes and driving around the mud castles ants had built.
Then, looking across the opening, Wilson suddenly turned and said,
“By God, there they are!”
And looking where he pointed, while the car jumped forward and Wilson spoke in rapid Swahili
to the driver, Macomber saw three huge, black animals looking almost cylindrical in their long
heaviness, like big black tank cars, moving at a gallop across the far edge of the open prairie. They
moved at a stiff-necked, stiff bodied gallop and he could see the upswept wide black horns on their
heads as they galloped heads out; the heads not moving.
“They’re three old bulls,” Wilson said. “We’ll cut them off before they get to the swamp.”
The car was going a wild forty-five miles an hour across the open and as Macomber watched,
the buffalo got bigger and bigger until he could see the gray, hairless, scabby look of one huge bull
and how his neck was a part of his shoulders and the shiny black of his horns as he galloped a little
behind the others that were strung out in that steady plunging gait; and then, the car swaying as though
it had just jumped a road, they drew up close and he could see the plunging hugeness of the bull, and
the dust in his sparsely haired hide, the wide boss of horn and his outstretched, wide-nostrilled
muzzle, and he was raising his rifle when Wilson shouted, “Not from the car, you fool!” and he had no
fear, only hatred of Wilson, while the brakes clamped on and the car skidded, plowing sideways to an
almost stop and Wilson was out on one side and he on the other, stumbling as his feet hit the still
speeding-by of the earth, and then he was shooting at the bull as he moved away, hearing the bullets
whunk into him, emptying his rifle at him as he moved steadily away, finally remembering to get his
shots forward into the shoulder, and as he fumbled to re-load, he saw the bull was down. Down on
his knees, his big head tossing, and seeing the other two still galloping he shot at the leader and hit
him. He shot again and missed and he heard the carawonging roar as Wilson shot and saw the leading
bull slide forward onto his nose.
“Get that other,” Wilson said. “Now you’re shooting!”
But the other bull was moving steadily at the same gallop and he missed, throwing a spout of
dirt, and Wilson missed and the dust rose in a cloud and Wilson shouted, “Come on. He’s too far!”
and grabbed his arm and they were in the car again, Macomber and Wilson hanging on the sides and
rocketing swayingly over the uneven ground, drawing up on the steady, plunging, heavy-necked,
straight-moving gallop of the bull.
They were behind him and Macomber was filling his rifle, dropping shells onto the ground,
jamming it, clearing the jam, then they were almost up with the bull when Wilson yelled “Stop,” and
the car skidded so that it almost swung over and Macomber fell forward onto his feet, slammed his
bolt forward and fired as far forward as he could aim into the galloping, rounded black back, aimed
and shot again, then again, then again, and the bullets, all of them hitting, had no effect on the buffalo
that he could see. Then Wilson shot, the roar deafening him, and he could see the bull stagger.
Macomber shot again, aiming carefully, and down he came, onto his knees.
“All right,” Wilson said. “Nice work. That’s the three.”
Macomber felt a drunken elation.
“How many times did you shoot?” he asked.
“Just three,” Wilson said. “You killed the first bull. The biggest one. I helped you finish the other
two. Afraid they might have got into cover. You had them killed. I was just mopping up a little. You
shot damn well.” “Let’s go to the car,” said Macomber. “I want a drink.” “Got to finish off that buff
first,” Wilson told him. The buffalo was on his knees and he jerked his head furiously and bellowed
in pig-eyed, roaring rage as they came toward him.
“Watch he doesn’t get up,” Wilson said. Then, “Get a little broadside and take him in the neck
just behind the ear.”
Macomber aimed carefully at the center of the huge, jerking, rage-driven neck and shot. At the
shot the head dropped forward.
“That does it,” said Wilson. “Got the spine. They’re a hell of a looking thing, aren’t they?”
“Let’s get the drink,” said Macomber. In his life he had never felt so good.
In the car Macomber’s wife sat very white-faced. “You were marvellous, darling,” she said to
Macomber. “What a ride.”
“Was it rough?” Wilson asked.
“It was frightful. I’ve never been more frightened in my life.”
“Let’s all have a drink,” Macomber said.
“By all means,” said Wilson. “Give it to the Memsahib.” She drank the neat whisky from the
flask and shuddered a little when she swallowed. She handed the flask to Macomber who handed it to
Wilson.
“It was frightfully exciting,” she said. “It’s given me a dreadful headache. I didn’t know you
were allowed to shoot them from cars though.
“No one shot from cars,” said Wilson coldly.
“I mean chase them from cars.”
“Wouldn’t ordinarily,” Wilson said. “Seemed sporting enough to me though while we were
doing it. Taking more chance driving that way across the plain full of holes and one thing and another
than hunting on foot. Buffalo could have charged us each time we shot if he liked. Gave him every
chance. Wouldn’t mention it to any one though. It’s illegal if that’s what you mean.”
“It seemed very unfair to me,” Margot said, “chasing those big helpless things in a motor car.”
“Did it?” said Wilson.
“What would happen if they heard about it in Nairobi?”
“I’d lose my licence for one thing. Other unpleasantnesses,” Wilson said, taking a drink from the
flask. “I’d be out of business.”
“Really?”
“Yes, really.”
“Well,” said Macomber, and he smiled for the first time all day. “Now she has something on
you.”
“You have such a pretty way of putting things, Francis,” Margot Macomber said. Wilson looked
at them both. If a four-letter man marries a five-letter woman, he was thinking, what number of letters
would their children be? What he said was, “We lost a gun-bearer. Did you notice it?”
“My God, no,” Macomber said.
“Here he comes,” Wilson said. “He’s all right. He must have fallen off when we left the first
bull.”
Approaching them was the middle-aged gun-bearer, limping along in his knitted cap, khaki tunic,
shorts and rubber sandals, gloomy-faced and disgusted looking. As he came up he called out to
Wilson in Swahili and they all saw the change in the white hunter’s face.
“What does he say?” asked Margot.
“He says the first bull got up and went into the bush,” Wilson said with no expression in his
voice.
“Oh,” said Macomber blankly.
“Then it’s going to be just like the lion,” said Margot, rull of anticipation.
“It’s not going to be a damned bit like the lion,” Wilson told her. “Did you want another drink,
Macomber?”
“Thanks, yes,” Macomber said. He expected the feeling he had had about the lion to come back
but it did not. For the first time in his life he really felt wholly without fear. Instead of fear he had a
feeling of definite elation.
“We’ll go and have a look at the second bull,” Wilson said. “I’ll tell the driver to put the car in
the shade.”
“What are you going to do?” asked Margaret Macomber.
“Take a look at the buff,” Wilson said.
“I’ll come.”
“Come along.”
The three of them walked over to where the second buffalo bulked blackly in the open, head
forward on the grass, the massive horns swung wide.
“He’s a very good head,” Wilson said. “That’s dose to a fifty-inch spread.”
Macomber was looking at him with delight.
“He’s hateful looking,” said Margot. “Can’t we go into the shade?”
“Of course,” Wilson said. “Look,” he said to Macomber, and pointed. “See that patch of bush?”
“Yes.”
“That’s where the first bull went in. The gun-bearer said when he fell off the bull was down. He
was watching us helling along and the other two buff galloping. When he looked up there was the bull
up and looking at him. Gun-bearer ran like hell and the bull went off slowly into that bush.”
“Can we go in after him now?” asked Macomber eagerly.
Wilson looked at him appraisingly. Damned if this isn’t a strange one, he thought. Yesterday he’s
scared sick and today he’s a ruddy fire eater.
“No, we’ll give him a while.”
“Let’s please go into the shade,” Margot said. Her face was white and she looked ill.
They made their way to the car where it stood under a single, wide-spreading tree and all
climbed in.
“Chances are he’s dead in there,” Wilson remarked. “After a little we’ll have a look.”
Macomber felt a wild unreasonable happiness that he had never known before.
“By God, that, was a chase,” he said. “I’ve never felt any such feeling. Wasn’t it marvellous,
Margot?”
“I hated it.”
“Why?”
“I hated it,” she said bitterly. “I loathed it.”
“You know I don’t think I’d ever be afraid of anything again,” Macomber said to Wilson.
“Something happened in me after we first saw the buff and started after him. Like a dam bursting. It
was pure excitement.”
“Cleans out your liver,” said Wilson. “Damn funny things happen to people.”
Macomber’s face was shining. “You know something did happen to me,” he said. “I feel
absolutely different.”
His wife said nothing and eyed him strangely. She was sitting far back in the seat and Macomber
was sitting forward talking to Wilson who turned sideways talking over the back of the front seat.
“You know, I’d like to try another lion,” Macomber said. “I’m really not afraid of them now.
After all, what can they do to you?”
“That’s it,” said Wilson. “Worst one can do is kill you. How does it go? Shakespeare. Damned
good. See if I can remember. Oh, damned good. Used to quote it to myself at one time. Let’s see. ‘By
my troth, I care not; a man can die but once; we owe God a death and let it go which way it will, he
that dies this year is quit for the next.’ Damned fine, eh?”
He was very embarrassed, having brought out this thing he had lived by, but he had seen men
come of age before and it always moved him. It was not a matter of their twenty-first birthday.
It had taken a strange chance of hunting, a sudden precipitation into action without opportunity
for worrying beforehand, to bring this about with Macomber, but regardless of how it had happened it
had most certainly happened. Look at the beggar now, Wilson thought. It’s that some of them stay little
boys so long, Wilson thought. Sometimes all their lives. Their figures stay boyish when they’re fifty.
The great American boy-men. Damned strange people. But he liked this Macomber now. Damned
strange fellow. Probably meant the end of cuckoldry too. Well, that would be a damned good thing.
Damned good thing. Beggar had probably been afraid all his life. Don’t know what started it. But
over now. Hadn’t had time to be afraid with the buff. That and being angry too. Motor car too. Motor
cars made it familiar. Be a damn fire eater now. He’d seen it in the war work the same way. More of
a change than any loss of virginity. Fear gone like an operation. Something else grew in its place.
Main thing a man had. Made him into a man. Women knew it too. No bloody fear.
From the far corner of the seat Margaret Macomber looked at the two of them. There was no
change in Wilson. She saw Wilson as she had seen him the day before when she had first realized
what his great talent was. But she saw the change in Francis Macomber now.
“Do you have that feeling of happiness about what’s going to happen?” Macomber asked, still
exploring his new wealth.
“You’re not supposed to mention it,” Wilson said, looking in the other’s face. “Much more
fashionable to say you’re scared. Mind you, you’ll be scared too, plenty of times.”
“But you have a feeling of happiness about action to come?”
“Yes,” said Wilson. “There’s that. Doesn’t do to talk too much about all this. Talk the whole
thing away. No pleasure in anything if you mouth it up too much.”
“You’re both talking rot,” said Margot. “Just because you’ve chased some helpless animals in a
motor car you talk like heroes.”
“Sorry,” said Wilson. “I have been gassing too much.” She’s worried about it already, he
thought.
“If you don’t know what we’re talking about why not keep out of it?” Macomber asked his wife.
“You’ve gotten awfully brave, awfully suddenly,” his wife said contemptuously, but her
contempt was not secure. She was very afraid of something. Macomber laughed, a very natural hearty
laugh. “You know I have,” he said. “I really have.”
“Isn’t it sort of late?” Margot said bitterly. Because she had done the best she could for many
years back and the way they were together now was no one person’s fault.
“Not for me,” said Macomber.
Margot said nothing but sat back in the corner of the seat.
“Do you think we’ve given him time enough?” Macomber asked Wilson cheerfully.
“We might have a look,” Wilson said. “Have you any solids left?”
“The gun-bearer has some.”
Wilson called in Swahili and the older gun-bearer, who was skinning out one of the heads,
straightened up, pulled a box of solids out of his pocket and brought them over to Macomber, who
filled his magazine and put the remaining shells in his pocket.
“You might as well shoot the Springfield,” Wilson said. “You’re used to it. We’ll leave the
Mannlicher in the car with the Memsahib. Your gun-bearer can carry your heavy gun. I’ve this
damned cannon. Now let me tell you about them.” He had saved this until the last because he did not
want to worry Macomber. “When a buff comes he comes with his head high and thrust straight out.
The boss of the horns covers any sort of a brain shot. The only shot is straight into the nose. The only
other shot is into his chest or, if you’re to one side, into the neck or the shoulders. After they’ve been
hit once they take a hell of a lot of killing. Don’t try anything fancy. Take the easiest shot there is.
They’ve finished skinning out that head now. Should we get started?”
He called to the gun-bearers, who came up wiping their hands, and the older one got into the
back.
“I’ll only take Kongoni,” Wilson said. “The other can watch to keep the birds away.”
As the car moved slowly across the open space toward the island of brushy trees that ran in a
tongue of foliage along a dry water course that cut the open swale, Macomber felt his heart pounding
and his mouth was dry again, but it was excitement, not fear.
“Here’s where he went in,” Wilson said. Then to the gun-bearer in Swahili, “Take the blood
spoor.”
The car was parallel to the patch of bush. Macomber, Wilson and the gun-bearer got down.
Macomber, looking back, saw his wife, with the rifle by her side, looking at him. He waved to her
and she did not wave back.
The brush was very thick ahead and the ground was dry. The middle-aged gun-bearer was
sweating heavily and Wilson had his hat down over his eyes and his red neck showed just ahead of
Macomber. Suddenly the gun-bearer said something in Swahili to Wilson and ran forward.
“He’s dead in there,” Wilson said. “Good work,” and he turned to grip Macomber’s hand and as
they shook hands, grinning at each other, the gun-bearer shouted wildly and they saw him coming out
of the bush sideways, fast as a crab, and the bull coming, nose out, mouth tight closed, blood dripping,
massive head straight out, coming in a charge, his little pig eyes bloodshot as he looked at them.
Wilson, who was ahead, was kneeling shooting, and Macomber, as he fired, unhearing his shot in the
roaring of Wilson’s gun, saw fragments like slate burst from the huge boss of the horns, and the head
jerked, he shot again at the wide nostrils and saw the horns jolt again and fragments fly, and he did not
see Wilson now and, aiming carefully, shot again with the buffalo’s huge bulk almost on him and his
rifle almost level with the on-coming head, nose out, and he could see the little wicked eyes and the
head started to lower and he felt a sudden white-hot, blinding flash explode inside his head and that
was all he ever felt.
Wilson had ducked to one side to get in a shoulder shot. Macomber had stood solid and shot for
the nose, shooting a touch high each time and hitting the heavy horns, splintering and chipping them
like hitting a slate roof, and Mrs. Macomber, in the car, had shot at the buffalo with the 6.5
Mannlicher as it seemed about to gore Macomber and had hit her husband about two inches up and a
little to one side of the base of his skull.
Francis Macomber lay now, face down, not two yards from where the buffalo lay on his side and
his wife knelt over him with Wilson beside her.
“I wouldn’t turn him over,” Wilson said.
The woman was crying hysterically.
“I’d get back in the car,” Wilson said. “Where’s the rifle?”
She shook her head, her face contorted. The gun-bearer picked up the rifle.
“Leave it as it is,” said Wilson. Then, “Go get Abdulla so that he may witness the manner of the
accident.”
He knelt down, took a handkerchief from his pocket, and spread it over Francis Macomber’s
crew-cropped head where it lay. The blood sank into the dry, loose earth.
Wilson stood up and saw the buffalo on his side, his legs out, his thinly-haired belly crawling
with ticks. “Hell of a good bull,” his brain registered automatically. “A good fifty inches, or better.
Better.” He called to the driver and told him to spread a blanket over the body and stay by it. Then he
walked over to the motor car where the woman sat crying in the corner.
“That was a pretty thing to do,” he said in a toneless voice. “He would have left you too.”
“Stop it,” she said.
“Of course it’s an accident,” he said. “I know that.”
“Stop it,” she said.
“Don’t worry,” he said. “There will be a certain amount of unpleasantness but I will have some
photographs taken that will be very useful at the inquest. There’s the testimony of the gun-bearers and
the driver too. You’re perfectly all right.”
“Stop it,” she said.
“There’s a hell of a lot to be done,” he said. “And I’ll have to send a truck off to the lake to
wireless for a plane to take the three of us into Nairobi. Why didn’t you poison him? That’s what they
do in England.”
“Stop it. Stop it. Stop it,” the woman cried.
Wilson looked at her with his flat blue eyes.
“I’m through now,” he said. “I was a little angry. I’d begun to like your husband.”
“Oh, please stop it,” she said. “Please stop it.”
“That’s better,” Wilson said. “Please is much better. Now I’ll stop.”
The Capital of the World
MADRID IS FULL OF BOYS NAMED PACO, which is the
diminutive of the name Francisco, and there is a Madrid joke about a father who came to Madrid and
inserted an advertisement in the personal columns of El Liberal which said: PACO MEET ME AT HOTEL
MONTANA NOON TUESDAY ALL IS FORGIVEN PAPA and how a squadron of Guardia Civil had to be
called out to disperse the eight hundred young men who answered the advertisement. But this Paco,
who waited on table at the Pension Luarca, had no father to forgive him, nor anything for the father to
forgive. He had two older sisters who were chambermaids at the Luarca, who had gotten their place
through coming from the same small village as a former Luarca chambermaid who had proven
hardworking and honest and hence given her village and its products a good name; and these sisters
had paid his way on the auto-bus to Madrid and gotten him his job as an apprentice waiter. He came
from a village in a part of Extramadura where conditions were incredibly primitive, food scarce, and
comforts unknown and he had worked hard ever since he could remember.
He was a well built boy with very black, rather curly hair, good teeth and a skin that his sisters
envied, and he had a ready and unpuzzled smile. He was fast on his feet and did his work well and he
loved his sisters, who seemed beautiful and sophisticated; he loved Madrid, which was still an
unbelievable place, and he loved his work which, done under bright lights, with clean linen, the
wearing of evening clothes, and abundant food in the kitchen, seemed romantically beautiful.
There were from eight to a dozen other people who lived at the Luarca and ate in the dining
room but for Paco, the youngest of the three waiters who served at table, the only ones who really
existed were the bullfighters.
Second-rate matadors lived at that pension because the address in the Calle San Jeronimo was
good, the food was excellent and the room and board was cheap. It is necessary for a bull fighter to
give the appearance, if not of prosperity, at least of respectability, since decorum and dignity rank
above courage as the virtues most highly prized in Spain, and bullfighters stayed at the Luarca until
their last pesetas were gone. There is no record of any bullfighter having left the Luarca for a better or
more expensive hotel; second-rate bullfighters never became first rate; but the descent from the
Luarca was swift since any one could stay there who was making anything at all and a bill was never
presented to a guest unasked until the woman who ran the place knew that the case was hopeless.
At this time there were three full matadors living at the Luarca as well as two very good
picadors, and one excellent banderillero. The Luarca was luxury for the picadors and the
banderilleros who, with their families in Seville, required lodging in Madrid during the Spring
season; but they were well paid and in the fixed employ of fighters who were heavily contracted
during the coming season and the three of these subalterns would probably make much more apiece
than any of the three matadors. Of the three matadors one was ill and trying to conceal it; one had
passed his short vogue as a novelty; and the third was a coward.
The coward had at one time, until he had received a peculiarly atrocious horn wound in the
lower abdomen at the start of his first season as a full matador, been exceptionally brave and
remarkably skillful and he still had many of the hearty mannerisms of his days of success. He was
jovial to excess and laughed constantly with and without provocation. He had, when successful, been
very addicted to practical jokes but he had given them up now. They took an assurance that he did not
feel. This matador had an intelligent, very open face and he carried himself with much style.
The matador who was ill was careful never to show it and was meticulous about eating a little of
all the dishes that were presented at the table. He had a great many handkerchiefs which he laundered
himself in his room and, lately, he had been selling his fighting suits. He had sold one, cheaply, before
Christmas and another in the first week of April. They had been very expensive suits, had always
been well kept and he had one more. Before he had become ill he had been a very promising, even a
sensational, fighter and, while he himself could not read, he had clippings which said that in his debut
in Madrid he had been better than Belmonte. He ate alone at a small table and looked up very little.
The matador who had once been a novelty was very short and brown and very dignified. He also
ate alone at a separate table and he smiled very rarely and never laughed. He came from Valladolid,
where the people are extremely serious, and he was a capable matador; but his style had become oldfashioned before he had ever succeeded in endearing himself to the public through his virtues, which
were courage and a calm capability, and his name on a poster would draw no one to a bull ring. His
novelty had been that he was so short that he could barely see over the bull’s withers, but there were
other short fighters, and he had never succeeded in imposing himself on the public’s fancy.
Of the picadors one was a thin, hawk-faced, gray-haired man, lightly built but with legs and arms
like iron, who always wore cattlemen’s boots under his trousers, drank too much every evening and
gazed amorously at any woman in the pension. The other was huge, dark, brown-faced, good-looking,
with black hair like an Indian and enormous hands. Both were great picadors although the first was
reputed to have lost much of his ability through drink and dissipation, and the second was said to be
too headstrong and quarrelsome to stay with any matador more than a single season.
The banderillero was middle-aged, gray, cat-quick in spite of his years and, sitting at the table
he looked a moderately prosperous business man. His legs were still good for this season, and when
they should go he was intelligent and experienced enough to keep regularly employed for a long time.
The difference would be that when his speed of foot would be gone he would always be frightened
where now he was assured and calm in the ring and out of it.
On this evening every one had left the dining room except the hawk-faced picador who drank too
much, the birthmarked-faced auctioneer of watches at the fairs and festivals of Spain, who also drank
too much, and two priests from Galicia who were sitting at a corner table and drinking if not too much
certainly enough. At that time wine was included in the price of the room and board at the Luarca and
the waiters had just brought fresh bottles of Valdepeñas to the tables of the auctioneer, then to the
picador and, finally, to the two priests.
The three waiters stood at the end of the room. It was the rule of the house that they should all
remain on duty until the diners whose tables they were responsible for should all have left, but the one
who served the table of the two priests had an appointment to go to an Anarcho-Syndicalist meeting
and Paco had agreed to take over his table for him.
Upstairs the matador who was ill was lying face down on his bed alone. The matador who was
no longer a novelty was sitting looking out of his window preparatory to walking out to the café. The
matador who was a coward had the older sister of Paco in his room with him and was trying to get
her to do something which she was laughingly refusing to do. This matador was saying “Come on,
little savage.”
“No,” said the sister. “Why should I?”
“For a favor.”
“You’ve eaten and now you want me for dessert.”
“Just once. What harm can it do?”
“Leave me alone. Leave me alone, I tell you.”
“It is a very little thing to do.”
“Leave me alone, I tell you.”
Down in the dining room the tallest of the waiters, who was overdue at the meeting, said “Look
at those black pigs drink.”
“That’s no way to speak,” said the second waiter. “They are decent clients. They do not drink
too much.”
“For me it is a good way to speak,” said the tall one. “There are the two curses of Spain, the
bulls and the priests.”
“Certainly not the individual bull and the individual priest,” said the second waiter.
“Yes,” said the tall waiter. “Only through the individual can you attack the class. It is necessary
to kill the individual bull and the individual priest. All of them. Then there are no more.”
“Save it for the meeting,” said the other waiter.
“Look at the barbarity of Madrid,” said the tall waiter. “It is now half-past eleven o’clock and
these are still guzzling.”
“They only started to eat at ten,” said the other waiter. “As you know there are many dishes. That
wine is cheap and these have paid for it. It is not a strong wine.”
“How can there be solidarity of workers with fools like you?” asked the tall waiter.
“Look,” said the second waiter who was a man of fifty. “I have worked all my life. In all that
remains of my life I must work. I have no complaints against work. To work is normal.”
“Yes, but the lack of work kills.”
“I have always worked,” said the older waiter. “Go on to the meeting. There is no necessity to
stay.”
“You are a good comrade,” said the tall waiter. “But you lack all ideology.”
“Mejor si me falta eso que el otro,” said the older waiter (meaning it is better to lack that than
work). “Go on to the mitin.”
Paco had said nothing. He did not yet understand politics but it always gave him a thrill to hear
the tall waiter speak of the necessity for killing the priests and the Guardia Civil. The tall waiter
represented to him revolution and revolution also was romantic. He himself would like to be a good
Catholic, a revolutionary, and have a steady job like this, while, at the same time, being a bullfighter.
“Go on to the meeting, Ignacio,” he said. “I will respond for your work.”
“The two of us,” said the older waiter.
“There isn’t enough for one,” said Paco. “Go on to the meeting.”
“Pues, me voy,” said the tall waiter. “And thanks.”
In the meantime, upstairs, the sister of Paco had gotten out of the embrace of the matador as
skilfully as a wrestler breaking a hold and said, now angry, “These are the hungry people. A failed
bullfighter. With your ton-load of fear. If you have so much of that, use it in the ring.”
“That is the way a whore talks.”
“A whore is also a woman, but I am not a whore.”
“You’ll be one.”
“Not through you.”
“Leave me,” said the matador who, now, repulsed and refused, felt the nakedness of his
cowardice returning.
“Leave you? What hasn’t left you?” said the sister. “Don’t you want me to make up the bed? I’m
paid to do that.”
“Leave me,” said the matador, his broad good-looking face wrinkled into a contortion that was
like crying. “You whore. You dirty little whore.”
“Matador,” she said, shutting the door. “My matador.”
Inside the room the matador sat on the bed. His face still had the contortion which, in the ring, he
made into a constant smile which frightened those people in the first rows of seats who knew what
they were watching. “And this,” he was saying aloud. “And this. And this.”
He could remember when he had been good and it had only been three years before. He could
remember the weight of the heavy gold-brocaded fighting jacket on his shoulders on that hot afternoon
in May when his voice had still been the same in the ring as in the cafe, and how he sighted along the
point-dipping blade at the place in the top of the shoulders where it was dusty in the short-haired
black hump of muscle above the wide, wood-knocking, splintered-tipped horns that lowered as he
went in to kill, and how the sword pushed in as easy as into a mound of stiff butter with the palm of
his hand pushing the pommel, his left arm crossed low, his left shoulder forward, his weight on his
left leg, and then his weight wasn’t on his leg. His weight was on his lower belly and as the bull
raised his head the horn was out of sight in him and he swung over on it twice before they pulled him
off it. So now when he went into kill, and it was seldom, he could not look at the horns and what did
any whore know about what he went through before be fought? And what had they been through that
laughed at him? They were all whores and they knew what they could do with it.
Down in the dining room the picador sat looking at the priests. If there were women in the room
he stared at them. If there were no women he would stare with enjoyment at a foreigner, un inglés, but
lacking women or strangers, he now stared with enjoyment and insolence at the two priests. While he
stared the birth-marked auctioneer rose and folding his napkin went out, leaving over half the wine in
the last bottle he had ordered. If his accounts had been paid up at the Luarca he would have finished
the bottle.
The two priests did not stare back at the picador. One of them was saying, “It is ten days since I
have been here waiting to see him and all day I sit in the ante-chamber and he will not receive me.”
“What is there to do?”
“Nothing. What can one do? One cannot go against authority.”
“I have been here for two weeks and nothing. I wait and they will not see me.”
“We are from the abandoned country. When the money runs out we can return.”
“To the abandoned country. What does Madrid care about Galicia? We are a poor province.”
“One understands the action of our brother Basilio.”
“Still I have no real confidence in the integrity of Basilio Alvarez.”
“Madrid is where one learns to understand. Madrid kills Spain.”
“If they would simply see one and refuse.”
“No. You must be broken and worn out by waiting.”
“Well, we shall see. I can wait as well as another.”
At this moment the picador got to his feet, walked over to the priests’ table and stood, grayheaded and hawk-faced, staring at them and smiling.
“A torero,” said one priest to the other.
“And a good one,” said the picador and walked out of the dining room, gray-jacketed, trimwaisted, bow-legged, in tight breeches over his high-heeled cattlemen’s boots that clicked on the
floor as he swaggered quite steadily, smiling to himself. He lived in a small, tight, professional world
of personal efficiency, nightly alcoholic triumph, and insolence. Now he lit a cigar and tilting his hat
at an angle in the hallway went out to the café.
The priests left immediately after the picador, hurriedly conscious of being the last people in the
dining room, and there was no one in the room now but Paco and the middle-aged waiter. They
cleared the tables and carried the bottles into the kitchen.
In the kitchen was the boy who washed the dishes. He was three years older than Paco and was
very cynical and bitter.
“Take this,” the middle-aged waiter said, and poured out a glass of the Valdepeñas and handed it
to him.
“Why not?” the boy took the glass.
“Tu, Paco?” the older waiter asked.
“Thank you,” said Paco. The three of them drank.
“I will be going,” said the middle-aged waiter.
“Good night,” they told him.
He went out and they were alone. Paco took a napkin one of the priests had used and standing
straight, his heels planted, lowered the napkin and with head following the movement, swung his arms
in the motion of a slow sweeping verónica. He turned, and advancing his right foot slightly, made the
second pass, gained a little terrain on the imaginary bull and made a third pass, slow, perfectly timed
and suave, then gathered the napkin to his waist and swung his hips away from the bull in a mediaverónica.
The dishwasher, whose name was Enrique, watched him critically and sneeringly.
“How is the bull?” he said.
“Very brave,” said Paco. “Look.”
Standing slim and straight he made four more perfect passes, smooth, elegant and graceful.
“And the bull?” asked Enrique standing against the sink, holding his wine glass and wearing his
apron.
“Still has lots of gas,” said Paco.
“You make me sick,” said Enrique.
“Why?”
“Look.”
Enrique removed his apron and citing the imaginary bull he sculptured four perfect, languid
gypsy verónicas and ended up with a rebolera that made the apron swing in a stiff arc past the bull’s
nose as he walked away from him.
“Look at that,” he said. “And I wash dishes.”
“Why?”
“Fear,” said Enrique. “Miedo. The same fear you would have in a ring with a bull.”
“No,” said Paco. “I wouldn’t be afraid.”
“Leche!” said Enrique. “Every one is afraid. But a torero can control his fear so that he can
work the bull. I went in an amateur fight and I was so afraid I couldn’t keep from running. Every one
thought it was very funny. So would you be afraid. If it wasn’t for fear every bootblack in Spain
would be a bullfighter. You, a country boy, would be frightened worse than I was.”
“No,” said Paco.
He had done it too many times in his imagination. Too many times he had seen the horns, seen the
bull’s wet muzzle, the ear twitching, then the head go down and the charge, the hoofs thudding and the
hot bull pass him as he swung the cape, to re-charge as he swung the cape again, then again, and
again, and again, to end winding the bull around him in his great media-verónica, and walk
swingingly away, with bull hairs caught in the gold ornaments of his jacket from the close passes; the
bull standing hypnotized and the crowd applauding. No, he would not be afraid. Others, yes. Not he.
He knew he would not be afraid. Even if he ever was afraid he knew that he could do it anyway. He
had confidence. “I wouldn’t be afraid,” he said.
Enrique said, “Leche,” again.
Then he said, “If we should try it?”
“How?”
“Look,” said Enrique. “You think of the bull but you do not think of the horns. The bull has such
force that the horns rip like a knife, they stab like a bayonet, and they kill like a club. Look,” he
opened a table drawer and took out two meat knives. “I will bind these to the legs of a chair. Then I
will play bull for you with the chair held before my head. The knives are the horns. If you make those
passes then they mean something.”
“Lend me your apron,” said Paco. “We’ll do it in the dining room.”
“No,” said Enrique, suddenly not bitter. “Don’t do it, Paco.”
“Yes,” said Paco. “I’m not afraid.”
“You will be when you see the knives come.”
“We’ll see,” said Paco. “Give me the apron.”
At this time, while Enrique was binding the two heavy-bladed razor-sharp meat knives fast to the
legs of the chair with two soiled napkins holding the half of each knife, wrapping them tight and then
knotting them, the two chambermaids, Paco’s sisters, were on their way to the cinema to see Greta
Garbo in Anna Christie. Of the two priests, one was sitting in his underwear reading his breviary and
the other was wearing a nightshirt and saying the rosary. All the bullfighters except the one who was
ill had made their evening appearance at the Café Fornos, where the big, dark-haired picador was
playing billiards, the short, serious matador was sitting at a crowded table before a coffee and milk,
along with the middle-aged banderillero and other serious workmen.
The drinking, gray-headed picador was sitting with a glass of cazalas brandy before him staring
with pleasure at a table where the matador whose courage was gone sat with another matador who
had renounced the sword to become a banderillero again, and two very houseworn-looking
prostitutes.
The auctioneer stood on the street corner talking with friends. The tall waiter was at the
Anarcho-syndicalist meeting waiting for an opportunity to speak. The middle-aged waiter was seated
on the terrace of the Café Alvarez drinking a small beer. The woman who owned the Luarca was
already asleep in her bed, where she lay on her back with the bolster between her legs; big, fat,
honest, clean, easy-going, very religious and never having ceased to miss or pray daily for her
husband, dead, now, twenty years. In his room, alone, the matador who was ill lay face down on his
bed with his mouth against a handkerchief.
Now, in the deserted dining room, Enrique tied the last knot in the napkins that bound the knives
to the chair legs and lifted the chair. He pointed the legs with the knives on them forward and held the
chair over his head with the two knives pointing straight ahead, one on each side of his head.
“It’s heavy,” he said. “Look, Paco. It is very dangerous. Don’t do it.” He was sweating.
Paco stood facing him, holding the apron spread, holding a fold of it bunched in each hand,
thumbs up, first finger down, spread to catch the eye of the bull.
“Charge straight,” he said. “Turn like a bull. Charge as many times as you want.”
“How will you know when to cut the pass?” asked Enrique. “It’s better to do three and then a
media.”
“All right,” said Paco. “But come straight. Huh, torito! Come on, little bull!”
Running with head down Enrique came toward him and Paco swung the apron just ahead of the
knife blade as it passed close in front of his belly and as it went by it was, to him, the real horn,
white-tipped, black, smooth, and as Enrique passed him and turned to rush again it was the hot,
blood-flanked mass of the bull that thudded by, then turned like a cat and came again as he swung the
cape slowly. Then the bull turned and came again and, as he watched the onrushing point, he stepped
his left foot two inches too far forward and the knife did not pass, but had slipped in as easily as into
a wineskin and there was a hot scalding rush above and around the sudden inner rigidity of steel and
Enrique shouting. “Ay! Ay! Let me get it out! Let me get it out!” and Paco slipped forward on the
chair, the apron cape still held, Enrique pulling on the chair as the knife turned in him, in him, Paco.
The knife was out now and he sat on the floor in the widening warm pool.
“Put the napkin over it. Hold it!” said Enrique. “Hold it tight. I will run for the doctor. You must
hold in the hemorrhage.”
“There should be a rubber cup,” said Paco. He had seen that used in the ring.
“I came straight,” said Enrique, crying. “All I wanted was to show the danger.”
“Don’t worry,” said Paco, his voice sounding far away. “But bring the doctor.”
In the ring they lifted you and carried you, running with you, to the operating room. If the femoral
artery emptied itself before you reached there they called the priest.
“Advise one of the priests,” said Paco, holding the napkin tight against his lower abdomen. He
could not believe that this had happened to him.
But Enrique was running down the Calle San Jerónimo to the all-night first-aid station and Paco
was alone, first sitting up, then huddled over, then slumped on the floor, until it was over, feeling his
life go out of him as dirty water empties from a bathtub when the plug is drawn. He was frightened
and he felt faint and he tried to say an act of contrition and he remembered how it started but before he
had said, as fast as he could, “Oh, my God, I am heartily sorry for having offended Thee who art
worthy of all my love and I firmly resolve …,” he felt too faint and he was lying face down on the
floor and it was over very quickly. A severed femoral artery empties itself faster than you can
believe.
As the doctor from the first-aid station came up the stairs accompanied by a policeman who held
on to Enrique by the arm, the two sisters of Paco were still in the moving-picture palace of the Gran
Via, where they were intensely disappointed in the Garbo film, which showed the great star in
miserable low surroundings when they had been accustomed to see her surrounded by great luxury
and brilliance. The audience disliked the film thoroughly and were protesting by whistling and
stamping their feet. All the other people from the hotel were doing almost what they had been doing
when the accident happened, except that the two priests had finished their devotions and were
preparing for sleep, and the gray-haired picador had moved his drink over to the table with the two
houseworn prostitutes. A little later he went out of the café with one of them. It was the one for whom
the matador who had lost his nerve had been buying drinks.
The boy Paco had never known about any of this nor about what all these people would be doing
on the next day and on other days to come. He had no idea how they really lived nor how they ended.
He did not even realize they ended. He died, as the Spanish phrase has it, full of illusions. He had not
had time in his life to lose any of them, nor even, at the end, to complete an act of contrition. He had
not even had time to be disappointed in the Garbo picture which disappointed all Madrid for a week.
Kilimanjaro is a snow-covered mountain 19,710 feet high, and is said to be the highest mountain
in Africa. Its western summit is called the Masai “Ngàje Naài,” the House of God. Close to the
western summit there is the dried and frozen carcass of a leopard. No one has explained what the
leopard was seeking at that altitude.
The Snows of Kilimanjaro
“THE MARVELLOUS THING IS THAT IT’S painless,” he said.
“That’s how you know when it starts.”
“Is it really?”
“Absolutely. I’m awfully sorry about the odor though. That must bother you.”
“Don’t! Please don’t.”
“Look at them,” he said. “Now is it sight or is it scent that brings them like that?”
The cot the man lay on was in the wide shade of a mimosa tree and as he looked out past the
shade onto the glare of the plain there were three of the big birds squatted obscenely, while in the sky
a dozen more sailed, making quick-moving shadows as they passed.
“They’ve been there since the day the truck broke down,” he said. “Today’s the first time any
have lit on the ground. I watched the way they sailed very carefully at first in case I ever wanted to
use them in a story. That’s funny now.”
“I wish you wouldn’t,” she said.
“I’m only talking,” he said. “It’s much easier if I talk. But I don’t want to bother you.”
“You know it doesn’t bother me,” she said. “It’s that I’ve gotten so very nervous not being able
to do anything. I think we might make it as easy as we can until the plane comes.”
“Or until the plane doesn’t come.”
“Please tell me what I can do. There must be something I can do.”
“You can take the leg off and that might stop it, though I doubt it. Or you can shoot me. You’re a
good shot now. I taught you to shoot, didn’t I?”
“Please don’t talk that way. Couldn’t I read to you?”
“Read what?”
“Anything in the book bag that we haven’t read.”
“I can’t listen to it,” he said. “Talking is the easiest. We quarrel and that makes the time pass.”
“I don’t quarrel. I never want to quarrel. Let’s not quarrel any more. No matter how nervous we
get. Maybe they will be back with another truck today. Maybe the plane will come.”
“I don’t want to move,” the man said. “There is no sense in moving now except to make it easier
for you.”
“That’s cowardly.”
“Can’t you let a man die as comfortably as he can without calling him names? What’s the use of
slanging me?”
“You’re not going to die.”
“Don’t be silly. I’m dying now. Ask those bastards.” He looked over to where the huge, filthy
birds sat, their naked heads sunk in the hunched feathers. A fourth planed down, to run quick-legged
and then waddle slowly toward the others.
“They are around every camp. You never notice them. You can’t die if you don’t give up.”
“Where did you read that? You’re such a bloody fool.”
“You might think about some one else.”
“For Christ’s sake,” he said, “that’s been my trade.”
He lay then and was quiet for a while and looked across the heat shimmer of the plain to the edge
of the bush. There were a few Tommies that showed minute and white against the yellow and, far off,
he saw a herd of zebra, white against the green of the bush. This was a pleasant camp under big trees
against a hill, with good water, and close by, a nearly dry water hole where sand grouse flighted in
the mornings.
“Wouldn’t you like me to read?” she asked. She was sitting on a canvas chair beside his cot.
“There’s a breeze coming up.”
“No thanks.”
“Maybe the truck will come.”
“I don’t give a damn about the truck.”
“I do.”
“You give a damn about so many things that I don’t.”
“Not so many, Harry.”
“What about a drink?”
“It’s supposed to be bad for you. It said in Black’s to avoid all alcohol. You shouldn’t drink.”
“Molo!” he shouted.
“Yes Bwana.”
“Bring whiskey-soda.”
“Yes Bwana.”
“You shouldn’t,” she said. “That’s what I mean by giving up. It says it’s bad for you. I know it’s
bad for you.”
“No,” he said. “It’s good for me.”
So now it was all over, he thought. So now he would never have a chance to finish it. So this
was the way it ended, in a bickering over a drink. Since the gangrene started in his right leg he had no
pain and with the pain the horror had gone and all he felt now was a great tiredness and anger that this
was the end of it. For this, that now was coming, he had very little curiosity. For years it had
obsessed him; but now it meant nothing in itself. It was strange how easy being tired enough made it.
Now he would never write the things that he had saved to write until he knew enough to write
them well. Well, he would not have to fail at trying to write them either. Maybe you could never write
them, and that was why you put them off and delayed the starting. Well he would never know, now.
“I wish we’d never come,” the woman said. She was looking at him, holding the glass and biting
her lip. “You never would have gotten anything like this in Paris. You always said you loved Paris.
We could have stayed in Paris or gone anywhere. I’d have gone anywhere. I said I’d go anywhere you
wanted. If you wanted to shoot we could have gone shooting in Hungary and been comfortable.”
“Your bloody money,” he said.
“That’s not fair,” she said. “It was always yours as much as mine. I left everything and I went
wherever you wanted to go and I’ve done what you wanted to do. But I wish we’d never come here.”
“You said you loved it.”
“I did when you were all right. But now I hate it. I don’t see why that had to happen to your leg.
What have we done to have that happen to us?”
“I suppose what I did was to forget to put iodine on it when I first scratched it. Then I didn’t pay
any attention to it because I never infect. Then, later, when it got bad, it was probably using that weak
carbolic solution when the other antiseptics ran out that paralyzed the minute blood vessels and
started the gangrene.” He looked at her, “What else?”
“I don’t mean that.”
“If we would have hired a good mechanic instead of a half-baked Kikuyu driver, he would have
checked the oil and never burned out that bearing in the truck.”
“I don’t mean that.”
“If you hadn’t left your own people, your goddamned Old Westbury, Saratoga, Palm Beach
people to take me on—”
“Why, I loved you. That’s not fair. I love you now. I’ll always love you. Don’t you love me?”
“No,” said the man. “I don’t think so. I never have.”
“Harry, what are you saying? You’re out of your head.”
“No. I haven’t any head to go out of.”
“Don’t drink that,” she said. “Darling, please don’t drink that. We have to do everything we
can.”
“You do it,” he said. “I’m tired.”
Now in his mind he saw a railway station at Karagatch and he was standing with his pack and
that was the headlight of the Simplon-Orient cutting the dark now and he was leaving Thrace then
after the retreat. That was one of the things he had saved to write, with, in the morning at
breakfast, looking out the window and seeing snow on the mountains in Bulgaria and Nansen’s
Secretary asking the old man if it were snow and the old man looking at it and saying, No, that’s
not snow. It’s too early for snow. And the Secretary repeating to the other girls, No, you see. It’s
not snow and them all saying, It’s not snow we were mistaken. But it was the snow all right and he
sent them on into it when he evolved exchange of populations. And it was snow they tramped along
in until they died that winter.
It was snow too that fell all Christmas week that year up in the Gauertal, that year they lived
in the woodcutter’s house with the big square porcelain stove that filled half the room, and they
slept on mattresses filled with beech leaves, the time the deserter came with his feet bloody in the
snow. He said the police were right behind him and they gave him woolen socks and held the
gendarmes talking until the tracks had drifted over.
In Schrunz, on Christmas day, the snow was so bright it hurt your eyes when you looked out
from the Weinstube and saw every one coming home from church. That was where they walked up
the sleigh-smoothed urine-yellowed road along the river with the steep pine hills, skis heavy on
the shoulder, and where they ran that great run down the glacier above the Madlener-haus, the
snow as smooth to see as cake frosting and as light as powder and he remembered the noiseless
rush the speed made as you dropped down like a bird.
They were snow-bound a week in the Madlener-haus that time in the blizzard playing cards in
the smoke by the lantern light and the stakes were higher all the time as Herr Lent lost more.
Finally he lost it all. Everything, the Skischule money and all the season’s profit and then his
capital. He could see him with his long nose, picking up the cards and then opening, “Sans Voir.”
There was always gambling then. When there was no snow you gambled and when there was too
much you gambled. He thought of all the time in his life he had spent gambling.
But he had never written a line of that, nor of that cold, bright Christmas day with the
mountains showing across the plain that Barker had flown across the lines to bomb the Austrian
of icers’ leave train, machine-gunning them as they scattered and ran. He remembered Barker
afterwards coming into the mess and starting to tell about it. And how quiet it got and then
somebody saying, “You bloody murderous bastard.”
Those were the same Austrians they killed then that he skied with later. No not the same.
Hans, that he skied with all that year, had been in the Kaiser-Jägers and when they went hunting
hares together up the little valley above the saw-mill they had talked of the fighting on Pasubio
and of the attack on Perticara and Asalone and he had never written a word of that. Nor of Monte
Corona, nor the Sette Communi, nor of Arsiero.
How many winters had he lived in the Vorarlberg and the Arlberg? It was four and then he
remembered the man who had the fox to sell when they had walked into Bludenz, that time to buy
presents, and the cherry-pit taste of good kirsch, the fast-slipping rush of running powder-snow on
crust, singing “Hi! Ho! said Rolly!” as you ran down the last stretch to the steep drop, taking it
straight, then running the orchard in three turns and out across the ditch and onto the icy road
behind the inn. Knocking your bindings loose, kicking the skis free and leaning them up against
the wooden wall of the inn, the lamplight coming from the window, where inside, in the smoky,
new-wine smelling warmth, they were playing the accordion.
“Where did we stay in Paris?” he asked the woman who was sitting by him in a canvas chair,
now, in Africa.
“At the Crillon. You know that.”
“Why do I know that?”
“That’s where we always stayed.”
“No. Not always.”
“There and at the Pavillion Henri-Quatre in St. Germain. You said you loved it there.”
“Love is a dunghill,” said Harry. “And I’m the cock that gets on it to crow.”
“If you have to go away,” she said, “is it absolutely necessary to kill off everything you leave
behind? I mean do you have to take away everything? Do you have to kill your horse, and your wife
and burn your saddle and your armour?”
“Yes,” he said. “Your damned money was my armour. My Swift and my Armour.”
“Don’t.”
“All right. I’ll stop that. I don’t want to hurt you.”
“It’s a little bit late now.”
“All right then. I’ll go on hurting you. It’s more amusing. The only thing I ever really liked to do
with you I can’t do now.”
“No, that’s not true. You liked to do many things and everything you wanted to do I did.”
“Oh, for Christ sake stop bragging, will you?”
He looked at her and saw her crying.
“Listen,” he said. “Do you think that it is fun to do this? I don’t know why I’m doing it. It’s trying
to kill to keep yourself alive, I imagine. I was all right when we started talking. I didn’t mean to start
this, and now I’m crazy as a coot and being as cruel to you as I can be. Don’t pay any attention,
darling, to what I say. I love you, really. You know I love you. I’ve never loved any one else the way
I love you.”
He slipped into the familiar lie he made his bread and butter by.
“You’re sweet to me.”
“You bitch,” he said. “You rich bitch. That’s poetry. I’m full of poetry now. Rot and poetry.
Rotten poetry.”
“Stop it. Harry, why do you have to turn into a devil now?”
“I don’t like to leave anything,” the man said. “I don’t like to leave things behind.”
It was evening now and he had been asleep. The sun was gone behind the hill and there was a
shadow all across the plain and the small animals were feeding close to camp; quick dropping heads
and switching tails, he watched them keeping well out away from the bush now. The birds no longer
waited on the ground. They were all perched heavily in a tree. There were many more of them. His
personal boy was sitting by the bed.
“Memsahib’s gone to shoot,” the boy said. “Does Bwana want?”
“Nothing.”
She had gone to kill a piece of meat and, knowing how he liked to watch the game, she had gone
well away so she would not disturb this little pocket of the plain that he could see. She was always
thoughtful, he thought. On anything she knew about, or had read, or that she had ever heard.
It was not her fault that when he went to her he was already over. How could a woman know that
you meant nothing that you said; that you spoke only from habit and to be comfortable? After he no
longer meant what he said, his lies were more successful with women than when he had told them the
truth.
It was not so much that he lied as that there was no truth to tell. He had had his life and it was
over and then he went on living it again with different people and more money, with the best of the
same places, and some new ones.
You kept from thinking and it was all marvellous. You were equipped with good insides so that
you did not go to pieces that way, the way most of them had, and you made an attitude that you cared
nothing for the work you used to do, now that you could no longer do it. But, in yourself, you said that
you would write about these people; about the very rich; that you were really not of them but a spy in
their country; that you would leave it and write of it and for once it would be written by some one
who knew what he was writing of. But he would never do it, because each day of not writing, of
comfort, of being that which he despised, dulled his ability and softened his will to work so that,
finally, he did no work at all. The people he knew now were all much more comfortable when he did
not work. Africa was where he had been happiest in the good time of his life, so he had come out here
to start again. They had made this safari with the minimum of comfort. There was no hardship; but
there was no luxury and he had thought that he could get back into training that way. That in some way
he could work the fat off his soul the way a fighter went into the mountains to work and train in order
to bum it out of his body.
She had liked it. She said she loved it. She loved anything that was exciting, that involved a
change of scene, where there were new people and where things were pleasant. And he had felt the
illusion of returning strength of will to work. Now if this was how it ended, and he knew it was, he
must not turn like some snake biting itself because its back was broken. It wasn’t this woman’s fault.
If it had not been she it would have been another. If he lived by a lie he should try to die by it. He
heard a shot beyond the hill.
She shot very well this good, this rich bitch, this kindly caretaker and destroyer of his talent.
Nonsense. He had destroyed his talent himself. Why should he blame this woman because she kept
him well? He had destroyed his talent by not using it, by betrayals of himself and what he believed in,
by drinking so much that he blunted the edge of his perceptions, by laziness, by sloth, and by
snobbery, by pride and by prejudice, by hook and by crook. What was this? A catalogue of old
books? What was his talent anyway? It was a talent all right but instead of using it, he had traded on
it. It was never what he had done, but always what he could do. And he had chosen to make his living
with something else instead of a pen or a pencil. It was strange, too, wasn’t it, that when he fell in
love with another woman, that woman should always have more money than the last one? But when he
no longer was in love, when he was only lying, as to this woman, now, who had the most money of
all, who had all the money there was, who had had a husband and children, who had taken lovers and
been dissatisfied with them, and who loved him dearly as a writer, as a man, as a companion and as a
proud possession; it was strange that when he did not love her at all and was lying, that he should be
able to give her more for her money than when he had really loved.
We must all be cut out for what we do, he thought. However you make your living is where your
talent lies. He had sold vitality, in one form or another, all his life and when your affections are not
too involved you give much better value for the money. He had found that out but he would never
write that, now, either. No, he would not write that, although it was well worth writing.
Now she came in sight, walking across the open toward the camp. She was wearing jodphurs
and carrying her rifle. The two boys had a Tommie slung and they were coming along behind her. She
was still a good-looking woman, he thought, and she had a pleasant body. She had a great talent and
appreciation for the bed, she was not pretty, but he liked her face, she read enormously, liked to ride
and shoot and, certainly, she drank too much. Her husband had died when she was still a
comparatively young woman and for a while she had devoted herself to her two just-grown children,
who did not need her and were embarrassed at having her about, to her stable of horses, to books, and
to bottles. She liked to read in the evening before dinner and she drank Scotch and soda while she
read. By dinner she was fairly drunk and after a bottle of wine at dinner she was usually drunk enough
to sleep.
That was before the lovers. After she had the lovers she did not drink so much because she did
not have to be drunk to sleep. But the lovers bored her. She had been married to a man who had never
bored her and these people bored her very much.
Then one of her two children was killed in a plane crash and after that was over she did not want
the lovers, and drink being no anæsthetic she had to make another life. Suddenly, she had been acutely
frightened of being alone. But she wanted some one that she respected with her.
It had begun very simply. She liked what he wrote and she had always envied the life he led. She
thought he did exactly what he wanted to. The steps by which she had acquired him and the way in
which she had finally fallen in love with him were all part of a regular progression in which she had
built herself a new life and he had traded away what remained of his old life.
He had traded it for security, for comfort too, there was no denying that, and for what else? He
did not know. She would have bought him anything he wanted. He knew that. She was a damned nice
woman too. He would as soon be in bed with her as any one; rather with her, because she was richer,
because she was very pleasant and appreciative and because she never made scenes. And now this
life that she had built again was coming to a term because he had not used iodine two weeks ago when
a thorn had scratched his knee as they moved forward trying to photograph a herd of waterbuck
standing, their heads up, peering while their nostrils searched the air, their ears spread wide to hear
the first noise that would send them rushing into the bush. They had bolted, too, before he got the
picture.
Here she came now.
He turned his head on the cot to look toward her. “Hello,” he said.
“I shot a Tommy ram,” she told him. “He’ll make you good broth and I’ll have them mash some
potatoes with the Klim. How do you feel?”
“Much better.”
“Isn’t that lovely? You know I thought perhaps you would. You were sleeping when I left.”
“I had a good sleep. Did you walk far?”
“No. Just around behind the hill. I made quite a good shot on the Tommy.”
“You shoot marvellously, you know.”
“I love it. I’ve loved Africa. Really. If you’re all right it’s the most fun that I’ve ever had. You
don’t know the fun it’s been to shoot with you. I’ve loved the country.”
“I love it too.”
“Darling, you don’t know how marvellous it is to see you feeling better. I couldn’t stand it when
you felt that way. You won’t talk to me like that again, will you? Promise me?”
“No,” he said. “I don’t remember what I said.”
“You don’t have to destroy me. Do you? I’m only a middle-aged woman who loves you and
wants to do what you want to do. I’ve been destroyed two or three times already. You wouldn’t want
to destroy me again, would you?”
“I’d like to destroy you a few times in bed,” he said.
“Yes. That’s the good destruction. That’s the way we’re made to be destroyed. The plane will
be here tomorrow.”
“How do you know?”
“I’m sure. It’s bound to come. The boys have the wood all ready and the grass to make the
smudge. I went down and looked at it again today. There’s plenty of room to land and we have the
smudges ready at both ends.”
“What makes you think it will come tomorrow?”
“I’m sure it will. It’s overdue now. Then, in town, they will fix up your leg and then we will
have some good destruction. Not that dreadful talking kind.”
“Should we have a drink? The sun is down.”
“Do you think you should?”
“I’m having one.”
“We’ll have one together. Molo, letti dui whiskey-soda!” she called.
“You’d better put on your mosquito boots,” he told her.
“I’ll wait till I bathe …”
While it grew dark they drank and just before it was dark and there was no longer enough light to
shoot, a hyena crossed the open on his way around the hill.
“That bastard crosses there every night,” the man said. “Every night for two weeks.”
“He’s the one makes the noise at night. I don’t mind it. They’re a filthy animal though.”
Drinking together, with no pain now except the discomfort of lying in the one position, the boys
lighting a fire, its shadow jumping on the tents, he could feel the return of acquiescence in this life of
pleasant surrender. She was very good to him. He had been cruel and unjust in the afternoon. She was
a fine woman, marvellous really. And just then it occurred to him that he was going to die.
It came with a rush; not as a rush of water nor of wind; but of a sudden evil-smelling emptiness
and the odd thing was that the hyena slipped lightly along the edge of it.
“What is it, Harry?” she asked him.
“Nothing,” he said. “You had better move over to the other side. To windward.”
“Did Molo change the dressing?”
“Yes. I’m just using the boric now.”
“How do you feel?”
“A little wobbly.”
“I’m going in to bathe,” she said. “I’ll be right out. I’ll eat with you and then we’ll put the cot
in.”
So, he said to himself, we did well to stop the quarrelling. He had never quarrelled much with
this woman, while with the women that he loved he had quarrelled so much they had finally, always,
with the corrosion of the quarrelling, killed what they had together. He had loved too much, demanded
too much, and he wore it all out.
He thought about alone in Constantinople that time, having quarrelled in Paris before he had
gone out. He had whored the whole time and then, when that was over, and he had failed to kill his
loneliness, but only made it worse, he had written her, the first one, the one who left him, a letter
telling her how he had never been able to kill it. … How when he thought he saw her outside the
Regence one time it made him go all faint and sick inside, and that he would follow a woman who
looked like her in some way, along the Boulevard, afraid to see it was not she, afraid to lose the
feeling it gave him. How every one he had slept with had only made him miss her more. How what
she had done could never matter since he knew he could not cure himself of loving her. He wrote
this letter at the Club, cold sober, and mailed it to New York asking her to write him at the of ice
in Paris. That seemed safe. And that night missing her so much it made him feel hollow sick inside,
he wandered up past Maxim’s, picked a girl up and took her out to supper. He had gone to a place
to dance with her afterward, she danced badly, and left her for a hot Armenian slut, that swung her
belly against him so it almost scalded. He took her away from a British gunner subaltern after a
row. The gunner asked him outside and they fought in the street on the cobbles in the dark. He’d
hit him twice, hard, on the side of the jaw and when he didn’t go down he knew he was in for a
fight. The gunner hit him in the body, then beside his eye. He swung with his left again and landed
and the gunner fell on him and grabbed his coat and tore the sleeve of and he clubbed him twice
behind the ear and then smashed him with his right as he pushed him away. When the gunner went
down his head hit first and he ran with the girl because they heard the M.P.’s coming. They got
into a taxi and drove out to Rimmily Hissa along the Bosphorus, and around, and back in the cool
night and went to bed and she felt as over-ripe as she looked but smooth, rose-petal, syrupy,
smooth-bellied, big-breasted and needed no pillow under her buttocks, and he left her before she
was awake looking blousy enough in the first daylight and turned up at the Pera Palace with a
black eye, carrying his coat because one sleeve was missing.
That same night he left for Anatolia and he remembered, later on that trip, riding all day
through fields of the poppies that they raised for opium and how strange it made you feel, finally,
and all the distances seemed wrong, to where they had made the attack with the newly arrived
Constantine of icers, that did not know a god-damned thing, and the artillery had fired into the
troops and the British observer had cried like a child.
That was the day he’d first seen dead men wearing white ballet skirts and upturned shoes
with pompons on them. The Turks had come steadily and lumpily and he had seen the skirted men
running and the of icers shooting into them and running then themselves and he and the British
observer had run too until his lungs ached and his mouth was full of the taste of pennies and they
stopped behind some rocks and there were the Turks coming as lumpily as ever. Later he had seen
the things that he could never think of and later still he had seen much worse. So when he got back
to Paris that time he could not talk about it or stand to have it mentioned. And there in the café as
he passed was that American poet with a pile of saucers in front of him and a stupid look on his
potato face talking about the Dada movement with a Roumanian who said his name was Tristan
Tzara, who always wore a monocle and had a headache, and, back at the apartment with his wife
that now he loved again, the quarrel all over, the madness all over, glad to be home, the of ice sent
his mail up to the flat. So then the letter in answer to the one he’d written came in on a platter one
morning and when he saw the handwriting he went cold all over and tried to slip the letter
underneath another. But his wife said, “Who is that letter from, dear?” and that was the end of the
beginning of that.
He remembered the good times with them all, and the quarrels. They always picked the finest
places to have the quarrels. And why had they always quarrelled when he was feeling best? He had
never written any of that because, at first, he never wanted to hurt any one and then it seemed as
though there was enough to write without it. But he had always thought that he would write it
finally. There was so much to write. He had seen the world change; not just the events; although
he had seen many of them and had watched the people, but he had seen the subtler change and he
could remember how the people were at dif erent times. He had been in it and he had watched it
and it was his duty to write of it; but now he never would.
“How do you feel?” she said. She had come out from the tent now after her bath.
“All right.”
“Could you eat now?” He saw Molo behind her with the folding table and the other boy with the
dishes.
“I want to write,” he said.
“You ought to take some broth to keep your strength up.”
“I’m going to die tonight,” he said. “I don’t need my strength up.”
“Don’t be melodramatic, Harry, please,” she said.
“Why don’t you use your nose? I’m rotted half way up my thigh now. What the hell should I fool
with broth for? Molo bring whiskey-soda.”
“Please take the broth,” she said gently.
“All right.”
The broth was too hot. He had to hold it in the cup until it cooled enough to take it and then he
just got it down without gagging.
“You’re a fine woman,” he said. “Don’t pay any attention to me.”
She looked at him with her well-known, well-loved face from Spur and Town & Country, only a
little the worse for drink, only a little the worse for bed, but Town & Country never showed those
good breasts and those useful thighs and those lightly small-of-back-caressing hands, and as he looked
and saw her well-known pleasant smile, he felt death come again. This time there was no rush. It was
a puff, as of a wind that makes a candle flicker and the flame go tall.
“They can bring my net out later and hang it from the tree and build the fire up. I’m not going in
the tent tonight. It’s not worth moving. It’s a clear night. There won’t be any rain.”
So this was how you died, in whispers that you did not hear. Well, there would be no more
quarrelling. He could promise that. The one experience that he had never had he was not going to
spoil now. He probably would. You spoiled everything. But perhaps he wouldn’t.
“You can’t take dictation, can you?”
“I never learned,” she told him.
“That’s all right.”
There wasn’t time, of course, although it seemed as though it telescoped so that you might put it
all into one paragraph if you could get it right.
There was a log house, chinked white with mortar, on a hill above the lake. There was a bell
on a pole by the door to call the people in to meals. Behind the house were fields and behind the
fields was the timber. A line of lombardy poplars ran from the house to the dock. Other poplars
ran along the point. A road went up to the hills along the edge of the timber and along that road he
picked blackberries. Then that log house was burned down and all the guns that had been on deer
foot racks above the open fire place were burned and afterwards their barrels, with the lead
melted in the magazines, and the stocks burned away, lay out on the heap of ashes that were used
to make lye for the big iron soap kettles, and you asked Grandfather if you could have them to play
with, and he said, no. You see they were his guns still and he never bought any others. Nor did he
hunt any more. The house was rebuilt in the same place out of lumber now and painted white and
from its porch you saw the poplars and the lake beyond; but there were never any more guns. The
barrels of the guns that had hung on the deer feet on the wall of the log house lay out there on the
heap of ashes and no one ever touched them.
In the Black Forest, after the war, we rented a trout stream and there were two ways to walk
to it. One was down the valley from Triberg and around the valley road in the shade of the trees
that bordered the white road, and then up a side road that went up through the hills past many
small farms, with the big Schwarzwald houses, until that road crossed the stream. That was where
our fishing began.
The other way was to climb steeply up to the edge of the woods and then go across the top of
the hills through the pine woods, and then out to the edge of a meadow and down across this
meadow to the bridge. There were birches along the stream and it was not big, but narrow, clear
and fast, with pools where it had cut under the roots of the birches. At the Hotel in Triberg the
proprietor had a fine season. It was very pleasant and we were all great friends. The next year
came the inflation and the money he had made the year before was not enough to buy supplies to
open the hotel and he hanged himself.
You could dictate that, but you could not dictate the Place Contrescarpe where the flower
sellers dyed their flowers in the street and the dye ran over the paving where the autobus started
and the old men and the women, always drunk on wine and bad marc; and the children with their
noses running in the cold; the smell of dirty sweat and poverty and drunkenness at the Café des
Amateurs and the whores at the Bal Musette they lived above. The concierge who entertained the
trooper of the Garde Republicaine in her loge, his horse-hair-plumed helmet on a chair. The
locataire across the hall whose husband was a bicycle racer and her joy that morning at the
crémerie when she had opened L’Auto and seen where he placed third in Paris-Tours, his first big
race. She had blushed and laughed and then gone upstairs crying with the yellow sporting paper in
her hand. The husband of the woman who ran the Bal Musette drove a taxi and when he, Harry,
had to take an early plane the husband knocked upon the door to wake him and they each drank a
glass of white wine at the zinc of the bar before they started. He knew his neighbors in that quarter
then because they all were poor.
Around that Place there were two kinds; the drunkards and the sportifs. The drunkards killed
their poverty that way; the sportifs took it out in exercise. They were the descendants of the
Communards and it was no struggle for them to know their politics. They knew who had shot their
fathers, their relatives, their brothers, and their friends when the Versailles troops came in and
took the town after the Commune and executed any one they could catch with calloused hands, or
who wore a cap, or carried any other sign he was a working man. And in that poverty, and in that
quarter across the street from a Boucherie Chevaline and a wine cooperative he had written the
start of all he was to do. There never was another part of Paris that he loved like that, the
sprawling trees, the old white plastered houses painted brown below, the long green of the autobus
in that round square, the purple flower dye upon the paving, the sudden drop down the hill of the
rue Cardinal Lemoine to the River, and the other way the narrow crowded world of the rue
Mouf etard. The street that ran up toward the Pantheon and the other that he always took with the
bicycle, the only asphalted street in all that quarter, smooth under the tires, with the high narrow
houses and the cheap tall hotel where Paul Verlaine had died. There were only two rooms in the
apartments where they lived and he had a room on the top floor of that hotel that cost him sixty
francs a month where he did his writing, and from it he could see the roofs and chimney pots and
all the hills of Paris.
From the apartment you could only see the wood and coal man’s place. He sold wine too, bad
wine. The golden horse’s head outside the Boucherie Chevaline where the carcasses hung yellow
gold and red in the open window, and the green painted co-operative where they bought their
wine; good wine and cheap. The rest was plaster walls and the windows of the neighbors. The
neighbors who, at night, when some one lay drunk in the street, moaning and groaning in that
typical French ivresse that you were propaganded to believe did not exist, would open their
windows and then the murmur of talk.
“Where is the policeman? When you don’t want him the bugger is always there. He’s sleeping
with some concierge. Get the Agent.” Till some one threw a bucket of water from a window and the
moaning stopped. “What’s that? Water. Ah, that’s intelligent.” And the windows shutting. Marie,
his femme de ménage, protesting against the eight-hour day saying, “If a husband works until six
he gets only a little drunk on the way home and does not waste too much. If he works only until five
he is drunk every night and one has no money. It is the wife of the working man who suf ers from
this shortening of hours.”
“Wouldn’t you like some more broth?” the woman asked him now.
“No, thank you very much. It is awfully good.”
“Try just a little.”
“I would like a whiskey-soda.”
“It’s not good for you.”
“No. It’s bad for me. Cole Porter wrote the words and the music. This knowledge that you’re
going mad for me.”
“You know I like you to drink.”
“Oh yes. Only it’s bad for me.”
When she goes, he thought, I’ll have all I want. Not all I want but all there is. Ayee he was tired.
Too tired. He was going to sleep a little while. He lay still and death was not there. It must have gone
around another street. It went in pairs, on bicycles, and moved absolutely silently on the pavements.
No, he had never written about Paris. Not the Paris that he cared about. But what about the
rest that he had never written?
What about the ranch and the silvered gray of the sage brush, the quick, clear water in the
irrigation ditches, and the heavy green of the alfalfa. The trail went up into the hills and the cattle
in the summer were shy as deer. The bawling and the steady noise and slow moving mass raising a
dust as you brought them down in the fall. And behind the mountains, the clear sharpness of the
peak in the evening light and, riding down along the trail in the moonlight, bright across the
valley. Now he remembered coming down through the timber in the dark holding the horse’s tail
when you could not see and all the stories that he meant to write.
About the half-wit chore boy who was left at the ranch that time and told not to let any one
get any hay, and that old bastard from the Forks who had beaten the boy when he had worked for
him stopping to get some feed. The boy refusing and the old man saying he would beat him again.
The boy got the rifle from the kitchen and shot him when he tried to come into the barn and when
they came back to the ranch he’d been dead a week, frozen in the corral, and the dogs had eaten
part of him. But what was left you packed on a sled wrapped in a blanket and roped on and you got
the boy to help you haul it, and the two of you took it out over the road on skis, and sixty miles
down to town to turn the boy over. He having no idea that he would be arrested. Thinking he had
done his duty and that you were his friend and he would be rewarded. He’d helped to haul the old
man in so everybody could know how bad the old man had been and how he’d tried to steal some
feed that didn’t belong to him, and when the sherif put the handcuf s on the boy he couldn’t
believe it. Then he’d started to cry. That was one story he had saved to write. He knew at least
twenty good stories from out there and he had never written one. Why?
“You tell them why,” he said.
“Why what, dear?”
“Why nothing.”
She didn’t drink so much, now, since she had him. But if he lived he would never write about
her, he knew that now. Nor about any of them. The rich were dull and they drank too much, or they
played too much backgammon. They were dull and they were repetitious. He remembered poor Julian
and his romantic awe of them and how he had started a story once that began, “The very rich are
different from you and me.” And how some one had said to Julian, Yes, they have more money. But
that was not humorous to Julian. He thought they were a special glamourous race and when he found
they weren’t it wrecked him just as much as any other thing that wrecked him.
He had been contemptuous of those who wrecked. You did not have to like it because you
understood it. He could beat anything, he thought, because no thing could hurt him if he did not care.
All right. Now he would not care for death. One thing he had always dreaded was the pain. He
could stand pain as well as any man, until it went on too long, and wore him out, but here he had
something that had hurt frightfully and just when he had felt it breaking him, the pain had stopped.
He remembered long ago when Williamson, the bombing of icer, had been hit by a stick bomb
some one in a German patrol had thrown as he was coming in through the wire that night and,
screaming, had begged every one to kill him. He was a fat man, very brave, and a good of icer,
although addicted to fantastic shows. But that night he was caught in the wire, with a flare
lighting him up and his bowels spilled out into the wire, so when they brought him in, alive, they
had to cut him loose. Shoot me, Harry. For Christ sake shoot me. They had had an argument one
time about our Lord never sending you anything you could not bear and some one’s theory had
been that meant that at a certain time the pain passed you out automatically. But he had always
remembered Williamson, that night. Nothing passed out Williamson until he gave him all his
morphine tablets that he had always saved to use himself and then they did not work right away.
Still this now, that he had, was very easy; and if it was no worse as it went on there was nothing
to worry about. Except that he would rather be in better company.
He thought a little about the company that he would like to have.
No, he thought, when everything you do, you do too long, and do too late, you can’t expect to find
the people still there. The people all are gone. The party’s over and you are with your hostess now.
I’m getting as bored with dying as with everything else, he thought.
“It’s a bore,” he said out loud.
“What is, my dear?”
“Anything you do too bloody long.”
He looked at her face between him and the fire. She was leaning back in the chair and the
firelight shone on her pleasantly lined face and he could see that she was sleepy. He heard the hyena
make a noise just outside the range of the fire.
“I’ve been writing,” he said. “But I got tired.”
“Do you think you will be able to sleep?”
“Pretty sure. Why don’t you turn in?”
“I like to sit here with you.”
“Do you feel anything strange?” he asked her.
“No. Just a little sleepy.”
“I do,” he said.
He had just felt death come by again.
“You know the only thing I’ve never lost is curiosity,” he said to her.
“You’ve never lost anything. You’re the most complete man I’ve ever known.”
“Christ,” he said. “How little a woman knows. What is that? Your intuition?”
Because, just then, death had come and rested its head on the foot of the cot and he could smell
its breath.
“Never believe any of that about a scythe and a skull,” he told her. “It can be two bicycle
policemen as easily, or be a bird. Or it can have a wide snout like a hyena.”
It had moved up on him now, but it had no shape any more. It simply occupied space.
“Tell it to go away.”
It did not go away but moved a little closer.
“You’ve got a hell of a breath,” he told it. “You stinking bastard.”
It moved up closer to him still and now he could not speak to it, and when it saw he could not
speak it came a little closer, and now he tried to send it away without speaking, but it moved in on
him so its weight was all upon his chest, and while it crouched there and he could not move, or speak,
he heard the woman say, “ Bwana is asleep now. Take the cot up very gently and carry it into the
tent.”
He could not speak to tell her to make it go away and it crouched now, heavier, so he could not
breathe. And then, while they lifted the cot, suddenly it was all right and the weight went from his
chest.
It was morning and had been morning for some time and he heard the plane. It showed very tiny
and then made a wide circle and the boys ran out and lit the fires, using kerosene, and piled on grass
so there were two big smudges at each end of the level place and the morning breeze blew them
toward the camp and the plane circled twice more, low this time, and then glided down and levelled
off and landed smoothly and, coming walking toward him, was old Compton in slacks, a tweed jacket
and a brown felt hat.
“What’s the matter, old cock?” Compton said.
“Bad leg,” he told him. “Will you have some breakfast?”
“Thanks. I’ll just have some tea. It’s the Puss Moth you know. I won’t be able to take the
Memsahib. There’s only room for one. Your lorry is on the way.”
Helen had taken Compton aside and was speaking to him. Compton came back more cheery than
ever.
“We’ll get you right in,” he said. “I’ll be back for the Mem. Now I’m afraid I’ll have to stop at
Arusha to refuel. We’d better get going.”
“What about the tea?”
“I don’t really care about it, you know.”
The boys had picked up the cot and carried it around the green tents and down along the rock and
out onto the plain and along past the smudges that were burning brightly now, the grass all consumed,
and the wind fanning the fire, to the little plane. It was difficult getting him in, but once in he lay back
in the leather seat, and the leg was stuck straight out to one side of the seat where Compton sat.
Compton started the motor and got in. He waved to Helen and to the boys and, as the clatter moved
into the old familiar roar, they swung around with Compie watching for warthog holes and roared,
bumping, along the stretch between the fires and with the last bump rose and he saw them all standing
below, waving, and the camp beside the hill, flattening now, and the plain spreading, clumps of trees,
and the bush flattening, while the game trails ran now smoothly to the dry waterholes, and there was a
new water that he had never known of. The zebra, small rounded backs now, and the wildebeeste,
big-headed dots seeming to climb as they moved in long fingers across the plain, now scattering as the
shadow came toward them, they were tiny now, and the movement had no gallop, and the plain as far
as you could see, gray-yellow now and ahead old Compie’s tweed back and the brown felt hat. Then
they were over the first hills and the wildebeeste were trailing up them, and then they were over
mountains with sudden depths of green-rising forest and the solid bamboo slopes, and then the heavy
forest again, sculptured into peaks and hollows until they crossed, and hills sloped down and then
another plain, hot now, and purple brown, bumpy with heat and Compie looking back to see how he
was riding. Then there were other mountains dark ahead.
And then instead of going on to Arusha they turned left, he evidently figured that they had the gas,
and looking down he saw a pink sifting cloud, moving over the ground, and in the air, like the first
snow in a blizzard, that comes from nowhere, and he knew the locusts were coming up from the South.
Then they began to climb and they were going to the East it seemed, and then it darkened and they
were in a storm, the rain so thick it seemed like flying through a waterfall, and then they were out and
Compie turned his head and grinned and pointed and there, ahead, all he could see, as wide as all the
world, great, high, and unbelievably white in the sun, was the square top of Kilimanjaro. And then he
knew that there was where he was going.
Just then the hyena stopped whimpering in the night and started to make a strange, human, almost
crying sound. The woman heard it and stirred uneasily. She did not wake. In her dream she was at the
house on Long Island and it was the night before her daughter’s début. Somehow her father was there
and he had been very rude. Then the noise the hyena made was so loud she woke and for a moment
she did not know where she was and she was very afraid. Then she took the flashlight and shone it on
the other cot that they had carried in after Harry had gone to sleep. She could see his bulk under the
mosquito bar but somehow he had gotten his leg out and it hung down alongside the cot. The dressings
had all come down and she could not look at it.
“Molo,” she called, “Molo! Molo!”
Then she said, “Harry, Harry!” Then her voice rising, “Harry! Please. Oh Harry!”
There was no answer and she could not hear him breathing.
Outside the tent the hyena made the same strange noise that had awakened her. But she did not
hear him for the beating of her heart.
Old Man at the Bridge
AN OLD MAN WITH STEEL RIMMED SPECtacles and very dusty
clothes sat by the side of the road. There was a pontoon bridge across the river and carts, trucks, and
men, women and children were crossing it. The mule-drawn carts staggered up the steep bank from
the bridge with soldiers helping push against the spokes of the wheels. The trucks ground up and away
heading out of it all and the peasants plodded along in the ankle deep dust. But the old man sat there
without moving. He was too tired to go any farther.
It was my business to cross the bridge, explore the bridgehead beyond and find out to what point
the enemy had advanced. I did this and returned over the bridge. There were not so many carts now
and very few people on foot, but the old man was still there.
“Where do you come from?” I asked him.
“From San Carlos,” he said, and smiled.
That was his native town and so it gave him pleasure to mention it and he smiled.
“I was taking care of animals,” he explained.
“Oh,” I said, not quite understanding.
“Yes,” he said, “I stayed, you see, taking care of animals. I was the last one to leave the town of
San Carlos.”
He did not look like a shepherd nor a herdsman and I looked at his black dusty clothes and his
gray dusty face and his steel rimmed spectacles and said, “What animals were they?”
“Various animals,” he said, and shook his head. “I had to leave them.”
I was watching the bridge and the African looking country of the Ebro Delta and wondering how
long now it would be before we would see the enemy, and listening all the while for the first noises
that would signal that ever mysterious event called contact, and the old man still sat there.
“What animals were they?” I asked.
“There were three animals altogether,” he explained. “There were two goats and a cat and then
there were four pairs of pigeons.”
“And you had to leave them?” I asked.
“Yes. Because of the artillery. The captain told me to go because of the artillery.”
“And you have no family?” I asked, watching the far end of the bridge where a few last carts
were hurrying down the slope of the bank.
“No,” he said, “only the animals I stated. The cat, of course, will be all right. A cat can look out
for itself, but I cannot think what will become of the others.”
“What politics have you?” I asked.
“I am without politics,” he said. “I am seventy-six years old. I have come twelve kilometers now
and I think now I can go no further.”
“This is not a good place to stop,” I said. “If you can make it, there are trucks up the road where
it forks for Tortosa.”
“I will wait a while,” he said, “and then I will go. Where do the trucks go?”
“Towards Barcelona,” I told him.
“I know no one in that direction,” he said, “but thank you very much. Thank you again very
much.”
He looked at me very blankly and tiredly, then said, having to share his worry with some one,
“The cat will be all right, I am sure. There is no need to be unquiet about the cat. But the others. Now
what do you think about the others?”
“Why they’ll probably come through it all right.”
“You think so?”
“Why not,” I said, watching the far bank where now there were no carts.
“But what will they do under the artillery when I was told to leave because of the artillery?”
“Did you leave the dove cage unlocked?” I asked.
“Yes.”
“Then they’ll fly.”
“Yes, certainly they’ll fly. But the others. It’s better not to think about the others,” he said.
“If you are rested I would go,” I urged. “Get up and try to walk now.”
“Thank you,” he said and got to his feet, swayed from side to side and then sat down backwards
in the dust.
“I was taking care of animals,” he said dully, but no longer to me. “I was only taking care of
animals.”
There was nothing to do about him. It was Easter Sunday and the Fascists were advancing
toward the Ebro. It was a gray overcast day with a low ceiling so their planes were not up. That and
the fact that cats know how to look after themselves was all the good luck that old man would ever
have.
Up in Michigan
JIM GILMORE CAME TO HORTONS BAY from Canada. He bought
the blacksmith shop from old man Horton. Jim was short and dark with big mustaches and big hands.
He was a good horseshoer and did not look much like a blacksmith even with his leather apron on. He
lived upstairs above the blacksmith shop and took his meals at D. J. Smith’s.
Liz Coates worked for Smith’s. Mrs. Smith, who was a very large clean woman, said Liz Coates
was the neatest girl she’d ever seen. Liz had good legs and always wore clean gingham aprons and
Jim noticed that her hair was always neat behind. He liked her face because it was so jolly but he
never thought about her.
Liz liked Jim very much. She liked it the way he walked over from the shop and often went to the
kitchen door to watch for him to start down the road. She liked it about his mustache. She liked it
about how white his teeth were when he smiled. She liked it very much that he didn’t look like a
blacksmith. She liked it how much D. J. Smith and Mrs. Smith liked Jim. One day she found that she
liked it the way the hair was black on his arms and how white they were above the tanned line when
he washed up in the washbasin outside the house. Liking that made her feel funny.
Hortons Bay, the town, was only five houses on the main road between Boyne City and
Charlevoix. There was the general store and post office with a high false front and maybe a wagon
hitched out in front, Smith’s house, Stroud’s house, Dillworth’s house, Horton’s house and Van
Hoosen’s house. The houses were in a big grove of elm trees and the road was very sandy. There was
farming country and timber each way up the road. Up the road a ways was the Methodist church and
down the road the other direction was the township school. The blacksmith shop was painted red and
faced the school.
A steep sandy road ran down the hill to the bay through the timber. From Smith’s back door you
could look out across the woods that ran down to the lake and across the bay. It was very beautiful in
the spring and summer, the bay blue and bright and usually whitecaps on the lake out beyond the point
from the breeze blowing from Charlevoix and Lake Michigan. From Smith’s back door Liz could see
ore barges way out in the lake going toward Boyne City. When she looked at them they didn’t seem to
be moving at all but if she went in and dried some more dishes and then came out again they would be
out of sight beyond the point.
All the time now Liz was thinking about Jim Gilmore. He didn’t seem to notice her much. He
talked about the shop to D. J. Smith and about the Republican Party and about James G. Blaine. In the
evenings he read The Toledo Blade and the Grand Rapids paper by the lamp in the front room or went
out spearing fish in the bay with a jacklight with D. J. Smith. In the fall he and Smith and Charley
Wyman took a wagon and tent, grub, axes, their rifles and two dogs and went on a trip to the pine
plains beyond Vanderbilt deer hunting. Liz and Mrs. Smith were cooking for four days for them before
they started. Liz wanted to make something special for Jim to take but she didn’t finally because she
was afraid to ask Mrs. Smith for the eggs and flour and afraid if she bought them Mrs. Smith would
catch her cooking. It would have been all right with Mrs. Smith but Liz was afraid.
All the time Jim was gone on the deer hunting trip Liz thought about him. It was awful while he
was gone. She couldn’t sleep well from thinking about him but she discovered it was fun to think
about him too. If she let herself go it was better. The night before they were to come back she didn’t
sleep at all, that is she didn’t think she slept because it was all mixed up in a dream about not sleeping
and really not sleeping. When she saw the wagon coming down the road she felt weak and sick sort of
inside. She couldn’t wait till she saw Jim and it seemed as though everything would be all right when
he came. The wagon stopped outside under the big elm and Mrs. Smith and Liz went out. All the men
had beards and there were three deer in the back of the wagon, their thin legs sticking stiff over the
edge of the wagon box. Mrs. Smith kissed D. J. and he hugged her. Jim said “Hello, Liz,” and grinned.
Liz hadn’t known just what would happen when Jim got back but she was sure it would be something.
Nothing had happened. The men were just home, that was all. Jim pulled the burlap sacks off the deer
and Liz looked at them. One was a big buck. It was stiff and hard to lift out of the wagon.
“Did you shoot it, Jim?” Liz asked.
“Yeah. Ain’t it a beauty?” Jim got it onto his back to carry to the smokehouse.
That night Charley Wyman stayed to supper at Smith’s. It was too late to get back to Charlevoix.
The men washed up and waited in the front room for supper.
“Ain’t there something left in that crock, Jimmy?” D. J. Smith asked, and Jim went out to the
wagon in the barn and fetched in the jug of whiskey the men had taken hunting with them. It was a
four-gallon jug and there was quite a little slopped back and forth in the bottom. Jim took a long pull
on his way back to the house. It was hard to lift such a big jug up to drink out of it. Some of the
whiskey ran down on his shirt front. The two men smiled when Jim came in with the jug. D. J. Smith
sent for glasses and Liz brought them. D. J. poured out three big shots.
“Well, here’s looking at you, D. J.,” said Charley Wyman.
“That damn big buck, Jimmy,” said D. J.
“Here’s all the ones we missed, D. J.,” said Jim, and downed his liquor.
“Tastes good to a man.”
“Nothing like it this time of year for what ails you.”
“How about another, boys?”
“Here’s how, D. J.”
“Down the creek, boys.”
“Here’s to next year.”
Jim began to feel great. He loved the taste and the feel of whiskey. He was glad to be back to a
comfortable bed and warm food and the shop. He had another drink. The men came in to supper
feeling hilarious but acting very respectable. Liz sat at the table after she put on the food and ate with
the family. It was a good dinner. The men ate seriously. After supper they went into the front room
again and Liz cleaned off with Mrs. Smith. Then Mrs. Smith went upstairs and pretty soon Smith came
out and went upstairs too. Jim and Charley were still in the front room. Liz was sitting in the kitchen
next to the stove pretending to read a book and thinking about Jim. She didn’t want to go to bed yet
because she knew Jim would be coming out and she wanted to see him as he went out so she could
take the way he looked up to bed with her.
She was thinking about him hard and then Jim came out. His eyes were shining and his hair was
a little rumpled. Liz looked down at her book. Jim came over back of her chair and stood there and
she could feel him breathing and then he put his arms around her. Her breasts felt plump and firm and
the nipples were erect under his hands. Liz was terribly frightened, no one had ever touched her, but
she thought, “He’s come to me finally. He’s really come.”
She held herself stiff because she was so frightened and did not know anything else to do and
then Jim held her tight against the chair and kissed her. It was such a sharp, aching, hurting feeling that
she thought she couldn’t stand it. She felt Jim right through the back of the chair and she couldn’t stand
it and then something clicked inside of her and the feeling was warmer and softer. Jim held her tight
hard against the chair and she wanted it now and Jim whispered, “Come on for a walk.”
Liz took her coat off the peg on the kitchen wall and they went out the door. Jim had his arm
around her and every little way they stopped and pressed against each other and Jim kissed her. There
was no moon and they walked ankle-deep in the sandy road through the trees down to the dock and the
warehouse on the bay. The water was lapping in the piles and the point was dark across the bay. It
was cold but Liz was hot all over from being with Jim. They sat down in the shelter of the warehouse
and Jim pulled Liz close to him. She was frightened. One of Jim’s hands went inside her dress and
stroked over her breast and the other hand was in her lap. She was very frightened and didn’t know
how he was going to go about things but she snuggled close to him. Then the hand that felt so big in
her lap went away and was on her leg and started to move up it.
“Don’t, Jim,” Liz said. Jim slid the hand further up.
“You mustn’t, Jim. You mustn’t.” Neither Jim nor Jim’s big hand paid any attention to her.
The boards were hard. Jim had her dress up and was trying to do something to her. She was
frightened but she wanted it. She had to have it but it frightened her.
“You mustn’t do it, Jim. You mustn’t.”
“I got to. I’m going to. You know we got to.”
“No we haven’t, Jim. We ain’t got to. Oh, it isn’t right. Oh, it’s so big and it hurts so. You can’t.
Oh, Jim. Jim. Oh.”
The hemlock planks of the dock were hard and splintery and cold and Jim was heavy on her and
he had hurt her. Liz pushed him, she was so uncomfortable and cramped. Jim was asleep. He
wouldn’t move. She worked out from under him and sat up and straightened her skirt and coat and
tried to do something with her hair. Jim was sleeping with his mouth a little open. Liz leaned over and
kissed him on the cheek. He was still asleep. She lifted his head a little and shook it. He rolled his
head over and swallowed. Liz started to cry. She walked over to the edge of the dock and looked
down to the water. There was a mist coming up from the bay. She was cold and miserable and
everything felt gone. She walked back to where Jim was lying and shook him once more to make sure.
She was crying.
“Jim,” she said, “Jim. Please, Jim.”
Jim stirred and curled a little tighter. Liz took off her coat and leaned over and covered him with
it. She tucked it around him neatly and carefully. Then she walked across the dock and up the steep
sandy road to go to bed. A cold mist was coming up through the woods from the bay.
On the Quai at Smyrna
THE STRANGE THING WAS, HE SAID, HOW they screamed every
night at midnight. I do not know why they screamed at that time. We were in the harbor and they were
all on the pier and at midnight they started screaming. We used to turn the searchlight on them to quiet
them. That always did the trick. We’d run the searchlight up and down over them two or three times
and they stopped it. One time I was senior officer on the pier and a Turkish officer came up to me in a
frightful rage because one of our sailors had been most insulting to him. So I told him the fellow
would be sent on ship and be most severely punished. I asked him to point him out. So he pointed out
a gunner’s mate, most inoffensive chap. Said he’d been most frightfully and repeatedly insulting;
talking to me through an interpreter. I couldn’t imagine how the gunner’s mate knew enough Turkish to
be insulting. I called him over and said, “And just in case you should have spoken to any Turkish
officers.”
“I haven’t spoken to any of them, sir.”
“I’m quite sure of it,” I said, “but you’d best go on board ship and not come ashore again for the
rest of the day.”
Then I told the Turk the man was being sent on board ship and would be most severely dealt
with. Oh most rigorously. He felt topping about it. Great friends we were.
The worst, he said, were the women with dead babies. You couldn’t get the women to give up
their dead babies. They’d have babies dead for six days. Wouldn’t give them up. Nothing you could
do about it. Had to take them away finally. Then there was an old lady, most extraordinary case. I told
it to a doctor and he said I was lying. We were clearing them off the pier, had to clear off the dead
ones, and this old woman was lying on a sort of litter. They said, “Will you have a look at her, sir?”
So I had a look at her and just then she died and went absolutely stiff. Her legs drew up and she drew
up from the waist and went quite rigid. Exactly as though she had been dead over night. She was quite
dead and absolutely rigid. I told a medical chap about it and he told me it was impossible.
They were all out there on the pier and it wasn’t at all like an earthquake or that sort of thing
because they never knew about the Turk. They never knew what the old Turk would do. You
remember when they ordered us not to come in to take off any more? I had the wind up when we came
in that morning. He had any amount of batteries and could have blown us clean out of the water. We
were going to come in, run close along the pier, let go the front and rear anchors and then shell the
Turkish quarter of the town. They would have blown us out of water but we would have blown the
town simply to hell. They just fired a few blank charges at us as we came in. Kemal came down and
sacked the Turkish commander. For exceeding his authority or some such thing. He got a bit above
himself. It would have been the hell of a mess.
You remember the harbor. There were plenty of nice things floating around in it. That was the
only time in my life I got so I dreamed about things. You didn’t mind the women who were having
babies as you did those with the dead ones. They had them all right. Surprising how few of them died.
You just covered them over with something and let them go to it. They’d always pick out the darkest
place in the hold to have them. None of them minded anything once they got off the pier.
The Greeks were nice chaps too. When they evacuated they had all their baggage animals they
couldn’t take off with them so they just broke their forelegs and dumped them into the shallow water.
All those mules with their forelegs broken pushed over into the shallow water. It was all a pleasant
business. My word yes a most pleasant business.
CHAPTER I
Everybody was drunk. The whole battery was drunk going along the road in the dark. We were
going to the Champagne. The lieutenant kept riding his horse out into the fields and saying to him,
“I’m drunk, I tell you, mon vieux. Oh, I am so soused.” We went along the road all night in the
dark and the adjutant kept riding up alongside my kitchen and saying, “You must put it out. It is
dangerous. It will be observed.” We were fifty kilometers from the front but the adjutant worried
about the fire in my kitchen. It was funny going along that road. That was when I was a kitchen
corporal.
Indian Camp
AT THE LAKE SHORE THERE WAS AN other rowboat drawn up.
The two Indians stood waiting.
Nick and his father got in the stern of the boat and the Indians shoved it off and one of them got in
to row. Uncle George sat in the stern of the camp rowboat. The young Indian shoved the camp boat off
and got in to row Uncle George.
The two boats started off in the dark. Nick heard the oarlocks of the other boat quite a way ahead
of them in the mist. The Indians rowed with quick choppy strokes. Nick lay back with his father’s arm
around him. It was cold on the water. The Indian who was rowing them was working very hard, but
the other boat moved further ahead in the mist all the time.
“Where are we going, Dad?” Nick asked.
“Over to the Indian camp. There is an Indian lady very sick.”
“Oh,” said Nick.
Across the bay they found the other boat beached. Uncle George was smoking a cigar in the dark.
The young Indian pulled the boat way up on the beach. Uncle George gave both the Indians cigars.
They walked up from the beach through a meadow that was soaking wet with dew, following the
young Indian who carried a lantern. Then they went into the woods and followed a trail that led to the
logging road that ran back into the hills. It was much lighter on the logging road as the timber was cut
away on both sides. The young Indian stopped and blew out his lantern and they all walked on along
the road.
They came around a bend and a dog came out barking. Ahead were the lights of the shanties
where the Indian bark-peelers lived. More dogs rushed out at them. The two Indians sent them back to
the shanties. In the shanty nearest the road there was a light in the window. An old woman stood in the
doorway holding a lamp.
Inside on a wooden bunk lay a young Indian woman. She had been trying to have her baby for
two days. All the old women in the camp had been helping her. The men had moved off up the road to
sit in the dark and smoke out of range of the noise she made. She screamed just as Nick and the two
Indians followed his father and Uncle George into the shanty. She lay in the lower bunk, very big
under a quilt. Her head was turned to one side. In the upper bunk was her husband. He had cut his foot
very badly with an ax three days before. He was smoking a pipe. The room smelled very bad.
Nick’s father ordered some water to be put on the stove, and while it was heating he spoke to
Nick.
“This lady is going to have a baby, Nick,” he said.
“I know,” said Nick.
“You don’t know,” said his father. “Listen to me. What she is going through is called being in
labor. The baby wants to be born and she wants it to be born. All her muscles are trying to get the
baby born. That is what is happening when she screams.”
“I see,” Nick said.
Just then the woman cried out.
“Oh, Daddy, can’t you give her something to make her stop screaming?” asked Nick.
“No. I haven’t any anæsthetic,” his father said. “But her screams are not important. I don’t hear
them because they are not important.”
The husband in the upper bunk rolled over against the wall.
The woman in the kitchen motioned to the doctor that the water was hot. Nick’s father went into
the kitchen and poured about half of the water out of the big kettle into a basin. Into the water left in
the kettle he put several things he unwrapped from a handkerchief.
“Those must boil,” he said, and began to scrub his hands in the basin of hot water with a cake of
soap he had brought from the camp. Nick watched his father’s hands scrubbing each other with the
soap. While his father washed his hands very carefully and thoroughly, he talked.
“You see, Nick, babies are supposed to be born head first but sometimes they’re not. When
they’re not they make a lot of trouble for everybody. Maybe I’ll have to operate on this lady. We’ll
know in a little while.”
When he was satisfied with his hands he went in and went to work.
“Pull back that quilt, will you, George?” he said. “I’d rather not touch it.”
Later when he started to operate Uncle George and three Indian men held the woman still. She
bit Uncle George on the arm and Uncle George said, “Damn squaw bitch!” and the young Indian who
had rowed Uncle George over laughed at him. Nick held the basin for his father. It all took a long
time. His father picked the baby up and slapped it to make it breathe and handed it to the old woman.
“See, it’s a boy, Nick,” he said. “How do you like being an interne?”
Nick said, “All right.” He was looking away so as not to see what his father was doing.
“There. That gets it,” said his father and put something into the basin. Nick didn’t look at it.
“Now,” his father said, “there’s some stitches to put in. You can watch this or not, Nick, just as
you like. I’m going to sew up the incision I made.”
Nick did not watch. His curiosity had been gone for a long time.
His father finished and stood up. Uncle George and the three Indian men stood up. Nick put the
basin out in the kitchen.
Uncle George looked at his arm. The young Indian smiled reminiscently.
“I’ll put some peroxide on that, George,” the doctor said. He bent over the Indian woman. She
was quiet now and her eyes were closed. She looked very pale. She did not know what had become
of the baby or anything.
“I’ll be back in the morning,” the doctor said, standing up. “The nurse should be here from St.
Ignace by noon and she’ll bring everything we need.”
He was feeling exalted and talkative as football players are in the dressing room after a game.
“That’s one for the medical journal, George,” he said. “Doing a Cæsarian with a jack-knife and
sewing it up with nine-foot, tapered gut leaders.”
Uncle George was standing against the wall, looking at his arm.
“Oh, you’re a great man, all right,” he said.
“Ought to have a look at the proud father. They’re usually the worst sufferers in these little
affairs,” the doctor said. “I must say he took it all pretty quietly.”
He pulled back the blanket from the Indian’s head. His hand came away wet. He mounted on the
edge of the lower bunk with the lamp in one hand and looked in. The Indian lay with his face toward
the wall. His throat had been cut from ear to ear. The blood had flowed down into a pool where his
body sagged the bunk. His head rested on his left arm. The open razor lay, edge up, in the blankets.
“Take Nick out of the shanty, George,” the doctor said.
There was no need of that. Nick, standing in the door of the kitchen, had a good view of the
upper bunk when his father, the lamp in one hand, tipped the Indian’s head back.
It was just beginning to be daylight when they walked along the logging road back toward the
lake.
“I’m terribly sorry I brought you along, Nickie,” said his father, all his post-operative
exhilaration gone. “It was an awful mess to put you through.”
“Do ladies always have such a hard time having babies?” Nick asked.
“No, that was very, very exceptional.”
“Why did he kill himself, Daddy?”
“I don’t know, Nick. He couldn’t stand things, I guess.”
“Do many men kill themselves, Daddy?”
“Not very many, Nick.”
“Do many women?”
“Hardly ever.”
“Don’t they ever?”
“Oh, yes. They do sometimes.”
“Daddy?”
“Yes.”
“Where did Uncle George go?”
“He’ll turn up all right.”
“Is dying hard, Daddy?”
“No, I think it’s pretty easy, Nick. It all depends.”
They were seated in the boat, Nick in the stern, his father rowing. The sun was coming up over
the hills. A bass jumped, making a circle in the water. Nick trailed his hand in the water. It felt warm
in the sharp chill of the morning.
In the early morning on the lake sitting in the stern of the boat with his father rowing, he felt quite
sure that he would never die.
CHAPTER II
Minarets stuck up in the rain out of Adrianople across the mud flats. The carts were jammed for
thirty miles along the Karagatch road. Water buf alo and cattle were hauling carts through the
mud. No end and no beginning. Just carts loaded with everything they owned. The old men and
women, soaked through, walked along keeping the cattle moving. The Maritza was running yellow
almost up to the bridge. Carts were jammed solid on the bridge with camels bobbing along
through them. Greek cavalry herded along the procession. Women and kids were in the carts
crouched with mattresses, mirrors, sewing machines, bundles. There was a woman having a kid
with a young girl holding a blanket over her and crying. Scared sick looking at it. It rained all
through the evacuation.
The Doctor and the
Doctor’s Wife
DICK BOULTON CAME FROM THE INDIAN camp to cut up
logs for Nick’s father. He brought his son Eddy and another Indian named Billy Tabeshaw with him.
They came in through the back gate out of the woods, Eddy carrying the long cross-cut saw. It flopped
over his shoulder and made a musical sound as he walked. Billy Tabeshaw carried two big canthooks. Dick had three axes under his arm.
He turned and shut the gate. The others went on ahead of him down to the lake shore where the
logs were buried in the sand.
The logs had been lost from the big log booms that were towed down the lake to the mill by the
steamer Magic. They had drifted up onto the beach and if nothing were done about them sooner or
later the crew of the Magic would come along the shore in a rowboat, spot the logs, drive an iron
spike with a ring on it into the end of each one and then tow them out into the lake to make a new
boom. But the lumbermen might never come for them because a few logs were not worth the price of a
crew to gather them. If no one came for them they would be left to waterlog and rot on the beach.
Nick’s father always assumed that this was what would happen, and hired the Indians to come
down from the camp and cut the logs up with the cross-cut saw and split them with a wedge to make
cord wood and chunks for the open fireplace. Dick Boulton walked around past the cottage down to
the lake. There were four big beech logs lying almost buried in the sand. Eddy hung the saw up by one
of its handles in the crotch of a tree. Dick put the three axes down on the little dock. Dick was a halfbreed and many of the farmers around the lake believed he was really a white man. He was very lazy
but a great worker once he was started. He took a plug of tobacco out of his pocket, bit off a chew and
spoke in Ojibway to Eddy and Billy Tabeshaw.
They sunk the ends of their cant-hooks into one of the logs and swung against it to loosen it in the
sand. They swung their weight against the shafts of the cant-hooks. The log moved in the sand. Dick
Boulton turned to Nick’s father.
“Well, Doc,” he said, “that’s a nice lot of timber you’ve stolen.”
“Don’t talk that way, Dick,” the doctor said. “It’s driftwood.”
Eddy and Billy Tabeshaw had rocked the log out of the wet sand and rolled it toward the water.
“Put it right in,” Dick Boulton shouted.
“What are you doing that for?” asked the doctor.
“Wash it off. Clean off the sand on account of the saw. I want to see who it belongs to,” Dick
said.
The log was just awash in the lake. Eddy and Billy Tabeshaw leaned on their cant-hooks
sweating in the sun. Dick kneeled down in the sand and looked at the mark of the scaler’s hammer in
the wood at the end of the log.
“It belongs to White and McNally,” he said, standing up and brushing off his trousers knees.
The doctor was very uncomfortable.
“You’d better not saw it up then, Dick,” he said, shortly.
“Don’t get huffy, Doc,” said Dick. “Don’t get huffy. I don’t care who you steal from. It’s none of
my business.”
“If you think the logs are stolen, leave them alone and take your tools back to the camp,” the
doctor said. His face was red.
“Don’t go off at half cock, Doc,” Dick said. He spat tobacco juice on the log. It slid off, thinning
in the water. “You know they’re stolen as well as I do. It don’t make any difference to me.”
“All right. If you think the logs are stolen, take your stuff and get out.”
“Now, Doc—”
“Take your stuff and get out.”
“Listen, Doc.”
“If you call me Doc once again. I’ll knock your eye teeth down your throat.”
“Oh, no, you won’t, Doc.”
Dick Boulton looked at the doctor. Dick was a big man. He knew how big a man he was. He
liked to get into fights. He was happy. Eddy and Billy Tabeshaw leaned on their cant-hooks and
looked at the doctor. The doctor chewed the beard on his lower lip and looked at Dick Boulton. Then
he turned away and walked up the hill to the cottage. They could see from his back how angry he was.
They all watched him walk up the hill and go inside the cottage.
Dick said something in Ojibway. Eddy laughed but Billy Tabeshaw looked very serious. He did
not understand English but he had sweat all the time the row was going on. He was fat with only a few
hairs of mustache like a Chinaman. He picked up the two cant-hooks. Dick picked up the axes and
Eddy took the saw down from the tree. They started off and walked up past the cottage and out the
back gate into the woods. Dick left the gate open. Billy Tabeshaw went back and fastened it. They
were gone through the woods.
In the cottage the doctor, sitting on the bed in his room, saw a pile of medical journals on the
floor by the bureau. They were still in their wrappers unopened. It irritated him.
“Aren’t you going back to work, dear?” asked the doctor’s wife from the room where she was
lying with the blinds drawn.
“No!”
“Was anything the matter?”
“I had a row with Dick Boulton.”
“Oh,” said his wife. “I hope you didn’t lose your temper, Henry.”
“No,” said the doctor.
“Remember, that he who ruleth his spirit is greater than he that taketh a city,” said his wife. She
was a Christian Scientist. Her Bible, her copy of Science and Health and her Quarterly were on a
table beside her bed in the darkened room.
Her husband did not answer. He was sitting on his bed now, cleaning a shotgun. He pushed the
magazine full of the heavy yellow shells and pumped them out again. They were scattered on the bed.
“Henry,” his wife called. Then paused a moment. “Henry!”
“Yes,” the doctor said.
“You didn’t say anything to Boulton to anger him, did you?”
“No,” said the doctor.
“What was the trouble about, dear?”
“Nothing much.”
“Tell me, Henry. Please don’t try and keep anything from me. What was the trouble about?”
“Well, Dick owes me a lot of money for pulling his squaw through pneumonia and I guess he
wanted a row so he wouldn’t have to take it out in work.”
His wife was silent. The doctor wiped his gun carefully with a rag. He pushed the shells back in
against the spring of the magazine. He sat with the gun on his knees. He was very fond of it. Then he
heard his wife’s voice from the darkened room.
“Dear, I don’t think, I really don’t think that any one would really do a thing like that.”
“No?” the doctor said.
“No. I can’t really believe that any one would do a thing of that sort intentionally.”
The doctor stood up and put the shotgun in the corner behind the dresser.
“Are you going out, dear?” his wife said.
“I think I’ll go for a walk,” the doctor said.
“If you see Nick, dear, will you tell him his mother wants to see him?” his wife said.
The doctor went out on the porch. The screen door slammed behind him. He heard his wife catch
her breath when the door slammed.
“Sorry,” he said, outside her window with the blinds drawn.
“It’s all right, dear,” she said.
He walked in the heat out the gate and along the path into the hemlock woods. It was cool in the
woods even on such a hot day. He found Nick sitting with his back against a tree, reading.
“Your mother wants you to come and see her,” the doctor said.
“I want to go with you,” Nick said.
His father looked down at him.
“All right. Come on, then,” his father said. “Give me the book, I’ll put it in my pocket.”
“I know where there’s black squirrels, Daddy,” Nick said.
“All right,” said his father. “Let’s go there.”
CHAPTER III
We were in a garden at Mons. Young Buckley came in with his patrol from across the river. The
first German I saw climbed up over the garden wall. We waited till he got one leg over and then
potted him. He had so much equipment on and looked awfully surprised and fell down into the
garden. Then three more came over farther down the wall. We shot them. They all came just like
that.
The End of Something
IN THE OLD DAYS HORTONS BAY WAS A lumbering town. No
one who lived in it was out of sound of the big saws in the mill by the lake. Then one year there were
no more logs to make lumber. The lumber schooners came into the bay and were loaded with the cut
of the mill that stood stacked in the yard. All the piles of lumber were carried away. The big mill
building had all its machinery that was removable taken out and hoisted on board one of the schooners
by the men who had worked in the mill. The schooner moved out of the bay toward the open lake
carrying the two great saws, the travelling carriage that hurled the logs against the revolving, circular
saws and all the rollers, wheels, belts and iron piled on a hull-deep load of lumber. Its open hold
covered with canvas and lashed tight, the sails of the schooner filled and it moved out into the open
lake, carrying with it everything that had made the mill a mill and Hortons Bay a town.
The one-story bunk houses, the eating-house, the company store, the mill offices, and the big mill
itself stood deserted in the acres of sawdust that covered the swampy meadow by the shore of the bay.
Ten years later there was nothing of the mill left except the broken white limestone of its
foundations showing through the swampy second growth as Nick and Marjorie rowed along the shore.
They were trolling along the edge of the channel-bank where the bottom dropped off suddenly from
sandy shallows to twelve feet of dark water. They were trolling on their way to the point to set night
lines for rainbow trout.
“There’s our old ruin, Nick,” Marjorie said.
Nick, rowing, looked at the white stone in the green trees.
“There it is,” he said.
“Can you remember when it was a mill?” Marjorie asked.
“I can just remember,” Nick said.
“It seems more like a castle,” Marjorie said.
Nick said nothing. They rowed on out of sight of the mill, following the shore line. Then Nick cut
across the bay.
“They aren’t striking,” he said.
“No,” Marione said. She was intent on the rod all the time they trolled, even when she talked.
She loved to fish. She loved to fish with Nick.
Close beside the boat a big trout broke the surface of the water. Nick pulled hard on one oar so
the boat would turn and the bait spinning far behind would pass where the trout was feeding. As the
trout’s back came up out of the water the minnows jumped wildly. They sprinkled the surface like a
handful of shot thrown into the water. Another trout broke water, feeding on the other side of the boat.
“They’re feeding,” Marjorie said.
“But they won’t strike,” Nick said.
He rowed the boat around to troll past both the feeding fish, then headed it for the point.
Marjorie did not reel in until the boat touched the shore.
They pulled the boat up the beach and Nick lifted out a pail of live perch. The perch swam in the
water in the pail. Nick caught three of them with his hands and cut their heads off and skinned them
while Marjorie chased with her hands in the bucket, finally caught a perch, cut its head off and
skinned it. Nick looked at her fish.
“You don’t want to take the ventral fin out,” he said. “It’ll be all right for bait but it’s better with
the ventral fin in.”
He hooked each of the skinned perch through the tail. There were two hooks attached to a leader
on each rod. Then Marjorie rowed the boat out over the channel-bank, holding the line in her teeth,
and looking toward Nick, who stood on the shore holding the rod and letting the line run out from the
reel.
“That’s about right,” he called.
“Should I let it drop?” Marjorie called back, holding the line in her hand.
“Sure. Let it go.” Marjorie dropped the line overboard and watched the baits go down through
the water.
She came in with the boat and ran the second line out the same way. Each time Nick set a heavy
slab of driftwood across the butt of the rod to hold it solid and propped it up at an angle with a small
slab. He reeled in the slack line so the line ran taut out to where the bait rested on the sandy floor of
the channel and set the click on the reel. When a trout, feeding on the bottom, took the bait it would
run with it, taking line out of the reel in a rush and making the reel sing with the click on.
Marjorie rowed up the point a little way so she would not disturb the line. She pulled hard on
the oars and the boat went way up the beach. Little waves came in with it. Marjorie stepped out of the
boat and Nick pulled the boat high up the beach.
“What’s the matter, Nick?” Marjorie asked.
“I don’t know,” Nick said, getting wood for a fire.
They made a fire with driftwood. Marjorie went to the boat and brought a blanket. The evening
breeze blew the smoke toward the point, so Marjorie spread the blanket out between the fire and the
lake.
Marjorie sat on the blanket with her back to the fire and waited for Nick. He came over and sat
down beside her on the blanket. In back of them was the close second-growth timber of the point and
in front was the bay with the mouth of Hortons Creek. It was not quite dark. The fire-light went as far
as the water. They could both see the two steel rods at an angle over the dark water. The fire glinted
on the reels.
Marjorie unpacked the basket of supper.
“I don’t feel like eating,” said Nick.
“Come on and eat, Nick,”
“All right.”
They ate without talking, and watched the two rods and the fire-light in the water.
“There’s going to be a moon tonight,” said Nick. He looked across the bay to the hills that were
beginning to sharpen against the sky. Beyond the hills he knew the moon was coming up.
“I know it,” Marjorie said happily.
“You know everything,” Nick said.
“Oh, Nick, please cut it out! Please, please don’t be that way!”
“I can’t help it,” Nick said. “You do. You know everything. That’s the trouble. You know you
do.”
Marjorie did not say anything.
“I’ve taught you everything. You know you do. What don’t you know, anyway?”
“Oh, shut up,” Marjorie said. “There comes the moon.”
They sat on the blanket without touching each other and watched the moon rise.
“You don’t have to talk silly,” Marjorie said. “What’s really the matter?”
“I don’t know.”
“Of course you know.”
“No I don’t.”
“Go on and say it.”
Nick looked on at the moon, coming up over the hills.
“It isn’t fun any more.”
He was afraid to look at Marjorie. Then he looked at her. She sat there with her back toward
him. He looked at her back. “It isn’t fun any more Not any of it.”
She didn’t say anything. He went on. “I feel as though everything was gone to hell inside of me. I
don’t know, Marge. I don’t know what to say.”
He looked on at her back.
“Isn’t love any fun?” Marjorie said.
“No,” Nick said. Marjorie stood up. Nick sat there his head in his hands.
“I’m going to take the boat,” Marjorie called to him. “You can walk back around the point.”
“All right,” Nick said. “I’ll push the boat off for you.”
“You don’t need to,” she said. She was afloat in the boat on the water with the moonlight on it.
Nick went back and lay down with his face in the blanket by the fire. He could hear Marjorie rowing
on the water.
He lay there for a long time. He lay there while he heard Bill come into the clearing walking
around through the woods. He felt Bill coming up to the fire. Bill didn’t touch him, either.
“Did she go all right?” Bill said.
“Yes,” Nick said, lying, his face on the blanket.
“Have a scene?”
“No, there wasn’t any scene.”
“How do you feel?”
“Oh, go away, Bill! Go away for a while.”
Bill selected a sandwich from the lunch basket and walked over to have a look at the rods.
CHAPTER IV
It was a frightfully hot day. We’d jammed an absolutely perfect barricade across the bridge. It was
simply priceless. A big old wrought-iron grating from the front of a house. Too heavy to lift and
you could shoot through it and they would have to climb over it. It was absolutely topping. They
tried taget over it, and we potted them from forty yards. They rushed it, and of icers came out
alone and worked on it. It was an absolutely perfect obstacle. Their of icers were very fine. We
were frightfully put out when we heard the flank had gone, and we had to fall back.
The Three-Day Blow
THE RAIN STOPPED AS NICK TURNED INTO the road that went
up through the orchard. The fruit had been picked and the fall wind blew through the bare trees. Nick
stopped and picked up a Wagner apple from beside the road, shiny in the brown grass from the rain.
He put the apple in the pocket of his Mackinaw coat.
The road came out of the orchard on to the top of the hill. There was the cottage, the porch bare,
smoke coming from the chimney. In back was the garage, the chicken coop and the second-growth
timber like a hedge against the woods behind. The big trees swayed far over in the wind as he
watched. It was the first of the autumn storms.
As Nick crossed the open field above the orchard the door of the cottage opened and Bill came
out. He stood on the porch looking out.
“Well, Wemedge,” he said.
“Hey, Bill,” Nick said, coming up the steps.
They stood together, looking out across the country, down over the orchard, beyond the road,
across the lower fields and the woods of the point to the lake. The wind was blowing straight down
the lake. They could see the surf along Ten Mile point.
“She’s blowing,” Nick said.
“She’ll blow like that for three days,” Bill said.
“Is your dad in?” Nick said.
“No. He’s out with the gun. Come on in.”
Nick went inside the cottage. There was a big fire in the fireplace. The wind made it roar. Bill
shut the door.
“Have a drink?” he said.
He went out to the kitchen and came back with two glasses and a pitcher of water. Nick reached
the whisky bottle from the shelf above the fireplace.
“All right?” he said.
“Good,” said Bill.
They sat in front of the fire and drank the Irish whisky and water.
“It’s got a swell, smoky taste,” Nick said, and looked at the fire through the glass.
“That’s the peat,” Bill said.
“You can’t get peat into liquor,” Nick said.
“That doesn’t make any difference,” Bill said.
“You ever seen any peat?” Nick asked.
“No,” said Bill.
“Neither have I,” Nick said.
His shoes, stretched out on the hearth, began to steam in front of the fire.
“Better take your shoes off,” Bill said.
“I haven’t got any socks on.”
“Take them off and dry them and I’ll get you some,” Bill said. He went upstairs into the loft and
Nick heard him walking about overhead. Upstairs was open under the roof and was where Bill and
his father and he, Nick, sometimes slept. In back was a dressing room. They moved the cots back out
of the rain and covered them with rubber blankets.
Bill came down with a pair of heavy wool socks.
“It’s getting too late to go around without socks,” he said.
“I hate to start them again,” Nick said. He pulled the socks on and slumped back in the chair,
putting his feet up on the screen in front of the fire.
“You’ll dent in the screen,” Bill said. Nick swung his feet over to the side of the fireplace.
“Got anything to read?” he asked.
“Only the paper.”
“What did the Cards do?”
“Dropped a double header to the Giants.”
“That ought to cinch it for them.”
“It’s a gift,” Bill said. “As long as McGraw can buy every good ball player in the league there’s
nothing to it.”
“He can’t buy them all,” Nick said.
“He buys all the ones he wants,” Bill said. “Or he makes them discontented so they have to trade
them to him.”
“Like Heinie Zim,” Nick agreed.
“That bonehead will do him a lot of good.”
Bill stood up.
“He can hit,” Nick offered. The heat from the fire was baking his legs.
“He’s a sweet fielder, too,” Bill said. “But he loses ball games.”
“Maybe that’s what McGraw wants him for,” Nick suggested.
“Maybe,” Bill agreed.
“There’s always more to it than we know about,” Nick said.
“Of course. But we’ve got pretty good dope for being so far away.”
“Like how much better you can pick them if you don’t see the horses.”
“That’s it.”
Bill reached down the whisky bottle. His big hand went all the way around it. He poured the
whisky into the glass Nick held out.
“How much water?”
“Just the same.”
He sat down on the floor beside Nick’s chair.
“It’s good when the fall storms come, isn’t it?” Nick said,
“It’s swell.”
“It’s the best time of year,” Nick said.
“Wouldn’t it be hell to be in town?” Bill said.
“I’d like to see the World Series,” Nick said.
“Well, they’re always in New York or Philadelphia now,” Bill said. “That doesn’t do us any
good.”
“I wonder if the Cards will ever win a pennant?”
“Not in our lifetime,” Bill said.
“Gee, they’d go crazy,” Nick said.
“Do you remember when they got going that once before they had the train wreck?”
“Boy!” Nick said, remembering.
Bill reached over to the table under the window for the book that lay there, face down, where he
had put it when he went to the door. He held his glass in one hand and the book in the other, leaning
back against Nick’s chair.
“What are you reading?”
“Richard Feverel.”
“I couldn’t get into it.”
“It’s all right,” Bill said. “It ain’t a bad book, Wemedge.”
“What else have you got I haven’t read?” Nick asked.
“Did you read the Forest Lovers?”
“Yup. That’s the one where they go to bed every night with the naked sword between them.”
“That’s a good book, Wemedge.”
“It’s a swell book. What I couldn’t ever understand was what good the sword would do. It
would have to stay edge up all the time because if it went over flat you could roll right over it and it
wouldn’t make any trouble.”
“It’s a symbol,” Bill said.
“Sure” said Nick, “but it isn’t practical.”
“Did you ever read Fortitude?”
“It’s fine,” Nick said. “That’s a real book. That’s where his old man is after him all the time.
Have you got any more by Walpole?”
“The Dark Forest,” Bill said. “It’s about Russia.”
“What does he know about Russia?” Nick asked.
“I don’t know. You can’t ever tell about those guys. Maybe he was there when he was a boy.
He’s got a lot of dope on it.”
“I’d like to meet him,” Nick said.
“I’d like to meet Chesterton,” Bill said.
“I wish he was here now,” Nick said. “We’d take him fishing to the ’Voix tomorrow.”
“I wonder if he’d like to go fishing,” Bill said.
“Sure,” said Nick. “He must be about the best guy there is. Do you remember the Flying Inn?”
“‘If an angel out of heaven
Gives you something else to drink.
Thank him for his kind intentions;
Go and pour them down the sink.’”
“That’s right,” said Nick. “I guess he’s a better guy than Walpole.”
“Oh, he’s a better guy, all right,” Bill said.
“But Walpole’s a better writer.”
“I don’t know,” Nick said. “Chesterton’s a classic.”
“Walpole’s a classic, too,” Bill insisted.
“I wish we had them both here,” Nick said. “We’d take them both fishing to the ’Voix
tomorrow.”
“Let’s get drunk,” Bill said.
“All right,” Nick agreed.
“My old man won’t care,” Bill said.
“Are you sure?” said Nick.
“I know it,” Bill said.
“I’m a little drunk now,” Nick said.
“You aren’t drunk,” Bill said.
He got up from the floor and reached for the whisky bottle. Nick held out his glass. His eyes
fixed on it while Bill poured.
Bill poured the glass half full of whisky.
“Put in your own water,” he said. “There’s just one more shot.”
“Got any more?” Nick asked.
“There’s plenty more but dad only likes me to drink what’s open.”
“Sure,” said Nick.
“He says opening bottles is what makes drunkards,” Bill explained.
“That’s right,” said Nick. He was impressed. He had never thought of that before. He had always
thought it was solitary drinking that made drunkards.
“How is your dad?” he asked respectfully.
“He’s all right,” Bill said. “He gets a little wild sometimes.”
“He’s a swell guy,” Nick said. He poured water into his glass out of the pitcher. It mixed slowly
with the whisky. There was more whisky than water.
“You bet your life he is,” Bill said.
“My old man’s all right,” Nick said.
“You’re damn right he is,” said Bill.
“He claims he’s never taken a drink in his life,” Nick said, as though announcing a scientific fact.
“Well, he’s a doctor. My old man’s a painter. That’s different.”
“He’s missed a lot,” Nick said sadly.
“You can’t tell.” Bill said. “Everything’s got its compensations.”
“He says he’s missed a lot himself,” Nick confessed.
“Well, dad’s had a tough time,” Bill said.
“It all evens up,” Nick said.
They sat looking into the fire and thinking of this profound truth.
“I’ll get a chunk from the back porch,” Nick said. He had noticed while looking into the fire that
the fire was dying down. Also he wished to show he could hold his liquor and be practical. Even if
his father had never touched a drop Bill was not going to get him drunk before he himself was drunk.
“Bring one of the big beech chunks,” Bill said. He was also being consciously practical.
Nick came in with the log through the kitchen and in passing knocked a pan off the kitchen table.
He laid the log down and picked up the pan. It had contained dried apricots, soaking in water. He
carefully picked up all the apricots off the floor, some of them had gone under the stove, and put them
back in the pan. He dipped some more water onto them from the pail by the table. He felt quite proud
of himself. He had been thoroughly practical.
He came in carrying the log and Bill got up from the chair and helped him put it on the fire.
“That’s a swell log,” Nick said.
“I’d been saving it for the bad weather,” Bill said. “A log like that will bum all night.”
“There’ll be coals left to start the fire in the morning,” Nick said.
“That’s right,” Bill agreed. They were conducting the conversation on a high plane.
“Let’s have another drink,” Nick said.
“I think there’s another bottle open in the locker,” Bill said.
He kneeled down in the corner in front of the locker and brought out a square-faced bottle.
“It’s Scotch,” he said.
“I’ll get some more water,” Nick said. He went out into the kitchen again. He filled the pitcher
with the dipper dipping cold spring water from the pail. On his way back to the living room he passed
a mirror in the dining room and looked in it. His face looked strange. He smiled at the face in the
mirror and it grinned back at him. He winked at it and went on. It was not his face but it didn’t make
any difference.
Bill had poured out the drinks.
“That’s an awfully big shot,” Nick said.
“Not for us, Wemedge,” Bill said.
“What’ll we drink to?” Nick asked, holding up the glass.
“Let’s drink to fishing,” Bill said.
“All right,” Nick said. “Gentlemen, I give you fishing.”
“All fishing,” Bill said. “Everywhere.”
“Fishing,” Nick said. “That’s what we drink to.”
“It’s better than baseball,” Bill said.
“There isn’t any comparison,” said Nick. “How did we ever get talking about baseball?”
“It was a mistake,” Bill said. “Baseball is a game for louts.”
They drank all that was in their glasses.
“Now let’s drink to Chesterton.”
“And Walpole,” Nick interposed.
Nick poured out the liquor. Bill poured in the water. They looked at each other. They felt very
fine.
“Gentlemen,” Bill said, “I give you Chesterton and Walpole.”
“Exactly, gentlemen,” Nick said.
They drank. Bill filled up the glasses. They sat down in the big chairs in front of the fire.
“You were very wise, Wemedge,” Bill said.
“What do you mean?” asked Nick.
“To bust off that Marge business,” Bill said.
“I guess so,” said Nick.
“It was the only thing to do. If you hadn’t, by now you’d be back home working trying to get
enough money to get married.”
Nick said nothing.
“Once a man’s married he’s absolutely bitched,” Bill went on. “He hasn’t got anything more.
Nothing. Not a damn thing. He’s done for. You’ve seen the guys that get married.”
Nick said nothing.
“You can tell them,” Bill said. “They get this sort of fat married look. They’re done for.”
“Sure,” said Nick.
“It was probably bad busting it off,” Bill said. “But you always fall for somebody else and then
it’s all right. Fall for them but don’t let them ruin you.”
“Yes,” said Nick.
“If you’d have married her you would have had to marry the whole family. Remember her
mother and that guy she married.”
Nick nodded.
“Imagine having them around the house all the time and going to Sunday dinners at their house,
and having them over to dinner and her telling Marge all the time what to do and how to act.”
Nick sat quiet.
“You came out of it damned well,” Bill said. “Now she can marry somebody of her own sort and
settle down and be happy. You can’t mix oil and water and you can’t mix that sort of thing any more
than if I’d marry Ida that works for Strattons. She’d probably like it, too.”
Nick said nothing. The liquor had all died out of him and left him alone. Bill wasn’t there. He
wasn’t sitting in front of the fire or going fishing tomorrow with Bill and his dad or anything. He
wasn’t drunk. It was all gone. All he knew was that he had once had Marjorie and that he had lost her.
She was gone and he had sent her away. That was all that mattered. He might never see her again.
Probably he never would. It was all gone, finished.
“Let’s have another drink,” Nick said.
Bill poured it out. Nick splashed in a little water.
“If you’d gone on that way we wouldn’t be here now,” Bill said.
That was true. His original plan had been to go down home and get a job. Then he had planned to
stay in Charlevoix all winter so he could be near Marge. Now he did not know what he was going to
do.
“Probably we wouldn’t even be going fishing tomorrow,” Bill said. “You had the right dope, all
right.”
“I couldn’t help it,” Nick said.
“I know. That’s the way it works out,” Bill said.
“All of a sudden everything was over,” Nick said. “I don’t know why it was. I couldn’t help it.
Just like when the three-day blows come now and rip all the leaves off the trees.”
“Well, it’s over. That’s the point,” Bill said.
“It was my fault,” Nick said.
“It doesn’t make any difference whose fault it was,” Bill said.
“No, I suppose not,” Nick said.
The big thing was that Marjorie was gone and that probably he would never see her again. He
had talked to her about how they would go to Italy together and the fun they would have. Places they
would be together. It was all gone now.
“So long as it’s over that’s all that matters,” Bill said. “I tell you, Wemedge, I was worried
while it was going on. You played it right. I understand her mother is sore as hell. She told a lot of
people you were engaged.”
“We weren’t engaged,” Nick said.
“It was all around that you were.”
“I can’t help it,” Nick said. “We weren’t.”
“Weren’t you going to get married?” Bill asked.
“Yes. But we weren’t engaged,” Nick said.
“What’s the difference?” Bill asked judicially.
“I don’t know. There’s a difference.”
“I don’t see it,” said Bill.
“All right,” said Nick. “Let’s get drunk.”
“All right,” Bill said. “Let’s get really drunk.”
“Let’s get drunk and then go swimming,” Nick said.
He drank off his glass.
“I’m sorry as hell about her but what could I do?” he said. “You know what her mother was
like!”
“She was terrible,” Bill said.
“All of a sudden it was over,” Nick said. “I oughtn’t to talk about it.”
“You aren’t,” Bill said. “I talked about it and now I’m through. We won’t ever speak about it
again. You don’t want to think about it. You might get back into it again.”
Nick had not thought about that. It had seemed so absolute. That was a thought. That made him
feel better.
“Sure,” he said. “There’s always that danger.”
He felt happy now. There was not anything that was irrevocable. He might go into town Saturday
night. Today was Thursday.
“There’s always a chance,” he said.
“You’ll have to watch yourself,” Bill said.
“I’ll watch myself,” he said.
He felt happy. Nothing was finished. Nothing was ever lost. He would go into town on Saturday.
He felt lighter, as he had felt before Bill started to talk about it. There was always a way out.
“Let’s take the guns and go down to the point and look for your dad,” Nick said.
“All right.”
Bill took down the two shotguns from the rack on the wall. He opened a box of shells. Nick put
on his Mackinaw coat and his shoes. His shoes were stiff from the drying. He was still quite drunk but
his head was clear.
“How do you feel?” Nick asked.
“Swell. I’ve just got a good edge on.” Bill was buttoning up his sweater.
“There’s no use getting drunk.”
“No. We ought to get outdoors.”
They stepped out the door. The wind was blowing a gale.
“The birds will lie right down in the grass with this,” Nick said.
They struck down toward the orchard.
“I saw a woodcock this morning,” Bill said.
“Maybe we’ll jump him,” Nick said.
“You can’t shoot in this wind,” Bill said.
Outside now the Marge business was no longer so tragic. It was not even very important. The
wind blew everything like that away.
“It’s coming right off the big lake,” Nick said.
Against the wind they heard the thud of a shotgun.
“That’s dad,” Bill said. “He’s down in the swamp.”
“Let’s cut down that way,” Nick said.
“Let’s cut across the lower meadow and see if we jump anything,” Bill said.
“All right,” Nick said.
None of it was important now. The wind blew it out of his head. Still he could always go into
town Saturday night. It was a good thing to have in reserve.
CHAPTER V
They shot the six cabinet ministers at half-past six in the morning against the wall of a hospital.
There were pools of water in the courtyard. There were wet dead leaves on the paving of the
courtyard. It rained hard. All the shutters of the hospital were nailed shut. One of the ministers
was sick with typhoid. Two soldiers carried him downstairs and out into the rain. They tried to
hold him up against the wall but he sat down in a puddle of water. The other five stood very quietly
against the wall. Finally the of icer told the soldiers it was no good trying to make him stand up.
When they fired the first volley he was sitting down in the water with his head on his knees.
The Battler
NICK STOOD UP. HE WAS ALL RIGHT. HE looked up the track at
the lights of the caboose going out of sight around the curve. There was water on both sides of the
track, then tamarack swamp.
He felt of his knee. The pants were torn and the skin was barked. His hands were scraped and
there were sand and cinders driven up under his nails. He went over to the edge of the track down the
little slope to the water and washed his hands. He washed them carefully in the cold water, getting the
dirt out from the nails. He squatted down and bathed his knee.
That lousy crut of a brakeman. He would get him some day. He would know him again. That was
a fine way to act.
“Come here, kid,” he said. “I got something for you.”
He had fallen for it. What a lousy kid thing to have done. They would never suck him in that way
again.
“Come here, kid, I got something for you.” Then wham and he lit on his hands and knees beside
the track.
Nick rubbed his eye. There was a big bump coming up. He would have a black eye, all right. It
ached already. That son of a crutting brakeman.
He touched the bump over his eye with his fingers. Oh, well, it was only a black eye. That was
all he had gotten out of it. Cheap at the price. He wished he could see it. Could not see it looking into
the water, though. It was dark and he was a long way off from anywhere. He wiped his hands on his
trousers and stood up, then climbed the embankment to the rails.
He started up the track. It was well ballasted and made easy walking, sand and gravel packed
between the ties, solid walking. The smooth roadbed like a causeway went on ahead through the
swamp. Nick walked along. He must get to somewhere.
Nick had swung on to the freight train when it slowed down for the yards outside of Walton
Junction. The train, with Nick on it, had passed through Kalkaska as it started to get dark. Now he
must be nearly to Mancelona. Three or four miles of swamp. He stepped along the track, walking so
he kept on the ballast between the ties, the swamp ghostly in the rising mist. His eye ached and he was
hungry. He kept on hiking, putting the miles of track back of him. The swamp was all the same on both
sides of the track.
Ahead there was a bridge. Nick crossed it, his boots ringing hollow on the iron. Down below the
water showed black between the slits of ties. Nick kicked a loose spike and it dropped into the water.
Beyond the bridge were hills. It was high and dark on both sides of the track. Up the track Nick saw a
fire.
He came up the track toward the fire carefully. It was off to one side of the track, below the
railway embankment. He had only seen the light from it. The track came out through a cut and where
the fire was burning the country opened out and fell away into woods. Nick dropped carefully down
the embankment and cut into the woods to come up to the fire through the trees. It was a beechwood
forest and the fallen beechnut burrs were under his shoes as he walked between the trees. The fire
was bright now, just at the edge of the trees. There was a man sitting by it. Nick waited behind the
tree and watched. The man looked to be alone. He was sitting there with his head in his hands looking
at the fire. Nick stepped out and walked into the firelight.
The man sat there looking into the fire. When Nick stopped quite close to him he did not move.
“Hello!” Nick said.
The man looked up.
“Where did you get the shiner?” he said.
“A brakeman busted me.”
“Off the through freight?”
“Yes.”
“I saw the bastard,” the man said. “He went through here ’bout an hour and a half ago. He was
walking along the top of the cars slapping his arms and singing.”
“The bastard!”
“It must have made him feel good to bust you,” the man said seriously.
“I’ll bust him.”
“Get him with a rock sometime when he’s going through,” the man advised.
“I’ll get him.”
“You’re a tough one, aren’t you?”
“No,” Nick answered.
“All you kids are tough.”
“You got to be tough,” Nick said.
“That’s what I said.”
The man looked at Nick and smiled. In the firelight Nick saw that his face was misshapen. His
nose was sunken, his eyes were slits, he had queer-shaped lips. Nick did not perceive all this at once,
he only saw the man’s face was queerly formed and mutilated. It was like putty in color. Dead looking
in the firelight.
“Don’t you like my pan?” the man asked.
Nick was embarrassed.
“Sure,” he said.
“Look here!” the man took off his cap.
He had only one ear. It was thickened and tight against the side of his head. Where the other ear
should have been there was a stump.
“Ever see one like that?”
“No,” said Nick. It made him a little sick.
“I could take it,” the man said. “Don’t you think I could take it, kid?”
“You bet!”
“They all bust their hands on me,” the little man said. “They couldn’t hurt me.”
He looked at Nick. “Sit down,” he said. “Want to eat?”
“Don’t bother,” Nick said. “I’m going on to the town.”
“Listen!” the man said. “Call me Ad.”
“Sure!”
“Listen,” the little man said. “I’m not quite right.”
“What’s the matter?”
“I’m crazy.”
He put on his cap. Nick felt like laughing.
“You’re all right,” he said.
“No, I’m not. I’m crazy. Listen, you ever been crazy?”
“No,” Nick said. “How does it get you?”
“I don’t know,” Ad said. “When you got it you don’t know about it. You know me, don’t you?”
“No.”
“I’m Ad Francis.”
“Honest to God?”
“Don’t you believe it?”
“Yes.”
Nick knew it must be true.
“You know how I beat them?”
“No,” Nick said.
“My heart’s slow. It only beats forty a minute. Feel it.” Nick hesitated.
“Come on,” the man took hold of his hand. “Take hold of my wrist. Put your fingers there.”
The little man’s wrist was thick and the muscles bulged above the bone. Nick felt the slow
pumping under his fingers.
“Got a watch?”
“No.”
“Neither have I,” Ad said. “It ain’t any good if you haven’t got a watch.” Nick dropped his wrist.
“Listen,” Ad Francis said. “Take ahold again. You count and I’ll count up to sixty.”
Feeling the slow hard throb under his fingers Nick started to count. He heard the little man
counting slowly, one, two, three, four, five, and on—aloud.
“Sixty,” Ad finished. “That’s a minute. What did you make it?”
“Forty,” Nick said.
“That’s right,” Ad said happily. “She never speeds up.”
A man dropped down the railroad embankment and came across the clearing to the fire.
“Hello, Bugs!” Ad said.
“Hello!” Bugs answered. It was a negro’s voice Nick knew from the way he walked that he was
a negro. He stood with his back to them, bending over the fire. He straightened up.
“This is my pal Bugs,” Ad said. “He’s crazy, too.”
“Glad to meet you,” Bugs said. “Where you say you’re from?”
“Chicago,” Nick said.
“That’s a fine town,” the negro said. “I didn’t catch your name.”
“Adams. Nick Adams.”
“He says he’s never been crazy, Bugs,” Ad said.
“He’s got a lot coming to him,” the negro said. He was unwrapping a package by the fire.
“When are we going to eat, Bugs?” the prizefighter asked.
“Right away.”
“Are you hungry, Nick?”
“Hungry as hell.”
“Hear that, Bugs?”
“I hear most of what goes on.”
“That ain’t what I asked you.”
“Yes. I heard what the gentleman said.”
Into a skillet he was laying slices of ham. As the skillet grew hot the grease sputtered and Bugs,
crouching on long nigger legs over the fire, turned the ham and broke eggs into the skillet, tipping it
from side to side to baste the eggs with the hot fat.
“Will you cut some bread out of that bag, Mister Adams?” Bugs turned from the fire.
“Sure.”
Nick reached in the bag and brought out a loaf of bread. He cut six slices. Ad watched him and
leaned forward.
“Let me take your knife, Nick,” he said.
“No, you don’t,” the negro said. “Hang onto your knife, Mister Adams.” The prizefighter sat
back.
“Will you bring me the bread, Mister Adams?” Bugs asked. Nick brought it over.
“Do you like to dip your bread in the ham fat?” the negro asked.
“You bet!”
“Perhaps we’d better wait until later. It’s better at the finish of the meal. Here.”
The negro picked up a slice of ham and laid it on one of the pieces of bread, then slid an egg on
top of it.
“Just close that sandwich, will you, please, and give it to Mister Francis.”
Ad took the sandwich and started eating.
“Watch out how that egg runs,” the negro warned. “This is for you, Mister Adams. The
remainder for myself.”
Nick bit into the sandwich. The negro was sitting opposite him beside Ad. The hot fried ham and
eggs tasted wonderful.
“Mister Adams is right hungry,” the negro said. The little man whom Nick knew by name as a
former champion fighter was silent. He had said nothing since the negro had spoken about the knife.
“May I offer you a slice of bread dipped right in the hot ham fat?” Bugs said.
“Thanks a lot.”
The little white man looked at Nick.
“Will you have some, Mister Adolph Francis?” Bugs offered from the skillet.
Ad did not answer. He was looking at Nick.
“Mister Francis?” came the nigger’s soft voice.
Ad did not answer. He was looking at Nick.
“I spoke to you. Mister Francis,” the nigger said softly.
Ad kept on looking at Nick. He had his cap down over his eyes. Nick felt nervous.
“How the hell do you get that way?” came out from under the cap sharply at Nick.
“Who the hell do you think you are? You’re a snotty bastard. You come in here where nobody
asks you and eat a man’s food and when he asks to borrow a knife you get snotty.”
He glared at Nick, his face was white and his eyes almost out of sight under the cap.
“You’re a hot sketch. Who the hell asked you to butt in here?”
“Nobody.”
“You’re damn right nobody did. Nobody asked you to stay either. You come in here and act
snotty about my face and smoke my cigars and drink my liquor and then talk snotty. Where the hell do
you think you get off?” Nick said nothing. Ad stood up.
“I’ll tell you, you yellow-livered Chicago bastard. You’re going to get your can knocked off. Do
you get that?”
Nick stepped back. The little man came toward him slowly, stepping flat-footed forward, his left
foot stepping forward, his right dragging up to it.
“Hit me,” he moved his head. “Try and hit me.”
“I don’t want to hit you.”
“You won’t get out of it that way. You’re going to take a beating, see? Come on and lead at me.”
“Cut it out,” Nick said.
“All right, then, you bastard.”
The little man looked down at Nick’s feet. As he looked down the negro, who had followed
behind him as he moved away from the fire, set himself and tapped him across the base of the skull.
He fell forward and Bugs dropped the cloth-wrapped blackjack on the grass. The little man lay there,
his face in the grass. The negro picked him up, his head hanging, and carried him to the fire. His face
looked bad, the eyes open. Bugs laid him down gently.
“Will you bring me the water in the bucket, Mister Adams,” he said. “I’m afraid I hit him just a
little hard.”
The negro splashed water with his hand on the man’s face and pulled his ears gently. The eyes
closed.
Bugs stood up.
“He’s all right,” he said. “There’s nothing to worry about. I’m sorry, Mister Adams.”
“It’s all right.” Nick was looking down at the little man. He saw the blackjack on the grass and
picked it up. It had a flexible handle and was limber in his hand. It was made of worn black leather
with a handkerchief wrapped around the heavy end.
“That’s a whalebone handle,” the negro smiled. “They don’t make them any more. I didn’t know
how well you could take care of yourself and, anyway, I didn’t want you to hurt him or mark him up
no more than he is.”
The negro smiled again.
“You hurt him yourself.”
“I know how to do it. He won’t remember nothing of it. I have to do it to change him when he
gets that way.”
Nick was still looking down at the little man, lying, his eyes closed in the firelight. Bugs put
some wood on the fire.
“Don’t you worry about him none, Mister Adams. I seen him like this plenty of times before.”
“What made him crazy?” Nick asked.
“Oh, a lot of things,” the negro answered from the fire. “Would you like a cup of this coffee,
Mister Adams?”
He handed Nick the cup and smoothed the coat he had placed under the unconscious man’s head.
“He took too many beatings, for one thing,” the negro sipped the coffee. “But that just made him
sort of simple. Then his sister was his manager and they was always being written up in the papers all
about brothers and sisters and how she loved her brother and how he loved his sister, and then they
got married in New York and that made a lot of unpleasantness.”
“I remember about it.”
“Sure. Of course they wasn’t brother and sister no more than a rabbit, but there was a lot of
people didn’t like it either way and they commenced to have disagreements, and one day she just went
off and never come back.”
He drank the coffee and wiped his lips with the pink palm of his hand.
“He just went crazy. Will you have some more coffee, Mister Adams?”
“Thanks.”
“I seen her a couple of times,” the negro went on. “She was an awful good-looking woman.
Looked enough like him to be twins. He wouldn’t be bad-looking without his face all busted.”
He stopped. The story seemed to be over.
“I met him in jail,” the negro said. “He was busting people all the time after she went away and
they put him in jail. I was in for cuttin’ a man.”
He smiled, and went on soft-voiced:
“Right away I liked him and when I got out I looked him up. He likes to think I’m crazy and I
don’t mind. I like to be with him and I like seeing the country and I don’t have to commit no larceny to
do it. I like living like a gentleman.”
“What do you all do?” Nick asked.
“Oh, nothing. Just move around. He’s got money.”
“He must have made a lot of money.”
“Sure. He spent all his money, though. Or they took it away from him. She sends him money.”
He poked up the fire.
“She’s a mighty fine woman,” he said. “She looks enough like him to be his own twin.”
The negro looked over at the little man, lying breathing heavily. His blond hair was down over
his forehead. His mutilated face looked childish in repose.
“I can wake him up any time now, Mister Adams. If you don’t mind I wish you’d sort of pull out.
I don’t like to not be hospitable, but it might disturb him back again to see you. I hate to have to thump
him and it’s the only thing to do when he gets started. I have to sort of keep him away from people.
You don’t mind, do you, Mister Adams? No, don’t thank me, Mister Adams. I’d have warned you
about him but he seemed to have taken such a liking to you and I thought things were going to be all
right. You’ll hit a town about two miles up the track. Mancelona they call it. Good-bye. I wish we
could ask you to stay the night but it’s just out of the question. Would you like to take some of that ham
and some bread with you? No? You better take a sandwich,” all this in a low, smooth, polite nigger
voice.
“Good. Well, good-bye, Mister Adams. Good-bye and good luck!”
Nick walked away from the fire across the clearing to the railway tracks. Out of the range of the
fire he listened. The low soft voice of the negro was talking. Nick could not hear the words. Then he
heard the little man say, “I got an awful headache, Bugs.”
“You’ll feel better. Mister Francis,” the negro’s voice soothed. “Just you drink a cup of this hot
coffee.”
Nick climbed the embankment and started up the track. He found he had a ham sandwich in his
hand and put it in his pocket. Looking back from the mounting grade before the track curved into the
hills he could see the firelight in the clearing.
CHAPTER VI
Nick sat against the wall of the church where they had dragged him to be clear of machine-gun
fire in the street. Both legs stuck out awkwardly. He had been hit in the spine. His face was sweaty
and dirty. The sun shone on his face. The day was very hot. Rinaldi, big backed, his equipment
sprawling, lay face downward against the wall. Nick looked straight ahead brilliantly. The pink
wall of the house opposite had fallen out from the roof, and an iron bedstead hung twisted toward
the street. Two Austrian dead lay in the rubble in the shade of the house. Up the street were other
dead. Things were getting forward in the town. It was going well. Stretcher bearers would be
along any time now. Nick turned his head carefully and looked at Rinaldi . “Senta Rinaldi. Senta.
You and me we’ve made a separate peace.” Rinaldi lay still in the sun breathing with dif iculty.
“Not patriots.” Nick turned his head carefully away smiling sweatily. Rinaldi was a disappointing
audience.
A Very Short Story
ONE HOT EVENING IN PADUA THEY CARried him up onto the
roof and he could look out over the top of the town. There were chimney swifts in the sky. After a
while it got dark and the searchlights came out. The others went down and took the bottles with them.
He and Luz could hear them below on the balcony. Luz sat on the bed. She was cool and fresh in the
hot night.
Luz stayed on night duty for three months. They were glad to let her. When they operated on him
she prepared him for the operating table; and they had a joke about friend or enema. He went under
the anæsthetic holding tight on to himself so he would not blab about anything during the silly, talky
time. After he got on crutches he used to take the temperatures so Luz would not have to get up from
the bed. There were only a few patients, and they all knew about it. They all liked Luz. As he walked
back along the halls he thought of Luz in his bed.
Before he went back to the front they went into the Duomo and prayed. It was dim and quiet, and
there were other people praying. They wanted to get married, but there was not enough time for the
banns, and neither of them had birth certificates. They felt as though they were married, but they
wanted every one to know about it, and to make it so they could not lose it.
Luz wrote him many letters that he never got until after the armistice. Fifteen came in a bunch to
the front and he sorted them by the dates and read them all straight through. They were all about the
hospital, and how much she loved him and how it was impossible to get along without him and how
terrible it was missing him at night.
After the armistice they agreed he should go home to get a job so they might be married. Luz
would not come home until he had a good job and could come to New York to meet her. It was
understood he would not drink, and he did not want to see his friends or any one in the States. Only to
get a job and be married. On the train from Padua to Milan they quarrelled about her not being willing
to come home at once. When they had to say good-bye, in the station at Milan, they kissed good-bye,
but were not finished with the quarrel. He felt sick about saying good-bye like that.
He went to America on a boat from Genoa. Luz went back to Pordenone to open a hospital. It
was lonely and rainy there, and there was a battalion of arditi quartered in the town. Living in the
muddy, rainy town in the winter, the major of the battalion made love to Luz, and she had never
known Italians before, and finally wrote to the States that theirs had been only a boy and girl affair.
She was sorry, and she knew he would probably not be able to understand, but might some day
forgive her, and be grateful to her, and she expected, absolutely unexpectedly, to be married in the
spring. She loved him as always, but she realized now it was only a boy and girl love. She hoped he
would have a great career, and believed in him absolutely. She knew it was for the best.
The major did not marry her in the spring, or any other time. Luz never got an answer to the letter
to Chicago about it. A short time after he contracted gonorrhea from a sales girl in a loop department
store while riding in a taxicab through Lincoln Park.
CHAPTER VII
While the bombardment was knocking the trench to pieces at Fossalta, he lay very flat and sweated
and prayed oh jesus christ get me out of here. Dear jesus please get me out. Christ please please
please christ. If you’ll only keep me from getting killed I’ll do anything you say. I believe in you
and I’ll tell every one in the world that you are the only one that matters. Please please dear jesus.
The shelling moved further up the line. We went to work on the trench and in the morning the sun
came up and the day was hot and muggy and cheerful and quiet. The next night back at Mestre he
did not tell the girl he went upstairs with at the Villa Rossa about Jesus. And he never told
anybody.
Soldier’s Home
KREBS WENT TO THE WAR FROM A METHodist college in
Kansas. There is a picture which shows him among his fraternity brothers, all of them wearing exactly
the same height and style collar. He enlisted in the Marines in 1917 and did not return to the United
States until the second division returned from the Rhine in the summer of 1919.
There is a picture which shows him on the Rhine with two German girls and another corporal.
Krebs and the corporal look too big for their uniforms. The German girls are not beautiful. The Rhine
does not show in the picture.
By the time Krebs returned to his home town in Oklahoma the greeting of heroes was over. He
came back much too late. The men from the town who had been drafted had all been welcomed
elaborately on their return. There had been a great deal of hysteria. Now the reaction had set in.
People seemed to think it was rather ridiculous for Krebs to be getting back so late, years after the
war was over.
At first Krebs, who had been at Belleau Wood, Soissons, the Champagne, St. Mihiel and in the
Argonne did not want to talk about the war at all. Later he felt the need to talk but no one wanted to
hear about it. His town had heard too many atrocity stories to be thrilled by actualities. Krebs found
that to be listened to at all he had to lie, and after he had done this twice he, too, had a reaction
against the war and against talking about it. A distaste for everything that had happened to him in the
war set in because of the lies he had told. All of the times that had been able to make him feel cool
and clear inside himself when he thought of them; the times so long back when he had done the one
thing, the only thing for a man to do, easily and naturally, when he might have done something else,
now lost their cool, valuable quality and then were lost themselves.
His lies were quite unimportant lies and consisted in attributing to himself things other men had
seen, done or heard of, and stating as facts certain apocryphal incidents familiar to all soldiers. Even
his lies were not sensational at the pool room. His acquaintances, who had heard detailed accounts of
German women found chained to machine guns in the Argonne forest and who could not comprehend,
or were barred by their patriotism from interest in, any German machine gunners who were not
chained, were not thrilled by his stories.
Krebs acquired the nausea in regard to experience that is the result of untruth or exaggeration,
and when he occasionally met another man who had really been a soldier and they talked a few
minutes in the dressing room at a dance he fell into the easy pose of the old soldier among other
soldiers: that he had been badly, sickeningly frightened all the time. In this way he lost everything.
During this time, it was late summer, he was sleeping late in bed, getting up to walk down town
to the library to get a book, eating lunch at home, reading on the front porch until he became bored and
then walking down through the town to spend the hottest hours of the day in the cool dark of the pool
room. He loved to play pool.
In the evening he practised on his clarinet, strolled down town, read and went to bed. He was
still a hero to his two young sisters. His mother would have given him breakfast in bed if he had
wanted it. She often came in when he was in bed and asked him to tell her about the war, but her
attention always wandered. His father was non-committal.
Before Krebs went away to the war he had never been allowed to drive the family motor car.
His father was in the real estate business and always wanted the car to be at his command when he
required it to take clients out into the country to show them a piece of farm property. The car always
stood outside the First National Bank building where his father had an office on the second floor.
Now, after the war, it was still the same car.
Nothing was changed in the town except that the young girls had grown up. But they lived in such
a complicated world of already defined alliances and shifting feuds that Krebs did not feel the energy
or the courage to break into it. He liked to look at them, though. There were so many good-looking
young girls. Most of them had their hair cut short. When he went away only little girls wore their hair
like that or girls that were fast. They all wore sweaters and shirt waists with round Dutch collars. It
was a pattern. He liked to look at them from the front porch as they walked on the other side of the
street. He liked to watch them walking under the shade of the trees. He liked the round Dutch collars
above their sweaters. He liked their silk stockings and flat shoes. He liked their bobbed hair and the
way they walked.
When he was in town their appeal to him was not very strong. He did not like them when he saw
them in the Greek’s ice cream parlor. He did not want them themselves really. They were too
complicated. There was something else. Vaguely he wanted a girl but he did not want to have to work
to get her. He would have liked to have a girl but he did not want to have to spend a long time getting
her. He did not want to get into the intrigue and the politics. He did not want to have to do any
courting. He did not want to tell any more lies. It wasn’t worth it.
He did not want any consequences. He did not want any consequences ever again. He wanted to
live along without consequences. Besides he did not really need a girl. The army had taught him that.
It was all right to pose as though you had to have a girl. Nearly everybody did that. But it wasn’t true.
You did not need a girl. That was the funny thing. First a fellow boasted how girls mean nothing to
him, that he never thought of them, that they could not touch him. Then a fellow boasted that he could
not get along without girls, that he had to have them all the time, that he could not go to sleep without
them.
That was all a lie. It was all a lie both ways. You did not need a girl unless you thought about
them. He learned that in the army. Then sooner or later you always got one. When you were really
ripe for a girl you always got one. You did not have to think about it. Sooner or later it would come.
He had learned that in the army.
Now he would have liked a girl if she had come to him and not wanted to talk. But here at home
it was all too complicated. He knew he could never get through it all again. It was not worth the
trouble. That was the thing about French girls and German girls. There was not all this talking. You
couldn’t talk much and you did not need to talk. It was simple and you were friends. He thought about
France and then he began to think about Germany. On the whole he had liked Germany better. He did
not want to leave Germany. He did not want to come home. Still, he had come home. He sat on the
front porch.
He liked the girls that were walking along the other side of the street. He liked the look of them
much better than the French girls or the German girls. But the world they were in was not the world he
was in. He would like to have one of them. But it was not worth it. They were such a nice pattern. He
liked the pattern. It was exciting. But he would not go through all the talking. He did not want one
badly enough. He liked to look at them all, though. It was not worth it. Not now when things were
getting good again.
He sat there on the porch reading a book on the war. It was a history and he was reading about
all the engagements he had been in. It was the most interesting reading he had ever done. He wished
there were more maps. He looked forward with a good feeling to reading all the really good histories
when they would come out with good detail maps. Now he was really learning about the war. He had
been a good soldier. That made a difference.
One morning after he had been home about a month his mother came into his bedroom and sat on
the bed. She smoothed her apron.
“I had a talk with your father last night, Harold,” she said, “and he is willing for you to take the
car out in the evenings.”
“Yeah?” said Krebs, who was not fully awake. “Take the car out? Yeah?”
“Yes. Your father has felt for some time that you should be able to take the car out in the
evenings whenever you wished but we only talked it over last night.”
“I’ll bet you made him,” Krebs said.
“No. It was your father’s suggestion that we talk the matter over.”
“Yeah. I’ll bet you made him,” Krebs sat up in bed.
“Will you come down to breakfast, Harold?” his mother said.
“As soon as I get my clothes on,” Krebs said.
His mother went out of the room and he could hear her frying something downstairs while he
washed, shaved and dressed to go down into the dining-room for breakfast. While he was eating
breakfast his sister brought in the mail.
“Well, Hare,” she said. “You old sleepy-head. What do you ever get up for?”
Krebs looked at her. He liked her. She was his best sister.
“Have you got the paper?” he asked.
She handed him The Kansas City Star and he shucked off its brown wrapper and opened it to the
sporting page. He folded The Star open and propped it against the water pitcher with his cereal dish
to steady it, so he could read while he ate.
“Harold,” his mother stood in the kitchen doorway, “Harold, please don’t muss up the paper.
Your father can’t read his Star if it’s been mussed.”
“I won’t muss it,” Krebs said.
His sister sat down at the table and watched him while he read.
“We’re playing indoor over at school this afternoon,” she said. “I’m going to pitch.”
“Good,” said Krebs. “How’s the old wing?”
“I can pitch better than lots of the boys. I tell them all you taught me. The other girls aren’t much
good.”
“Yeah?” said Krebs.
“I tell them all you’re my beau. Aren’t you my beau, Hare?”
“You bet.”
“Couldn’t your brother really be your beau just because he’s your brother?”
“I don’t know.”
“Sure you know. Couldn’t you be my beau, Hare, if I was old enough and if you wanted to?”
“Sure. You’re my girl now.”
“Am I really your girl?”
“Sure.”
“Do you love me?”
“Uh, huh.”
“Will you love me always?”
“Sure.”
“Will you come over and watch me play indoor?”
“Maybe.”
“Aw, Hare, you don’t love me. If you loved me, you’d want to come over and watch me play
indoor.”
Krebs’s mother came into the dining-room from the kitchen. She carried a plate with two fried
eggs and some crisp bacon on it and a plate of buckwheat cakes.
“You run along, Helen,” she said. “I want to talk to Harold.”
She put the eggs and bacon down in front of him and brought in a jug of maple syrup for the
buckwheat cakes. Then she sat down across the table from Krebs.
“I wish you’d put down the paper a minute, Harold,” she said.
Krebs took down the paper and folded it.
“Have you decided what you are going to do yet, Harold?” his mother said, taking off her
glasses.
“No,” said Krebs.
“Don’t you think it’s about time?” His mother did not say this in a mean way. She seemed
worried.
“I hadn’t thought about it,” Krebs said.
“God has some work for every one to do,” his mother said. “There can be no idle hands in His
Kingdom.”
“I’m not in His Kingdom,” Krebs said.
“We are all of us in His Kingdom.”
Krebs felt embarrassed and resentful as always.
“I’ve worried about you so much, Harold,” his mother went on. “I know the temptations you must
have been exposed to. I know how weak men are. I know what your own dear grandfather, my own
father, told us about the Civil War and I have prayed for you. I pray for you all day long, Harold.”
Krebs looked at the bacon fat hardening on his plate.
“Your father is worried, too,” his mother went on. “He thinks you have lost your ambition, that
you haven’t got a definite aim in life. Charley Simmons, who is just your age, has a good job and is
going to be married. The boys are all settling down; they’re all determined to get somewhere; you can
see that boys like Charley Simmons are on their way to being really a credit to the community.”
Krebs said nothing.
“Don’t look that way, Harold,” his mother said. “You know we love you and I want to tell you
for your own good how matters stand. Your father does not want to hamper your freedom. He thinks
you should be allowed to drive the car. If you want to take some of the nice girls out riding with you,
we are only too pleased. We want you to enjoy yourself. But you are going to have to settle down to
work, Harold. Your father doesn’t care what you start in at. All work is honorable as he says. But
you’ve got to make a start at something. He asked me to speak to you this morning and then you can
stop in and see him at his office.”
“Is that all?” Krebs said.
“Yes. Don’t you love your mother, dear boy?”
“No,” Krebs said.
His mother looked at him across the table. Her eyes were shiny. She started crying.
“I don’t love anybody,” Krebs said.
It wasn’t any good. He couldn’t tell her, he couldn’t make her see it. It was silly to have said it.
He had only hurt her. He went over and took hold of her arm. She was crying with her head in her
hands.
“I didn’t mean it,” he said. “I was just angry at something. I didn’t mean I didn’t love you.”
His mother went on crying. Krebs put his arm on her shoulder.
“Can’t you believe me, mother?”
His mother shook her head.
“Please, please, mother. Please believe me.”
“All right,” his mother said chokily. She looked up at him. “I believe you, Harold.”
Krebs kissed her hair. She put her face up to him.
“I’m your mother,” she said. “I held you next to my heart when you were a tiny baby.”
Krebs felt sick and vaguely nauseated.
“I know, Mummy,” he said. “I’ll try and be a good boy for you.”
“Would you kneel and pray with me, Harold?” his mother asked.
They knelt down beside the dining-room table and Krebs’s mother prayed.
“Now, you pray, Harold,” she said.
“I can’t,” Krebs said.
“Try, Harold.”
“I can’t.”
“Do you want me to pray for you?”
“Yes.”
So his mother prayed for him and then they stood up and Krebs kissed his mother and went out of
the house. He had tried so to keep his life from being complicated. Still, none of it had touched him.
He had felt sorry for his mother and she had made him lie. He would go to Kansas City and get a job
and she would feel all right about it. There would be one more scene maybe before he got away. He
would not go down to his father’s office. He would miss that one. He wanted his life to go smoothly.
It had just gotten going that way. Well, that was all over now, anyway. He would go over to the
schoolyard and watch Helen play indoor baseball.
CHAPTER VIII
At two o’clock in the morning two Hungarians got into a cigar store at Fifteenth Street and Grand
Avenue. Drevitts and Boyle drove up from the Fifteenth Street police station in a Ford. The
Hungarians were backing their wagon out of an alley. Boyle shot one of the seat of the wagon and
one out of the wagon box. Drevitts got frightened when he found they were both dead. Hell Jimmy,
he said, you oughtn’t to have done it. There’s liable to be a hell of a lot of trouble.
—They’re crooks, ain’t they? said Boyle. They’re wops, ain’t they? Who the hell is going to
make any trouble?
—That’s all right maybe this time, said Drevitts, but how did you know they were wops when
you bumped them?
Wops, said Boyle, I can tell wops a mile of .
The Revolutionist
IN 1919 HE WAS TRAVELLING ON THE railroads in Italy,
carrying a square of oilcloth from the headquarters of the party written in indelible pencil and saying
here was a comrade who had suffered very much under the Whites in Budapest and requesting
comrades to aid him in any way. He used this instead of a ticket. He was very shy and quite young and
the train men passed him on from one crew to another. He had no money, and they fed him behind the
counter in railway eating houses.
He was delighted with Italy. It was a beautiful country, he said. The people were all kind. He
had been in many towns, walked much, and seen many pictures. Giotto, Masaccio, and Piero della
Francesca he bought reproductions of and carried them wrapped in a copy of Avanti. Mantegna he did
not like.
He reported at Bologna, and I took him with me up into the Romagna where it was necessary I go
to see a man. We had a good trip together. It was early September and the country was pleasant. He
was a Magyar, a very nice boy and very shy. Horthy’s men had done some bad things to him. He
talked about it a little. In spite of Hungary, he believed altogether in the world revolution.
“But how is the movement going in Italy?” he asked.
“Very badly,” I said.
“But it will go better,” he said. “You have everything here. It is the one country that every one is
sure of. It will be the starting point of everything.” I did not say anything.
At Bologna he said good-bye to us to go on the train to Milano and then to Aosta to walk over
the pass into Switzerland. I spoke to him about the Mantegnas in Milano. “No,” he said, very shyly, he
did not like Mantegna. I wrote out for him where to eat in Milano and the addresses of comrades. He
thanked me very much, but his mind was already looking forward to walking over the pass. He was
very eager to walk over the pass while the weather held good. He loved the mountains in the autumn.
The last I heard of him the Swiss had him in jail near Sion.
CHAPTER IX
The first matador got the horn through his sword hand and the crowd hooted him. The second
matador slipped and the bull caught him through the belly and he hung on to the horn with one
hand and held the other tight against the place, and the bull rammed him wham against the wall
and the horn came out, and he lay in the sand, and then got up like crazy drunk and tried to slug
the men carrying him away and yelled for his sword but he fainted. The kid came out and had to
kill five bulls because you can’t have more than three matadors, and the last bull he was so tired
he couldn’t get the sword in. He couldn’t hardly lift his arm. He tried five times and the crowd was
quiet because it was a good bull and it looked like him or the bull and then he finally made it. He
sat down in the sand and puked and they held a cape over him while the crowd hollered and threw
things down into the bull ring.
Mr. and Mrs. Elliot
MR. AND MRS. ELLIOT TRIED VERY HARD to have a baby. They
tried as often as Mrs. Elliot could stand it. They tried in Boston after they were married and they tried
coming over on the boat. They did not try very often on the boat because Mrs. Elliot was quite sick.
She was sick and when she was sick she was sick as Southern women are sick. That is women from
the Southern part of the United States. Like all Southern women Mrs. Elliot disintegrated very quickly
under sea sickness, travelling at night, and getting up too early in the morning. Many of the people on
the boat took her for Elliot’s mother. Other people who knew they were married believed she was
going to have a baby. In reality she was forty years old. Her years had been precipitated suddenly
when she started travelling.
She had seemed much younger, in fact she had seemed not to have any age at all, when Elliot had
married her after several weeks of making love to her after knowing her for a long time in her tea
shop before he had kissed her one evening.
Hubert Elliot was taking postgraduate work in law at Harvard when he was married. He was a
poet with an income of nearly ten thousand dollars a year. He wrote very long poems very rapidly. He
was twenty-five years old and had never gone to bed with a woman until he married Mrs. Elliot. He
wanted to keep himself pure so that he could bring to his wife the same purity of mind and body that
he expected of her. He called it to himself living straight. He had been in love with various girls
before he kissed Mrs. Elliot and always told them sooner or later that he had led a clean life. Nearly
all the girls lost interest in him. He was shocked and really horrified at the way girls would become
engaged to and marry men whom they must know had dragged themselves through the gutter. He once
tried to warn a girl he knew against a man of whom he had almost proof that he had been a rotter at
college and a very unpleasant incident had resulted.
Mrs. Elliot’s name was Cornelia. She had taught him to call her Calutina, which was her family
nickname in the South. His mother cried when he brought Cornelia home after their marriage but
brightened very much when she learned they were going to live abroad.
Cornelia had said, “You dear sweet boy,” and held him closer than ever when he had told her
how he had kept himself clean for her. Cornelia was pure too. “Kiss me again like that,” she said.
Hubert explained to her that he had learned that way of kissing from hearing a fellow tell a story
once. He was delighted with his experiment and they developed it as far as possible. Sometimes
when they had been kissing together a long time, Cornelia would ask him to tell her again that he had
kept himself really straight for her. The declaration always set her off again.
At first Hubert had no idea of marrying Cornelia. He had never thought of her that way. She had
been such a good friend of his, and then one day in the little back room of the shop they had been
dancing to the gramophone while her girl friend was in the front of the shop and she had looked up
into his eyes and he had kissed her. He could never remember just when it was decided that they were
to be married. But they were married.
They spent the night of the day they were married in a Boston hotel. They were both
disappointed but finally Cornelia went to sleep. Hubert could not sleep and several times went out
and walked up and down the corridor of the hotel in his new Jaeger bathrobe that he had bought for
his wedding trip. As he walked he saw all the pairs of shoes, small shoes and big shoes, outside the
doors of the hotel rooms. This set his heart to pounding and he hurried back to his own room but
Cornelia was asleep. He did not like to waken her and soon everything was quite all right and he
slept peacefully.
The next day they called on his mother and the next day they sailed for Europe. It was possible to
try to have a baby but Cornelia could not attempt it very often although they wanted a baby more than
anything else in the world. They landed at Cherbourg and came to Paris. They tried to have a baby in
Paris. Then they decided to go to Dijon where there was summer school and where a number of
people who crossed on the boat with them had gone. They found there was nothing to do in Dijon.
Hubert, however, was writing a great number of poems and Cornelia typed them for him. They were
all very long poems. He was very severe about mistakes and would make her re-do an entire page if
there was one mistake. She cried a good deal and they tried several times to have a baby before they
left Dijon.
They came to Paris and most of their friends from the boat came back too. They were tired of
Dijon and anyway would now be able to say that after leaving Harvard or Columbia or Wabash they
had studied at the University of Dijon down in the Côte d’Or. Many of them would have preferred to
go to Languedoc, Montpellier or Perpignan if there are universities there. But all those places are too
far away. Dijon is only four and a half hours from Paris and there is a diner on the train.
So they all sat around the Café du Dome, avoiding the Rotonde across the street because it is
always so full of foreigners, for a few days and then the Elliots rented a château in Touraine through
an advertisement in the New York Herald. Elliot had a number of friends by now all of whom
admired his poetry and Mrs. Elliot had prevailed upon him to send over to Boston for her girl friend
who had been in the tea shop. Mrs. Elliot became much brighter after her girl friend came and they
had many good cries together. The girl friend was several years older than Cornelia and called her
Honey. She too came from a very old Southern family.
The three of them, with several of Elliot’s friends who called him Hubie, went down to the
château in Touraine. They found Touraine to be a very flat hot country very much like Kansas. Elliot
had nearly enough poems for a book now. He was going to bring it out in Boston and had already sent
his check to, and made a contract with, a publisher.
In a short time the friends began to drift back to Paris. Touraine had not turned out the way it
looked when it started. Soon all the friends had gone off with a rich young and unmarried poet to a
seaside resort near Trouville. There they were all very happy.
Elliot kept on at the château in Touraine because he had taken it for all summer. He and Mrs.
Elliot tried very hard to have a baby in the big hot bedroom on the big, hard bed. Mrs. Elliot was
learning the touch system on the typewriter, but she found that while it increased the speed it made
more mistakes. The girl friend was now typing practically all of the manuscripts. She was very neat
and efficient and seemed to enjoy it.
Elliot had taken to drinking white wine and lived apart in his own room. He wrote a great deal
of poetry during the night and in the morning looked very exhausted. Mrs. Elliot and the girl friend
now slept together in the big mediæval bed. They had many a good cry together. In the evening they
all sat at dinner together in the garden under a plane tree and the hot evening wind blew and Elliot
drank white wine and Mrs. Elliot and the girl friend made conversation and they were all quite happy.
CHAPTER X
They whack-whacked the white horse on the legs and he kneed himself up. The picador twisted the
stirrups straight and pulled and hauled up into the saddle. The horse’s entrails hung down in a
blue bunch and swung backward and forward as he began to canter, the monos whacking him on
the back of his legs with the rods. He cantered jerkily along the barrera. He stopped stif and one
of the monos held his bridle and walked him forward. The picador kicked in his spurs, leaned
forward and shook his lance at the bull. Blood pumped regularly from between the horse’s front
legs. He was nervously wobbly. The bull could not make up his mind to charge.
Cat in the Rain
THERE WERE ONLY TWO AMERICANS stopping at the hotel.
They did not know any of the people they passed on the stairs on their way to and from their room.
Their room was on the second floor facing the sea. It also faced the public garden and the war
monument. There were big palms and green benches in the public garden. In the good weather there
was always an artist with his easel. Artists liked the way the palms grew and the bright colors of the
hotels facing the gardens and the sea. Italians came from a long way off to look up at the war
monument. It was made of bronze and glistened in the rain. It was raining. The rain dripped from the
palm trees. Water stood in pools on the gravel paths. The sea broke in a long line in the rain and
slipped back down the beach to come up and break again in a long line in the rain. The motor cars
were gone from the square by the war monument. Across the square in the doorway of the café a
waiter stood looking out at the empty square.
The American wife stood at the window looking out. Outside right under their window a cat was
crouched under one of the dripping green tables. The cat was trying to make herself so compact that
she would not be dripped on.
“I’m going down and get that kitty,” the American wife said.
“I’ll do it,” her husband offered from the bed.
“No, I’ll get it. The poor kitty out trying to keep dry under a table.”
The husband went on reading, lying propped up with the two pillows at the foot of the bed.
“Don’t get wet,” he said.
The wife went downstairs and the hotel owner stood up and bowed to her as she passed the
office. His desk was at the far end of the office. He was an old man and very tall.
“Il piove,” the wife said. She liked the hotel-keeper.
“Sì, sì, Signera, brutto tempo. It’s very bad weather.”
He stood behind his desk in the far end of the dim room. The wife liked him. She liked the
deadly serious way he received any complaints. She liked his dignity. She liked the way he wanted to
serve her. She liked the way he felt about being a hotel-keeper. She liked his old, heavy face and big
hands.
Liking him she opened the door and looked out. It was raining harder. A man in a rubber cape
was crossing the empty square to the café. The cat would be around to the right. Perhaps she could go
along under the eaves. As she stood in the doorway an umbrella opened behind her. It was the maid
who looked after their room.
“You must not get wet,” she smiled, speaking Italian. Of course, the hotel-keeper had sent her.
With the maid holding the umbrella over her, she walked along the gravel path until she was
under their window. The table was there, washed bright green in the rain, but the cat was gone. She
was suddenly disappointed. The maid looked up at her.
“Ha perduto qualche cosa, Signera?”
“There was a cat,” said the American girl.
“A cat?”
“Si, il gatto.”
“A cat?” the maid laughed. “A cat in the rain?”
“Yes,” she said, “under the table.” Then, “Oh, I wanted it so much. I wanted a kitty.”
When she talked English the maid’s face tightened.
“Come, Signora,” she said. “We must get back inside. You will be wet.”
“I suppose so,” said the American girl.
They went back along the gravel path and passed in the door. The maid stayed outside to close
the umbrella. As the American girl passed the office, the padrone bowed from his desk. Something
felt very small and tight inside the girl. The padrone made her feel very small and at the same time
really important. She had a momentary feeling of being of supreme importance. She went on up the
stairs. She opened the door of the room. George was on the bed, reading.
“Did you get the cat?” he asked, putting the book down.
“It was gone.”
“Wonder where it went to,” he said, resting his eyes from reading.
She sat down on the bed.
“I wanted it so much,” she said. “I don’t know why I wanted it so much. I wanted that poor kitty.
It isn’t any fun to be a poor kitty out in the rain.” George was reading again.
She went over and sat in front of the mirror of the dressing table looking at herself with the hand
glass. She studied her profile, first one side and then the other. Then she studied the back of her head
and her neck.
“Don’t you think it would be a good idea if I let my hair grow out?” she asked, looking at her
profile again.
George looked up and saw the back of her neck, clipped close like a boy’s.
“I like it the way it is.”
“I get so tired of it,” she said. “I get so tired of looking like a boy.”
George shifted his position in the bed. He hadn’t looked away from her since she started to
speak.
“You look pretty darn nice,” he said.
She laid the mirror down on the dresser and went over to the window and looked out. It was
getting dark.
“I want to pull my hair back tight and smooth and make a big knot at the back that I can feel,” she
said. “I want to have a kitty to sit on my lap and purr when I stroke her.”
“Yeah?” George said from the bed.
“And I want to eat at a table with my own silver and I want candles. And I want it to be spring
and I want to brush my hair out in front of a mirror and I want a kitty and I want some new clothes.”
“Oh, shut up and get something to read,” George said. He was reading again.
His wife was looking out of the window. It was quite dark now and still raining in the palm
trees.
“Anyway, I want a cat,” she said, “I want a cat. I want a cat now. If I can’t have long hair or any
fun, I can have a cat.”
George was not listening. He was reading his book. His wife looked out of the window where
the light had come on in the square.
Someone knocked at the door.
“Avanti, ” George said. He looked up from his book.
In the doorway stood the maid. She held a big tortoise-shell cat pressed tight against her and
swung down against her body.
“Excuse me,” she said, “the padrone asked me to bring this for the Signora.”
CHAPTER XI
The crowd shouted all the time and threw pieces of bread down into the ring, then cushions and
leather wine bottles, keeping up whistling and yelling. Finally the bull was too tired from so much
bad sticking and folded his knees and lay down and one of the cuadrilla leaned out over his neck
and killed him with the puntillo. The crowd came over the barrera and around the torero and two
men grabbed him and held him and some one cut of his pigtail and was waving it and a kid
grabbed it and ran away with it. Afterwards I saw him at the café. He was very short with a brown
face and quite drunk and he said after all it has happened before like that. I am not really a good
bull fighter.
Out of Season
ON THE FOUR LIRE PEDUZZI HAD EARNED by spading the hotel
garden he got quite drunk. He saw the young gentleman coming down the path and spoke to him
mysteriously. The young gentleman said he had not eaten but would be ready to go as soon as lunch
was finished. Forty minutes or an hour.
At the cantina near the bridge they trusted him for three more grappas because he was so
confident and mysterious about his job for the afternoon. It was a windy day with the sun coming out
from behind clouds and then going under in sprinkles of rain. A wonderful day for trout fishing.
The young gentleman came out of the hotel and asked him about the rods. Should his wife come
behind with the rods? “Yes,” said Peduzzi, “let her follow us.” The young gentleman went back into
the hotel and spoke to his wife. He and Peduzzi started down the road. The young gentleman had a
musette over his shoulder. Peduzzi saw the wife, who looked as young as the young gentleman, and
was wearing mountain boots and a blue beret, start out to follow them down the road, carrying the
fishing rods, unjointed, one in each hand. Peduzzi didn’t like her to be way back there. “Signorina.”
he called, winking at the young gentleman, “come up here and walk with us. Signora, come up here.
Let us all walk together.” Peduzzi wanted them all three to walk down the street of Cortina together.
The wife stayed behind, following rather sullenly. “Signorina,” Peduzzi called tenderly, “come
up here with us.” The young gentleman looked back and shouted something. The wife stopped lagging
behind and walked up.
Everyone they met walking through the main street of the town Peduzzi greeted elaborately. Buon
dì, Arturo! Tipping his hat. The bank clerk stared at him from the door of the Fascist café. Groups of
three and four people standing in front of the shops stared at the three. The workmen in their stonepowdered jackets working on the foundations of the new hotel looked up as they passed. Nobody
spoke or gave any sign to them except the town beggar, lean and old, with a spittle-thickened beard,
who lifted his hat as they passed.
Peduzzi stopped in front of a store with the window full of bottles and brought his empty grappa
bottle from an inside pocket of his old military coat. “A little to drink, some marsala for the Signora,
something, something to drink.” He gestured with the bottle. It was a wonderful day. “Marsala, you
like marsala, Signorina? A little marsala?”
The wife stood sullenly. “You’ll have to play up to this,” she said. “I can’t understand a word he
says. He’s drunk, isn’t he?”
The young gentleman appeared not to hear Peduzzi. He was thinking, what in hell makes him say
marsala? That’s what Max Beerbohm drinks.
“Geld,” Peduzzi said finally, taking hold of the young gentleman’s sleeve. “Lire.” He smiled,
reluctant to press the subject but needing to bring the young gentleman into action.
The young gentleman took out his pocketook and gave him a ten-lira note. Peduzzi went up the
steps to the door of the Specialty of Domestic and Foreign Wines shop. It was locked.
“It is closed until two,” someone passing in the street said scornfully. Peduzzi came down the
steps. He felt hurt. “Never mind,” he said, “we can get it at the Concordia.”
They walked down the road to the Concordia three abreast. On the porch of the Concordia,
where the rusty bobsleds were stacked, the young gentleman said, “Was wollen Sie?” Peduzzi handed
him the ten-lira note folded over and over. “Nothing,” he said, “anything.” He was embarrassed.
“Marsala, maybe. I don’t know. Marsala?”
The door of the Concordia shut on the young gentleman and the wife. “Three marsalas,” said the
young gentleman to the girl behind the pastry counter. “Two, you mean?” she asked. “No,” he said,
“one for a vecchio.” “Oh,” she said, “a vecchio,” and laughed, getting down the bottle. She poured
out the three muddy looking drinks into three glasses. The wife was sitting at a table under the line of
newspapers on sticks. The young gentleman put one of the marsalas in front of her. “You might as
well drink it,” he said, “maybe it’ll make you feel better.” She sat and looked at the glass. The young
gentleman went outside the door with a glass for Peduzzi but could not see him.
“I don’t know where he is,” he said, coming back into the pastry room carrying the glass.
“He wanted a quart of it,” said the wife.
“How much is a quarter litre?” the young gentleman asked the girl.
“Of the bianco? One lira.”
“No, of the marsala. Put these two in, too,” he said, giving her his own glass and the one poured
for Peduzzi. She filled the quarter litre wine measure with a funnel. “A bottle to carry it,” said the
young gentleman.
She went to hunt for a bottle. It all amused her.
“I’m sorry you feel so rotten, Tiny,” he said. “I’m sorry I talked the way I did at lunch. We were
both getting at the same thing from different angles.”
“It doesn’t make any difference,” she said. “None of it makes any difference.”
“Are you too cold?” he asked. “I wish you’d worn another sweater.”
“I’ve got on three sweaters.”
The girl came in with a very slim brown bottle and poured the marsala into it. The young
gentleman paid five lire more. They went out the door. The girl was amused. Peduzzi was walking up
and down at the other end out of the wind and holding the rods.
“Come on” he said, “I will carry the rods. What difference does it make if anybody sees them?
No one will trouble us. No one will make any trouble for me in Cortina. I know them at the
municipio. I have been a soldier. Everybody in this town likes me. I sell frogs. What if it is forbidden
to fish? Not a thing. Nothing. No trouble. Big trout, I tell you. Lots of them.”
They were walking down the hill toward the river. The town was in back of them. The sun had
gone under and it was sprinkling rain. “There,” said Peduzzi, pointing to a girl in the doorway of a
house they passed. “My daughter.”
“His doctor,” the wife said, “has he got to show us his doctor?”
“He said his daughter,” said the young gentleman.
The girl went into the house as Peduzzi pointed.
They walked down the hill across the fields and then turned to follow the river bank. Peduzzi
talked rapidly with much winking and knowingness. As they walked three abreast the wife caught his
breath across the wind. Once he nudged her in the ribs. Part of the time he talked in d’Ampezzo
dialect and sometimes in Tyroler German dialect. He could not make out which the young gentleman
and his wife understood the best so he was being bilingual. But as the young gentleman said, “Ja, Ja,”
Peduzzi decided to talk altogether in Tyroler. The young gentleman and the wife understood nothing.
“Everybody in the town saw us going through with these rods. We’re probably being followed
by the game police now. I wish we weren’t in on this damn thing. This damned old fool is so drunk,
too.”
“Of course you haven’t got the guts to just go back,” said the wife. “Of course you have to go
on.”
“Why don’t you go back? Go on back, Tiny.”
“I’m going to stay with you. If you go to jail we might as well both go.”
They turned sharp down the bank and Peduzzi stood, his coat blowing in the wind, gesturing at
the river. It was brown and muddy. Off on the right there was a dump heap.
“Say it to me in Italian,” said the young gentleman.
“Un’ mezz’ora. Piu d’un’ mezz’ora.”
“He says it’s at least a half hour more. Go on back. Tiny. You’re cold in this wind anyway. It’s a
rotten day and we aren’t going to have any fun, anyway.”
“All right,” she said, and climbed up the grassy bank.
Peduzzi was down at the river and did not notice her till she was almost out of sight over the
crest. “Frau!” he shouted. “Frau! Fräulein! You’re not going.”
She went on over the crest of the hill.
“She’s gone!” said Peduzzi. It shocked him.
He took off the rubber bands that held the rod segments together and commenced to joint up one
of the rods.
“But you said it was half an hour further.”
“Oh, yes. It is good half an hour down. It is good here, too.”
“Really?”
“Of course. It is good here and good there, too.”
The young gentleman sat down on the bank and jointed up a rod, put on the reel and threaded the
line through the guides. He felt uncomfortable and afraid that any minute a gamekeeper or a posse of
citizens would come over the bank from the town. He could see the houses of the town and the
campanile over the edge of the hill. He opened his leader box. Peduzzi leaned over and dug his flat,
hard thumb and forefinger in and tangled the moistened leaders.
“Have you some lead?”
“No.”
“You must have some lead.” Peduzzi was excited. “You must have piombo. Piombo. A little
piombo. Just here. Just above the hook or your bait will float on the water. You must have it. Just a
little piombo.”
“Have you got some?”
“No.” He looked through his pockets desperately. Sifting through the cloth dirt in the linings of
his inside military pockets. “I haven’t any. We must have piombo.”
“We can’t fish then,” said the young gentleman, and unjointed the rod, reeling the line back
through the guides. “We’ll get some piombo and fish tomorrow.”
“But listen, caro, you must have piombo. The line will lie flat on the water.” Peduzzi’s day was
going to pieces before his eyes. “You must have piombo. A little is enough. Your stuff is all clean and
new but you have no lead. I would have brought some. You said you had everything.”
The young gentleman looked at the stream discolored by the melting snow. “I know,” he said,
“we’ll get some piombo and fish tomorrow.”
“At what hour in the morning? Tell me that.”
“At seven.”
The sun came out. It was warm and pleasant. The young gentleman felt relieved. He was no
longer breaking the law. Sitting on the bank he took the bottle of marsala out of his pocket and passed
it to Peduzzi. Peduzzi passed it back. The young gentleman took a drink of it and passed it to Peduzzi
again. Peduzzi passed it back again. “Drink,” he said, “drink. It’s your marsala.” After another short
drink the young gentleman handed the bottle over. Peduzzi had been watching it closely. He took the
bottle very hurriedly and tipped it up. The gray hairs in the folds of his neck oscillated as he drank,
his eyes fixed on the end of the narrow brown bottle. He drank it all. The sun shone while he drank. It
was wonderful. This was a great day, after all. A wonderful day.
“Senta, caro! In the morning at seven.” He had called the young gentleman caro several times
and nothing had happened. It was good marsala. His eyes glistened. Days like this stretched out
ahead. It would begin at seven in the morning.
They started to walk up the hill toward the town. The young gentleman went on ahead. He was
quite a way up the hill. Peduzzi called to him.
“Listen, caro, can you let me take five lire for a favor?”
“For today?” asked the young gentleman frowning.
“No, not today. Give it to me today for tomorrow. I will provide everything for tomorrow. Pane,
salami, formaggio, good stuff for all of us. You and I and the Signora. Bait for fishing, minnows, not
worms only. Perhaps I can get some marsala. All for five lire. Five lire for a favor.”
The young gentleman looked through his pocketbook and took out a two-lira note and two ones.
“Thank you, caro. Thank you,” said Peduzzi, in the tone of one member of the Carleton Club
accepting the Morning Post from another. This was living. He was through with the hotel garden,
breaking up frozen manure with a dung fork. Life was opening out.
“Until seven o’clock then, caro,” he said, slapping the young gentleman on the back. “Promptly
at seven.”
“I may not be going,” said the young gentleman putting his purse back in his pocket.
“What,” said Peduzzi, “I will have minnows, Signor. Salami, everything. You and I and the
Signora. The three of us.”
“I may not be going,” said the young gentleman, “very probably not. I will leave word with the
padrone at the hotel office.”
CHAPTER XII
If it happened right down close in front of you, you could see Villalta snarl at the bull and curse
him, and when the bull charged he swung back firmly like an oak when the wind hits it, his legs
tight together, the muleta trailing and the sword following the curve behind. Then he cursed the
bull, flopped the muleta at him, and swung back from the charge his feet firm, the muleta curving
and at each swing the crowd roaring.
When he started to kill it was all in the same rush. The bull looking at him straight in front,
hating. He drew out the sword from the folds of the muleta and sighted with the same movement
and called to the bull, Toro! Toro! and the bull charged and Villalta charged and just for a
moment they became one. Villalta became one with the bull and then it was over. Villalta standing
straight and the red hilt of the sword sticking out dully between the bull’s shoulders. Villalta, his
hand up at the crowd and the bull roaring blood, looking straight at Villalta and his legs caving.
Cross-Country Snow
THE FUNICULAR CAR BUCKED ONCE MORE and then stopped. It
could not go farther, the snow drifted solidly across the track. The gale scouring the exposed surface
of the mountain had swept the snow surface into a wind-board crust. Nick, waxing his skis in the
baggage car, pushed his boots into the toe irons and shut the clamp tight. He jumped from the car
sideways onto the hard wind-board, made a jump turn and crouching and trailing his sticks slipped in
a rush down the slope.
On the white below George dipped and rose and dipped out of sight. The rush and the sudden
swoop as he dropped down a steep undulation in the mountain side plucked Nick’s mind out and left
him only the wonderful flying, dropping sensation in his body. He rose to a slight up-run and then the
snow seemed to drop out from under him as he went down, down, faster and faster in a rush down the
last, long steep slope. Crouching so he was almost sitting back on his skis, trying to keep the center of
gravity low, the snow driving like a sand-storm, he knew the pace was too much. But he held it. He
would not let go and spill. Then a patch of soft snow, left in a hollow by the wind, spilled him and he
went over and over in a clashing of skis, feeling like a shot rabbit, then stuck, his legs crossed, his
skis sticking straight up and his nose and ears jammed full of snow.
George stood a little farther down the slope, knocking the snow from his wind jacket with big
slaps.
“You took a beauty, Mike,” he called to Nick. “That’s lousy soft snow. It bagged me the same
way.”
“What’s it like over the khud?” Nick kicked his skis around as he lay on his back and stood up.
“You’ve got to keep to your left. It’s a good fast drop with a Christy at the bottom on account of
a fence.”
“Wait a sec and we’ll take it together.”
“No, you come on and go first. I like to see you take the khuds.”
Nick Adams came up past George, big back and blond head still faintly snowy, then his skis
started slipping at the edge and he swooped down, hissing in the crystalline powder snow and
seeming to float up and drop down as he went up and down the billowing khuds. He held to his left
and at the end, as he rushed toward the fence, keeping his knees locked tight together and turning his
body like tightening a screw brought his skis sharply around to the right in a smother of snow and
slowed into a loss of speed parallel to the hillside and the wire fence.
He looked up the hill. George was coming down in telemark position, kneeling; one leg forward
and bent, the other trailing; his sticks hanging like some insect’s thin legs, kicking up puffs of snow as
they touched the surface and finally the whole kneeling, trailing figure coming around in a beautiful
right curve, crouching, the legs shot forward and back, the body leaning out against the swing, the
sticks accenting the curve like points of light, all in a wild cloud of snow.
“I was afraid to Christy,” George said, “the snow was too deep. You made a beauty.”
“I can’t telemark with my leg,” Nick said.
Nick held down the top strand of the wire fence with his ski and George slid over. Nick
followed him down to the road. They thrust bent-kneed along the road into a pine forest. The road
became polished ice, stained orange and a tobacco yellow from the teams hauling logs. The skiers
kept to the stretch of snow along the side. The road dipped sharply to a stream and then ran straight
up-hill. Through the woods they could see a long, low-eaved, weather-beaten building. Through the
trees it was a faded yellow. Closer the window frames were painted green. The paint was peeling.
Nick knocked his clamps loose with one of his ski sticks and kicked off the skis.
“We might as well carry them up here,” he said.
He climbed the steep road with the skis on his shoulder, kicking his heel nails into the icy
footing. He heard George breathing and kicking in his heels just behind him. They stacked the skis
against the side of the inn and slapped the snow off each other’s trousers, stamped their boots clean,
and went in.
Inside it was quite dark. A big porcelain stove shone in the corner of the room. There was a low
ceiling. Smooth benches back of dark, wine-stained tables were along each side of the rooms. Two
Swiss sat over their pipes and two decies of cloudy new wine next to the stove. The boys took off
their jackets and sat against the wall on the other side of the stove. A voice in the next room stopped
singing and a girl in a blue apron came in through the door to see what they wanted to drink.
“A bottle of Sion,” Nick said. “Is that all right, Gidge?”
“Sure,” said George. “You know more about wine than I do. I like any of it.”
The girl went out.
“There’s nothing really can touch skiing, is there?” Nick said. “The way it feels when you first
drop off on a long run.”
“Huh,” said George. “It’s too swell to talk about.”
The girl brought the wine in and they had trouble with the cork. Nick finally opened it. The girl
went out and they heard her singing in German in the next room.
“Those specks of cork in it don’t matter,” said Nick.
“I wonder if she’s got any cake.”
“Let’s find out.”
The girl came in and Nick noticed that her apron covered swellingly her pregnancy. I wonder
why I didn’t see that when she first came in, he thought.
“What were you singing?” he asked her.
“Opera, German opera.” She did not care to discuss the subject. “We have some apple strudel if
you want it.”
“She isn’t so cordial, is she?” said George.
“Oh, well. She doesn’t know us and she thought we were going to kid her about her singing,
maybe. She’s from up where they speak German probably and she’s touchy about being here and then
she’s got that baby coming without being married and she’s touchy.”
“How do you know she isn’t married?”
“No ring. Hell, no girls get married around here till they’re knocked up.”
The door came open and a gang of woodcutters from up the road came in, stamping their boots
and steaming in the room. The waitress brought in three litres of new wine for the gang and they sat at
the two tables, smoking and quiet, with their hats off, leaning back against the wall or forward on the
table. Outside the horses on the wood sledges made an occasional sharp jangle of bells as they tossed
their heads.
George and Nick were happy. They were fond of each other. They knew they had the run back
home ahead of them.
“When have you got to go back to school?” Nick asked.
“Tonight,” George answered. “I’ve got to get the ten-forty from Montreux.”
“I wish you could stick over and we could do the Dent du Lys tomorrow.”
“I got to get educated,” George said. “Gee, Mike, don’t you wish we could just bum together?
Take our skis and go on the train to where there was good running and then go on and put up at pubs
and go right across the Oberland and up the Valais and all through the Engadine and just take repair
kit and extra sweaters and pyjamas in our rucksacks and not give a damn about school or anything.”
“Yes, and go through the Schwarzwald that way. Gee, the swell places.”
“That’s where you went fishing last summer, isn’t it?”
“Yes.”
They ate the strudel and drank the rest of the wine.
George leaned back against the wall and shut his eyes.
“Wine always makes me feel this way,” he said.
“Feel bad?” Nick asked.
“No. I feel good, but funny.”
“I know,” Nick said.
“Sure,” said George.
“Should we have another bottle?” Nick asked.
“Not for me,” George said.
They sat there, Nick leaning his elbows on the table, George slumped back against the wall.
“Is Helen going to have a baby?” George said, coming down to the table from the wall.
“Yes.”
“When?”
“Late next summer.”
“Are you glad?”
“Yes. Now.”
“Will you go back to the States?”
“I guess so.”
“Do you want to?”
“No.”
“Does Helen?”
“No.”
George sat silent. He looked at the empty bottle and the empty glasses.
“It’s hell, isn’t it?” he said.
“No. Not exactly,” Nick said.
“Why not?”
“I don’t know,” Nick said.
“Will you ever go skiing together in the States?” George said.
“I don’t know,” said Nick.
“The mountains aren’t much,” George said.
“No,” said Nick. “They’re too rocky. There’s too much timber and they’re too far away.”
“Yes,” said George, “that’s the way it is in California.”
“Yes,” Nick said, “that’s the way it is everywhere I’ve ever been.”
“Yes,” said George, “that’s the way it is.”
The Swiss got up and paid and went out.
“I wish we were Swiss,” George said.
“They’ve all got goiter,” said Nick.
“I don’t believe it,” George said.
“Neither do I,” said Nick.
They laughed.
“Maybe we’ll never go skiing again, Nick,” George said.
“We’ve got to,” said Nick. “It isn’t worth while if you can’t.”
“We’ll go, all right,” George said.
“We’ve got to,” Nick agreed.
“I wish we could make a promise about it,” George said.
Nick stood up. He buckled his wind jacket tight. He leaned over George and picked up the two
ski poles from against the wall. He stuck one of the ski poles into the floor.
“There isn’t any good in promising,” he said.
They opened the door and went out. It was very cold. The snow had crusted hard. The road ran
up the hill into the pine trees.
They took down their skis from where they leaned against the wall in the inn. Nick put on his
gloves. George was already started up the road, his skis on his shoulder. Now they would have the
run home together.
CHAPTER XIII
I heard the drums coming down the street and then the fifes and the pipes and then they came
around the corner, all dancing. The street was full of them. Maera saw him and then I saw him.
When they stopped the music for the crouch he hunched down in the street with them all and when
they started it again he jumped up and went dancing down the street with them. He was drunk all
right.
You go down after him, said Maera, he hates me.
So I went down and caught up with them and grabbed him while he was crouched down
waiting for the music to break loose and said, Come on Luis. For Christ’s sake you’ve got bulls
this afternoon. He didn’t listen to me, he was listening so hard for the music to start.
I said, Don’t be a damn fool Luis. Come on back to the hotel.
Then the music started up again and he jumped up and twisted away from me and started
dancing. I grabbed his arm and he pulled loose and said, Oh leave me alone. You’re not my father.
I went back to the hotel and Maera was on the balcony looking out to see if I’d be bringing
him back. He went inside when he saw me and came downstairs disgusted.
Well, I said, after all he’s just an ignorant Mexican savage.
Yes, Maera said, and who will kill his bulls after he gets a cogida?
We, I suppose, I said.
Yes, we, said Maera. We kills the savages ’ bulls, and the drunkards’ bulls, and the riau-riau
dancers’ bulls. Yes. We kill them. We kill them all right. Yes. Yes. Yes.
My Old Man
I GUESS LOOKING AT IT, NOW, MY OLD man was cut out for a fat
guy, one of those regular little roly fat guys you see around, but he sure never got that way, except a
little toward the last, and then it wasn’t his fault, he was riding over the jumps only and he could
afford to carry plenty of weight then. I remember the way he’d pull on a rubber shirt over a couple of
jerseys and a big sweat shirt over that, and get me to run with him in the forenoon in the hot sun. He’d
have, maybe, taken a trial trip with one of Razzo’s skins early in the morning after just getting in from
Torino at four o’clock in the morning and beating it out to the stables in a cab and then with the dew
all over everything and the sun just starting to get going, I’d help him pull off his boots and he’d get
into a pair of sneakers and all these sweaters and we’d start out.
“Come on, kid,” he’d say, stepping up and down on his toes in front of the jock’s dressing room,
“let’s get moving.”
Then we’d start off jogging around the infield once, maybe, with him ahead, running nice, and
then turn out the gate and along one of those roads with all the trees along both sides of them that run
out from San Siro. I’d go ahead of him when we hit the road and I could run pretty good and I’d look
around and he’d be jogging easy just behind me and after a little while I’d look around again and he’d
begun to sweat. Sweating heavy and he’d just be dogging it along with his eyes on my back, but when
he’d catch me looking at him he’d grin and say, “Sweating plenty?” When my old man grinned,
nobody could help but grin too. We’d keep right on running out toward the mountains and then my old
man would yell, “Hey, Joe!” and I’d look back and he’d be sitting under a tree with a towel he’d had
around his waist wrapped around his neck.
I’d come back and sit down beside him and he’d pull a rope out of his pocket and start skipping
rope out in the sun with the sweat pouring off his face and him skipping rope out in the white dust with
the rope going cloppetty, cloppetty, clop, clop, clop, and the sun hotter, and him working harder up
and down a patch of the road. Say, it was a treat to see my old man skip rope, too. He could whirr it
fast or lop it slow and fancy. Say, you ought to have seen wops look at us sometimes, when they’d
come by, going into town walking along with big white steers hauling the cart. They sure looked as
though they thought the old man was nuts. He’d start the rope whirring till they’d stop dead still and
watch him, then give the steers a cluck and a poke with the goad and get going again.
When I’d sit watching him working out in the hot sun I sure felt fond of him. He sure was fun and
he done his work so hard and he’d finish up with a regular whirring that’d drive the sweat out on his
face like water and then sling the rope at the tree and come over and sit down with me and lean back
against the tree with the towel and a sweater wrapped around his neck.
“Sure is hell keeping it down, Joe,” he’d say and lean back and shut his eyes and breathe long
and deep, “it ain’t like when you’re a kid.” Then he’d get up and before he started to cool we’d jog
along back to the stables. That’s the way it was keeping down to weight. He was worried all the time.
Most jocks can just about ride off all they want to. A jock loses about a kilo every time he rides, but
my old man was sort of dried out and he couldn’t keep down his kilos without all that running.
I remember once at San Siro, Regoli, a little wop, that was riding for Buzoni, came out across
the paddock going to the bar for something cool; and flicking his boots with his whip, after he’d just
weighed in and my old man had just weighed in too, and came out with the saddle under his arm
looking red-faced and tired and too big for his silks and he stood there looking at young Regoli
standing up to the outdoors bar, cool and kid-looking, and I said, “What’s the matter, Dad?” cause I
thought maybe Regoli had bumped him or something and he just looked at Regoli and said, “Oh, to
hell with it,” and went on to the dressing room.
Well, it would have been all right, maybe, if we’d stayed in Milan and ridden at Milan and
Torino/cause if there ever were any easy courses, it’s those two. “Pianola, Joe,” my old man said
when he dismounted in the winning stall after what the wops thought was a hell of a steeplechase. I
asked him once. “This course rides itself. It’s the pace you’re going at, that makes riding the jumps
dangerous, Joe. We ain’t going any pace here, and they ain’t really bad jumps either. But it’s the pace
always—not the jumps—that makes the trouble.”
San Siro was the swellest course I’d ever seen but the old man said it was a dog’s life. Going
back and forth between Mirafiore and San Siro and riding just about every day in the week with a
train ride every other night.
I was nuts about the horses, too. There’s something about it, when they come out and go up the
track to the post. Sort of dancy and tight looking with the jock keeping a tight hold on them and maybe
easing off a little and letting them run a little going up. Then once they were at the barrier it got me
worse than anything. Especially at San Siro with that big green infield and the mountains way off and
the fat wop starter with his big whip and the jocks fiddling them around and then the barrier snapping
up and that bell going off and them all getting off in a bunch and then commencing to string out. You
know the way a bunch of skins gets off. If you’re up in the stand with a pair of glasses all you see is
them plunging off and then that bell goes off and it seems like it rings for a thousand years and then
they come sweeping round the turn. There wasn’t ever anything like it for me.
But my old man said one day, in the dressing room, when he was getting into his street clothes,
“None of these things are horses, Joe. They’d kill that bunch of skates for their hides and hoofs up at
Paris.” That was the day he’d won the Premio Commercio with Lantorna shooting her out of the field
the last hundred meters like pulling a cork out of a bottle.
It was right after the Premio Commercio that we pulled out and left Italy. My old man and
Holbrook and a fat wop in a straw hat that kept wiping his face with a handkerchief were having an
argument at a table in the Galleria. They were all talking French and the two of them was after my old
man about something. Finally he didn’t say anything any more but just sat there and looked at
Holbrook, and the two of them kept after him, first one talking and then the other, and the fat wop
always butting in on Holbrook.
“You go out and buy me a Sportsman, will you, Joe?” my old man said, and handed me a couple
of soldi without looking away from Holbrook.
So I went out of the Galleria and walked over to in front of the Scala and bought a paper, and
came back and stood a little way away because I didn’t want to butt in and my old man was sitting
back in his chair looking down at his coffee and fooling with a spoon and Holbrook and the big wop
were standing and the big wop was wiping his face and shaking his head. And I came up and my old
man acted just as though the two of them weren’t standing there and said, “Want an ice, Joe?”
Holbrook looked down at my old man and said slow and careful, “You son of a bitch,” and he and the
fat wop went out through the tables.
My old man sat there and son of smiled at me, but his face was white and he looked sick as hell
and I was scared and felt sick inside because I knew something had happened and I didn’t see how
anybody could call my old man a son of a bitch, and get away with it. My old man opened up the
Sportsman and studied the handicaps for a while and then he said, “You got to take a lot of things in
this world, Joe.” And three days later we left Milan for good on the Turin train for Paris, after an
auction sale out in front of Turner’s stables of everything we couldn’t get into a trunk and a suit case.
We got into Paris early in the morning in a long, dirty station the old man told me was the Gare
de Lyon. Paris was an awful big town after Milan. Seems like in Milan everybody is going
somewhere and all the trams run somewhere and there ain’t any sort of a mix-up, but Paris is all
balled up and they never do straighten it out. I got to like it, though, part of it, anyway, and say, it’s got
the best race courses in the world. Seems as though that were the thing that keeps it all going and
about the only thing you can figure on is that every day the buses will be going out to whatever track
they’re running at, going right out through everything to the track. I never really got to know Paris
well, because I just came in about once or twice a week with the old man from Maisons and he
always sat at the Café de la Paix on the Opera side with the rest of the gang from Maisons and I guess
that’s one of the busiest parts of the town. But, say, it is funny that a big town like Paris wouldn’t have
a Galleria, isn’t it?
Well, we went out to live at Maisons-Lafitte, where just about everybody lives except the gang
at Chantilly, with a Mrs. Meyers that runs a boarding house. Maisons is about the swellest place to
live I’ve ever seen in all my life. The town ain’t so much, but there’s a lake and a swell forest that we
used to go off bumming in all day, a couple of us kids, and my old man made me a sling shot and we
got a lot of things with it but the best one was a magpie. Young Dick Atkinson shot a rabbit with it one
day and we put it under a tree and were all sitting around and Dick had some cigarettes and all of a
sudden the rabbit jumped up and beat it into the brush and we chased it but we couldn’t find it. Gee,
we had fun at Maisons. Mrs. Meyers used to give me lunch in the morning and I’d be gone all day. I
learned to talk French quick. It’s an easy language.
As soon as we got to Maisons, my old man wrote to Milan for his license and he was pretty
worried till it came. He used to sit around the Café de Paris in Maisons with the gang, there were lots
of guys he’d known when he rode up at Paris, before the war, lived at Maisons, and there’s a lot of
time to sit around because the work around a racing stable, for the jocks, that is, is all cleaned up by
nine o’clock in the morning. They take the first bunch of skins out to gallop them at 5:30 in the
morning and they work the second lot at 8 o’clock. That means getting up early all right and going to
bed early, too. If a jock’s riding for somebody too, he can’t go boozing around because the trainer
always has an eye on him if he’s a kid and if he ain’t a kid he’s always got an eye on himself. So
mostly if a jock ain’t working he sits around the Café de Paris with the gang and they can all sit
around about two or three hours in front of some drink like a vermouth and seltz and they talk and tell
stories and shoot pool and it’s sort of like a club or the Galleria in Milan. Only it ain’t really like the
Galleria because there everybody is going by all the time and there’s everybody around at the tables.
Well, my old man got his license all right. They sent it through to him without a word and he
rode a couple of times. Amiens, up country and that sort of thing, but he didn’t seem to get any
engagement. Everybody liked him and whenever I’d come into the Café in the forenoon I’d find
somebody drinking with him because my old man wasn’t tight like most of these jockeys that have got
the first dollar they made riding at the World’s Fair in St. Louis in nineteen ought four. That’s what
my old man would say when he’d kid George Burns. But it seemed like everybody steered clear of
giving my old man any mounts.
We went out to wherever they were runnning every day with the car from Maisons and that was
the most fun of all. I was glad when the horses came back from Deauville and the summer. Even
though it meant no more bumming in the woods,’cause then we’d ride to Enghien or Tremblay or St.
Cloud and watch them from the trainers’ and jockeys’ stand. I sure learned about racing from going
out with that gang and the fun of it was going every day.
I remember once out at St. Cloud. It was a big two hundred thousand franc race with seven
entries and Kzar a big favorite. I went around to the paddock to see the horses with my old man and
you never saw such horses. This Kzar is a great big yellow horse that looks like just nothing but run. I
never saw such a horse. He was being led around the paddocks with his head down and when he went
by me I felt all hollow inside he was so beautiful. There never was such a wonderful, lean, running
built horse. And he went around the paddock putting his feet just so and quiet and careful and moving
easy like he knew just what he had to do and not jerking and standing up on his legs and getting wild
eyed like you see these selling platers with a shot of dope in them. The crowd was so thick I couldn’t
see him again except just his legs going by and some yellow and my old man started out through the
crowd and I followed him over to the jock’s dressing room back in the trees and there was a big
crowd around there, too, but the man at the door in a derby nodded to my old man and we got in and
everybody was sitting around and getting dressed and pulling shirts over their heads and pulling boots
on and it all smelled hot and sweaty and linimenty and outside was the crowd looking in.
The old man went over and sat down beside George Gardner that was getting into his pants and
said, “What’s the dope, George?” just in an ordinary tone of voice ’cause there ain’t any use him
feeling around because George either can tell him or he can’t tell him.
“He won’t win,” George says very low, leaning over and buttoning the bottoms of his breeches.
“Who will?” my old man says, leaning over close so nobody can hear.
“Kircubbin,” George says, “and if he does, save me a couple of tickets.”
My old man says something in a regular voice to George and George says, “Don’t ever bet on
anything I tell you,” kidding like, and we beat it out and through all the crowd that was looking in,
over to the 100 franc mutuel machine. But I knew something big was up because George is Kzar’s
jockey. On the way he gets one of the yellow odds-sheets with the starting prices on and Kzar is only
paying 5 for 10, Cefisidote is next at 3 to 1 and fifth down the list this Kircubbin at 8 to 1. My old
man bets five thousand on Kircubbin to win and puts on a thousand to place and we went around back
of the grandstand to go up the stairs and get a place to watch the race.
We were jammed in tight and first a man in a long coat with a gray tall hat and a whip folded up
in his hand came out and then one after another the horses, with the jocks up and a stable boy holding
the bridle on each side and walking along, followed the old guy. That big yellow horse Kzar came
first. He didn’t look so big when you first looked at him until you saw the length of his legs and the
whole way he’s built and the way he moves. Gosh, I never saw such a horse. George Gardner was
riding him and they moved along slow, back of the old guy in the gray tall hat that walked along like
he was a ring master in a circus. Back of Kzar, moving along smooth and yellow in the sun, was a
good looking black with a nice head with Tommy Archibald riding him; and after the black was a
string of five more horses all moving along slow in a procession past the grandstand and the pesage.
My old man said the black was Kircubbin and I took a good look at him and he was a nice-looking
horse, all right, but nothing like Kzar.
Everybody cheered Kzar when he went by and he sure was one swell-looking horse. The
procession of them went around on the other side past the pelouse and then back up to the near end of
the course and the circus master had the stable boys turn them loose one after another so they could
gallop by the stands on their way up to the post and let everybody have a good look at them. They
weren’t at the post hardly any time at all when the gong started and you could see them way off across
the infield all in a bunch starting on the first swing like a lot of little toy horses. I was watching them
through the glasses and Kzar was running well back, with one of the bays making the pace. They
swept down and around and came pounding past and Kzar was way back when they passed us and
this Kircubbin horse in front and going smooth. Gee, it’s awful when they go by you and then you have
to watch them go farther away and get smaller and smaller and then all bunched up on the turns and
then come around towards into the stretch and you feel like swearing and god-damming worse and
worse. Finally they made the last turn and came into the straightaway with this Kircubbin horse way
out in front. Everybody was looking funny and saying “Kzar” in sort of a sick way and them pounding
nearer down the stretch, and then something came out of the pack right into my glasses like a horseheaded yellow streak and everybody began to yell “Kzar” as though they were crazy. Kzar came on
faster than I’d ever seen anything in my life and pulled up on Kircubbin that was going fast as any
black horse could go with the jock flogging hell out of him with the gad and they were right dead neck
and neck for a second but Kzar seemed going about twice as fast with those great jumps and that head
out—but it was while they were neck and neck that they passed the winning post and when the
numbers went up in the slots the first one was 2 and that meant that Kircubbin had won.
I felt all trembly and funny inside, and then we were all jammed in with the people going
downstairs to stand in front of the board where they’d post what Kircubbin paid. Honest, watching the
race I’d forgot how much my old man had bet on Kircubbin. I’d wanted Kzar to win so damned bad.
But now it was all over it was swell to know we had the winner.
“Wasn’t it a swell race. Dad?” I said to him.
He looked at me sort of funny with his derby on the back of his head. “George Gardner’s a swell
jockey, all right,” he said. “It sure took a great jock to keep that Kzar horse from winning.”
Of course I knew it was funny all the time. But my old man saying that right out like that sure took
the kick all out of it for me and I didn’t get the real kick back again ever, even when they posted the
numbers upon the board and the bell rang to pay off and we saw that Kircubbin paid 67.50 for 10. All
round people were saying, “Poor Kzar! Poor Kzar!” And I thought, I wish I were a jockey and could
have rode him instead of that son of a bitch. And that was funny, thinking of George Gardner as a son
of a bitch because I’d always liked him and besides he’d given us the winner, but I guess that’s what
he is, all right.
My old man had a big lot of money after that race and he took to coming into Paris oftener. If they
raced at Tremblay he’d have them drop him in town on their way back to Maisons and he and I’d sit
out in front of the Café de la Paix and watch the people go by. It’s funny sitting there. There’s streams
of people going by and all sorts of guys come up and want to sell you things, and I loved to sit there
with my old man. That was when we’d have the most fun. Guys would come by selling funny rabbits
that jumped if you squeezed a bulb and they’d come up to us and my old man would kid with them. He
could talk French just like English and all those kind of guys knew him ’cause you can always tell a
jockey—and then we always sat at the same table and they got used to seeing us there. There were
guys selling matrimonial papers and girls selling rubber eggs that when you squeezed them a rooster
came out of them and one old wormy-looking guy that went by with post-cards of Paris, showing them
to everybody, and, of course, nobody ever bought any, and then he would come back and show the
under side of the pack and they would all be smutty postcards and lots of people would dig down and
buy them.
Gee, I remember the funny people that used to go by. Girls around supper time looking for
somebody to take them out to eat and they’d speak to my old man and he’d make some joke at them in
French and they’d pat me on the head and go on. Once there was an American woman sitting with her
kid daughter at the next table to us and they were both eating ices and I kept looking at the girl and she
was awfully good looking and I smiled at her and she smiled at me but that was all that ever came of
it because I looked for her mother and her every day and I made up ways that I was going to speak to
her and I wondered if I got to know her if her mother would let me take her out to Auteuil or Tremblay
but I never saw either of them again. Anyway, I guess it wouldn’t have been any good, anyway,
because looking back on it I remember the way I thought out would be best to speak to her was to say,
“Pardon me, but perhaps I can give you a winner at Enghien today?” and, after all, maybe she would
have thought I was a tout instead of really trying to give her a winner.
We’d sit at the Café de la Paix, my old man and me, and we had a big drag with the waiter
because my old man drank whisky and it cost five francs, and that meant a good tip when the saucers
were counted up. My old man was drinking more than I’d ever seen him, but he wasn’t riding at all
now and besides he said that whisky kept his weight down. But I noticed he was putting it on, all
right, just the same. He’d busted away from his old gang out at Maisons and seemed to like just sitting
around on the boulevard with me. But he was dropping money every day at the track. He’d feel sort of
doleful after the last race, if he’d lost on the day, until we’d get to our table and he’d have his first
whisky and then he’d be fine.
He’d be reading the Paris-Sport and he’d look over at me and say, “Where’s your girl, Joe?” to
kid me on account I had told him about the girl that day at the next table. And I’d get red, but I liked
being kidded about her. It gave me a good feeling. “Keep your eye peeled for her, Joe,” he’d say,
“she’ll be back.”
He’d ask me questions about things and some of the things I’d say he’d laugh. And then he’d get
started talking about things. About riding down in Egypt, or at St. Moritz on the ice before my mother
died, and about during the war when they had regular races down in the south of France without any
purses, or betting or crowd or anything just to keep the breed up. Regular races with the jocks riding
hell out of the horses. Gee, I could listen to my old man talk by the hour, especially when he’d had a
couple or so of drinks. He’d tell me about when he was a boy in Kentucky and going coon hunting,
and the old days in the States before everything went on the bum there. And he’d say, “Joe, when
we’ve got a decent stake, you’re going back there to the States and go to school.”
“What’ve I got to go back there to go to school for when everything’s on the bum there?” I’d ask
him.
“That’s different,” he’d say and get the waiter over and pay the pile of saucers and we’d get a
taxi to the Gare St. Lazare and get on the train out to Maisons.
One day at Auteuil, after a selling steeplechase, my old man bought in the winner for 30,000
francs. He had to bid a little to get him but the stable let the horse go finally and my old man had his
permit and his colors in a week. Gee, I felt proud when my old man was an owner. He fixed it up for
stable space with Charles Drake and cut out coming in to Paris, and started his running and sweating
out again, and him and I were the whole stable gang. Our horse’s name was Gilford, he was Irish bred
and a nice, sweet jumper. My old man figured that training him and riding him, himself, he was a good
investment. I was proud of everything and I thought Gilford was as good a horse as Kzar. He was a
good, solid jumper, a bay, with plenty of speed on the flat, if you asked him for it, and he was a nicelooking horse, too.
Gee, I was fond of him. The first time he started with my old man up, he finished third in a 2500
meter hurdle race and when my old man got off him, all sweating and happy in the place stall, and
went in to weigh, I felt as proud of him as though it was the first race he’d ever placed in. You see,
when a guy ain’t been riding for a long time, you can’t make yourself really believe that he has ever
rode. The whole thing was different now, ’cause down in Milan, even big races never seemed to
make any difference to my old man, if he won he wasn’t ever excited or anything, and now it was so I
couldn’t hardly sleep the night before a race and I knew my old man was excited, too, even if he
didn’t show it. Riding for yourself makes an awful difference.
Second time Gilford and my old man started, was a rainy Sunday at Auteuil, in the Prix du
Marat, a 4500 meter steeplechase. As soon as he’d gone out I beat it up in the stand with the new
glasses my old man had bought for me to watch them. They started way over at the far end of the
course and there was some trouble at the barrier. Something with goggle blinders on was making a
great fuss and rearing around and busted the barrier once, but I could see my old man in our black
jacket, with a white cross and a black cap, sitting up on Gilford, and patting him with his hand. Then
they were off in a jump and out of sight behind the trees and the gong going for dear life and the parimutuel wickets rattling down. Gosh, I was so excited, I was afraid to look at them, but I fixed the
glasses on the place where they would come out back of the trees and then out they came with the old
black jacket going third and they all sailing over the jump like birds. Then they went out of sight again
and then they came pounding out and down the hill and all going nice and sweet and easy and taking
the fence smooth in a bunch, and moving away from us all solid. Looked as though you could walk
across on their backs they were all so bunched and going so smooth. Then they bellied over the big
double Bullfinch and something came down. I couldn’t see who it was, but in a minute the horse was
up and galloping free and the field, all bunched still, sweeping around the long left turn into the
straightaway. They jumped the stone wall and came jammed down the stretch toward the big waterjump right in front of the stands. I saw them coming and hollered at my old man as he went by, and he
was leading by about a length and riding way out, and light as a monkey, and they were racing for the
water-jump. They took off over the big hedge of the water-jump in a pack and then there was a crash,
and two horses pulled sideways out off it, and kept on going, and three others were piled up. I
couldn’t see my old man anywhere. One horse kneed himself up and the jock had hold of the bridle
and mounted and went slamming on after the place money. The other horse was up and away by
himself, jerking his head and galloping with the bridle rein hanging and the jock staggered over to one
side of the track against the fence. Then Gilford rolled over to one side off my old man and got up and
started to run on three legs with his front off hoof dangling and there was my old man laying there on
the grass flat out with his face up and blood all over the side of his head. I ran down the stand and
bumped into a jam of people and got to the rail and a cop grabbed me and held me and two big
stretcher-bearers were going out after my old man and around on the other side of the course I saw
three horses, strung way out, coming out of the trees and taking the jump.
My old man was dead when they brought him in and while a doctor was listening to his heart
with a thing plugged in his ears, I heard a shot up the track that meant they’d killed Gilford. I lay down
beside my old man, when they carried the stretcher into the hospital room, and hung onto the stretcher
and cried and cried, and he looked so white and gone and so awfully dead, and I couldn’t help feeling
that if my old man was dead maybe they didn’t need to have shot Gilford. His hoof might have got
well. I don’t know. I loved my old man so much.
Then a couple of guys came in and one of them patted me on the back and then went over and
looked at my old man and then pulled a sheet off the cot and spread it over him; and the other was
telephoning in French for them to send the ambulance to take him out to Maisons. And I couldn’t stop
crying, crying and choking, sort of, and George Gardner came in and sat down beside me on the floor
and put his arm around me and says, “Come on, Joe, old boy. Get up and we’ll go out and wait for the
ambulance.”
George and I went out to the gate and I was trying to stop bawling and George wiped off my face
with his handkerchief and we were standing back a little ways while the crowd was going out of the
gate and a couple of guys stopped near us while we were waiting for the crowd to get through the gate
and one of them was counting a bunch of mutuel tickets and he said, “Well, Butler got his, all right.”
The other guy said, “I don’t give a good goddam if he did, the crook. He had it coming to him on
the stuff he’s pulled.”
“I’ll say he had,” said the other guy, and tore the bunch of tickets in two.
And George Gardner looked at me to see if I’d heard and I had all right and he said, “Don’t you
listen to what those bums said, Joe. Your old man was one swell guy.”
But I don’t know. Seems like when they get started they don’t leave a guy nothing.
CHAPTER XIV
Maera lay still his head on his arms, his face in the sand. He felt warm and sticky from the
bleeding. Each time he felt the horn coming. Sometimes the bull only bumped him with his head.
Once the horn went all the way through him and he felt it go into the sand. Some one had the bull
by the tail. They were swearing at him and flopping the cape in his face. Then the bull was gone.
Some men picked Maera up and started to run with him toward the barriers through the gate out
the passageway around under the grandstand to the infirmary. They laid Maera down on a cot and
one of the men went out for the doctor. The others stood around. The doctor came running from the
corral where he had been sewing up picador horses. He had to stop and wash his hands. There was
a great shouting going on in the grandstand overhead. Maera felt everything getting larger and
larger and then smaller and smaller. Then it got larger and larger and larger and then smaller
and smaller. Then everything commenced to run faster and faster as when they speed up a
cinematograph film. Then he was dead.
Big Two-Hearted River
Part I
THE TRAIN WENT ON UP THE TRACK OUT of sight, around one of
the hills of burnt timber. Nick sat down on the bundle of canvas and bedding the baggage man had
pitched out of the door of the baggage car. There was no town, nothing but the rails and the burnedover country. The thirteen saloons that had lined the one street of Seney had not left a trace. The
foundations of the Mansion House hotel stuck up above the ground. The stone was chipped and split
by the fire. It was all that was left of the town of Seney. Even the surface had been burned off the
ground.
Nick looked at the burned-over stretch of hillside, where he had expected to find the scattered
houses of the town and then walked down the railroad track to the bridge over the river. The river
was there. It swirled against the log spiles of the bridge. Nick looked down into the clear, brown
water, colored from the pebbly bottom, and watched the trout keeping themselves steady in the current
with wavering fins. As he watched them they changed their positions by quick angles, only to hold
steady in the fast water again. Nick watched them a long time.
He watched them holding themselves with their noses into the current, many trout in deep, fast
moving water, slightly distorted as he watched far down through the glassy convex surface of the
pool, its surface pushing and swelling smooth against the resistance of the log-driven piles of the
bridge. At the bottom of the pool were the big trout. Nick did not see them at first. Then he saw them
at the bottom of the pool, big trout looking to hold themselves on the gravel bottom in a varying mist
of gravel and sand, raised in spurts by the current.
Nick looked down into the pool from the bridge. It was a hot day. A kingfisher flew up the
stream. It was a long time since Nick had looked into a stream and seen trout. They were very
satisfactory. As the shadow of the kingfisher moved up the stream, a big trout shot upstream in a long
angle, only his shadow marking the angle, then lost his shadow as he came through the surface of the
water, caught the sun, and then, as he went back into the stream under the surface, his shadow seemed
to float down the stream with the current, unresisting, to his post under the bridge where he tightened
facing up into the current.
Nick’s heart tightened as the trout moved. He felt all the old feeling.
He turned and looked down the stream. It stretched away, pebbly-bottomed with shallows and
big boulders and a deep pool as it curved away around the foot of a bluff.
Nick walked back up the ties to where his pack lay in the cinders beside the railway track. He
was happy. He adjusted the pack harness around the bundle, pulling straps tight, slung the pack on his
back, got his arms through the shoulder straps and took some of the pull off his shoulders by leaning
his forehead against the wide band of the tump-line. Still, it was too heavy. It was much too heavy. He
had his leather rod-case in his hand and leaning forward to keep the weight of the pack high on his
shoulders he walked along the road that paralleled the railway track, leaving the burned town behind
in the heat, and then turned off around a hill with a high, fire-scarred hill on either side onto a road
that went back into the country. He walked along the road feeling the ache from the pull of the heavy
pack. The road climbed steadily. It was hard work walking up-hill. His muscles ached and the day
was hot, but Nick felt happy. He felt he had left everything behind, the need for thinking, the need to
write, other needs. It was all back of him.
From the time he had gotten down off the train and the baggage man had thrown his pack out of
the open car door things had been different. Seney was burned, the country was burned over and
changed, but it did not matter. It could not all be burned. He knew that. He hiked along the road,
sweating in the sun, climbing to cross the range of hills that separated the railway from the pine
plains.
The road ran on, dipping occasionally, but always climbing. Nick went on up. Finally the road
after going parallel to the burnt hillside reached the top. Nick leaned back against a stump and slipped
out of the pack harness. Ahead of him, as far as he could see, was the pine plain. The burned country
stopped off at the left with the range of hills. On ahead islands of dark pine trees rose out of the plain.
Far off to the left was the line of the river. Nick followed it with his eye and caught glints of the water
in the sun.
There was nothing but the pine plain ahead of him, until the far blue hills that marked the Lake
Superior height of land. He could hardly see them, faint and far away in the heat-light over the plain.
If he looked too steadily they were gone. But if he only half-looked they were there, the far-off hills of
the height of land.
Nick sat down against the charred stump and smoked a cigarette. His pack balanced on the top of
the stump, harness holding ready, a hollow molded in it from his back. Nick sat smoking, looking out
over the country. He did not need to get his map out. He knew where he was from the position of the
river.
As he smoked, his legs stretched out in front of him, he noticed a grasshopper walk along the
ground and up onto his woolen sock. The grasshopper was black. As he had walked along the road,
climbing, he had started many grasshoppers from the dust. They were all black. They were not the big
grasshoppers with yellow and black or red and black wings whirring out from their black wing
sheathing as they fly up. These were just ordinary hoppers, but all a sooty black in color. Nick had
wondered about them as he walked, without really thinking about them. Now, as he watched the black
hopper that was nibbling at the wool of his sock with its fourway lip, he realized that they had all
turned black from living in the burned-over land. He realized that the fire must have come the year
before, but the grasshoppers were all black now. He wondered how long they would stay that way.
Carefully he reached his hand down and took hold of the hopper by the wings. He turned him up,
all his legs walking in the air, and looked at his jointed belly. Yes, it was black too, iridescent where
the back and head were dusty.
“Go on, hopper,” Nick said, speaking out loud for the first time. “Fly away somewhere.”
He tossed the grasshopper up into the air and watched him sail away to a charcoal stump across
the road.
Nick stood up. He leaned his back against the weight of his pack where it rested upright on the
stump and got his arms through the shoulder straps. He stood with the pack on his back on the brow of
the hill looking out across the country toward the distant river and then struck down the hillside away
from the road. Underfoot the ground was good walking. Two hundred yards down the hillside the fire
line stopped. Then it was sweet fern, growing ankle high, to walk through, and clumps of jack pines; a
long undulating country with frequent rises and descents, sandy underfoot and the country alive again.
Nick kept his direction by the sun. He knew where he wanted to strike the river and he kept on
through the pine plain, mounting small rises to see other rises ahead of him and sometimes from the
top of a rise a great solid island of pines off to his right or his left. He broke off some sprigs of the
heathery sweet fern, and put them under his pack straps. The chafing crushed it and he smelled it as he
walked.
He was tired and very hot, walking across the uneven, shadeless pine plain. At any time he knew
he could strike the river by turning off to his left. It could not be more than a mile away. But he kept
on toward the north to hit the river as far upstream as he could go in one day’s walking.
For some time as he walked Nick had been in sight of one of the big islands of pine standing out
above the rolling high ground he was crossing. He dipped down and then as he came slowly up to the
crest of the bridge he turned and made toward the pine trees.
There was no underbrush in the island of pine trees. The trunks of the trees went straight up or
slanted toward each other. The trunks were straight and brown without branches. The branches were
high above. Some interlocked to make a solid shadow on the brown forest floor. Around the grove of
trees was a bare space. It was brown and soft underfoot as Nick walked on it. This was the overlapping of the pine needle floor, extending out beyond the width of the high branches. The trees had
grown tall and the branches moved high, leaving in the sun this bare space they had once covered with
shadow. Sharp at the edge of this extension of the forest floor commenced the sweet fern.
Nick slipped off his pack and lay down in the shade. He lay on his back and looked up into the
pine trees. His neck and back and the small of his back rested as he stretched. The earth felt good
against his back. He looked up at the sky, through the branches, and then shut his eyes. He opened
them and looked up again. There was a wind high up in the branches. He shut his eyes again and went
to sleep.
Nick woke stiff and cramped. The sun was nearly down. His pack was heavy and the straps
painful as he lifted it on. He leaned over with the pack on and picked up the leather rod-case and
started out from the pine trees across the sweet fern swale, toward the river. He knew it could not be
more than a mile.
He came down a hillside covered with stumps into a meadow. At the edge of the meadow
flowed the river. Nick was glad to get to the river. He walked upstream through the meadow. His
trousers were soaked with the dew as he walked. After the hot day, the dew had come quickly and
heavily. The river made no sound. It was too fast and smooth. At the edge of the meadow, before he
mounted to a piece of high ground to make camp, Nick looked down the river at the trout rising. They
were rising to insects come from the swamp on the other side of the stream when the sun went down.
The trout jumped out of water to take them. While Nick walked through the little stretch of meadow
alongside the stream, trout had jumped high out of water. Now as he looked down the river, the
insects must be settling on the surface, for the trout were feeding steadily all down the stream. As far
down the long stretch as he could see, the trout were rising, making circles all down the surface of the
water, as though it were starting to rain.
The ground rose, wooded and sandy, to overlook the meadow, the stretch of river and the
swamp. Nick dropped his pack and rod-case and looked for a level piece of ground. He was very
hungry and he wanted to make his camp before he cooked. Between two jack pines, the ground was
quite level. He took the ax out of the pack and chopped out two projecting roots. That leveled a piece
of ground large enough to sleep on. He smoothed out the sandy soil with his hand and pulled all the
sweet fern bushes by their roots. His hands smelled good from the sweet fern. He smoothed the
uprooted earth. He did not want anything making lumps under the blankets. When he had the ground
smooth, he spread his three blankets. One he folded double, next to the ground. The other two he
spread on top.
With the ax he slit off a bright slab of pine from one of the stumps and split it into pegs for the
tent. He wanted them long and solid to hold in the ground. With the tent unpacked and spread on the
ground, the pack, leaning against a jackpine, looked much smaller. Nick tied the rope that served the
tent for a ridge-pole to the trunk of one of the pine trees and pulled the tent up off the ground with the
other end of the rope and tied it to the other pine. The tent hung on the rope like a canvas blanket on a
clothesline. Nick poked a pole he had cut up under the back peak of the canvas and then made it a tent
by pegging out the sides. He pegged the sides out taut and drove the pegs deep, hitting them down into
the ground with the flat of the ax until the rope loops were buried and the canvas was drum tight.
Across the open mouth of the tent Nick fixed cheesecloth to keep out mosquitoes. He crawled
inside under the mosquito bar with various things from the pack to put at the head of the bed under the
slant of the canvas. Inside the tent the light came through the brown canvas. It smelled pleasantly of
canvas. Already there was something mysterious and homelike. Nick was happy as he crawled inside
the tent. He had not been unhappy all day. This was different though. Now things were done. There
had been this to do. Now it was done. It had been a hard trip. He was very tired. That was done. He
had made his camp. He was settled. Nothing could touch him. It was a good place to camp. He was
there, in the good place. He was in his home where he had made it. Now he was hungry.
He came out, crawling under the cheesecloth. It was quite dark outside. It was lighter in the tent.
Nick went over to the pack and found, with his fingers, a long nail in a paper sack of nails, in the
bottom of the pack. He drove it into the pine tree, holding it close and hitting it gently with the flat of
the ax. He hung the pack up on the nail. All his supplies were in the pack. They were off the ground
and sheltered now.
Nick was hungry. He did not believe he had ever been hungrier. He opened and emptied a can of
pork and beans and a can of spaghetti into the frying pan. “I’ve got a right to eat this kind of stuff, if
I’m willing to carry it,” Nick said. His voice sounded strange in the darkening woods. He did not
speak again.
He started a fire with some chunks of pine he got with the ax from a stump. Over the fire he stuck
a wire grill, pushing the four legs down into the ground with his boot. Nick put the frying pan on the
grill over the flames. He was hungrier. The beans and spaghetti warmed. Nick stirred them and mixed
them together. They began to bubble, making little bubbles that rose with difficulty to the surface.
There was a good smell. Nick got out a bottle of tomato catchup and cut four slices of bread. The
little bubbles were coming faster now. Nick sat down beside the fire and lifted the frying pan off. He
poured about half the contents out into the tin plate. It spread slowly on the plate. Nick knew it was
too hot. He poured on some tomato catchup. He knew the beans and spaghetti were still too hot. He
looked at the fire, then at the tent, he was not going to spoil it all by burning his tongue. For years he
had never enjoyed fried bananas because he had never been able to wait for them to cool. His tongue
was very sensitive. He was very hungry. Across the river in the swamp, in the almost dark, he saw a
mist rising. He looked at the tent once more. All right. He took a full spoonful from the plate.
“Chrise,” Nick said, “Geezus Chrise,” he said happily.
He ate the whole plateful before he remembered the bread. Nick finished the second plateful
with the bread, mopping the plate shiny. He had not eaten since a cup of coffee and a ham sandwich in
the station restaurant at St. Ignace. It had been a very fine experience. He had been that hungry before,
but had not been able to satisfy it. He could have made camp hours before if he had wanted to. There
were plenty of good places to camp on the river. But this was good.
Nick tucked two big chips of pine under the grill. The fire flared up. He had forgotten to get
water for the coffee. Out of the pack he got a folding canvas bucket and walked down the hill, across
the edge of the meadow, to the stream. The other bank was in the white mist. The grass was wet and
cold as he knelt on the bank and dipped the canvas bucket into the stream. It bellied and pulled hard in
the current. The water was ice cold. Nick rinsed the bucket and carried it full up to the camp. Up
away from the stream it was not so cold.
Nick drove another big nail and hung up the bucket full of water. He dipped the coffee pot half
full, put some more chips under the grill onto the fire and put the pot on. He could not remember
which way he made coffee. He could remember an argument about it with Hopkins, but not which side
he had taken. He decided to bring it to a boil. He remembered now that was Hopkins’s way. He had
once argued about everything with Hopkins. While he waited for the coffee to boil, he opened a small
can of apricots. He liked to open cans. He emptied the can of apricots out into a tin cup. While he
watched the coffee on the fire, he drank the juice syrup of the apricots, carefully at first to keep from
spilling, then meditatively, sucking the apricots down. They were better than fresh apricots.
The coffee boiled as he watched. The lid came up and coffee and grounds ran down the side of
the pot. Nick took it off the grill. It was a triumph for Hopkins. He put sugar in the empty apricot cup
and poured some of the coffee out to cool. It was too hot to pour and he used his hat to hold the handle
of the coffee pot. He would not let it steep in the pot at all. Not the first cup. It should be straight
Hopkins all the way. Hop deserved that. He was a very serious coffee drinker. He was the most
serious man Nick had ever known. Not heavy, serious. That was a long time ago. Hopkins spoke
without moving his lips. He had played polo. He made millions of dollars in Texas. He had borrowed
carfare to go to Chicago, when the wire came that his first big well had come in. He could have wired
for money. That would have been too slow. They called Hop’s girl the Blonde Venus. Hop did not
mind because she was not his real girl. Hopkins said very confidently that none of them would make
fun of his real girl. He was right. Hopkins went away when the telegram came. That was on the Black
River. It took eight days for the telegram to reach him. Hopkins gave away his .22 caliber Colt
automatic pistol to Nick. He gave his camera to Bill. It was to remember him always by. They were
all going fishing again next summer. The Hop Head was rich. He would get a yacht and they would all
cruise along the north shore of Lake Superior. He was excited but serious. They said good-bye and all
felt bad. It broke up the trip. They never saw Hopkins again. That was a long time ago on the Black
River.
Nick drank the coffee, the coffee according to Hopkins. The coffee was bitter. Nick laughed. It
made a good ending to the story. His mind was starting to work. He knew he could choke it because
he was tired enough. He spilled the coffee out of the pot and shook the grounds loose into the fire. He
lit a cigarette and went inside the tent. He took off his shoes and trousers, sitting on the blankets,
rolled the shoes up inside the trousers for a pillow and got in between the blankets.
Out through the front of the tent he watched the glow of the fire, when the night wind blew on it.
It was a quiet night. The swamp was perfectly quiet. Nick stretched under the blanket comfortably. A
mosquito hummed close to his ear. Nick sat up and lit a match. The mosquito was on the canvas, over
his head. Nick moved the match quickly up to it. The mosquito made a satisfactory hiss in the flame.
The match went out. Nick lay down again under the blanket. He turned on his side and shut his eyes.
He was sleepy. He felt sleep coming. He curled up under the blanket and went to sleep.
CHAPTER XV
They hanged Sam Cardinella at six o’clock in the morning in the corridor of the county jail. The
corridor was high and narrow with tiers of cells on either side. All the cells were occupied. The
men had been brought in for the hanging. Five men sentenced to be hanged were in the five top
cells. Three of the men to be hanged were negroes. They were very frightened. One of the white
men sat on his cot with his head in his hands. The other lay flat on his cot with a blanket wrapped
around his head.
They came out onto the gallows through a door in the wall. There were seven of them
including two priests. They were carrying Sam Cardinella. He had been like that since about four
o’clock in the morning.
While they were strapping his legs together two guards held him up and the two priests were
whispering to him. “Be a man, my son,” said one priest. When they came toward him with the cap
to go over his head Sam Cardinella lost control of his sphincter muscle. The guards who had been
holding him up both dropped him. They were both disgusted. “How about a chair, Will?” asked
one of the guards. “Better get one,” said a man in a derby hat.
When they all stepped back on the scaf olding back of the drop, which was very heavy, built of
oak and steel and swung on ball bearings, Sam Cardinella was left sitting there strapped tight, the
younger of the two priests kneeling beside the chair. The priest skipped back onto the scaf olding
just before the drop fell.
Big Two-Hearted River
Part II
IN THE MORNING THE SUN WAS UP AND the tent was starting to
get hot. Nick crawled out under the mosquito netting stretched across the mouth of the tent, to look at
the morning. The grass was wet on his hands as he came out. He held his trousers and his shoes in his
hands. The sun was just up over the hill. There was the meadow, the river and the swamp. There were
birch trees in the green of the swamp on the other side of the river.
The river was clear and smoothly fast in the early morning. Down about two hundred yards were
three logs all the way across the stream. They made the water smooth and deep above them. As Nick
watched, a mink crossed the river on the logs and went into the swamp. Nick was excited. He was
excited by the early morning and the river. He was really too hurried to eat breakfast, but he knew he
must. He built a little fire and put on the coffee pot.
While the water was heating in the pot he took an empty bottle and went down over the edge of
the high ground to the meadow. The meadow was wet with dew and Nick wanted to catch
grasshoppers for bait before the sun dried the grass. He found plenty of good grasshoppers. They
were at the base of the grass stems. Sometimes they clung to a grass stem. They were cold and wet
with the dew, and could not jump until the sun warmed them. Nick picked them up, taking only the
medium-sized brown ones, and put them into the bottle. He turned over a log and just under the shelter
of the edge were several hundred hoppers. It was a grasshopper lodging house. Nick put about fifty of
the medium browns into the bottle. While he was picking up the hoppers the others warmed in the sun
and commenced to hop away. They flew when they hopped. At first they made one flight and stayed
stiff when they landed, as though they were dead.
Nick knew that by the time he was through with breakfast they would be as lively as ever.
Without dew in the grass it would take him all day to catch a bottle full of good grasshoppers and he
would have to crush many of them, slamming at them with his hat. He washed his hands at the stream.
He was excited to be near it. Then he walked up to the tent. The hoppers were already jumping stiffly
in the grass. In the bottle, warmed by the sun, they were jumping in a mass. Nick put in a pine stick as
a cork. It plugged the mouth of the bottle enough, so the hoppers could not get out and left plenty of air
passage.
He had rolled the log back and knew he could get grasshoppers there every morning.
Nick laid the bottle full of jumping grasshoppers against a pine trunk. Rapidly he mixed some
buckwheat flour with water and stirred it smooth, one cup of flour, one cup of water. He put a handful
of coffee in the pot and dipped a lump of grease out of a can and slid it sputtering across the hot
skillet. On the smoking skillet he poured smoothly the buckwheat batter. It spread like lava, the grease
spitting sharply. Around the edges the buckwheat cake began to firm, then brown, then crisp. The
surface was bubbling slowly to porousness. Nick pushed under the browned under surface with a
fresh pine chip. He shook the skillet sideways and the cake was loose on the surface. I won’t try and
flop it, he thought. He slid the chip of clean wood all the way under the cake, and flopped it over onto
its face. It sputtered in the pan.
When it was cooked Nick regreased the skillet. He used all the batter. It made another big
flapjack and one smaller one.
Nick ate a big flapjack and a smaller one, covered with apple butter. He put apple butter on the
third cake, folded it over twice, wrapped it in oiled paper and put it in his shirt pocket. He put the
apple butter jar back in the pack and cut bread for two sandwiches.
In the pack he found a big onion. He sliced it in two and peeled the silky outer skin. Then he cut
one half into slices and made onion sandwiches. He wrapped them in oiled paper and buttoned them
in the other pocket of his khaki shirt. He turned the skillet upside down on the grill, drank the coffee,
sweetened and yellow brown with the condensed milk in it, and tidied up the camp. It was a good
camp.
Nick took his fly rod out of the leather rod-case, jointed it, and shoved the rod-case back into the
tent. He put on the reel and threaded the line through the guides. He had to hold it from hand to hand,
as he threaded it, or it would slip back through its own weight. It was a heavy, double tapered fly
line. Nick had paid eight dollars for it a long time ago. It was made heavy to lift back in the air and
come forward flat and heavy and straight to make it possible to cast a fly which has no weight. Nick
opened the aluminum leader box. The leaders were coiled between the damp flannel pads. Nick had
wet the pads at the water cooler on the train up to St. Ignace. In the damp pads the gut leaders had
softened and Nick unrolled one and tied it by a loop at the end to the heavy fly line. He fastened a
hook on the end of the leader. It was a small hook; very thin and springy.
Nick took it from his hook book, sitting with the rod across his lap. He tested the knot and the
spring of the rod by pulling the line taut. It was a good feeling. He was careful not to let the hook bite
into his finger.
He started down to the stream, holding his rod, the bottle of grasshoppers hung from his neck by
a thong tied in half hitches around the neck of the bottle. His landing net hung by a hook from his belt.
Over his shoulder was a long flour sack tied at each corner into an ear. The cord went over his
shoulder. The sack flapped against his legs.
Nick felt awkward and professionally happy with all his equipment hanging from him. The
grasshopper bottle swung against his chest. In his shirt the breast pockets bulged against him with the
lunch and his fly book.
He stepped into the stream. It was a shock. His trousers clung tight to his legs. His shoes felt the
gravel. The water was a rising cold shock.
Rushing, the current sucked against his legs. Where he stepped in, the water was over his knees.
He waded with the current. The gravel slid under his shoes. He looked down at the swirl of water
below each leg and tipped up the bottle to get a grasshopper.
The first grasshopper gave a jump in the neck of the bottle and went out into the water. He was
sucked under in the whirl by Nick’s right leg and came to the surface a little way down stream. He
floated rapidly, kicking. In a quick circle, breaking the smooth surface of the water, he disappeared. A
trout had taken him.
Another hopper poked his face out of the bottle. His antennæ wavered. He was getting his front
legs out of the bottle to jump. Nick took him by the head and held him while he threaded the slim hook
under his chin, down through his thorax and into the last segments of his abdomen. The grasshopper
took hold of the hook with his front feel, spitting tobacco juice on it. Nick dropped him into the water.
Holding the rod in his right hand he let out line against the pull of the grasshopper in the current.
He stripped off line from the reel with his left hand and let it run free. He could see the hopper in the
little waves of the current. It went out of sight.
There was a tug on the line. Nick pulled against the taut line. It was his first strike. Holding the
now living rod across the current, he brought in the line with his left hand. The rod bent in jerks, the
trout pumping against the current. Nick knew it was a small one. He lifted the rod straight up in the
air. It bowed with the pull.
He saw the trout in the water jerking with his head and body against the shifting tangent of the
line in the stream.
Nick took the line in his left hand and pulled the trout, thumping tiredly against the current, to the
surface. His back was mottled the clear, water-over-gravel color, his side flashing in the sun. The rod
under his right arm, Nick stooped, dipping his right hand into the current. He held the trout, never still,
with his moist right hand, while he unhooked the barb from his mouth, then dropped him back into the
stream.
He hung unsteadily in the current, then settled to the bottom beside a stone. Nick reached down
his hand to touch him, his arm to the elbow under water. The trout was steady in the moving stream,
resting on the gravel, beside a stone. As Nick’s fingers touched him, touched his smooth, cool,
underwater feeling he was gone, gone in a shadow across the bottom of the stream.
He’s all right, Nick thought. He was only tired.
He had wet his hand before he touched the trout, so he would not disturb the delicate mucus that
covered him. If a trout was touched with a dry hand, a white fungus attacked the unprotected spot.
Years before when he had fished crowded streams, with fly fishermen ahead of him and behind him,
Nick had again and again come on dead trout, furry with white fungus, drifted against a rock, or
floating belly up in some pool. Nick did not like to fish with other men on the river. Unless they were
of your party, they spoiled it.
He wallowed down the stream, above his knees in the current, through the fifty yards of shallow
water above the pile of logs that crossed the stream. He did not rebait his hook and held it in his hand
as he waded. He was certain he could catch small trout in the shallows, but he did not want them.
There would be no big trout in the shallows this time of day.
Now the water deepened up his thighs sharply and coldly. Ahead was the smooth dammed-back
flood of water above the logs. The water was smooth and dark; on the left, the lower edge of the
meadow; on the right the swamp.
Nick leaned back against the current and took a hopper from the bottle. He threaded the hopper
on the hook and spat on him for good luck. Then he pulled several yards of line from the reel and
tossed the hopper out ahead onto the fast, dark water. It floated down towards the logs, then the
weight of the line pulled the bait under the surface. Nick held the rod in his right hand, letting the line
run out through his fingers.
There was a long tug. Nick struck and the rod came alive and dangerous, bent double, the line
tightening, coming out of water, tightening, all in a heavy, dangerous, steady pull. Nick felt the moment
when the leader would break if the strain increased and let the line go.
The reel ratcheted into a mechanical shriek as the line went out in a rush. Too fast. Nick could
not check it, the line rushing out, the reel note rising as the line ran out.
With the core of the reel showing, his heart feeling stopped with the excitement, leaning back
against the current that mounted icily his thighs, Nick thumbed the reel hard with his left hand. It was
awkward getting his thumb inside the fly reel frame.
As he put on pressure the line tightened into sudden hardness and beyond the logs a huge trout
went high out of water. As he jumped, Nick lowered the tip of the rod. But he felt, as he dropped the
tip to ease the strain, the moment when the strain was too great; the hardness too tight. Of course, the
leader had broken. There was no mistaking the feeling when all spring left the line and it became dry
and hard. Then it went slack.
His mouth dry, his heart down, Nick reeled in. He had never seen so big a trout. There was a
heaviness, a power not to be held, and then the bulk of him, as he jumped. He looked as broad as a
salmon.
Nick’s hand was shaky. He reeled in slowly. The thrill had been too much. He felt, vaguely, a
little sick, as though it would be better to sit down.
The leader had broken where the hook was tied to it. Nick took it in his hand. He thought of the
trout somewhere on the bottom, holding himself steady over the gravel, far down below the light,
under the logs, with the hook in his jaw. Nick knew the trout’s teeth would cut through the snell of the
hook. The hook would imbed itself in his jaw. He’d bet the trout was angry. Anything that size would
be angry. That was a trout. He had been solidly hooked. Solid as a rock. He felt like a rock, too,
before he started off. By God, he was a big one. By God, he was the biggest one I ever heard of.
Nick climbed out onto the meadow and stood, water running down his trousers and out of his
shoes, his shoes squelchy. He went over and sat on the logs. He did not want to rush his sensations
any.
He wriggled his toes in the water, in his shoes, and got out a cigarette from his breast pocket. He
lit it and tossed the match into the fast water below the logs. A tiny trout rose at the match, as it swung
around in the fast current. Nick laughed. He would finish the cigarette.
He sat on the logs, smoking, drying in the sun, the sun warm on his back, the river shallow ahead
entering the woods, curving into the woods, shallows, light glittering, big water-smooth rocks, cedars
along the bank and white birches, the logs warm in the sun, smooth to sit on, without bark, gray to the
touch; slowly the feeling of disappointment left him. It went away slowly, the feeling of
disappointment that came sharply after the thrill that made his shoulders ache. It was all right now.
His rod lying out on the logs, Nick tied a new hook on the leader, pulling the gut tight until it grimped
into itself in a hard knot.
He baited up, then picked up the rod and walked to the far end of the logs to get into the water,
where it was not too deep. Under and beyond the logs was a deep pool. Nick walked around the
shallow shelf near the swamp shore until he came out on the shallow bed of the stream.
On the left, where the meadow ended and the woods began, a great elm tree was uprooted. Gone
over in a storm, it lay back into the woods, its roots clotted with dirt, grass growing in them, rising a
solid bank beside the stream. The river cut to the edge of the uprooted tree. From where Nick stood
he could see deep channels, like ruts, cut in the shallow bed of the stream by the flow of the current.
Pebbly where he stood and pebbly and full of boulders beyond; where it curved near the tree roots,
the bed of the stream was marly and between the ruts of deep water green weed fronds swung in the
current.
Nick swung the rod back over his shoulder and forward, and the line, curving forward, laid the
grasshopper down on one of the deep channels in the weeds. A trout struck and Nick hooked him.
Holding the rod far out toward the uprooted tree and sloshing backward in the current, Nick
worked the trout, plunging, the rod bending alive, out of the danger of the weeds into the open river.
Holding the rod, pumping alive against the current, Nick brought the trout in. He rushed, but always
came, the spring of the rod yielding to the rushes, sometimes jerking under water, but always bringing
him in. Nick eased downstream with the rushes. The rod above his head he led the trout over the net,
then lifted.
The trout hung heavy in the net, mottled trout back and silver sides in the meshes. Nick unhooked
him; heavy sides, good to hold, big undershot jaw, and slipped him, heaving and big sliding, into the
long sack that hung from his shoulders in the water.
Nick spread the mouth of the sack against the current and it filled, heavy with water. He held it
up, the bottom in the stream, and the water poured out through the sides. Inside at the bottom was the
big trout, alive in the water.
Nick moved downstream. The sack out ahead of him sunk heavy in the water, pulling from his
shoulders.
It was getting hot, the sun hot on the back of his neck.
Nick had one good trout. He did not care about getting many trout. Now the stream was shallow
and wide. There were trees along both banks. The trees of the left bank made short shadows on the
current in the forenoon sun. Nick knew there were trout in each shadow. In the afternoon, after the sun
had crossed toward the hills, the trout would be in the cool shadows on the other side of the stream.
The very biggest ones would lie up close to the bank. You could always pick them up there on
the Black. When the sun was down they all moved out into the current. Just when the sun made the
water blinding in the glare before it went down, you were liable to strike a big trout anywhere in the
current. It was almost impossible to fish then, the surface of the water was blinding as a mirror in the
sun. Of course, you could fish upstream, but in a stream like the Black, or this, you had to wallow
against the current and in a deep place, the water piled up on you. It was no fun to fish upstream with
this much current.
Nick moved along through the shallow stretch watching the banks for deep holes. A beech tree
grew close beside the river, so that the branches hung down into the water. The stream went back in
under the leaves. There were always trout in a place like that.
Nick did not care about fishing that hole. He was sure he would get hooked in the branches.
It looked deep though. He dropped the grasshopper so the current took it under water, back in
under the overhanging branch. The line pulled hard and Nick struck. The trout threshed heavily, half
out of water in the leaves and branches. The line was caught. Nick pulled hard and the trout was off.
He reeled in and holding the hook in his hand, walked down the stream.
Ahead, close to the left bank, was a big log. Nick saw it was hollow; pointing up river the
current entered it smoothly, only a little ripple spread each side of the log. The water was deepening.
The top of the hollow log was gray and dry. It was partly in the shadow.
Nick took the cork out of the grasshopper bottle and a hopper clung to it. He picked him off,
hooked him and tossed him out. He held the rod far out so that the hopper on the water moved into the
current flowing into the hollow log. Nick lowered the rod and the hopper floated in. There was a
heavy strike. Nick swung the rod against the pull. It felt as though he were hooked into the log itself,
except for the live feeling.
He tried to force the fish out into the current. It came, heavily.
The line went slack and Nick thought the trout was gone. Then he saw him, very near, in the
current, shaking his head, trying to get the hook out. His mouth was clamped shut. He was fighting the
hook in the clear flowing current.
Looping in the line with his left hand, Nick swung the rod to make the line taut and tried to lead
the trout toward the net, but he was gone, out of sight, the line pumping. Nick fought him against the
current, letting him thump in the water against the spring of the rod. He shifted the rod to his left hand,
worked the trout upstream, holding his weight, fighting on the rod, and then let him down into the net.
He lifted him clear of the water, a heavy half circle in the net, the net dripping, unhooked him and slid
him into the sack.
He spread the mouth of the sack and looked down in at the two big trout alive in the water.
Through the deepening water, Nick waded over to the hollow log. He took the sack off, over his
head, the trout flopping as it came out of water, and hung it so the trout were deep in the water. Then
he pulled himself up on the log and sat, the water from his trouser and boots running down into the
stream. He laid his rod down, moved along to the shady end of the log and took the sandwiches out of
his pocket. He dipped the sandwiches in the cold water. The current carried away the crumbs. He ate
the sandwiches and dipped his hat full of water to drink, the water running out through his hat just
ahead of his drinking.
It was cool in the shade, sitting on the log. He took a cigarette out and struck a match to light it.
The match sunk into the gray wood, making a tiny furrow. Nick leaned over the side of the log, found
a hard place and lit the match. He sat smoking and watching the river.
Ahead the river narrowed and went into a swamp. The river became smooth and deep and the
swamp looked solid with cedar trees, their trunks close together, their branches solid. It would not be
possible to walk through a swamp like that. The branches grew so low. You would have to keep
almost level with the ground to move at all. You could not crash through the branches. That must be
why the animals that lived in swamps were built the way they were, Nick thought.
He wished he had brought something to read. He felt like reading. He did not feel like going on
into the swamp. He looked down the river. A big cedar slanted all the way across the stream. Beyond
that the river went into the swamp.
Nick did not want to go in there now. He felt a reaction against deep wading with the water
deepening up under his armpits, to hook big trout in places impossible to land them. In the swamp the
banks were bare, the big cedars came together overhead, the sun did not come through, except in
patches; in the fast deep water, in the half light, the fishing would be tragic. In the swamp fishing was
a tragic adventure. Nick did not want it. He did not want to go down the stream any further today.
He took out his knife, opened it and stuck it in the log. Then he pulled up the sack, reached into it
and brought out one of the trout. Holding him near the tail, hard to hold, alive, in his hand, he whacked
him against the log. The trout quivered, rigid. Nick laid him on the log in the shade and broke the neck
of the other fish the same way. He laid them side by side on the log. They were fine trout.
Nick cleaned them, slitting them from the vent to the tip of the jaw. All the insides and the gills
and tongue came out in one piece. They were both males; long gray-white strips of milt, smooth and
clean. All the insides clean and compact, coming out all together. Nick tossed the offal ashore for the
minks to find.
He washed the trout in the stream. When he held them back up in the water they looked like live
fish. Their color was not gone yet. He washed his hands and dried them on the log. Then he laid the
trout on the sack spread out on the log, rolled them up in it, tied the bundle and put it in the landing
net. His knife was still standing, blade stuck in the log. He cleaned it on the wood and put it in his
pocket.
Nick stood up on the log, holding his rod, the landing net hanging heavy, then stepped into the
water and splashed ashore. He climbed the bank and cut up into the woods, toward the high ground.
He was going back to camp. He looked back. The river just showed through the trees. There were
plenty of days coming when he could fish the swamp.
L’ENVOI
The king was working in the garden. He seemed very glad to see me. We walked through the
garden. This is the queen, he said. She was clipping a rose bush. Oh how do you do, she said. We
sat down at a table under a big tree and the king ordered whiskey and soda. We have good whiskey
anyway, he said. The revolutionary committee, he told me, would not allow him to go outside the
palace grounds. Plastiras is a very good man I believe, he said, but frightfully dif icult. I think he
did right though shooting those chaps. If Kerensky had shot a few men things might have been
altogether dif erent. Of course the great thing in this sort of an af air is not to be shot oneself!
It was very jolly. We talked for a long time. Like all Greeks he wanted to go to America.
The Undefeated
MANUEL GARCIA CLIMBED THE STAIRS to Don Miguel
Retana’s office. He set down his suitcase and knocked on the door. There was no answer. Manuel,
standing in the hallway, felt there was someone in the room. He felt it through the door.
“Retana,” he said, listening.
There was no answer.
He’s there, all right, Manuel thought.
“Retana,” he said and banged the door.
“Who’s there?” said someone in the office.
“Me, Manolo,” Manuel said.
“What do you want?” asked the voice.
“I want to work,” Manuel said.
Something in the door clicked several times and it swung open. Manuel went in, carrying his
suitcase.
A little man sat behind a desk at the far side of the room. Over his head was a bull’s head,
stuffed by a Madrid taxidermist; on the walls were framed photographs and bull-fight posters.
The little man sat looking at Manuel.
“I thought they’d killed you,” he said.
Manuel knocked with his knuckles on the desk. The little man sat looking at him across the desk.
“How many corridas you had this year?” Retana asked.
“One,” he answered.
“Just that one?” the little man asked.
“That’s all.”
“I read about it in the papers,” Retana said. He leaned back in the chair and looked at Manuel.
Manuel looked up at the stuffed bull. He had seen it often before. He felt a certain family interest
in it. It had killed his brother, the promising one, about nine years ago. Manuel remembered the day.
There was a brass plate on the oak shield the bull’s head was mounted on. Manuel could not read it,
but he imagined it was in memory of his brother. Well, he had been a good kid.
The plate said: “The Bull ‘Mariposa’ of the Duke of Veragua, which accepted 9 varas for 7
caballos, and caused the death of Antonio Garcia, Novillero, April 27, 1909.”
Retana saw him looking at the stuffed bull’s head.
“The lot the Duke sent me for Sunday will make a scandal,” he said. “They’re all bad in the legs.
What do they say about them at the Café?”
“I don’t know,” Manuel said. “I just got in.”
“Yes,” Retana said. “You still have your bag.”
He looked at Manuel, leaning back behind the big desk.
“Sit down,” he said. “Take off your cap.”
Manuel sat down; his cap off, his face was changed. He looked pale, and his coleta pinned
forward on his head, so that it would not show under the cap, gave him a strange look.
“You don’t look well,” Retana said.
“I just got out of the hospital,” Manuel said.
“I heard they’d cut your leg off,” Retana said.
“No,” said Manuel. “It got all right.”
Retana leaned forward across the desk and pushed a wooden box of cigarettes toward Manuel.
“Have a cigarette,” he said.
“Thanks.”
Manuel lit it.
“Smoke?” he said, offering the match to Retana.
“No,” Retana waved his hand, “I never smoke.”
Retana watched him smoking.
“Why don’t you get a job and go to work?” he said.
“I don’t want to work,” Manuel said. “I am a bullfighter.”
“There aren’t any bullfighters any more,” Retana said.
“I’m a bullfighter,” Manuel said.
“Yes, while you’re in there,” Retana said.
Manuel laughed.
Retana sat, saying nothing and looking at Manuel.
“I’ll put you in a nocturnal if you want,” Retana offered.
“When?” Manuel asked.
“Tomorrow night.”
“I don’t like to substitute for anybody,” Manuel said. That was the way they all got killed. That
was the way Salvador got killed. He tapped with his knuckles on the table.
“It’s all I’ve got,” Retana said.
“Why don’t you put me on next week?” Manuel suggested.
“You wouldn’t draw,” Retana said. “All they want is Litri and Rubito and La Torre. Those kids
are good.”
“They’d come to see me get it,” Manuel said, hopefully.
“No, they wouldn’t. They don’t know who you are any more.”
“I’ve got a lot of stuff,” Manuel said.
“I’m offering to put you on tomorrow night,” Retana said. “You can work with young Hernandez
and kill two novillos after the Charlots.”
“Whose novillos?” Manuel asked.
“I don’t know. Whatever stuff they’ve got in the corrals. What the veterinaries won’t pass in the
daytime.”
“I don’t like to substitute,” Manuel said.
“You can take it or leave it,” Retana said. He leaned forward over the papers. He was no longer
interested. The appeal that Manuel had made to him for a moment when he thought of the old days was
gone. He would like to get him to substitute for Larita because he could get him cheaply. He could get
others cheaply too. He would like to help him though. Still he had given him the chance. It was up to
him.
“How much do I get?” Manuel asked. He was still playing with the idea of refusing. But he knew
he could not refuse.
“Two hundred and fifty pesetas,” Retana said. He had thought of five hundred, but when he
opened his mouth it said two hundred and fifty.
“You pay Villalta seven thousand,” Manuel said.
“You’re not Villalta,” Retana said.
“I know it,” Manuel said.
“He draws it, Manolo,” Retana said in explanation.
“Sure,” said Manuel. He stood up. “Give me three hundred, Retana.”
“All right,” Retana agreed. He reached in the drawer for a paper.
“Can I have fifty now?” Manuel asked.
“Sure,” said Retana. He took a fifty-peseta note out of his pocket-book and laid it, spread out
flat, on the table.
Manuel picked it up and put it in his pocket.
“What about a cuadrilla?” he asked.
“There’s the boys that always work for me nights,” Retana said. “They’re all right.”
“How about picadors?” Manuel asked.
“They’re not much,” Retana admitted.
“I’ve got to have one good pic,” Manuel said.
“Get him then,” Retana said. “Go and get him.”
“Not out of this,” Manuel said. “I’m not paying for any cuadrilla out of sixty duros.”
Retana said nothing but looked at Manuel across the big desk.
“You know I’ve got to have one good pic,” Manuel said.
Retana said nothing but looked at Manuel from a long way off.
“It isn’t right,” Manuel said.
Retana was still considering him, leaning back in his chair, considering him from a long way
away.
“There’re the regular pics,” he offered.
“I know,” Manuel said. “I know your regular pics.”
Retana did not smile. Manuel knew it was over.
“All I want is an even break,” Manuel said reasoningly. “When I go out there I want to be able to
call my shots on the bull. It only takes one good picador.”
He was talking to a man who was no longer listening.
“If you want something extra,” Retana said, “go and get it. There will be a regular cuadrilla out
there. Bring as many of your own pics as you want. The charlotada is over by 10.30.”
“All right,” Manuel said. “If that’s the way you feel about it.”
“That’s the way,” Retana said.
“I’ll see you tomorrow night,” Manuel said.
“I’ll be out there,” Retana said.
Manuel picked up his suitcase and went out.
“Shut the door,” Retana called.
Manuel looked back. Retana was sitting forward looking at some papers. Manuel pulled the door
tight until it clicked.
He went down the stairs and out of the door into the hot brightness of the street. It was very hot
in the street and the light on the white buildings was sudden and hard on his eyes. He walked down
the shady side of the steep street toward the Puerta del Sol. The shade felt solid and cool as running
water. The heat came suddenly as he crossed the intersecting streets. Manuel saw no one he knew in
all the people he passed.
Just before the Puerta del Sol he turned into a café.
It was quiet in the café. There were a few men sitting at tables against the wall. At one table four
men played cards. Most of the men sat against the wall smoking, empty coffee-cups and liqueurglasses before them on the tables. Manuel went through the long room to a small room in back. A man
sat at a table in the corner asleep. Manuel sat down at one of the tables.
A waiter came in and stood beside Manuel’s table.
“Have you seen Zurito?” Manuel asked him.
“He was in before lunch,” the waiter answered. “He won’t be back before five o’clock.”
“Bring me some coffee and milk and a shot of the ordinary,” Manuel said.
The waiter came back into the room carrying a tray with a big coffee-glass and a liqueur-glass
on it. In his left hand he held a bottle of brandy. He swung these down to the table and a boy who had
followed him poured coffee and milk into the glass from two shiny, spouted pots with long handles.
Manuel took off his cap and the waiter noticed his pigtail pinned forward on his head. He
winked at the coffee-boy as he poured out the brandy into the little glass beside Manuel’s coffee. The
coffee-boy looked at Manuel’s pale face curiously.
“You fighting here?” asked the waiter, corking up the bottle.
“Yes,” Manuel said. “Tomorrow.”
The waiter stood there, holding the bottle on one hip.
“You in the Charlie Chaplins?” he asked.
The coffee-boy looked away, embarrassed.
“No. In the ordinary.”
“I thought they were going to have Chaves and Hernandez,” the waiter said.
“No. Me and another.”
“Who? Chaves or Hernandez?”
“Hernandez, I think.”
“What’s the matter with Chaves?”
“He got hurt.”
“Where did you hear that?”
“Retana.”
“Hey, Looie,” the waiter called to the next room, “Chaves got cogida.”
Manuel had taken the wrapper off the lumps of sugar and dropped them into his coffee. He
stirred it and drank it down, sweet, hot, and warming in his empty stomach. He drank off the brandy.
“Give me another shot of that,” he said to the waiter.
The waiter uncorked the bottle and poured the glass full, slopping another drink into the saucer.
Another waiter had come up in front of the table. The coffee-boy was gone.
“Is Chaves hurt bad?” the second waiter asked Manuel.
“I don’t know,” Manuel said, “Retana didn’t say.”
“A hell of a lot he cares,” the tall waiter said. Manuel had not seen him before. He must have
just come up.
“If you stand in with Retana in this town, you’re a made man,” the tall waiter said. “If you aren’t
in with him, you might just as well go out and shoot yourself.”
“You said it,” the other waiter who had come in said. “You said it then.”
“You’re right I said it,” said the tall waiter. “I know what I’m talking about when I talk about
that bird.”
“Look what he’s done for Villalta,” the first waiter said.
“And that ain’t all,” the tall waiter said. “Look what he’s done for Marcial Lalanda. Look what
he’s done for Nacional.”
“You said it, kid,” agreed the short waiter.
Manuel looked at them, standing talking in front of his table. He had drunk his second brandy.
They had forgotten about him. They were not interested in him.
“Look at that bunch of camels,” the tall waiter went on. “Did you ever see this Nacional II?”
“I seen him last Sunday, didn’t I?” the original waiter said.
“He’s a giraffe,” the short waiter said.
“What did I tell you?” the tall waiter said. “Those are Retana’s boys.”
“Say, give me another shot of that,” Manuel said. He had poured the brandy the waiter had
slopped over in the saucer into his glass and drank it while they were talking.
The original waiter poured his glass full mechanically, and the three of them went out of the
room talking.
In the far corner the man was still asleep, snoring slightly on the intaking breath, his head back
against the wall.
Manuel drank his brandy. He felt sleepy himself. It was too hot to go out into the town. Besides
there was nothing to do. He wanted to see Zurito. He would go to sleep while he waited. He kicked
his suitcase under the table to be sure it was there. Perhaps it would be better to put it back under the
seat, against the wall. He leaned down and shoved it under. Then he leaned forward on the table and
went to sleep.
When he woke there was someone sitting across the table from him. It was a big man with a
heavy brown face like an Indian. He had been sitting there some time. He had waved the waiter away
and sat reading the paper and occasionally looking down at Manuel, asleep, his head on the table. He
read the paper laboriously, forming the words with his lips as he read. When it tired him he looked at
Manuel. He sat heavily in the chair, his black Cordoba hat tipped forward.
Manuel sat up and looked at him.
“Hello, Zurito,” he said.
“Hello, kid,” the big man said.
“I’ve been asleep.” Manuel rubbed his forehead with the back of his fist.
“I thought maybe you were.”
“How’s everything?”
“Good. How is everything with you?”
“Not so good.”
They were both silent. Zurito, the picador, looked at Manuel’s white face. Manuel looked down
at the picador’s enormous hands folding the paper to put away in his pocket.
“I got a favor to ask you, Manos,” Manuel said.
Manosduros was Zurito’s nickname. He never heard it without thinking of his huge hands. He put
them forward on the table self-consciously.
“Let’s have a drink,” he said.
“Sure,” said Manuel.
The waiter came and went and came again. He went out of the room looking back at the two men
at the table.
“What’s the matter, Manolo?” Zurito set down his glass.
“Would you pic two bulls for me tomorrow night?” Manuel asked, looking up at Zurito across
the table.
“No,” said Zurito. “I’m not pic-ing.”
Manuel looked down at his glass. He had expected that answer; now he had it. Well, he had it.
“I’m sorry, Manolo, but I’m not pic-ing.” Zurito looked at his hands.
“That’s all right,” Manuel said.
“I’m too old,” Zurito said.
“I just asked you,” Manuel said.
“Is it the nocturnal tomorrow?”
“That’s it. I figured if I had just one good pic, I could get away with it.”
“How much are you getting?”
“Three hundred pesetas.”
“I get more than that for pic-ing.”
“I know,” said Manuel. “I didn’t have any right to ask you.”
“What do you keep on doing it for?” Zurito asked. “Why don’t you cut off your coleta, Manolo?”
“I don’t know,” Manuel said.
“You’re pretty near as old as I am,” Zurito said.
“I don’t know,” Manuel said. “I got to do it. If I can fix it so that I get an even break, that’s all I
want. I got to stick with it, Manos.”
“No, you don’t.”
“Yes, I do. I’ve tried keeping away from it.”
“I know how you feel. But it isn’t right. You ought to get out and stay out.”
“I can’t do it. Besides, I’ve been going good lately.”
Zurito looked at his face.
“You’ve been in the hospital.”
“But I was going great when I got hurt.”
Zurito said nothing. He tipped the cognac out of his saucer into his glass.
“The papers said they never saw a better faena,” Manuel said.
Zurito looked at him.
“You know when I get going I’m good,” Manuel said.
“You’re too old,” the picador said.
“No,” said Manuel. “You’re ten years older than I am.”
“With me it’s different.”
“I’m not too old,” Manuel said.
They sat silent, Manuel watching the picador’s face.
“I was going great till I got hurt,” Manuel offered.
“You ought to have seen me, Manos,” Manuel said, reproachfully.
“I don’t want to see you,” Zurito said. “It makes me nervous.”
“You haven’t seen me lately.”
“I’ve seen you plenty.”
Zurito looked at Manuel, avoiding his eyes.
“You ought to quit it, Manolo.”
“I can’t,” Manuel said. “I’m going good now, I tell you.”
Zurito leaned forward, his hands on the table.
“Listen. I’ll pic for you and if you don’t go big tomorrow night, you’ll quit. See? Will you do
that?”
“Sure.”
Zurito leaned back, relieved.
“You got to quit,” he said. “No monkey business. You got to cut the coleta.”
“I won’t have to quit,” Manuel said. “You watch me. I’ve got the stuff.”
Zurito stood up. He felt tired from arguing.
“You got to quit,” he said. “I’ll cut your coleta myself.”
“No, you won’t,” Manuel said. “You won’t have a chance.”
Zurito called the waiter.
“Come on,” said Zurito. “Come on up to the house.”
Manuel reached under the seat for his suitcase. He was happy. He knew Zurito would pic for
him. He was the best picador living. It was all simple now.
“Come on up to the house and we’ll eat,” Zurito said.
Manuel stood in the patio de caballos waiting for the Charlie Chaplins to be over. Zurito stood
beside him. Where they stood it was dark. The high door that led into the bull-ring was shut. Above
them they heard a shout, then another shout of laughter. Then there was silence. Manuel liked the smell
of the stables about the patio de caballos. It smelt good in the dark. There was another roar from the
arena and then applause, prolonged applause, going on and on.
“You ever seen these fellows?” Zurito asked, big and looming beside Manuel in the dark.
“No,” Manuel said.
“They’re pretty funny,” Zurito said. He smiled to himself in the dark.
The high, double, tight-fitting door into the bull-ring swung open and Manuel saw the ring in the
hard light of the arc-lights, the plaza, dark all the way around, rising high; around the edge of the ring
were running and bowing two men dressed like tramps, followed by a third in the uniform of a hotel
bell-boy who stooped and picked up the hats and canes thrown down onto the sand and tossed them
back up into the darkness.
The electric light went on in the patio.
“I’ll climb onto one of those ponies while you collect the kids,” Zurito said.
Behind them came the jingle of the mules, coming out to go into the arena and be hitched onto the
dead bull.
The members of the cuadrilla, who had been watching the burlesque from the runway between
the barrera and the seals, came walking back and stood in a group talking, under the electric light in
the patio. A good-looking lad in a silver-and-orange suit came up to Manuel and smiled.
“I’m Hernandez,” he said and put out his hand.
Manuel shook it.
“They’re regular elephants we’ve got tonight,” the boy said cheerfully.
“They’re big ones with horns,” Manuel agreed.
“You drew the worst lot,” the boy said.
“That’s all right,” Manuel said. “The bigger they are, the more meat for the poor.”
“Where did you get that one?” Hernandez grinned.
“That’s an old one,” Manuel said. “You line up your cuadrilla, so I can see what I’ve got.”
“You’ve got some good kids,” Hernandez said. He was very cheerful. He had been on twice
before in nocturnals and was beginning to get a following in Madrid. He was happy the fight would
start in a few minutes.
“Where are the pics?” Manuel asked.
“They’re back in the corrals fighting about who gets the beautiful horses,” Hernandez grinned.
The mules came through the gate in a rush, the whips snapping, bells jangling and the young bull
ploughing a furrow of sand.
They formed up for the paseo as soon as the bull had gone through.
Manuel and Hernandez stood in front. The youths of the cuadrillas were behind, their heavy
capes furled over their arms. In back, the four picadors, mounted, holding their steel-tipped pushpoles erect in the half-dark of the corral.
“It’s a wonder Retana wouldn’t give us enough light to see the horses by,” one picador said.
He knows we’ll be happier if we don’t get too good a look at these skins,” another pic
answered.
“This thing I’m on barely keeps me off the ground,” the first picador said.
“Well, they’re horses.”
“Sure, they’re horses.”
They talked, sitting their gaunt horses in the dark.
Zurito said nothing. He had the only steady horse of the lot. He had tried him, wheeling him in
the corrals and he responded to the bit and the spurs. He had taken the bandage off his right eye and
cut the strings where they had tied his ears tight shut at the base. He was a good, solid horse, solid on
his legs. That was all he needed. He intended to ride him all through the corrida. He had already,
since he had mounted, sitting in the half-dark in the big, quilted saddle, waiting for the paseo, pic-ed
through the whole corrida in his mind. The other picadors went on talking on both sides of him. He
did not hear them.
The two matadors stood together in front of their three peones, their capes furled over their left
arms in the same fashion. Manuel was thinking about the three lads in back of him. They were all
three Madrileños, like Hernandez, boys about nineteen. One of them, a gypsy, serious, aloof, and
dark-faced, he liked the look of. He turned.
“What’s your name, kid?” he asked the gypsy.
“Fuentes,” the gypsy said.
“That’s a good name,” Manuel said.
The gypsy smiled, showing his teeth.
“You take the bull and give him a little run when he comes out,” Manuel said.
“All right,” the gypsy said. His face was serious. He began to think about just what he would do.
“Here she goes,” Manuel said to Hernandez.
“All right. We’ll go.”
Heads up, swinging with the music, their right arms swinging free, they stepped out, crossing the
sanded arena under the arc-lights, the cuadrillas opening out behind, the picadors riding after, behind
came the bull-ring servants and the jingling mules. The crowd applauded Hernandez as they marched
across the arena. Arrogant, swinging, they looked straight ahead as they marched.
They bowed before the president, and the procession broke up into its component parts. The
bull-fighters went over to the barrera and changed their heavy mantles for the light fighting capes.
The mules went out. The picadors galloped jerkily around the ring, and two rode out the gate they had
come in by. The servants swept the sand smooth.
Manuel drank a glass of water poured for him by one of Retana’s deputies, who was acting as
his manager and sword-handler. Hernandez came over from speaking with his own manager.
“You got a good hand, kid,” Manuel complimented him.
“They like me,” Hernandez said happily.
“How did the paseo go?” Manuel asked Retana’s man.
“Like a wedding,” said the handler. “Fine. You came out like Joselito and Belmonte.”
Zurito rode by, a bulky equestrian statue. He wheeled his horse and faced him toward the toril
on the far side of the ring where the bull would come out. It was strange under the arc-light. He pic-ed
in the hot afternoon sun for big money. He didn’t like this arc-light business. He wished they would
get started.
Manuel went up to him.
“Pic him, Manos,” he said. “Cut him down to size for me.”
“I’ll pic him, kid,” Zurito spat on the sand. “I’ll make him jump out of the ring.”
“Lean on him, Manos,” Manuel said.
“I’ll lean on him,” Zurito said. “What’s holding it up?”
“He’s coming now,” Manuel said.
Zurito sat there, his feet in the box-stirrups, his great legs in the buckskin-covered armor
gripping the horse, the reins in his left hand, the long pic held in his right hand, his broad hat well
down over his eyes to shade them from the lights, watching the distant door of the toril. His horse’s
ears quivered. Zurito patted him with his left hand.
The red door of the toril swung back and for a moment Zurito looked into the empty passageway
far across the arena. Then the bull came out in a rush, skidding on his four legs as he came out under
the lights, then charging in a gallop, moving softly in a fast gallop, silent except as he woofed through
wide nostrils as he charged, glad to be free after the dark pen.
In the first row of seats, slightly bored, leaning forward to write on the cement wall in front of
his knees, the substitute bull-fight critic of El Heraldo scribbled: “Campagnero, Negro, 42, came out
at 90 miles an hour with plenty of gas—”
Manuel, leaning against the barrera, watching the bull, waved his hand and the gypsy ran out,
trailing his cape. The bull, in full gallop, pivoted and charged the cape, his head down, his tail rising.
The gypsy moved in a zigzag, and as he passed, the bull caught sight of him and abandoned the cape to
charge the man. The gyp sprinted and vaulted the red fence of the barrera as the bull struck it with his
horns. He tossed into it twice with his horns, banging into the wood blindly.
The critic of El Heraldo lit a cigarette and tossed the match at the bull, then wrote in his notebook, “large and with enough horns to satisfy the cash customers, Campagnero showed a tendency to
cut into the terrain of the bull-fighters.”
Manuel stepped out on the hard sand as the bull banged into the fence. Out of the corner of his
eye he saw Zurito sitting the white horse close to the barrera, about a quarter of the way around the
ring to the left. Manuel held the cape close in front of him, a fold in each hand, and shouted at the bull.
“Huh! Huh!” The bull turned, seemed to brace against the fence as he charged in a scramble, driving
into the cape as Manuel side-stepped, pivoted on his heels with the charge of the bull, and swung the
cape just ahead of the horns. At the end of the swing he was facing the bull again and held the cape in
the same position close in front of his body, and pivoted again as the bull recharged. Each time, as he
swung, the crowd shouted.
Four times he swung with the bull, lifting the cape so it billowed full, and each time bringing the
bull around to charge again. Then, at the end of the fifth swing, he held the cape against his hip and
pivoted, so the cape swung out like a ballet dancer’s skirt and wound the bull around himself like a
belt, to step clear, leaving the bull facing Zurito on the white horse, come up and planted firm, the
horse facing the bull, its ears forward, its lips nervous, Zurito, his hat over his eyes, leaning forward,
the long pole sticking out before and behind in a sharp angle under his right arm, held half-way down,
the triangular iron point facing the bull.
El Heraldo’s second-string critic, drawing on his cigarette, his eyes on the bull, wrote: “The
veteran Manolo designed a series of acceptable verónicas, ending in a very Belmontistic recorte that
earned applause from the regulars, and we entered the tercio of the cavalry.”
Zurito sat his horse, measuring the distance between the bull and the end of the pic. As he
looked, the bull gathered himself together and charged, his eyes on the horse’s chest. As he lowered
his head to hook, Zurito sunk the point of the pic in the swelling hump of muscle above the bull’s
shoulder, leaned all his weight on the shaft, and with his left hand pulled the white horse into the air,
front hoofs pawing, and swung him to the right as he pushed the bull under and through so the horns
passed safely under the horse’s belly and the horse came down, quivering, the bull’s tail brushing his
chest as he charged the cape Hernandez offered him.
Hernandez ran sideways, taking the bull out and away with the cape, toward the other picador.
He fixed him with a swing of the cape, squarely facing the horse and rider, and stepped back. As the
bull saw the horse he charged. The picador’s lance slid along his back, and as the shock of the charge
lifted the horse, the picador was already half-way out of the saddle, lifting his right leg clear as he
missed with the lance and falling to the left side to keep the horse between him and the bull. The
horse, lifted and gored, crashed over with the bull driving into him, the picador gave a shove with his
boots against the horse and lay clear, waiting to be lifted and hauled away and put on his feet.
Manuel let the bull drive into the fallen horse; he was in no hurry, the picador was safe; besides,
it did a picador like that good to worry. He’d stay on longer next time. Lousy pics! He looked across
the sand at Zurito a little way out from the barrera, his horse rigid, waiting.
“Huh!” he called to the bull, “Tomar!” holding the cape in both hands so it would catch his eye.
The bull detached himself from the horse and charged the cape, and Manuel, running sideways and
holding the cape spread wide, stopped, swung on his heels, and brought the bull sharply around facing
Zurito.
“Campagnero accepted a pair of varas for the death of one rosinante, with Hernandez and
Manolo at the quites,” El Heraldo’s critic wrote. “He pressed on the iron and clearly showed he was
no horse-lover. The veteran Zurito resurrected some of his old stuff with the pike-pole, notably the
suerte—”
“Olé! Olé!” the man sitting beside him shouted. The shout was lost in the roar of the crowd, and
he slapped the critic on the back. The critic looked up to see Zurito, directly below him, leaning far
out over his horse, the length of the pic rising in a sharp angle under his armpit, holding the pic almost
by the point, bearing down with all his weight, holding the bull off, the bull pushing and driving to get
at the horse, and Zurito, far out, on top of him, holding him, holding him, and slowly pivoting the
horse against the pressure, so that at last he was clear. Zurito felt the moment when the horse was
clear and the bull could come past, and relaxed the absolute steel lock of his resistance, and the
triangular steel point of the pic ripped in the bull’s hump of shoulder muscle as he tore loose to find
Hernandez’s cape before his muzzle. He charged blindly into the cape and the boy took him out into
the open arena.
Zurito sat patting his horse and looking at the bull charging the cape that Hernandez swung for
him out under the bright light while the crowd shouted.
“You see that one?” he said to Manuel.
“It was a wonder,” Manuel said.
“I got him that time,” Zurito said. “Look at him now.”
At the conclusion of a closely turned pass of the cape the bull slid to his knees. He was up at
once, but far out across the sand Manuel and Zurito saw the shine of the pumping flow of blood,
smooth against the black of the bull’s shoulder.
“I got him that time,” Zurito said.
“He’s a good bull,” Manuel said.
“If they gave me another shot at him, I’d kill him,” Zurito said.
“They’ll change the thirds on us,” Manuel said.
“Look at him now,” Zurito said.
“I got to go over there,” Manuel said, and started on a run for the other side of the ring, where the
monos were leading a horse out by the bridle toward the bull, whacking him on the legs with rods and
all, in a procession, trying to get him toward the bull, who stood, dropping his head, pawing, unable
to make up his mind to charge.
Zurito, sitting his horse, walking him toward the scene, not missing any detail, scowled.
Finally the bull charged, the horse leaders ran for the barrera, the picador hit too far back, and
the bull got under the horse, lifted him, threw him onto his back.
Zurito watched. The monos, in their red shirts, running out to drag the picador clear. The
picador, now on his feet, swearing and flopping his arms. Manuel and Hernandez standing ready with
their capes. And the bull, the great, black bull, with a horse on his back, hooves dangling, the bridle
caught in the horns. Black bull with a horse on his back, staggering short-legged, then arching his neck
and lifting, thrusting, charging to slide the horse off, horse sliding down. Then the bull into a lunging
charge at the cape Manuel spread for him.
The bull was slower now, Manuel felt. He was bleeding badly. There was a sheen of blood all
down his flank.
Manuel offered him the cape again. There he came, eyes open, ugly, watching the cape. Manuel
stepped to the side and raised his arms, tightening the cape ahead of the bull for the verónica.
Now he was facing the bull. Yes, his head was going down a little. He was carrying it lower.
That was Zurito.
Manuel flopped the cape; there he comes; he side-stepped and swung in another verónica. He’s
shooting awfully accurately, he thought. He’s had enough fight, so he’s watching now. He’s hunting
now. Got his eye on me. But I always give him the cape.
He shook the cape at the bull; there he comes; he side-stepped. Awful close that time. I don’t
want to work that close to him.
The edge of the cape was wet with blood where it had swept along the bull’s back as he went
by.
All right, here’s the last one.
Manuel, facing the bull, having turned with him each charge, offered the cape with his two hands.
The bull looked at him. Eyes watching, horns straight forward, the bull looked at him, watching.
“Huh!” Manuel said, “Toro!” and leaning back, swung the cape forward. Here he comes. He
side-stepped, swung the cape in back of him, and pivoted, so the bull followed a swirl of cape and
then was left with nothing, fixed by the pass, dominated by the cape. Manuel swung the cape under his
muzzle with one hand, to show the bull was fixed, and walked away.
There was no applause.
Manuel walked across the sand toward the barrera, while Zurito rode out of the ring. The
trumpet had blown to change the act to the planting of the banderillas while Manuel had been working
with the bull. He had not consciously noticed it. The monos were spreading canvas over the two dead
horses and sprinkling sawdust around them.
Manuel came up to the barrera for a drink of water. Retana’s man handed him the heavy porous
jug.
Fuentes, the tall gypsy, was standing holding a pair of banderillas, holding them together, slim,
red sticks, fish-hook points out. He looked at Manuel.
“Go on out there,” Manuel said.
The gypsy trotted out. Manuel set down the jug and watched. He wiped his face with his
handkerchief.
The critic of El Heraldo reached for the bottle of warm champagne that stood between his feet,
took a drink, and finished his paragraph.
“—the aged Manolo rated no applause for a vulgar series of lances with the cape and we entered
the third of the palings.”
Alone in the center of the ring the bull stood, still fixed. Fuentes, tall, flat-backed, walking
toward him arrogantly, his arms spread out, the two slim, red sticks, one in each hand, held by the
fingers, points straight forward. Fuentes walked forward. Back of him and to one side was a peon
with a cape. The bull looked at him and was no longer fixed.
His eyes watched Fuentes, now standing still. Now he leaned back, calling to him. Fuentes
twitched the two banderillas and the light on the steel points caught the bull’s eye.
His tail went up and he charged.
He came straight, his eyes on the man. Fuentes stood still, leaning back, the banderillas pointing
forward. As the bull lowered his head to hook, Fuentes leaned backward, his arms came together and
rose, his two hands touching, the banderillas two descending red lines, and leaning forward drove the
points into the bull’s shoulder, leaning far in over the bull’s horns and pivoting on the two upright
sticks, his legs tight together, his body curving to one side to let the bull pass.
“Olé!” from the crowd.
The bull was hooking wildly, jumping like a trout, all four feet off the ground. The red shaft of
the banderillas tossed as he jumped.
Manuel, standing at the barrera, noticed that he looked always to the right.
“Tell him to drop the next pair on the right,” he said to the kid who started to run out to Fuentes
with the new banderillas.
A heavy hand fell on his shoulder. It was Zurito.
“How do you feel, kid?” he asked.
Manuel was watching the bull.
Zurito leaned forward on the barrera, leaning the weight of his body on his arms. Manuel turned
to him.
“You’re going good,” Zurito said.
Manuel shook his head. He had nothing to do now until the next third. The gypsy was very good
with the banderillas. The bull would come to him in the next third in good shape. He was a good bull.
It had all been easy up to now. The final stuff with the sword was all he worried over. He did not
really worry. He did not even think about it. But standing there he had a heavy sense of apprehension.
He looked out at the bull, planning his faena, his work with the red cloth that was to reduce the bull,
to make him manageable.
The gypsy was walking out toward the bull again, walking heel-and-toe, insultingly, like a
ballroom dancer, the red shafts of the banderillas twitching with his walk. The bull watched him, not
fixed now, hunting him, but waiting to get close enough so he could be sure of getting him, getting the
horns into him.
As Fuentes walked forward the bull charged. Fuentes ran across the quarter of a circle as the
bull charged and, as he passed running backward, stopped, swung forward, rose on his toes, arms
straight out, and sunk the banderillas straight down into the tight of the big shoulder muscles as the
bull missed him.
The crowd were wild about it.
“That kid won’t stay in this night stuff long,” Retana’s man said to Zurito.
“He’s good,” Zurito said.
“Watch him now.”
They watched.
Fuentes was standing with his back against the barrera. Two of the cuadrilla were back of him,
with their capes ready to flop over the fence to distract the bull.
The bull, with his tongue out, his barrel heaving, was watching the gypsy. He thought he had him
now. Back against the red planks. Only a short charge away. The bull watched him.
The gypsy bent back, drew back his arms, the banderillas pointing at the bull. He called to the
bull, stamped one foot. The bull was suspicious. He wanted the man. No more barbs in the shoulder.
Fuentes walked a little closer to the bull. Bent back. Called again. Somebody in the crowd
shouted a warning.
“He’s too damn close,” Zurito said.
“Watch him,” Retana’s man said.
Leaning back, inciting the bull with the banderillas, Fuentes jumped, both feet off the ground. As
he jumped the bull’s tail rose and he charged. Fuentes came down on his toes, arms straight out,
whole body arching forward, and drove the shafts straight down as he swung his body clear of the
right horn.
The bull crashed into the barrera where the flopping capes had attracted his eye as he lost the
man.
The gypsy came running along the barrera toward Manuel, taking the applause of the crowd. His
vest was ripped where he had not quite cleared the point of the horn. He was happy about it, showing
it to the spectators. He made the tour of the ring. Zurito saw him go by, smiling, pointing at his vest.
He smiled.
Somebody else was planting the last pair of banderillas. Nobody was paying any attention.
Retana’s man tucked a baton inside the red cloth of a muleta, folded the cloth over it, and handed
it over the barrera to Manuel. He reached in the leather sword-case, took out a sword, and holding it
by its leather scabbard, reached it over the fence to Manuel. Manuel pulled the blade out by the red
hilt and the scabbard fell limp.
He looked at Zurito. The big man saw he was sweating.
“Now you get him, kid,” Zurito said.
Manuel nodded.
“He’s in good shape,” Zurito said.
“Just like you want him,” Retana’s man assured him.
Manuel nodded.
The trumpeter, up under the roof, blew for the final act, and Manuel walked across the arena
toward where, up in the dark boxes, the president must be.
In the front row of seats the substitute bull-fight critic of El Heraldo took a long drink of the
warm champagne. He had decided it was not worth while to write a running story and would write up
the corrida back in the office. What the hell was it anyway? Only a nocturnal. If he missed anything he
would get it out of the morning papers. He took another drink of the champagne. He had a date at
Maxim’s at twelve. Who were these bull-fighters anyway? Kids and bums. A bunch of bums. He put
his pad of paper in his pocket and looked over toward Manuel, standing very much alone in the ring,
gesturing with his hat in a salute toward a box he could not see high up in the dark plaza. Out in the
ring the bull stood quiet, looking at nothing.
“I dedicate this bull to you, Mr. President, and to the public of Madrid, the most intelligent and
generous of the world,” was what Manuel was saying. It was a formula. He said it all. It was a little
long for nocturnal use.
He bowed at the dark, straightened, tossed his hat over his shoulder, and, carrying the muleta in
his left hand and the sword in his right, walked out toward the bull.
Manuel walked toward the bull. The bull looked at him; his eyes were quick. Manuel noticed the
way the banderillas hung down on his left shoulder and the steady sheen of blood from Zurito’s picing. He noticed the way the bull’s feet were. As he walked forward, holding the muleta in his left
hand and the sword in his right, he watched the bull’s feet. The bull could not charge without
gathering his feet together. Now he stood square on them, dully.
Manuel walked toward him, watching his feet. This was all right. He could do this. He must
work to get the bull’s head down, so he could go in past the horns and kill him. He did not think about
the sword, not about killing the bull. He thought about one thing at a time. The coming things
oppressed him, though. Walking forward, watching the bull’s feet, he saw successively his eyes, his
wet muzzle, and the wide, forward-pointing spread of his horns. The bull had light circles about his
eyes. His eyes watched Manuel. He felt he was going to get this little one with the white face.
Standing still now and spreading the red cloth of the muleta with the sword, pricking the point
into the cloth so that the sword, now held in his left hand, spread the red flannel like the jib of a boat,
Manuel noticed the points of the bull’s horns. One of them was splintered from banging against the
barrera. The other was sharp as a porcupine quill. Manuel noticed while spreading the muleta that
the white base of the horn was stained red. While he noticed these things he did not lose sight of the
bull’s feet. The bull watched Manuel steadily.
He’s on the defensive now, Manuel thought. He’s reserving himself. I’ve got to bring him out of
that and get his head down. Always get his head down. Zurito had his head down once, but he’s come
back. He’ll bleed when I start him going and that will bring it down.
Holding the muleta, with the sword in his left hand widening it in front of him, he called to the
bull.
The bull looked at him.
He leaned back insultingly and shook the wide-spread flannel.
The bull saw the muleta. It was a bright scarlet under the arc-light. The bull’s legs tightened.
Here he comes. Whoosh! Manuel turned as the bull came and raised the muleta so that it passed
over the bull’s horns and swept down his broad back from head to tail. The bull had gone clean up in
the air with the charge. Manuel had not moved.
At the end of the pass the bull turned like a cat coming around a corner and faced Manuel.
He was on the offensive again. His heaviness was gone. Manuel noted the fresh blood shining
down the black shoulder and dripping down the bull’s leg. He drew the sword out of the muleta and
held it in his right hand. The muleta held low down in his left hand, leaning toward the left, he called
to the bull. The bull’s legs tightened, his eyes on the muleta. Here he comes, Manuel thought. Yuh!
He swung with the charge, sweeping the muleta ahead of the bull, his feet firm, the sword
following the curve, a point of light under the arcs.
The bull recharged as the pase natural finished and Manuel raised the muleta for a pase de
pecho. Firmly planted, the bull came by his chest under the raised muleta. Manuel leaned his head
back to avoid the clattering banderillo shafts. The hot, black bull body touched his chest as it passed.
Too damn close, Manuel thought. Zurito, leaning on the barrera, spoke rapidly to the gypsy, who
trotted out toward Manuel with a cape. Zurito pulled his hat down low and looked out across the
arena at Manuel.
Manuel was facing the bull again, the muleta held low and to the left. The bull’s head was down
as he watched the muleta.
“If it was Belmonte doing that stuff, they’d go crazy,” Retana’s man said.
Zurito said nothing. He was watching Manuel out in the center of the arena.
“Where did the boss dig this fellow up?” Retana’s man asked.
“Out of the hospital,” Zurito said.
“That’s where he’s going damn quick,” Retana’s man said.
Zurito turned on him.
“Knock on that,” he said, pointing to the barrera.
“I was just kidding, man,” Retana’s man said.
“Knock on the wood.”
Retana’s man leaned forward and knocked three times on the barrera.
“Watch the faena,” Zurito said.
Out in the center of the ring, under the lights, Manuel was kneeling, facing the bull, and as he
raised the muleta in both hands the bull charged, tail up.
Manuel swung his body clear and, as the bull recharged, brought around the muleta in a halfcircle that pulled the bull to his knees.
“Why, that one’s a great bull-fighter,” Retana’s man said.
“No, he’s not,” said Zurito.
Manuel stood up and, the muleta in his left hand, the sword in his right, acknowledged the
applause from the dark plaza.
The bull had humped himself up from his knees and stood waiting, his head hung low.
Zurito spoke to two of the other lads of the cuadrilla and they ran out to stand back of Manuel
with their capes. There were four men back of him now. Hernandez had followed him since he first
came out with the muleta. Fuentes stood watching, his cape held against his body, tall, in repose,
watching lazy-eyed. Now the two came up. Hernandez motioned them to stand one at each side.
Manuel stood alone, facing the bull.
Manuel waved back the men with the capes. Stepping back cautiously, they saw his face was
white and sweating.
Didn’t they know enough to keep back? Did they want to catch the bull’s eye with the capes after
he was fixed and ready? He had enough to worry about without that kind of thing.
The bull was standing, his four feet square, looking at the muleta. Manuel furled the muleta in
his left hand. The bull’s eyes watched it. His body was heavy on his feel. He carried his head low,
but not too low.
Manuel lifted the muleta at him. The bull did not move. Only his eyes watched.
He’s all lead. Manuel thought. He’s all square. He’s framed right. He’ll take it.
He thought in bull-fight terms. Sometimes he had a thought and the particular piece of slang
would not come into his mind and he could not realize the thought. His instincts and his knowledge
worked automatically, and his brain worked slowly and in words. He knew all about bulls. He did
not have to think about them. He just did the right thing. His eyes noted things and his body performed
the necessary measures without thought. If he thought about it, he would be gone.
Now, facing the bull, he was conscious of many things at the same time. There were the horns,
the one splintered, the other smoothly sharp, the need to profile himself toward the left horn, lance
himself short and straight, lower the muleta so the bull would follow it, and, going in over the horns,
put the sword all the way into a little spot about as big as a five-peseta piece straight in back of the
neck, between the sharp pitch of the bull’s shoulders. He must do all this and must then come out from
between the horns. He was conscious he must do all this, but his only thought was in words: “Corto y
derecho.”
“Corto y derecho,” he thought, furling the muleta. Short and straight. Corto y derecho, he drew
the sword out of the muleta, profiled on the splintered left horn, dropped the muleta across his body,
so his right hand with the sword on the level with his eye made the sign of the cross, and, rising on his
toes, sighted along the dipping blade of the sword at the spot high up between the bull’s shoulders.
Corto y derecho he launched himself on the bull.
There was a shock, and he felt himself go up in the air. He pushed on the sword as he went up
and over, and it flew out of his hand. He hit the ground and the bull was on him. Manuel, lying on the
ground, kicked at the bull’s muzzle with his slippered feet. Kicking, kicking, the bull after him,
missing him in his excitement, bumping him with his head, driving the horns into the sand. Kicking
like a man keeping a ball in the air, Manuel kept the bull from getting a clean thrust at him.
Manuel felt the wind on his back from the capes flopping at the bull, and then the bull was gone,
gone over him in a rush. Dark, as his belly went over. Not even stepped on.
Manuel stood up and picked up the muleta. Fuentes handed him the sword. It was bent where it
had struck the shoulder-blade. Manuel straightened it on his knee and ran toward the bull, standing
now beside one of the dead horses. As he ran, his jacket flopped where it had been ripped under his
armpit.
“Get him out of there,” Manuel shouted to the gypsy. The bull had smelled the blood of the dead
horse and ripped into the canvas-cover with his horns. He charged Fuentes’s cape, with the canvas
hanging from his splintered horn, and the crowd laughed. Out in the ring, he tossed his head to rid
himself of the canvas. Hernandez, running up from behind him, grabbed the end of the canvas and
neatly lifted it off the horn.
The bull followed it in a half-charge and stopped still. He was on the defensive again. Manuel
was walking toward him with the sword and muleta. Manuel swung the muleta before him. The bull
would not charge.
Manuel profiled toward the bull, sighting along the dipping blade of the sword. The bull was
motionless, seemingly dead on his feet, incapable of another charge.
Manuel rose to his toes, sighting along the steel, and charged.
Again there was the shock and he felt himself being borne back in a rush, to strike hard on the
sand. There was no chance of kicking this time. The bull was on top of him. Manuel lay as though
dead, his head on his arms, and the bull bumped him. Bumped his back, bumped his face in the sand.
He felt the horn go into the sand between his folded arms. The bull hit him in the small of the back.
His face drove into the sand. The horn drove through one of his sleeves and the bull ripped it off.
Manuel was tossed clear and the bull followed the capes.
Manuel got up, found the sword and muleta, tried the point of the sword with his thumb, and then
ran toward the barrera for a new sword.
Retana’s man handed him the sword over the edge of the barrera.
“Wipe off your face,” he said.
Manuel, running again toward the bull, wiped his bloody face with his handkerchief. He had not
seen Zurito. Where was Zurito?
The cuadrilla had stepped away from the bull and waited with their capes. The bull stood,
heavy and dull again after the action.
Manuel walked toward him with the muleta. He stopped and shook it. The bull did not respond.
He passed it right and left, left and right before the bull’s muzzle. The bull’s eyes watched it and
turned with the swing, but he would not charge. He was waiting for Manuel.
Manuel was worried. There was nothing to do but go in. Corto y derecho. He profiled close to
the bull, crossed the muleta in front of his body and charged. As he pushed in the sword, he jerked his
body to the left to clear the horn. The bull passed him and the sword shot up in the air, twinkling
under the arc-lights, to fall red-hilted on the sand.
Manuel ran over and picked it up. It was bent and he straightened it over his knee.
As he came running toward the bull, fixed again now, he passed Hernandez standing with his
cape.
“He’s all bone,” the boy said encouragingly.
Manuel nodded, wiping his face. He put the bloody handkerchief in his pocket.
There was the bull. He was close to the barrera now. Damn him. Maybe he was all bone.
Maybe there was not any place for the sword to go in. The hell there wasn’t! He’d show them.
He tried a pass with the muleta and the bull did not move. Manuel chopped the muleta back and
forth in front of the bull. Nothing doing.
He furled the muleta, drew the sword out, profiled and drove in on the bull. He felt the sword
buckle as he shoved it in, leaning his weight on it, and then it shot high in the air, end-over-ending into
the crowd. Manuel had jerked clear as the sword jumped.
The first cushions thrown down out of the dark missed him. Then one hit him in the face, his
bloody face looking toward the crowd. They were coming down fast. Spotting the sand. Somebody
threw an empty champagne-bottle from close range. It hit Manuel on the foot. He stood there watching
the dark, where the things were coming from. Then something whished through the air and struck by
him. Manuel leaned over and picked it up. It was his sword. He straightened it over his knee and
gestured with it to the crowd.
“Thank you,” he said. “Thank you.”
Oh, the dirty bastards! Dirty bastards! Oh, the lousy, dirty bastards! He kicked into a cushion as
he ran.
There was the bull. The same as ever. All right, you dirty, lousy bastard!
Manuel passed the muleta in front of the bull’s black muzzle.
Nothing doing.
You won’t! All right. He stepped close and jammed the sharp peak of the muleta into the bull’s
damp muzzle.
The bull was on him as he jumped back and as he tripped on a cushion he felt the horn go into
him, into his side. He grabbed the horn with his two hands and rode backward, holding tight onto the
place. The bull tossed him and he was clear. He lay still. It was all right. The bull was gone.
He got up coughing and feeling broken and gone. The dirty bastards!
“Give me the sword,” he shouted. “Give me the stuff.”
Fuentes came up with the muleta and the sword.
Hernandez put his arm around him.
“Go on to the infirmary, man,” he said. “Don’t be a damn fool.”
“Get away from me,” Manuel said. “Get to hell away from me.”
He twisted free. Hernandez shrugged his shoulders. Manuel ran toward the bull.
There was the bull standing, heavy, firmly planted.
All right, you bastard! Manuel drew the sword out of the muleta, sighted with the same
movement, and flung himself onto the bull. He felt the sword go in all the way. Right up to the guard.
Four fingers and his thumb into the bull. The blood was hot on his knuckles, and he was on top of the
bull.
The bull lurched with him as he lay on, and seemed to sink; then he was standing clear. He
looked at the bull going down slowly over on his side, then suddenly four feet in the air.
Then he gestured at the crowd, his hand warm from the bull blood.
All right, you bastards! He wanted to say something, but he started to cough. It was hot and
choking. He looked down for the muleta. He must go over and salute the president. President hell! He
was sitting down looking at something. It was the bull. His four feet up. Thick tongue out. Things
crawling around on his belly and under his legs. Crawling where the hair was thin. Dead bull. To hell
with the bull! To hell with them all! He started to get to his feet and commenced to cough. He sat
down again, coughing. Somebody came and pushed him up.
They carried him across the ring to the infirmary, running with him across the sand, standing
blocked at the gate as the mules came in, then around under the dark passageway, men grunting as they
took him up the stairway, and then laid him down.
The doctor and two men in white were waiting for him. They laid him out on the table. They
were cutting away his shirt. Manuel felt tired. His whole chest felt scalding inside. He started to
cough and they held something to his mouth. Everybody was very busy.
There was an electric light in his eyes. He shut his eyes.
He heard someone coming very heavily up the stairs. Then he did not hear it. Then he heard a
noise far off. That was the crowd. Well, somebody would have to kill his other bull. They had cut
away all his shirt. The doctor smiled at him. There was Retana.
“Hello, Retana!” Manuel said. He could not hear his voice.
Retana smiled at him and said something. Manuel could not hear it.
Zurito stood beside the table, bending over where the doctor was working. He was in his
picador clothes, without his hat.
Zurito said something to him. Manuel could not hear it.
Zurito was speaking to Retana. One of the men in white smiled and handed Retana a pair of
scissors. Retana gave them to Zurito. Zurito said something to Manuel. He could not hear it.
To hell with this operating-table. He’d been on plenty of operating-tables before. He was not
going to die. There would be a priest if he was going to die.
Zurito was saying something to him. Holding up the scissors.
That was it. They were going to cut off his coleta. They were going to cut off his pigtail.
Manuel sat up on the operating-table. The doctor stepped back, angry. Someone grabbed him and
held him.
“You couldn’t do a thing like that, Manos,” he said.
He heard suddenly, clearly, Zurito’s voice.
“That’s all right,” Zurito said. “I won’t do it. I was joking.”
“I was going good,” Manuel said. “I didn’t have any luck. That was all.”
Manuel lay back. They had put something over his face. It was all familiar. He inhaled deeply.
He felt very tired. He was very, very tired. They took the thing away from his face.
“I was going good,” Manuel said weakly. “I was going great.”
Retana looked at Zurito and started for the door.
“I’ll stay here with him,” Zurito said.
Retana shrugged his shoulders.
Manuel opened his eyes and looked at Zurito.
“Wasn’t I going good, Manos?” he asked, for confirmation.
“Sure,” said Zurito. “You were going great.”
The doctor’s assistant put the cone over Manuel’s face and he inhaled deeply. Zurito stood
awkwardly, watching.
In Another Country
IN THE FALL THE WAR WAS ALWAYS there, but we did not go to
it any more. It was cold in the fall in Milan and the dark came very early. Then the electric lights
came on, and it was pleasant along the streets looking in the windows. There was much game hanging
outside the shops, and the snow powdered in the fur of the foxes and the wind blew their tails. The
deer hung stiff and heavy and empty, and small birds blew in the wind and the wind turned their
feathers. It was a cold fall and the wind came down from the mountains.
We were all at the hospital every afternoon, and there were different ways of walking across the
town through the dusk to the hospital. Two of the ways were alongside canals, but they were long.
Always, though, you crossed a bridge across a canal to enter the hospital. There was a choice of three
bridges. On one of them a woman sold roasted chestnuts. It was warm, standing in front of her
charcoal fire, and the chestnuts were warm afterward in your pocket. The hospital was very old and
very beautiful, and you entered through a gate and walked across a courtyard and out a gate on the
other side. There were usually funerals starting from the courtyard. Beyond the old hospital were the
new brick pavilions, and there we met every afternoon and were all very polite and interested in what
was the matter, and sat in the machines that were to make so much difference.
The doctor came up to the machine where I was sitting and said: “What did you like best to do
before the war? Did you practice a sport?”
I said: “Yes, football.”
“Good” he said. “You will be able to play football again better than ever.”
My knee did not bend and the leg dropped straight from the knee to the ankle without a calf, and
the machine was to bend the knee and make it move as in riding a tricycle. But it did not bend yet, and
instead the machine lurched when it came to the bending part. The doctor said: “That will all pass.
You are a fortunate young man. You will play football again like a champion.”
In the next machine was a major who had a little hand like a baby’s. He winked at me when the
doctor examined his hand, which was between two leather straps that bounced up and down and
flapped the stiff fingers, and said: “And will I too play football, captain-doctor?” He had been a very
great fencer, and before the war the greatest fencer in Italy.
The doctor went to his office in a back room and brought a photograph which showed a hand that
had been withered almost as small as the major’s, before it had taken a machine course, and after was
a little larger. The major held the photograph with his good hand and looked at it very carefully. “A
wound?” he asked.
“An industrial accident,” the doctor said.
“Very interesting, very interesting,” the major said, and handed it back to the doctor.
“You have confidence?”
“No,” said the major.
There were three boys who came each day who were about the same age I was. They were all
three from Milan, and one of them was to be a lawyer, and one was to be a painter, and one had
intended to be a soldier, and after we were finished with the machines, sometimes we walked back
together to the Café Cova, which was next door to the Scala. We walked the short way through the
communist quarter because we were four together. The people hated us because we were officers,
and from a wine-shop some one would call out, “A basso gli uf iciali!” as we passed. Another boy
who walked with us sometimes and made us five wore a black silk handkerchief across his face
because he had no nose then and his face was to be rebuilt. He had gone out to the front from the
military academy and been wounded within an hour after he had gone into the front line for the first
time. They rebuilt his face, but he came from a very old family and they could never get the nose
exactly right. He went to South America and worked in a bank. But this was a long time ago, and then
we did not any of us know how it was going to be afterward. We only knew then that there was
always the war, but that we were not going to it any more.
We all had the same medals, except the boy with the black silk bandage across his face, and he
had not been at the front long enough to get any medals. The tall boy with a very pale face who was to
be a lawyer had been a lieutenant of Arditi and had three medals of the sort we each had only one of.
He had lived a very long time with death and was a little detached. We were all a little detached, and
there was nothing that held us together except that we met every afternoon at the hospital. Although, as
we walked to the Cova through the tough part of town, walking in the dark, with light and singing
coming out of the wine-shops, and sometimes having to walk into the street when the men and women
would crowd together on the sidewalk so that we would have had to jostle them to get by, we felt
held together by there being something that had happened that they, the people who disliked us, did
not understand.
We ourselves all understood the Cova, where it was rich and warm and not too brightly lighted,
and noisy and smoky at certain hours, and there were always girls at the tables and the illustrated
papers on a rack on the wall. The girls at the Cova were very patriotic, and I found that the most
patriotic people in Italy were the café girls—and I believe they are still patriotic.
The boys at first were very polite about my medals and asked me what I had done to get them. I
showed them the papers, which were written in very beautiful language and full of fratellanza and
abnegazione, but which really said, with the adjectives removed, that I had been given the medals
because I was an American. After that their manner changed a little toward me, although I was their
friend against outsiders. I was a friend, but I was never really one of them after they had read the
citations, because it had been different with them and they had done very different things to get their
medals. I had been wounded, it was true; but we all knew that being wounded, after all, was really an
accident. I was never ashamed of the ribbons, though, and sometimes, after the cocktail hour, I would
imagine myself having done all the things they had done to get their medals; but walking home at night
through the empty streets with the cold wind and all the shops closed, trying to keep near the street
lights, I knew that I would never have done such things, and I was very much afraid to die, and often
lay in bed at night by myself, afraid to die and wondering how I would be when I went back to the
front again.
The three with the medals were like hunting-hawks; and I was not a hawk, although I might seem
a hawk to those who had never hunted; they, the three, knew better and so we drifted apart. But I
stayed good friends with the boy who had been wounded his first day at the front, because he would
never know now how he would have turned out; so he could never be accepted either, and I liked him
because I thought perhaps he would not have turned out to be a hawk either.
The major, who had been the great fencer, did not believe in bravery, and spent much time while
we sat in the machines correcting my grammar. He had complimented me on how I spoke Italian, and
we talked together very easily. One day I had said that Italian seemed such an easy language to me that
I could not take a great interest in it; everything was so easy to say. “Ah, yes,” the major said. “Why,
then, do you not take up the use of grammar?” So we took up the use of grammar, and soon Italian was
such a difficult language that I was afraid to talk to him until I had the grammar straight in my mind.
The major came very regularly to the hospital. I do not think he ever missed a day, although I am
sure he did not believe in the machines. There was a time when none of us believed in the machines,
and one day the major said it was all nonsense. The machines were new then and it was we who were
to prove them. It was an idiotic idea, he said, “a theory, like another.” I had not learned my grammar,
and he said I was a stupid impossible disgrace, and he was a fool to have bothered with me. He was
a small man and he sat straight up in his chair with his right hand thrust into the machine and looked
straight ahead at the wall while the straps thumped up and down with his fingers in them.
“What will you do when the war is over if it is over?” he asked me. “Speak grammatically!”
“I will go to the States.”
“Are you married?”
“No, but I hope to be.”
“The more of a fool you are,” he said. He seemed very angry. “A man must not marry.”
“Why, Signor Maggiore?”
“Don’t call me ‘Signor Maggiore.’”
“Why must not a man marry?”
“He cannot marry. He cannot marry,” he said angrily. “If he is to lose everything, he should not
place himself in a position to lose that. He should not place himself in a position to lose. He should
find things he cannot lose.”
He spoke very angrily and bitterly, and looked straight ahead while he talked.
“But why should he necessarily lose it?”
“He’ll lose it,” the major said. He was looking at the wall. Then he looked down at the machine
and jerked his little hand out from between the straps and slapped it hard against his thigh. “He’ll lose
it,” he almost shouted. “Don’t argue with me!” Then he called to the attendant who ran the machines.
“Come and turn this damned thing off.”
He went back into the other room for the light treatment and the massage. Then I heard him ask
the doctor if he might use his telephone and he shut the door. When he came back into the room, I was
sitting in another machine. He was wearing his cape and had his cap on, and he came directly toward
my machine and put his arm on my shoulder.
“I am so sorry,” he said, and patted me on the shoulder with his good hand. “I would not be rude.
My wife has just died. You must forgive me.”
“Oh—” I said, feeling sick for him. “I am so sorry.”
He stood there biting his lower lip. “It is very difficult,” he said. “I cannot resign myself.”
He looked straight past me and out through the window. Then he began to cry. “I am utterly
unable to resign myself,” he said and choked. And then crying, his head up looking at nothing, carrying
himself straight and soldierly, with tears on both his cheeks and biting his lips, he walked past the
machines and out the door.
The doctor told me that the major’s wife, who was very young and whom he had not married
until he was definitely invalided out of the war, had died of pneumonia. She had been sick only a few
days. No one expected her to die. The major did not come to the hospital for three days. Then he came
at the usual hour, wearing a black band on the sleeve of his uniform. When he came back, there were
large framed photographs around the wall, of all sorts of wounds before and after they had been cured
by the machines. In front of the machine the major used were three photographs of hands like his that
were completely restored. I do not know where the doctor got them. I always understood we were the
first to use the machines. The photographs did not make much difference to the major because he only
looked out of the window.
Hills Like White Elephants
THE HILLS ACROSS THE VALLEY OF THE Ebro were long and
white. On this side there was no shade and no trees and the station was between two lines of rails in
the sun. Close against the side of the station there was the warm shadow of the building and a curtain,
made of strings of bamboo beads, hung across the open door into the bar, to keep out flies. The
American and the girl with him sat at a table in the shade, outside the building. It was very hot and the
express from Barcelona would come in forty minutes. It stopped at this junction for two minutes and
went on to Madrid.
“What should we drink?” the girl asked. She had taken off her hat and put it on the table.
“It’s pretty hot,” the man said.
“Let’s drink beer.”
“Dos cervezas,” the man said into the curtain.
“Big ones?” a woman asked from the doorway.
“Yes. Two big ones.”
The woman brought two glasses of beer and two felt pads. She put the felt pads and the beer
glasses on the table and looked at the man and the girl. The girl was looking off at the line of hills.
They were white in the sun and the country was brown and dry.
“They look like white elephants,” she said.
“I’ve never seen one,” the man drank his beer.
“No, you wouldn’t have.”
“I might have,” the man said. “Just because you say I wouldn’t have doesn’t prove anything.”
The girl looked at the bead curtain. “They’ve painted something on it,” she said. “What does it
say?”
“Anis del Toro. It’s a drink.”
“Could we try it?”
The man called “Listen” through the curtain. The woman came out from the bar.
“Four reales.”
“We want two Anis del Toro.”
“With water?”
“Do you want it with water?”
“I don’t know,” the girl said. “Is it good with water?”
“It’s all right.”
“You want them with water?” asked the woman.
“Yes, with water.”
“It tastes like licorice,” the girl said and put the glass down.
“That’s the way with everything.”
“Yes,” said the girl. “Everything tastes of licorice. Especially all the things you’ve waited so
long for, like absinthe.”
“Oh, cut it out.”
“You started it,” the girl said. “I was being amused. I was having a fine time.”
“Well, let’s try and have a fine time.”
“All right. I was trying. I said the mountains looked like white elephants. Wasn’t that bright?”
“That was bright.”
“I wanted to try this new drink: That’s all we do, isn’t it—look at things and try new drinks?”
“I guess so.”
The girl looked across at the hills.
“They’re lovely hills,” she said. “They don’t really look like white elephants. I just meant the
coloring of their skin through the trees.”
“Should we have another drink?”
“All right.”
The warm wind blew the bead curtain against the table.
“The beer’s nice and cool,” the man said.
“It’s lovely,” the girl said.
“It’s really an awfully simple operation, Jig,” the man said. “It’s not really an operation at all.”
The girl looked at the ground the table legs rested on.
“I know you wouldn’t mind it. Jig. It’s really not anything. It’s just to let the air in.”
The girl did not say anything.
“I’ll go with you and I’ll stay with you all the time. They just let the air in and then it’s all
perfectly natural.”
“Then what will we do afterward?”
“We’ll be fine afterward. Just like we were before.”
“What makes you think so?”
“That’s the only thing that bothers us. It’s the only thing that’s made us unhappy.”
The girl looked at the bead curtain, put her hand out and took hold of two of the strings of beads.
“And you think then we’ll be all right and be happy.”
“I know we will. You don’t have to be afraid. I’ve known lots of people that have done it.”
“So have I,” said the girl. “And afterward they were all so happy.”
“Well,” the man said, “if you don’t want to you don’t have to. I wouldn’t have you do it if you
didn’t want to. But I know it’s perfectly simple.”
“And you really want to?”
“I think it’s the best thing to do. But I don’t want you to do it if you don’t really want to.”
“And if I do it you’ll be happy and things will be like they were and you’ll love me?”
“I love you now. You know I love you.”
“I know. But if I do it, then it will be nice again if I say things are like white elephants, and
you’ll like it?”
“I’ll love it. I love it now but I just can’t think about it. You know how I get when I worry.”
“If I do it you won’t ever worry?”
“I won’t worry about that because it’s perfectly simple.”
“Then I’ll do it. Because I don’t care about me.”
“What do you mean?”
“I don’t care about me.”
“Well, I care about you.”
“Oh, yes. But I don’t care about me. And I’ll do it and then everything will be fine.”
“I don’t want you to do it if you feel that way.”
The girl stood up and walked to the end of the station. Across, on the other side, were fields of
grain and trees along the banks of the Ebro. Far away, beyond the river, were mountains. The shadow
of a cloud moved across the field of grain and she saw the river through the trees.
“And we could have all this,” she said. “And we could have everything and every day we make
it more impossible.”
“What did you say?”
“I said we could have everything.”
“We can have everything.”
“No, we can’t.”
“We can have the whole world.”
“No, we can’t.”
“We can go everywhere.”
“No, we can’t. It isn’t ours any more.”
“It’s ours.”
“No, it isn’t. And once they take it away, you never get it back.”
“But they haven’t taken it away.”
“We’ll wait and see.”
“Come on back in the shade,” he said. “You mustn’t feel that way.”
“I don’t feel any way,” the girl said. “I just know things.”
“I don’t want you to do anything that you don’t want to do—”
“Nor that isn’t good for me,” she said. “I know. Could we have another beer?”
“All right. But you’ve got to realize—”
“I realize,” the girl said. “Can’t we maybe stop talking?”
They sat down at the table and the girl looked across at the hills on the dry side of the valley and
the man looked at her and at the table.
“You’ve got to realize,” he said, “that I don’t want you to do it if you don’t want to. I’m perfectly
willing to go through with it if it means anything to you.”
“Doesn’t it mean anything to you? We could get along.”
“Of course it does. But I don’t want anybody but you. I don’t want any one else. And I know it’s
perfectly simple.”
“Yes, you know it’s perfectly simple.”
“It’s all right for you to say that, but I do know it.”
“Would you do something for me now?”
“I’d do anything for you.”
“Would you please please please please please please please stop talking?”
He did not say anything but looked at the bags against the wall of the station. There were labels
on them from all the hotels where they had spent nights.
“But I don’t want you to,” he said, “I don’t care anything about it.”
“I’ll scream,” the girl said.
The woman came out through the curtains with two glasses of beer and put them down on the
damp felt pads. “The train comes in five minutes,” she said.
“What did she say?” asked the girl.
“That the train is coming in five minutes.”
The girl smiled brightly at the woman, to thank her.
“I’d better take the bags over to the other side of the station,” the man said. She smiled at him.
“All right. Then come back and we’ll finish the beer.”
He picked up the two heavy bags and carried them around the station to the other tracks. He
looked up the tracks but could not see the train. Coming back, he walked through the barroom, where
people waiting for the train were drinking. He drank an Anis at the bar and looked at the people. They
were all waiting reasonably for the train. He went out through the bead curtain. She was sitting at the
table and smiled at him.
“Do you feel better?” he asked.
“I feel fine,” she said. “There’s nothing wrong with me. I feel fine.”
The Killers
THE DOOR OF HENRY’S LUNCH-ROOM opened and two men
came in. They sat down at the counter.
“What’s yours?” George asked them.
“I don’t know,” one of the men said. “What do you want to eat, Al?”
“I don’t know,” said Al. “I don’t know what I want to eat.”
Outside it was getting dark. The street-light came on outside the window. The two men at the
counter read the menu. From the other end of the counter Nick Adams watched them. He had been
talking to George when they came in.
“I’ll have a roast pork tenderloin with apple sauce and mashed potatoes,” the first man said.
“It isn’t ready yet.”
“What the hell do you put it on the card for?”
“That’s the dinner,” George explained. “You can get that at six o’clock.”
George looked at the clock on the wall behind the counter.
“It’s five o’clock.”
“The clock says twenty minutes past five,” the second man said.
“It’s twenty minutes fast.”
“Oh, to hell with the clock,” the first man said. “What have you got to eat?”
“I can give you any kind of sandwiches,” George said. “You can have ham and eggs, bacon and
eggs, liver and bacon, or a steak.”
“Give me chicken croquettes with green peas and cream sauce and mashed potatoes.”
“That’s the dinner.”
“Everything we want’s the dinner, eh? That’s the way you work it.”
“I can give you ham and eggs, bacon and eggs, liver—”
“I’ll take ham and eggs,” the man called Al said. He wore a derby hat and a black overcoat
buttoned across the chest. His face was small and white and he had tight lips. He wore a silk muffler
and gloves.
“Give me bacon and eggs,” said the other man. He was about the same size as Al. Their faces
were different, but they were dressed like twins. Both wore overcoats too tight for them. They sat
leaning forward, their elbows on the counter.
“Got anything to drink?” Al asked.
“Silver beer, bevo, ginger-ale,” George said.
“I mean you got anything to drink?”
“Just those I said.”
“This is a hot town,” said the other. “What do they call it?”
“Summit.”
“Ever hear of it?” Al asked his friend.
“No,” said the friend.
“What do you do here nights?” Al asked.
“They eat the dinner,” his friend said. “They all come here and eat the big dinner.”
“That’s right,” George said.
“So you think that’s right?” Al asked George.
“Sure.”
“You’re a pretty bright boy, aren’t you?”
“Sure,” said George.
“Well, you’re not,” said the other little man. “Is he, Al?”
“He’s dumb,” said Al. He turned to Nick. “What’s your name?”
“Adams.”
“Another bright boy,” Al said. “Ain’t he a bright boy, Max?”
“The town’s full of bright boys,” Max said.
George put the two platters, one of ham and eggs, the other of bacon and eggs, on the counter. He
set down two side-dishes of fried potatoes and closed the wicket into the kitchen.
“Which is yours?” he asked Al.
“Don’t you remember?”
“Ham and eggs.”
“Just a bright boy,” Max said. He leaned forward and took the ham and eggs. Both men ate with
their gloves on. George watched them eat.
“What are you looking it?” Max looked at George.
“Nothing.”
“The hell you were. You were looking at me.”
“Maybe the boy meant it for a joke, Max,” Al said.
George laughed.
“You don’t have to laugh,” Max said to him. “You don’t have to laugh at all, see?”
“All right,” said George.
“So he thinks it’s all right.” Max turned to Al. “He thinks it’s all right. That’s a good one.”
“Oh, he’s a thinker,” Al said. They went on eating.
“What’s the bright boy’s name down the counter?” Al asked Max.
“Hey, bright boy,” Max said to Nick. “You go around on the other side of the counter with your
boy friend.”
“What’s the idea?” Nick asked.
“There isn’t any idea.”
“You better go around, bright boy,” Al said. Nick went around behind the counter.
“What’s the idea?” George asked.
“None of your damn business,” Al said. “Who’s out in the kitchen?”
“The nigger.”
“What do you mean the nigger?”
“The nigger that cooks.”
“Tell him to come in.”
“What’s the idea?”
“Tell him to come in.”
“Where do you think you are?”
“We know damn well where we are,” the man called Max said. “Do we look silly?”
“You talk silly,” Al said to him. “What the hell do you argue with this kid for? Listen,” he said to
George, “tell the nigger to come out here.”
“What are you going to do to him?”
“Nothing. Use your head, bright boy. What would we do to a nigger?”
George opened the slit that opened back into the kitchen. “Sam,” he called. “Come in here a
minute.”
The door to the kitchen opened and the nigger came in. “What was it?” he asked. The two men at
the counter took a look at him.
“All right, nigger. You stand right there,” Al said.
Sam, the nigger, standing in his apron, looked at the two men sitting at the counter. “Yes, sir,” he
said. Al got down from his stool.
“I’m going back to the kitchen with the nigger and bright boy,” he said. “Go on back to the
kitchen, nigger. You go with him, bright boy.” The little man walked after Nick and Sam, the cook,
back into the kitchen. The door shut after them. The man called Max sat at the counter opposite
George. He didn’t look at George but looked in the mirror that ran along back of the counter. Henry’s
had been made over from a saloon into a lunch-counter.
“Well, bright boy,” Max said, looking into the mirror, “why don’t you say something?”
“What’s it all about?”
“Hey, Al,” Max called, “bright boy wants to know what it’s all about.”
“Why don’t you tell him?” Al’s voice came from the kitchen.
“What do you think it’s all about?”
“I don’t know.”
“What do you think?”
Max looked into the mirror all the time he was talking.
“I wouldn’t say.”
“Hey, Al, bright boy says he wouldn’t say what he thinks it’s all about.”
“I can hear you, all right,” Al said from the kitchen. He had propped open the slit that dishes
passed through into the kitchen with a catsup bottle. “Listen, bright boy,” he said from the kitchen to
George. “Stand a little further along the bar. You move a little to the left. Max.” He was like a
photographer arranging for a group picture.
“Talk to me, bright boy,” Max said. “What do you trunk’s going to happen?”
George did not say anything.
“I’ll tell you,” Max said. “We’re going to kill a Swede. Do you know a big Swede named Ole
Andreson?”
“Yes.”
“He comes here to eat every night, don’t he?”
“Sometimes he comes here.”
“He comes here at six o’clock, don’t he?”
“If he comes.”
“We know all that, bright boy,” Max said. “Talk about something else. Ever go to the movies?”
“Once in a while.”
“You ought to go to the movies more. The movies are fine for a bright boy like you.”
“What are you going to kill Ole Andreson for? What did he ever do to you?”
“He never had a chance to do anything to us. He never even seen us.”
“And he’s only going to see us once,” Al said from the kitchen.
“What are you going to kill him for, then?” George asked.
“We’re killing him for a friend. Just to oblige a friend, bright boy.”
“Shut up,” said Al from the kitchen. “You talk too goddam much.”
“Well, I got to keep bright boy amused. Don’t I, bright boy?”
“You talk too damn much,” Al said. “The nigger and my bright boy are amused by themselves. I
got them tied up like a couple of girl friends in the convent.”
“I suppose you were in a convent?”
“You never know.”
“You were in a kosher convent. That’s where you were.”
George looked up at the clock.
“If anybody comes in you tell them the cook is off, and if they keep after it, you tell them you’ll
go back and cook yourself. Do you get that, bright boy?”
“All right,” George said. “What you going to do with us afterward?”
“That’ll depend,” Max said. “That’s one of those things you never know at the time.”
George looked up at the clock. It was a quarter past six. The door from the street opened. A
street-car motorman came in.
“Hello, George,” he said. “Can I get supper?”
“Sam’s gone out,” George said. “He’ll be back in about half an hour.”
“I’d better go up the street,” the motorman said. George looked at the clock. It was twenty
minutes past six.
“That was nice, bright boy,” Max said. “You’re a regular little gentleman.”
“He knew I’d blow his head off,” Al said from the kitchen.
“No,” said Max. “It ain’t that. Bright boy is nice. He’s a nice boy. I like him.”
At six-fifty-five George said: “He’s not coming.”
Two other people had been in the lunch-room. Once George had gone out to the kitchen and
made a ham-and-egg sandwich “to go” that a man wanted to take with him. Inside the kitchen he saw
Al, his derby hat tipped back, sitting on a stool beside the wicket with the muzzle of a sawed-off
shotgun resting on the ledge. Nick and the cook were back to back in the corner, a towel tied in each
of their mouths. George had cooked the sandwich, wrapped it up in oiled paper, put it in a bag,
brought it in, and the man had paid for it and gone out.
“Bright boy can do everything,” Max said. “He can cook and everything. You’d make some girl a
nice wife, bright boy.”
“Yes?” George said. “Your friend, Ole Andreson, isn’t going to come.”
“We’ll give him ten minutes,” Max said.
Max watched the mirror and the clock. The hands of the clock marked seven o’clock, and then
five minutes past seven.
“Come on, Al,” said Max. “We better go. He’s not coming.”
“Better give him five minutes,” Al said from the kitchen.
In the five minutes a man came in, and George explained that the cook was sick.
“Why the hell don’t you get another cook?” the man asked. “Aren’t you running a lunch-counter?”
He went out.
“Come on, Al,” Max said.
“What about the two bright boys and the nigger?”
“They’re all right.”
“You think so?”
“Sure. We’re through with it.”
“I don’t like it,” said Al. “It’s sloppy. You talk too much.”
“Oh, what the hell,” said Max. “We got to keep amused, haven’t we?”
“You talk too much, all the same,” Al said. He came out from the kitchen. The cutoff barrels of
the shotgun made a slight bulge under the waist of his too tight-fitting overcoat. He straightened his
coat with his gloved hands.
“So long, bright boy,” he said to George. “You got a lot of luck.”
“That’s the truth,” Max said. “You ought to play the races, bright boy.”
The two of them went out the door. George watched them, through the window, pass under the
arc-light and cross the street. In their tight overcoats and derby hats they looked like a vaudeville
team. George went back through the swinging-door into the kitchen and untied Nick and the cook.
“I don’t want any more of that,” said Sam, the cook. “I don’t want any more of that.”
Nick stood up. He had never had a towel in his mouth before.
“Say,” he said. “What the hell?” He was trying to swagger it off.
“They were going to kill Ole Andreson,” George said. “They were going to shoot him when he
came in to eat.”
“Ole Andreson?”
“Sure.”
The cook felt the corners of his mouth with his thumbs.
“They all gone?” he asked.
“Yeah,” said George. “They’re gone now.”
“I don’t like it,” said the cook. “I don’t like any of it at all.”
“Listen,” George said to Nick. “You better go see Ole Andreson.”
“All right.”
“You better not have anything to do with it at all,” Sam, the cook, said. “You better stay way out
of it.”
“Don’t go if you don’t want to,” George said.
“Mixing up in this ain’t going to get you anywhere,” the cook said. “You stay out of it.”
“I’ll go see him,” Nick said to George. “Where does he live?”
The cook turned away.
“Little boys always know what they want to do,” he said.
“He lives up at Hirsch’s rooming-house,” George said to Nick.
“I’ll go up there.”
Outside the arc-light shone through the bare branches of a tree. Nick walked up the street beside
the car-tracks and turned at the next arc-light down a side-street. Three houses up the street was
Hirsch’s rooming-house. Nick walked up the two steps and pushed the bell. A woman came to the
door.
“Is Ole Andreson here?”
“Do you want to see him?”
“Yes, if he’s in.”
Nick followed the woman up a flight of stairs and back to the end of a corridor. She knocked on
the door.
“Who is it?”
“It’s somebody to see you, Mr. Andreson,” the woman said.
“It’s Nick Adams.”
“Come in.”
Nick opened the door and went into the room. Ole Andreson was lying on the bed with all his
clothes on. He had been a heavyweight prizefighter and he was too long for the bed. He lay with his
head on two pillows. He did not look at Nick.
“What was it?” he asked.
“I was up at Henry’s,” Nick said, “and two fellows came in and tied up me and the cook, and
they said they were going to kill you.”
It sounded silly when he said it. Ole Andreson said nothing.
“They put us out in the kitchen,” Nick went on. “They were going to shoot you when you came in
to supper.”
Ole Andreson looked at the wall and did not say anything.
“George thought I better come and tell you about it.”
“There isn’t anything I can do about it,” Ole Andreson said.
“I’ll tell you what they were like.”
“I don’t want to know what they were like,” Ole Andreson said. He looked at the wall. “Thanks
for coming to tell me about it.”
“That’s all right.”
Nick looked at the big man lying on the bed.
“Don’t you want me to go and see the police?”
“No,” Ole Andreson said. “That wouldn’t do any good.”
“Isn’t there something I could do?”
“No. There ain’t anything to do.”
“Maybe it was just a bluff.”
“No. It ain’t just a bluff.”
Ole Andreson rolled over toward the wall.
“The only thing is,” he said, talking toward the wall, “I just can’t make up my mind to go out. I
been in here all day.”
“Couldn’t you get out of town?”
“No,” Ole Andreson said. “I’m through with all that running around.”
He looked at the wall.
“There ain’t anything to do now.”
“Couldn’t you fix it up some way?”
“No. I got in wrong.” He talked in the same flat voice. “There ain’t anything to do. After a while
I’ll make up my mind to go out.”
“I better go back and see George,” Nick said.
“So long,” said Ole Andreson. He did not look toward Nick. “Thanks for coming around.”
Nick went out. As he shut the door he saw Ole Andreson with all his clothes on, lying on the bed
looking at the wall.
“He’s been in his room all day,” the landlady said down-stairs. “I guess he don’t feel well. I
said to him: ‘Mr. Andreson, you ought to go out and take a walk on a nice fall day like this,’ but he
didn’t feel like it.”
“He doesn’t want to go out.”
“I’m sorry he don’t feel well,” the woman said. “He’s an awfully nice man. He was in the ring,
you know.”
“I know it.”
“You’d never know it except from the way his face is,” the woman said. They stood talking just
inside the street door. “He’s just as gentle.”
“Well, good-night, Mrs. Hirsch,” Nick said.
“I’m not Mrs. Hirsch,” the woman said. “She owns the place. I just look after it for her. I’m Mrs.
Bell.”
“Well, good-night, Mrs. Bell,” Nick said.
“Good-night,” the woman said.
Nick walked up the dark street to the corner under the arc-light, and then along the car-tracks to
Henry’s eating-house. George was inside, back of the counter.
“Did you see Ole?”
“Yes,” said Nick. “He’s in his room and he won’t go out.”
The cook opened the door from the kitchen when he heard Nick’s voice.
“I don’t even listen to it,” he said and shut the door.
“Did you tell him about it?” George asked.
“Sure. I told him but he knows what it’s all about.”
“What’s he going to do?”
“Nothing.”
“They’ll kill him.”
“I guess they will.”
“He must have got mixed up in something in Chicago.”
“I guess so,” said Nick.
“It’s a hell of a thing.”
“It’s an awful thing,” Nick said.
They did not say anything. George reached down for a towel and wiped the counter.
“I wonder what he did?” Nick said.
“Double-crossed somebody. That’s what they kill them for.”
“I’m going to get out of this town,” Nick said.
“Yes,” said George. “That’s a good thing to do.”
“I can’t stand to think about him waiting in the room and knowing he’s going to get it. It’s too
damned awful.”
“Well,” said George, “you better not think about it.”
Che Ti Dice la Patria?
THE ROAD OF THE PASS WAS HARD AND smooth and not yet
dusty in the early morning. Below were the hills with oak and chestnut trees, and far away below was
the sea. On the other side were snowy mountains.
We came down from the pass through wooded country. There were bags of charcoal piled
beside the road, and through the trees we saw charcoal-burners’ huts. It was Sunday and the road,
rising and falling, but always dropping away from the altitude of the pass, went through the scrub
woods and through villages.
Outside the villages there were fields with vines. The fields were brown and the vines coarse
and thick. The houses were white, and in the streets the men, in their Sunday clothes, were playing
bowls. Against the walls of some of the houses there were pear trees, their branches candelabraed
against the white walls. The pear trees had been sprayed, and the walls of the houses were stained a
metallic blue-green by the spray vapor. There were small clearings around the villages where the
vines grew, and then the woods.
In a village, twenty kilometres above Spezia, there was a crowd in the square, and a young man
carrying a suitcase came up to the car and asked us to take him in to Spezia.
“There are only two places, and they are occupied,” I said. We had an old Ford coupé.
“I will ride on the outside.”
“You will be uncomfortable.”
“That makes nothing. I must go to Spezia.”
“Should we take him?” I asked Guy.
“He seems to be going anyway,” Guy said. The young man handed in a parcel through the
window.
“Look after this,” he said. Two men tied his suitcase on the back of the car, above our suitcases.
He shook hands with every one, explained that to a Fascist and a man as used to travelling as himself
there was no discomfort, and climbed up on the running-board on the left-hand side of the car, holding
on inside, his right arm through the open window.
“You can start,” he said. The crowd waved. He waved with his free hand.
“What did he say?” Guy asked me.
“That we could start.”
“Isn’t he nice?” Guy said.
The road followed a river. Across the river were mountains. The sun was taking the frost out of
the grass. It was bright and cold and the air came through the open wind-shield.
“How do you think he likes it out there?” Guy was looking up the road. His view out of his side
of the car was blocked by our guest. The young man projected from the side of the car like the
figurehead of a ship. He had turned his coat collar up and pulled his hat down and his nose looked
cold in the wind.
“Maybe he’ll get enough of it,” Guy said. “That’s the side our bum tire’s on.”
“Oh, he’d leave us if we blew out,” I said. “He wouldn’t get his travelling-clothes dirty.”
“Well, I don’t mind him,” Guy said—“except the way he leans out on the turns.”
The woods were gone; the road had left the river to climb; the radiator was boiling; the young
man looked annoyedly and suspiciously at the steam and rusty water; the engine was grinding, with
both Guy’s feet on the first-speed pedal, up and up, back and forth and up, and, finally, out level. The
grinding stopped, and in the new quiet there was a great churning bubbling in the radiator. We were at
the top of the last range above Spezia and the sea. The road descended with short, barely rounded
turns. Our guest hung out on the turns and nearly pulled the top-heavy car over.
“You can’t tell him not to,” I said to Guy. “It’s his sense of self-preservation.”
“The great Italian sense.”
“The greatest Italian sense.”
We came down around curves, through deep dust, the dust powdering the olive trees. Spezia
spread below along the sea. The road flattened outside the town. Our guest put his head in the
window.
“I want to stop.”
“Stop it,” I said to Guy.
We slowed up, at the side of the road. The young man got down, went to the back of the car and
untied the suitcase.
“I stop here, so you won’t get into trouble carrying passengers,” he said. “My package.”
I handed him the package. He reached in his pocket.
“How much do I owe you?”
“Nothing.”
“Why not?”
“I don’t know,” I said.
“Then thanks,” the young man said, not “thank you,” or “thank you very much,” or “thank you a
thousand times,” all of which you formerly said in Italy to a man when he handed you a time-table or
explained about a direction. The young man uttered the lowest form of the word “thanks” and looked
after us suspiciously as Guy started the car. I waved my hand at him. He was too dignified to reply.
We went on into Spezia.
“That’s a young man that will go a long way in Italy,” I said to Guy.
“Well,” said Guy, “he went twenty kilometres with us.”
A MEAL IN SPEZIA
We came into Spezia looking for a place to eat. The street was wide and the houses high and yellow.
We followed the tram-track into the center of town. On the walls of the houses were stencilled eyebugging portraits of Mussolini, with hand-painted “vivas,” the double V in black paint with drippings
of paint down the wall. Side-streets went down to the harbor. It was bright and the people were all
out for Sunday. The stone paving had been sprinkled and there were damp stretches in the dust. We
went close to the curb to avoid a tram.
“Let’s eat somewhere simple,” Guy said.
We stopped opposite two restaurant signs. We were standing across the street and I was buying
the papers. The two restaurants were side by side. A woman standing in the doorway of one smiled at
us and we crossed the street and went in.
It was dark inside and at the back of the room three girls were sitting at a table with an old
woman. Across from us, at another table, sat a sailor. He sat there neither eating nor drinking. Further
back, a young man in a blue suit was writing at a table. His hair was pomaded and shining and he was
very smartly dressed and clean-cut looking.
The light came through the doorway, and through the window where vegetables, fruit, steaks, and
chops were arranged in a show-case. A girl came and took our order and another girl stood in the
doorway. We noticed that she wore nothing under her house dress. The girl who took our order put
her arm around Guy’s neck while we were looking at the menu. There were three girls in all, and they
all took turns going and standing in the doorway. The old woman at the table in the back of the room
spoke to them and they sat down again with her.
There was no doorway leading from the room except into the kitchen. A curtain hung over it. The
girl who had taken our order came in from the kitchen with spaghetti. She put it on the table and
brought a bottle of red wine and sat down at the table.
“Well,” I said to Guy, “you wanted to eat some place simple.”
“This isn’t simple. This is complicated.”
“What do you say?” asked the girl. “Are you Germans?”
“South Germans,” I said. “The South Germans are a gentle, lovable people.”
“Don’t understand,” she said.
“What’s the mechanics of this place?” Guy asked. “Do I have to let her put her arm around my
neck?”
“Certainly,” I said. “Mussolini has abolished the brothels. This is a restaurant.”
The girl wore a one-piece dress. She leaned forward against the table and put her hands on her
breasts and smiled. She smiled better on one side than on the other and turned the good side toward
us. The charm of the good side had been enhanced by some event which had smoothed the other side
of her nose in, as warm wax can be smoothed. Her nose, however, did not look like warm wax. It was
very cold and firmed, only smoothed in. “You like me?” she asked Guy.
“He adores you,” I said. “But he doesn’t speak Italian.”
“Ich spreche Deutsch,” she said, and stroked Guy’s hair.
“Speak to the lady in your native tongue, Guy.”
“Where do you come from?” asked the lady.
“Potsdam.”
“And you will stay here now for a little while?”
“In this so dear Spezia?” I asked.
“Tell her we have to go,” said Guy. “Tell her we are very ill, and have no money.”
“My friend is a misogynist,” I said, “an old German misogynist.”
“Tell him I love him.”
I told him.
“Will you shut your mouth and get us out of here?” Guy said. The lady had placed another arm
around his neck. “Tell him he is mine,” she said. I told him.
“Will you get us out of here?”
“You are quarrelling,” the lady said. “You do not love one another.”
“We are Germans,” I said proudly, “old South Germans.”
“Tell him he is a beautiful boy,” the lady said. Guy is thirty-eight and takes some pride in the fact
that he is taken for a travelling salesman in France. “You are a beautiful boy,” I said.
“Who says so?” Guy asked, “you or her?”
“She does. I’m just your interpreter. Isn’t that what you got me in on this trip for?”
“I’m glad it’s her,” said Guy. “I didn’t want to have to leave you here too.”
“I don’t know. Spezia’s a lovely place.”
“Spezia,” the lady said. “You are talking about Spezia.”
“Lovely place,” I said.
“It is my country,” she said. “Spezia is my home and Italy is my country.”
“She says that Italy is her country.”
“Tell her it looks like her country,” Guy said.
“What have you for dessert?” I asked.
“Fruit,” she said. “We have bananas.”
“Bananas are all right,” Guy said. “They’ve got skins on.”
“Oh, he takes bananas,” the lady said. She embraced Guy.
“What does she say?” he asked, keeping his face out of the way.
“She is pleased because you take bananas.”
“Tell her I don’t take bananas.”
“The Signor does not take bananas.”
“Ah,” said the lady, crestfallen, “he doesn’t take bananas.”
“Tell her I take a cold bath every morning,” Guy said.
“The Signor takes a cold bath every morning.”
“No understand,” the lady said.
Across from us, the property sailor had not moved. No one in the place paid any attention to him.
“We want the bill,” I said.
“Oh, no. You must stay.”
“Listen,” the clean-cut young man said from the table where he was writing, “let them go. These
two are worth nothing.”
The lady took my hand. “You won’t stay? You won’t ask him to stay?”
“We have to go,” I said. “We have to get to Pisa, or if possible, Firenze, tonight. We can amuse
ourselves in those cities at the end of the day. It is now the day. In the day we must cover distance.”
“To stay a little while is nice.”
“To travel is necessary during the light of day.”
“Listen,” the clean-cut young man said. “Don’t bother to talk with these two. I tell you they are
worth nothing and I know.”
“Bring us the bill,” I said. She brought the bill from the old woman and went back and sat at the
table. Another girl came in from the kitchen. She walked the length of the room and stood in the
doorway.
“Don’t bother with these two,” the clean-cut young man said in a wearied voice. “Come and eat.
They are worth nothing.”
We paid the bill and stood up. All the girls, the old woman, and the clean-cut young man sat
down at table together. The property sailor sat with his head in his hands. No one had spoken to him
all the time we were at lunch. The girl brought us our change that the old woman counted out for her
and went back to her place at the table. We left a tip on the table and went out. When we were seated
in the car ready to start, the girl came out and stood in the door. We started and I waved to her. She
did not wave, but stood there looking after us.
AFTER THE RAIN
It was raining hard when we passed through the suburbs of Genoa and, even going very slowly behind
the tram-cars and the motor trucks, liquid mud splashed on to the sidewalks, so that people stepped
into doorways as they saw us coming. In San Pier d’Arena, the industrial suburb outside of Genoa,
there is a wide street with two car-tracks and we drove down the center to avoid sending the mud on
to the men going home from work. On our left was the Mediterranean. There was a big sea running
and waves broke and the wind blew the spray against the car. A river-bed that, when we had passed,
going into Italy, had been wide, stony and dry, was running brown, and up to the banks. The brown
water discolored the sea and as the waves thinned and cleared in breaking, the light came through the
yellow water and the crests, detached by the wind, blew across the road.
A big car passed us, going fast, and a sheet of muddy water rose up and over our wind-shield
and radiator. The automatic wind-shield cleaner moved back and forth, spreading the film over the
glass. We stopped and ate lunch at Sestri. There was no heat in the restaurant and we kept our hats
and coats on. We could see the car outside, through the window. It was covered with mud and was
stopped beside some boats that had been pulled up beyond the waves. In the restaurant you could see
your breath.
The pasta asciutta was good; the wine tasted of alum, and we poured water in it. Afterward the
waiter brought beefsteak and fried potatoes. A man and a woman sat at the far end of the restaurant.
He was middle-aged and she was young and wore black. All during the meal she would blow out her
breath in the cold damp air. The man would look at it and shake his head. They ate without talking and
the man held her hand under the table. She was good-looking and they seemed very sad. They had a
travelling-bag with them.
We had the papers and I read the account of the Shanghai fighting aloud to Guy. After the meal,
he left with the waiter in search for a place which did not exist in the restaurant, and I cleaned off the
wind-shield, the lights and the license plates with a rag. Guy came back and we backed the car out
and started. The waiter had taken him across the road and into an old house. The people in the house
were suspicious and the waiter had remained with Guy to see nothing was stolen.
“Although I don’t know how, me not being a plumber, they expected me to steal anything,” Guy
said.
As we came up on a headland beyond the town, the wind struck the car and nearly tipped it over.
“It’s good it blows us away from the sea,” Guy said.
“Well,” I said, “they drowned Shelley somewhere along here.”
“That was down by Viareggio,” Guy said. “Do you remember what we came to this country
for?”
“Yes,” I said, “but we didn’t get it.”
“We’ll be out of it tonight.”
“If we can get past Ventimiglia.”
“We’ll see. I don’t like to drive this coast at night.” It was early afternoon and the sun was out.
Below, the sea was blue with whitecaps running toward Savona. Back, beyond the cape, the brown
and blue water joined. Out ahead of us, a tramp steamer was going up the coast.
“Can you still see Genoa?” Guy asked.
“Oh, yes.”
“That next big cape ought to put it out of sight.”
“We’ll see it a long time yet. I can still see Portofino Cape behind it.”
Finally we could not see Genoa. I looked back as we came out and there was only the sea, and
below, in the bay, a line of beach with fishing-boats and above, on the side of the hill, a town and then
capes far down the coast.
“It’s gone now,” I said to Guy.
“Oh, it’s been gone a long time now.”
“But we couldn’t be sure till we got way out.”
There was a sign with a picture of an S-turn and Svolta Pericolosa. The road curved around the
headland and the wind blew through the crack in the wind-shield. Below the cape was a flat stretch
beside the sea. The wind had dried the mud and the wheels were beginning to lift dust. On the flat
road we passed a Fascist riding a bicycle, a heavy revolver in a holster on his back. He held the
middle of the road on his bicycle and we turned out for him. He looked up at us as we passed. Ahead
there was a railway crossing, and as we came toward it the gates went down.
As we waited, the Fascist came up on his bicycle. The train went by and Guy started the engine.
“Wait,” the bicycle man shouted from behind the car. “Your number’s dirty.”
I got out with a rag. The number had been cleaned at lunch.
“You can read it,” I said.
“You think so?”
“Read it.”
“I cannot read it. It is dirty.”
I wiped it off with the rag.
“How’s that?”
“Twenty-five lire.”
“What?” I said. “You could have read it. It’s only dirty from the state of the roads.”
“You don’t like Italian roads?”
“They are dirty.”
“Fifty lire.” He spat in the road. “Your car is dirty and you are dirty too.”
“Good. And give me a receipt with your name.”
He took out a receipt book, made in duplicate, and perforated, so one side could be given to the
customer, and the other side filled in and kept as a stub. There was no carbon to record what the
customer’s ticket said.
“Give me fifty lire.”
He wrote in indelible pencil, tore out the slip and handed it to me. I read it.
“This is for twenty-five lire.”
“A mistake,” he said, and changed the twenty-five to fifty.
“And now the other side. Make it fifty in the part you keep.”
He smiled a beautiful Italian smile and wrote something on the receipt stub, holding it so I could
not see.
“Go on,” he said, “before your number gets dirty again.”
We drove for two hours after it was dark and slept in Mentone that night. It seemed very cheerful
and clean and sane and lovely. We had driven from Ventimiglia to Pisa and Florence, across the
Romagna to Rimini, back through Forli, Imola, Bologna, Parma, Piacenza and Genoa, to Ventimiglia
again. The whole trip had taken only ten days. Naturally, in such a short trip, we had no opportunity to
see how things were with the country or the people.
Fifty Grand
“HOW ARE YOU GOING YOURSELF, Jack?” I asked him.
“You seen this Walcott?” he says.
“Just in the gym.”
“Well,” Jack says, “I’m going to need a lot of luck with that boy.”
“He can’t hit you. Jack,” Soldier said.
“I wish to hell he couldn’t.”
“He couldn’t hit you with a handful of bird-shot.”
“Bird-shot’d be all right,” Jack says. “I wouldn’t mind bird-shot any.”
“He looks easy to hit,” I said.
“Sure,” Jack says, “he ain’t going to last long. He ain’t going to last like you and me, Jerry. But
right now he’s got everything.”
“You’ll left-hand him to death.”
“Maybe,” Jack says. “Sure. I got a chance to.”
“Handle him like you handled Kid Lewis.”
“Kid Lewis,” Jack said. “That kike!”
The three of us, Jack Brennan, Soldier Bartlett, and I were in Hanley’s. There were a couple of
broads sitting at the next table to us. They had been drinking.
“What do you mean, kike?” one of the broads says. “What do you mean, kike, you big Irish
bum?”
“Sure,” Jack says. “That’s it.”
“Kikes,” this broad goes on. “They’re always talking about kikes, these big Irishmen. What do
you mean, kikes?”
“Come on. Let’s get out of here.”
“Kikes,” this broad goes on. “Whoever saw you ever buy a drink? Your wife sews your pockets
up every morning. These Irishmen and their kikes! Ted Lewis could lick you too.”
“Sure,” Jack says. “And you give away a lot of things free too, don’t you?”
We went out. That was Jack. He could say what he wanted to when he wanted to say it.
Jack started training out at Danny Hogan’s health farm over in Jersey. It was nice out there but
Jack didn’t like it much. He didn’t like being away from his wife and the kids, and he was sore and
grouchy most of the time. He liked me and we got along fine together; and he liked Hogan, but after a
while Soldier Bartlett commenced to get on his nerves. A kidder gets to be an awful thing around a
camp if his stuff goes sort of sour. Soldier was always kidding Jack, just sort of kidding him all the
time. It wasn’t very funny and it wasn’t very good, and it began to get to Jack. It was sort of stuff like
this. Jack would finish up with the weights and the bag and pull on the gloves.
“You want to work?” he’d say to Soldier.
“Sure. How you want me to work?” Soldier would ask. “Want me to treat you rough like
Walcott? Want me to knock you down a few times?”
“That’s it,” Jack would say. He didn’t like it any, though.
One morning we were all out on the road. We’d been out quite a way and now we were coming
back. We’d go along fast for three minutes and then walk a minute, and then go fast for three minutes
again. Jack wasn’t ever what you would call a sprinter. He’d move around fast enough in the ring if
he had to, but he wasn’t any too fast on the road. All the time we were walking Soldier was kidding
him. We came up the hill to the farmhouse.
“Well,” says Jack, “you better go back to town. Soldier.”
“What do you mean?”
“You better go back to town and stay there.”
“What’s the matter?”
“I’m sick of hearing you talk.”
“Yes?” says Soldier.
“Yes.” says Jack.
“You’ll be a damn sight sicker when Walcott gets through with you.”
“Sure,” says Jack, “maybe I will. But I know I’m sick of you.”
So Soldier went off on the train to town that same morning. I went down with him to the train. He
was good and sore.
“I was just kidding him,” he said. We were waiting on the platform. “He can’t pull that stuff with
me, Jerry.”
“He’s nervous and crabby,” I said. “He’s a good fellow, Soldier.”
“The hell he is. The hell he’s ever been a good fellow.”
“Well,” I said, “so long, Soldier.”
The train had come in. He climbed up with his bag.
“So long, Jerry,” he says. “You be in town before the fight?”
“I don’t think so.”
“See you then.”
He went in and the conductor swung up and the train went out. I rode back to the farm in the cart.
Jack was on the porch writing a letter to his wife. The mail had come and I got the papers and went
over on the other side of the porch and sat down to read. Hogan came out the door and walked over to
me.
“Did he have a jam with Soldier?”
“Not a jam,” I said. “He just told him to go back to town.”
“I could see it coming,” Hogan said. “He never liked Soldier much.”
“No. He don’t like many people.”
“He’s a pretty cold one,” Hogan said.
“Well, he’s always been fine to me.”
“Me too,” Hogan said. “I got no kick on him. He’s a cold one, though.”
Hogan went in through the screen door and I sat there on the porch and read the papers. It was
just starting to get fall weather and it’s nice country there in Jersey, up in the hills, and after I read the
paper through I sat there and looked out at the country and the road down below against the woods
with cars going along it, lifting the dust up. It was fine weather and pretty nice-looking country. Hogan
came to the door and I said, “Say, Hogan, haven’t you got anything to shoot out here?”
“No,” Hogan said. “Only sparrows.”
“Seen the paper?” I said to Hogan.
“What’s in it?”
“Sande booted three of them in yesterday.”
“I got that on the telephone last night.”
“You follow them pretty close, Hogan?” I asked.
“Oh, I keep in touch with them,” Hogan said.
“How about Jack?” I says. “Does he still play them?”
“Him?” said Hogan. “Can you see him doing it?”
Just then Jack came around the corner with the letter in his hand. He’s wearing a sweater and an
old pair of pants and boxing shoes.
“Got a stamp, Hogan?” he asks.
“Give me the letter,” Hogan said. “I’ll mail it for you.”
“Say, Jack,” I said, “didn’t you used to play the ponies?”
“Sure.”
“I knew you did. I knew I used to see you out at Sheepshead.”
“What did you lay off them for?” Hogan asked.
“Lost money.”
Jack sat down on the porch by me. He leaned back against a post. He shut his eyes in the sun.
“Want a chair?” Hogan asked.
“No,” said Jack. “This is fine.”
“It’s a nice day,” I said. “It’s pretty nice out in the country.”
“I’d a damn sight rather be in town with the wife.”
“Well, you only got another week.”
“Yes,” Jack says. “That’s so.”
We sat there on the porch. Hogan was inside at the office.
“What do you think about the shape I’m in?” Jack asked me.
“Well, you can’t tell,” I said. “You got a week to get around into form.”
“Don’t stall me.”
“Well,” I said, “you’re not right.”
“I’m not sleeping,” Jack said.
“You’ll be all right in a couple of days.”
“No,” says Jack, “I got the insomnia.”
“What’s on your mind?”
“I miss the wife.”
“Have her come out.”
“No. I’m too old for that.”
“We’ll take a long walk before you turn in and get you good and tired.”
“Tired!” Jack says. “I’m tired all the time.”
He was that way all week. He wouldn’t sleep at night and he’d get up in the morning feeling that
way, you know, when you can’t shut your hands. “He’s stale as poorhouse cake,” Hogan said. “He’s
nothing.”
“I never seen Walcott,” I said.
“He’ll kill him,” said Hogan. “He’ll tear him in two.”
“Well,” I said, “everybody’s got to get it sometime.”
“Not like this, though,” Hogan said. “They’ll think he never trained. It gives the farm a black
eye.”
“You hear what the reporters said about him?”
“Didn’t I! They said he was awful. They said they oughtn’t to let him fight.”
“Well,” I said, “they’re always wrong, ain’t they?”
“Yes,” said Hogan. “But this time they’re right.”
“What the hell do they know about whether a man’s right or not?”
“Well,” said Hogan, “they’re not such fools.”
“All they did was pick Willard at Toledo. This Lardner, he’s so wise now, ask him about when
he picked Willard at Toledo.”
“Aw, he wasn’t out,” Hogan said. “He only writes the big fights.”
“I don’t care who they are,” I said. “What the hell do they know? They can write maybe, but
what the hell do they know?”
“You don’t think Jack’s in any shape, do you?” Hogan asked.
“No. He’s through. All he needs is to have Corbett pick him to win for it to be all over.”
“Well, Corbett’ll pick him,” Hogan says.
“Sure. He’ll pick him.”
That night Jack didn’t sleep any either. The next morning was the last day before the fight. After
breakfast we were out on the porch again.
“What do you think about, Jack, when you can’t sleep?” I said.
“Oh, I worry,” Jack says. “I worry about property I got up in the Bronx, I worry about property I
got in Florida. I worry about the kids. I worry about the wife. Sometimes I think about fights. I think
about that kike Ted Lewis and I get sore. I got some stocks and I worry about them. What the hell
don’t I think about?”
“Well,” I said, “tomorrow night it’ll all be over.”
“Sure,” said Jack. “That always helps a lot, don’t it? That just fixes everything all up, I suppose.
Sure.”
He was sore all day. We didn’t do any work. Jack just moved around a little to loosen up. He
shadow-boxed a few rounds. He didn’t even look good doing that. He skipped the rope a little while.
He couldn’t sweat.
“He’d be better not to do any work at all,” Hogan said. We were standing watching him skip
rope. “Don’t he ever sweat at all any more?”
“He can’t sweat.”
“Do you suppose he’s got the con? He never had any trouble making weight did he?”
“No, he hasn’t got any con. He just hasn’t got anything inside any more.”
“He ought to sweat,” said Hogan.
Jack came over, skipping the rope. He was skipping up and down in front of us, forward and
back, crossing his arms every third time.
“Well,” he says. “What are you buzzards talking about?”
“I don’t think you ought to work any more,” Hogan says. “You’ll be stale.”
“Wouldn’t that be awful?” Jack says and skips away down the floor, slapping the rope hard.
That afternoon John Collins showed up out at the farm. Jack was up in his room. John came out
in a car from town. He had a couple of friends with him. The car stopped and they all got out.
“Where’s Jack?” John asked me.
“Up in his room, lying down.”
“Lying down?”
“Yes,” I said.
“How is he?”
I looked at the two fellows that were with John.
“They’re friends of his,” John said.
“He’s pretty bad,” I said.
“What’s the matter with him?”
“He don’t sleep.”
“Hell,” said John. “That Irishman could never sleep.”
“He isn’t right,” I said.
“Hell,” John said. “He’s never right. I’ve had him for ten years and he’s never been right yet.”
The fellows who were with him laughed.
“I want you to shake hands with Mr. Morgan and Mr. Steinfelt,” John said. “This is Mr. Doyle.
He’s been training Jack.”
“Glad to meet you,” I said.
“Let’s go up and see the boy,” the fellow called Morgan said.
“Let’s have a look at him,” Steinfelt said.
We all went upstairs.
“Where’s Hogan?” John asked.
“He’s out in the barn with a couple of his customers,” I said.
“He got many people out here now?” John asked.
“Just two.”
“Pretty quiet, ain’t it?” Morgan said.
“Yes,” I said. “It’s pretty quiet.”
We were outside Jack’s room. John knocked on the door. There wasn’t any answer.
“Maybe he’s asleep,” I said.
“What the hell’s he sleeping in the daytime for?”
John turned the handle and we all went in. Jack was lying asleep on the bed. He was face down
and his face was in the pillow. Both his arms were around the pillow.
“Hey, Jack!” John said to him.
Jack’s head moved a little on the pillow. “Jack!” John says, leaning over him. Jack just dug a
little deeper in the pillow. John touched him on the shoulder. Jack sat up and looked at us. He hadn’t
shaved and he was wearing an old sweater.
“Christ! Why can’t you let me sleep?” he says to John.
“Don’t be sore,” John says. “I didn’t mean to wake you up.”
“Oh no,” Jack says. “Of course not.”
“You know Morgan and Steinfelt,” John said.
“Glad to see you,” Jack says.
“How do you feel, Jack?” Morgan asks him.
“Fine,” Jack says. “How the hell would I feel?”
“You look fine,” Steinfelt says.
“Yes, don’t 11,” says Jack. “Say,” he says to John. “You’re my manager. You get a big enough
cut. Why the hell don’t you come out here when the reporters was out! You want Jerry and me to talk
to them?”
“I had Lew fighting in Philadelphia,” John said.
“What the hell’s that to me?” Jack says. “You’re my manager. You get a big enough cut, don’t
you? You aren’t making me any money in Philadelphia, are you? Why the hell aren’t you out here
when I ought to have you?”
“Hogan was here.”
“Hogan,” Jack says. “Hogan’s as dumb as I am.”
“Soldier Bahtlett was out here wukking with you for a while, wasn’t he?” Steinfelt said to
change the subject.
“Yes, he was out here,” Jack says. “He was out here all right.”
“Say, Jerry,” John said to me. “Would you go and find Hogan and tell him we want to see him in
about half an hour?”
“Sure,” I said.
“Why the hell can’t he stick around?” Jack says. “Stick around, Jerry.”
Morgan and Steinfelt looked at each other.
“Quiet down, Jack,” John said to him.
“I better go find Hogan,” I said.
“All right, if you want to go,” Jack says. “None of these guys are going to send you away,
though.”
“I’ll go find Hogan,” I said.
Hogan was out in the gym in the barn. He had a couple of his health-farm patients with the gloves
on. They neither one wanted to hit the other, for fear the other would come back and hit him.
“That’ll do,” Hogan said when he saw me come in. “You can stop the slaughter. You gentlemen
take a shower and Bruce will rub you down.”
They climbed out through the ropes and Hogan came over to me.
“John Collins is out with a couple of friends to see Jack,” I said.
“I saw them come up in the car.”
“Who are the two fellows with John?”
“They’re what you call wise boys,” Hogan said. “Don’t you know them two?”
“No,” I said.
“That’s Happy Steinfelt and Lew Morgan. They got a pool-room.’
“I been away a long time,” I said.
“Sure,” said Hogan. “That Happy Steinfelt’s a big operator.”
“I’ve heard his name,” I said.
“He’s a pretty smooth boy,” Hogan said. “They’re a couple of sharpshooters.”
“Well,” I said. “They want to see us in half an hour.”
“You mean they don’t want to see us until a half an hour?”
“That’s it.”
“Come on in the office,” Hogan said. “To hell with those sharpshooters.”
After about thirty minutes or so Hogan and I went upstairs. We knocked on Jack’s door. They
were talking inside the room.
“Wait a minute,” somebody said.
“To hell with that stuff,” Hogan said. “When you want to see me I’m down in the office.”
We heard the door unlock. Steinfelt opened it.
“Come on in, Hogan,” he says. “We’re all going to have a drink.”
“Well,” says Hogan. “That’s something.”
We went in. Jack was sitting on the bed. John and Morgan were sitting on a couple of chairs.
Steinfelt was standing up.
“You’re a pretty mysterious lot of boys,” Hogan said.
“Hello, Danny,” John says.
“Hello, Danny,” Morgan says and shakes hands.
Jack doesn’t say anything. He just sits there on the bed. He ain’t with the others. He’s all by
himself. He was wearing an old blue jersey and pants and had on boxing shoes. He needed a shave.
Steinfelt and Morgan were dressers. John was quite a dresser too. Jack sat there looking Irish and
tough.
Steinfelt brought out a bottle and Hogan brought in some glasses and everybody had a drink. Jack
and I took one and the rest of them went on and had two or three each.
“Better save some for your ride back,” Hogan said.
“Don’t you worry. We got plenty,” Morgan said.
Jack hadn’t drunk anything since the one drink. He was standing up and looking at them. Morgan
was sitting on the bed where Jack had sat.
“Have a drink. Jack,” John said and handed him the glass and the bottle.
“No,” Jack said, “I never liked to go to these wakes.”
They all laughed. Jack didn’t laugh.
They were all feeling pretty good when they left. Jack stood on the porch when they got into the
car. They waved to him.
“So long,” Jack said.
We had supper. Jack didn’t say anything all during the meal except, “Will you pass me this?” or
“Will you pass me that?” The two health-farm patients ate at the same table with us. They were pretty
nice fellows. After we finished eating we went out on the porch. It was dark early.
“Like to take a walk, Jerry?” Jack asked.
“Sure,” I said.
We put on our coats and started out. It was quite a way down to the main road and then we
walked along the main road about a mile and a half. Cars kept going by and we would pull out to the
side until they were past. Jack didn’t say anything. After we had stepped out into the bushes to let a
big car go by Jack said, “To hell with this walking. Come on back to Hogan’s.”
We went along a side road that cut up over the hill and cut across the fields back to Hogan’s. We
could see the lights of the house up on the hill. We came around to the front of the house and there
standing in the doorway was Hogan.
“Have a good walk?” Hogan asked.
“Oh, fine,” Jack said. “Listen, Hogan. Have you got any liquor?”
“Sure,” says Hogan. “What’s the idea?”
“Send it up to the room,” Jack says. “I’m going to sleep tonight.”
“You’re the doctor,” Hogan says.
“Come on up to the room, Jerry,” Jack says.
Upstairs Jack sat on the bed with his head in his hands.
“Ain’t it a life?” Jack says.
Hogan brought in a quart of liquor and two glasses.
“Want some ginger ale?”
“What do you think I want to do, get sick?”
“I just asked you,” said Hogan.
“Have a drink?” said Jack.
“No, thanks,” said Hogan. He went out.
“How about you, Jerry?”
“I’ll have one with you,” I said.
Jack poured out a couple of drinks. “Now,” he said, “I want to take it slow and easy.”
“Put some water in it,” I said.
“Yes,” Jack said. “I guess that’s better.”
We had a couple of drinks without saying anything. Jack started to pour me another.
“No,” I said, “that’s all I want.”
“All right,” Jack said. He poured himself out another big shot and put water in it. He was
lighting up a little.
“That was a fine bunch out here this afternoon,” he said. “They don’t take any chances, those
two.”
Then a little later, “Well,” he says, “they’re right. What the hell’s the good in taking chances?”
“Don’t you want another. Jerry?” he said. “Come on, drink along with me.”
“I don’t need it, Jack,” I said. “I feel all right.”
“Just have one more,” Jack said. It was softening him up.
“All right,” I said.
Jack poured one for me and another big one for himself.
“You know,” he said, “I like liquor pretty well. If I hadn’t been boxing I would have drunk quite
a lot.”
“Sure,” I said.
“You know,” he said, “I missed a lot, boxing.”
“You made plenty of money.”
“Sure, that’s what I’m after. You know I miss a lot. Jerry.”
“How do you mean?”
“Well,” he says, “like about the wife. And being away from home so much. It don’t do my girls
any good. ‘Who’s your old man?’ some of those society kids’ll say to them. ‘My old man’s Jack
Brennan.’ That don’t do them any good.”
“Hell,” I said, “all that makes a difference is if they got dough.”
“Well,” says Jack, “I got the dough for them all right.”
He poured out another drink. The bottle was about empty.
“Put some water in it,” I said. Jack poured in some water.
“You know,” he says, “you ain’t got any idea how I miss the wife.”
“Sure.”
“You ain’t got any idea. You can’t have an idea what it’s like.”
“It ought to be better out in the country than in town.”
“With me now,” Jack said, “it don’t make any difference where I am. You can’t have an idea
what it’s like.”
“Have another drink.”
“Am I getting soused? Do I talk funny?”
“You’re coming on all right.”
“You can’t have an idea what it’s like. They ain’t anybody can have an idea what it’s like.”
“Except the wife,” I said.
“She knows,” Jack said. “She knows all right. She knows. You bet she knows.”
“Put some water in that,” I said.
“Jerry,” says Jack, “you can’t have an idea what it gets to be like.”
He was good and drunk. He was looking at me steady. His eyes were sort of too steady.
“You’ll sleep all right,” I said.
“Listen Jerry,” Jack says. “You want to make some money? Get some money down on Walcott.”
“Yes?”
“Listen, Jerry,” Jack put down the glass. “I’m not drunk now, see? You know what I’m betting on
him? Fifty grand.”
“That’s a lot of dough.”
“Fifty grand,” Jack says, “at two to one. I’ll get twenty-five thousand bucks. Get some money on
him, Jerry.”
“It sounds good,” I said.
“How can I beat him?” Jack says. “It ain’t crooked. How can I beat him? Why not make money
on it?”
“Put some water in that,” I said.
“I’m through after this fight,” Jack says. “I’m through with it. I got to take a beating. Why
shouldn’t I make money on it?”
“Sure.”
“I ain’t slept for a week,” Jack says. “All night I lay awake and worry my can off. I can’t sleep,
Jerry. You ain’t got an idea what it’s like when you can’t sleep.”
“Sure.”
“I can’t sleep. That’s all. I just can’t sleep. What’s the use of taking care of yourself all these
years when you can’t sleep?”
“It’s bad.”
“You ain’t got an idea what it’s like, Jerry, when you can’t sleep.”
“Put some water in that,” I said.
Well, about eleven o’clock Jack passes out and I put him to bed. Finally he’s so he can’t keep
from sleeping. I helped him get his clothes off and got him into bed.
“You’ll sleep all right. Jack,” I said.
“Sure,” Jack says, “I’ll sleep now.”
“Good night, Jack,” I said.
“Good night, Jerry,” Jack says. “You’re the only friend I got.”
“Oh, hell,” I said.
“You’re the only friend I got,” Jack says, “the only friend I got.”
“Go to sleep,” I said.
“I’ll sleep,” Jack says.
Downstairs Hogan was sitting at the desk in the office reading the papers. He looked up. “Well,
you get your boy friend to sleep?” he asks.
“He’s off.”
“It’s better for him than not sleeping,” Hogan said.
“Sure.”
“You’d have a hell of a time explaining that to these sport writers though,” Hogan said.
“Well, I’m going to bed myself,” I said.
“Good night,” said Hogan.
In the morning I came downstairs about eight o’clock and got some breakfast. Hogan had his two
customers out in the barn doing exercises. I went out and watched them.
“One! Two! Three! Four!” Hogan was counting for them. “Hello, Jerry,” he said. “Is Jack up
yet?”
“No. He’s still sleeping.”
I went back to my room and packed up to go in to town. About nine-thirty I heard Jack getting up
in the next room. When I heard him go downstairs I went down after him. Jack was sitting at the
breakfast table. Hogan had come in and was standing beside the table.
“How do you feel, Jack?” I asked him.
“Not so bad.”
“Sleep well?” Hogan asked.
“I slept all right,” Jack said. “I got a thick tongue but I ain’t got a head.”
“Good,” said Hogan. “That was good liquor.”
“Put it on the bill,” Jack says.
“What time you want to go into town?” Hogan asked.
“Before lunch,” Jack says. “The eleven o’clock train.”
“Sit down, Jerry,” Jack said. Hogan went out.
I sat down at the table. Jack was eating a grapefruit. When he’d find a seed he’d spit it out in the
spoon and dump it on the plate.
“I guess I was pretty stewed last night,” he started.
“You drank some liquor.”
“I guess I said a lot of fool things.”
“You weren’t bad.”
“Where’s Hogan?” he asked. He was through with the grapefruit.
“He’s out in front in the office.”
“What did I say about betting on the fight?” Jack asked. He was holding the spoon and sort of
poking at the grapefruit with it.
The girl came in with some ham and eggs and took away the grapefruit.
“Bring me another glass of milk,” Jack said to her. She went out.
“You said you had fifty grand on Walcott,” I said.
“That’s right,” Jack said.
“That’s a lot of money.”
“I don’t feel too good about it,” Jack said.
“Something might happen.”
“No,” Jack said. “He wants the title bad. They’ll be shooting with him all right.”
“You can’t ever tell.”
“No. He wants the title. It’s worth a lot of money to him.”
“Fifty grand is a lot of money,” I said.
“It’s business,” said Jack. “I can’t win. You know I can’t win anyway.”
“As long as you’re in there you got a chance.”
“No,” Jack says. “I’m all through. It’s just business.”
“How do you feel?”
“Pretty good,” Jack said. “The sleep was what I needed.”
“You might go good.”
“I’ll give them a good show,” Jack said.
After breakfast Jack called up his wife on the long-distance. He was inside the booth
telephoning.
“That’s the first time he’s called her up since he’s out here,” Hogan said.
“He writes her every day.”
“Sure,” Hogan says, “a letter only costs two cents.”
Hogan said good-by to us and Brace, the nigger rubber, drove us down to the train in the cart.
“Good-by, Mr. Brennan,” Bruce said at the train, “I sure hope you knock his can off.”
“So long,” Jack said. He gave Bruce two dollars. Bruce had worked on him a lot. He looked
kind of disappointed. Jack saw me looking at Bruce holding the two dollars.
“It’s all in the bill,” he said. “Hogan charged me for the rubbing.”
On the train going into town Jack didn’t talk. He sat in the corner of the seat with his ticket in his
hat-band and looked out of the window. Once he turned and spoke to me.
“I told the wife I’d take a room at the Shelby tonight,” he said. “It’s just around the corner from
the Garden. I can go up to the house tomorrow morning.”
“That’s a good idea,” I said. “Your wife ever see you fight, Jack?”
“No,” Jack says. “She never seen me fight.”
I thought he must be figuring on taking an awful beating if he doesn’t want to go home afterward.
In town we took a taxi up to the Shelby. A boy came out and took our bags and we went in to the desk.
“How much are the rooms?” Jack asked.
“We only have double rooms,” the clerk says. “I can give you a nice double room for ten
dollars.”
“That’s too steep.”
“I can give you a double room for seven dollars.”
“With a bath?”
“Certainly.”
“You might as well bunk with me, Jerry,” Jack says.
“Oh,” I said, “I’ll sleep down at my brother-in-law’s.”
“I don’t mean for you to pay it,” Jack says. “I just want to get my money’s worth.”
“Will you register, please?” the clerk says. He looked at the names. “Number 238, Mr.
Brennan.”
We went up in the elevator. It was a nice big room with two beds and a door opening into a
bath-room.
“This is pretty good,” Jack says.
The boy who brought us up pulled up the curtains and brought in our bags. Jack didn’t make any
move, so I gave the boy a quarter. We washed up and Jack said we better go out and get something to
eat.
We ate a lunch at Jimmy Hanley’s place. Quite a lot of the boys were there. When we were
about half through eating, John came in and sat down with us. Jack didn’t talk much.
“How are you on the weight. Jack?” John asked him. Jack was putting away a pretty good lunch.
“I could make it with my clothes on,” Jack said. He never had to worry about taking off weight.
He was a natural welterweight and he’d never gotten fat. He’d lost weight out at Hogan’s.
“Well, that’s one thing you never had to worry about,” John said.
“That’s one thing,” Jack says.
We went around to the Garden to weigh in after lunch. The match was made at a hundred fortyseven pounds at three o’clock. Jack stepped on the scales with a towel around him. The bar didn’t
move. Walcott had just weighed and was standing with a lot of people around him.
“Let’s see what you weigh, Jack,” Freedman, Walcott’s manager said.
“All right, weigh him then,” Jack jerked his head toward Walcott.
“Drop the towel,” Freedman said.
“What do you make it?” Jack asked the fellows who were weighing.
“One hundred and forty-three pounds,” the fat man who was weighing said.
“You’re down fine, Jack,” Freedman says.
“Weigh him,” Jack says.
Walcott came over. He was a blond with wide shoulders and arms like a heavyweight. He didn’t
have much legs. Jack stood about half a head taller than he did.
“Hello, Jack,” he said. His face was plenty marked up.
“Hello,” said Jack. “How you feel?”
“Good,” Walcott says. He dropped the towel from around his waist and stood on the scales. He
had the widest shoulders and back you ever saw.
“One hundred and forty-six pounds and twelve ounces.”
Walcott stepped off and grinned at Jack.
“Well,” John says to him, “Jack’s spotting you about four pounds.”
“More than that when I come in, kid,” Walcott says. “I’m going to go and eat now.”
We went back and Jack got dressed. “He’s a pretty tough-looking boy,” Jack says to me.
“He looks as though he’d been hit plenty of times.”
“Oh, yes,” Jack says. “He ain’t hard to hit.”
“Where are you going?” John asked when Jack was dressed.
“Back to the hotel,” Jack says. “You looked after everything?”
“Yes,” John says. “It’s all looked after.”
“I’m going to lie down a while,” Jack says.
“I’ll come around for you about a quarter to seven and we’ll go and eat.”
“All right.”
Up at the hotel Jack took off his shoes and his coat and lay down for a while. I wrote a letter. I
looked over a couple of times and Jack wasn’t sleeping. He was lying perfectly still but every once in
a while his eyes would open. Finally he sits up.
“Want to play some cribbage, Jerry?” he says.
“Sure,” I said.
He went over to his suitcase and got out the cards and the cribbage board. We played cribbage
and he won three dollars off me. John knocked at the door and came in.
“Want to play some cribbage, John?” Jack asked him.
John put his hat down on the table. It was all wet. His coat was wet too.
“Is it raining?” Jack asks.
“It’s pouring,” John says. “The taxi I had got tied up in the traffic and I got out and walked.”
“Come on, play some cribbage,” Jack says.
“You ought to go and eat.”
“No,” says Jack. “I don’t want to eat yet.”
So they played cribbage for about half an hour and Jack won a dollar and a half off him.
“Well, I suppose we got to go eat,” Jack says. He went to the window and looked out.
“Is it still raining?”
“Yes.”
“Let’s eat in the hotel,” John says.
“All right,” Jack says, “I’ll play you once more to see who pays for the meal.”
After a little while Jack gets up and says, “You buy the meal, John,” and we went downstairs
and ate in the big dining-room.
After we ate we went upstairs and Jack played cribbage with John again and won two dollars
and a half off him. Jack was feeling pretty good. John had a bag with him with all his stuff in it. Jack
took off his shirt and collar and put on a jersey and a sweater, so he wouldn’t catch cold when he
came out, and put his ring clothes and his bathrobe in a bag.
“You all ready?” John asks him. “I’ll call up and have them get a taxi.”
Pretty soon the telephone rang and they said the taxi was waiting.
We rode down in the elevator and went out through the lobby, and got in a taxi and rode around
to the Garden. It was raining hard but there was a lot of people outside on the streets. The Garden was
sold out. As we came in on our way to the dressing-room I saw how full it was. It looked like half a
mile down to the ring. It was all dark. Just the lights over the ring.
“It’s a good thing, with this rain, they didn’t try and pull this fight in the ball park,” John said.
“They got a good crowd,” Jack says.
“This is a fight that would draw a lot more than the Garden could hold.”
“You can’t tell about the weather,” Jack says.
John came to the door of the dressing-room and poked his head in. Jack was sitting there with his
bathrobe on, he had his arms folded and was looking at the floor. John had a couple of handlers with
him. They looked over his shoulder. Jack looked up.
“Is he in?” he asked.
“He’s just gone down,” John said.
We started down. Walcott was just getting into the ring. The crowd gave him a big hand. He
climbed through between the ropes and put his two fists together and smiled, and shook them at the
crowd, first at one side of the ring, then at the other, and then sat down. Jack got a good hand coming
down through the crowd. Jack is Irish and the Irish always get a pretty good hand. An Irishman don’t
draw in New York like a Jew or an Italian but they always get a good hand. Jack climbed up and bent
down to go through the ropes and Walcott came over from his corner and pushed the rope down for
Jack to go through. The crowd thought that was wonderful. Walcott put his hand on Jack’s shoulder
and they stood there just for a second.
“So you’re going to be one of these popular champions,” Jack says to him. “Take your goddam
hand off my shoulder.”
“Be yourself,” Walcott says.
This is all great for the crowd. How gentlemanly the boys are before the fight. How they wish
each other luck.
Solly Freedman came over to our comer while Jack is bandaging his hands and John is over in
Walcott’s corner. Jack puts his thumb through the slit in the bandage and then wrapped his hand nice
and smooth. I taped it around the wrist and twice across the knuckles.
“Hey,” Freedman says. “Where do you get all that tape?”
“Feel of it,” Jack says. “It’s soft, ain’t it? Don’t be a hick.”
Freedman stands there all the time while Jack bandages the other hand, and one of the boys that’s
going to handle him brings the gloves and I pull them on and work them around.
“Say, Freedman,” Jack asks, “what nationality is this Walcott?”
“I don’t know,” Solly says. “He’s some sort of a Dane.”
“He’s a Bohemian,” the lad who brought the gloves said.
The referee called them out to the center of the ring and Jack walks out. Walcott comes out
smiling. They met and the referee put his arm on each of their shoulders.
“Hello, popularity,” Jack says to Walcott.
“Be yourself.”
“What do you call yourself ‘Walcott’ for?” Jack says. “Didn’t you know he was a nigger?”
“Listen—” says the referee, and he gives them the same old line. Once Walcott interrupts him.
He grabs Jack’s arm and says, “Can I hit when he’s got me like this?”
“Keep your hands off me,” Jack says. “There ain’t no moving-pictures of this.”
They went back to their corners. I lifted the bathrobe off Jack and he leaned on the ropes and
flexed his knees a couple of times and scuffed his shoes in the rosin. The gong rang and Jack turned
quick and went out. Walcott came toward him and they touched gloves and as soon as Walcott
dropped his hands Jack jumped his left into his face twice. There wasn’t anybody ever boxed better
than Jack. Walcott was after him, going forward all the time with his chin on his chest. He’s a hooker
and he carries his hands pretty low. All he knows is to get in there and sock. But every time he gets in
there close. Jack has the left hand in his face. It’s just as though it’s automatic. Jack just raises the left
hand up and it’s in Walcott’s face. Three or four times Jack brings the right over but Walcott gets it on
the shoulder or high up on the head. He’s just like all these hookers. The only thing he’s afraid of is
another one of the same kind. He’s covered everywhere you can hurt him. He don’t care about a left
hand in his face.
After about four rounds Jack has him bleeding bad and his face all cut up, but every time
Walcott’s got in close he’s socked so hard he’s got two big red patches on both sides just below
Jack’s ribs. Every time he gets in close, Jack ties him up, then gets one hand loose and uppercuts him,
but when Walcott gets his hands loose he socks Jack in the body so they can hear it outside in the
street. He’s a socker.
It goes along like that for three rounds more. They don’t talk any. They’re working all the time.
We worked over Jack plenty too, in between the rounds. He don’t look good at all but he never does
much work in the ring. He don’t move around much and that left hand is just automatic. It’s just like it
was connected with Walcott’s face and Jack just had to wish it in every time. Jack is always calm in
close and he doesn’t waste any juice. He knows everything about working in close too and he’s
getting away with a lot of stuff. While they were in our corner I watched him tie Walcott up, get his
right hand loose, turn it and come up with an uppercut that got Walcott’s nose with the heel of the
glove. Walcott was bleeding bad and leaned his nose on Jack’s shoulder so as to give Jack some of it
too, and Jack sort of lifted his shoulder sharp and caught him against the nose, and then brought down
the right hand and did the same thing again.
Walcott was sore as hell. By the time they’d gone five rounds he hated Jack’s guts. Jack wasn’t
sore; that is, he wasn’t any sorer than he always was. He certainly did used to make the fellows he
fought hate boxing. That was why he hated Kid Lewis so. He never got the Kid’s goat. Kid Lewis
always had about three new dirty things Jack couldn’t do. Jack was as safe as a church all the time he
was in there, as long as he was strong. He certainly was treating Walcott rough. The funny thing was it
looked as though Jack was an open classic boxer. That was because he had all that stuff too.
After the seventh round Jack says, “My left’s getting heavy.”
From then he started to take a beating. It didn’t show at first. But instead of him running the fight
it was Walcott was running it, instead of being safe all the time now he was in trouble. He couldn’t
keep him out with the left hand now. It looked as though it was the same as ever, only now instead of
Walcott’s punches just missing him they were just hitting him. He took an awful beating in the body.
“What’s the round?” Jack asked.
“The eleventh.”
“I can’t stay,” Jack says. “My legs are going bad.”
Walcott had been just hitting him for a long time. It was like a baseball catcher pulls the ball and
takes some of the shock off. From now on Walcott commenced to land solid. He certainly was a
socking-machine. Jack was just trying to block everything now. It didn’t show what an awful beating
he was taking. In between the rounds I worked on his legs. The muscles would flutter under my hands
all the time I was rubbing them. He was sick as hell.
“How’s it go?” he asked John, turning around, his face all swollen.
“It’s his fight.”
“I think I can last,” Jack says. “I don’t want this bohunk to stop me.” It was going just the way he
thought it would. He knew he couldn’t beat Walcott. He wasn’t strong any more. He was all right
though. His money was all right and now he wanted to finish it off right to please himself. He didn’t
want to be knocked out.
The gong rang and we pushed him out. He went out slow. Walcott came right out after him. Jack
put the left in his face and Walcott took it, came in under it and started working on Jack’s body. Jack
tried to tie him up and it was just like trying to hold on to a buzz-saw. Jack broke away from it and
missed with the right. Walcott clipped him with a left hook and Jack went down. He went down on
his hands and knees and looked at us. The referee started counting. Jack was watching us and shaking
his head. At eight John motioned to him. You couldn’t hear on account of the crowd. Jack got up. The
referee had been holding Walcott back with one arm while he counted.
When Jack was on his feet Walcott started toward him.
“Watch yourself, Jimmy,” I heard Solly Freedman yell to him.
Walcott came up to Jack looking at him. Jack stuck the left hand at him. Walcott just shook his
head. He backed Jack up against the ropes, measured him and then hooked the left very light to the
side of Jack’s head and socked the right into the body as hard as he could sock, just as low as he
could get it. He must have hit him five inches below the belt. I thought the eyes would come out of
Jack’s head. They stuck way out. His mouth come open.
The referee grabbed Walcott. Jack stepped forward. If he went down there went fifty thousand
bucks. He walked as though all his insides were going to fall out.
“It wasn’t low,” he said. “It was a accident.”
The crowd were yelling so you couldn’t hear anything.
“I’m all right,” Jack says. They were right in front of us. The referee looks at John and then he
shakes his head.
“Come on, you polak son-of-a-bitch,” Jack says to Walcott.
John was hanging onto the ropes. He had the towel ready to chuck in. Jack was standing just a
little way out from the ropes. He took a step forward. I saw the sweat come out on his face like
somebody had squeezed it and a big drop went down his nose.
“Come on and fight,” Jack says to Walcott.
The referee looked at John and waved Walcott on.
“Go in there, you slob,” he says.
Walcott went in. He didn’t know what to do either. He never thought Jack could have stood it.
Jack put the left in his face. There was such a hell of a lot of yelling going on. They were right in front
of us. Walcott hit him twice. Jack’s face was the worst thing I ever saw—the look on it! He was
holding himself and all his body together and it all showed on his face. All the time he was thinking
and holding his body in where it was busted.
Then he started to sock. His face looked awful all the time. He started to sock with his hands
low down by his side, swinging at Walcott. Walcott covered up and Jack was swinging wild at
Walcott’s head. Then he swung the left and it hit Walcott in the groin and the right hit Walcott right
bang where he’d hit Jack. Way low below the belt. Walcott went down and grabbed himself there and
rolled and twisted around.
The referee grabbed Jack and pushed him toward his corner. John jumps into the ring. There was
all this yelling going on. The referee was talking with the judges and then the announcer got into the
ring with the megaphone and says, “Walcott on a foul.”
The referee is talking to John and he says, “What could I do? Jack wouldn’t take the foul. Then
when he’s groggy he fouls him.”
“He’d lost it anyway,” John says.
Jack’s sitting on the chair. I’ve got his gloves off and he’s holding himself in down there with
both hands. When he’s got something supporting it his face doesn’t look so bad.
“Go over and say you’re sorry,” John says into his ear. “It’ll look good.”
Jack stands up and the sweat comes out all over his face. I put the bathrobe around him and he
holds himself in with one hand under the bathrobe and goes across the ring. They’ve picked Walcott
up and they’re working on him. There’re a lot of people in Walcott’s corner. Nobody speaks to Jack.
He leans over Walcott.
“I’m sorry,” Jack says. “I didn’t mean to foul you.”
Walcott doesn’t say anything. He looks too damned sick.
“Well, you’re the champion now,” Jack says to him. “I hope you get a hell of a lot of fun out of
it.”
“Leave the kid alone,” Solly Freedman says.
“Hello, Solly,” Jack says. “I’m sorry I fouled your boy.”
Freedman just looks at him.
Jack went to his corner walking that funny jerky way and we got him down through the ropes and
through the reporters’ tables and out down the aisle. A lot of people want to slap Jack on the back. He
goes out through all that mob in his bathrobe to the dressing-room. It’s a popular win for Walcott.
That’s the way the money was bet in the Garden.
Once we got inside the dressing-room Jack lay down and shut his eyes.
“We want to get to the hotel and get a doctor,” John says.
“I’m all busted inside,” Jack says.
“I’m sorry as hell. Jack,” John says.
“It’s all right,” Jack says.
He lies there with his eyes shut.
“They certainly tried a nice double-cross,” John said.
“Your friends Morgan and Steinfelt,” Jack said. “You got nice friends.”
He lies there, his eyes are open now. His face has still got that awful drawn look.
“It’s funny how fast you can think when it means that much money,” Jack says.
“You’re some boy, Jack,” John says.
“No,” Jack says. “It was nothing.”
A Simple Enquiry
OUTSIDE, THE SNOW WAS HIGHER THAN the window. The
sunlight came in through the window and shone on a map on the pineboard wall of the hut. The sun
was high and the light came in over the top of the snow. A trench had been cut along the open side of
the hut, and each clear day the sun, shining on the wall, reflected heat against the snow and widened
the trench. It was late March. The major sat at a table against the wall. His adjutant sat at another
table.
Around the major’s eyes were two white circles where his snow-glasses had protected his face
from the sun on the snow. The rest of his face had been burned and then tanned and then burned
through the tan. His nose was swollen and there were edges of loose skin where blisters had been.
While he worked at the papers he put the fingers of his left hand into a saucer of oil and then spread
the oil over his face, touching it very gently with the tips of his fingers. He was very careful to drain
his fingers on the edge of the saucer so there was only a film of oil on them, and after he had stroked
his forehead and his cheeks, he stroked his nose very delicately between his fingers. When he had
finished he stood up, took the saucer of oil and went into the small room of the hut where he slept.
“I’m going to take a little sleep,” he said to the adjutant. In that army an adjutant is not a
commissioned officer. “You will finish up.”
“Yes, signor maggiore,” the adjutant answered. He leaned back in his chair and yawned. He
took a paper-covered book out of the pocket of his coat and opened it; then laid it down on the table
and lit his pipe. He leaned forward on the table to read and puffed at his pipe. Then he closed the
book and put it back in his pocket. He had too much paper-work to get through. He could not enjoy
reading until it was done. Outside, the sun went behind a mountain and there was no more light on the
wall of the hut. A soldier came in and put some pine branches, chopped into irregular lengths, into the
stove. “Be soft, Pinin,” the adjutant said to him. “The major is sleeping.”
Pinin was the major’s orderly. He was a dark-faced boy, and he fixed the stove, putting the pine
wood in carefully, shut the door, and went into the back of the hut again. The adjutant went on with his
papers.
“Tonani,” the major called.
“Signor maggiore?”
“Send Pinin in to me.”
“Pinin!” the adjutant called. Pinin came into the room. “The major wants you,” the adjutant said.
Pinin walked across the main room of the hut toward the major’s door. He knocked on the halfopened door. “Signor maggiore?”
“Come in,” the adjutant heard the major say, “and shut the door.”
Inside the room the major lay on his bunk. Pinin stood beside the bunk. The major lay with his
head on the rucksack that he had stuffed with spare clothing to make a pillow. His long, burned, oiled
face looked at Pinin. His hands lay on the blankets.
“You are nineteen?” he asked.
“Yes, signor maggiore.”
“You have ever been in love?”
“How do you mean, signor maggiore?”
“In love—with a girl?”
“I have been with girls.”
“I did not ask that. I asked if you had been in love—with a girl.”
“Yes, signor maggiore.”
“You are in love with this girl now? You don’t write her. I read all your letters.”
“I am in love with her,” Pinin said, “but I do not write her.”
“You are sure of this?”
“I am sure.”
“Tonani,” the major said in the same tone of voice, “can you hear me talking?”
There was no answer from the next room.
“He can not hear,” the major said. “And you are quite sure that you love a girl?”
“I am sure.”
“And,” the major looked at him quickly, “that you are not corrupt?”
“I don’t know what you mean, corrupt.”
“All right,” the major said. “You needn’t be superior.”
Pinin looked at the floor. The major looked at his brown face, down and up him, and at his
hands. Then he went on, not smiling, “And you don’t really want—” the major paused. Pinin looked at
the floor. “That your great desire isn’t really—” Pinin looked at the floor. The major leaned his head
back on the rucksack and smiled. He was really relieved: life in the army was too complicated.
“You’re a good boy,” he said. “You’re a good boy, Pinin. But don’t be superior and be careful some
one else doesn’t come along and take you.”
Pinin stood still beside the bunk.
“Don’t be afraid,” the major said. His hands were folded on the blankets. “I won’t touch you.
You can go back to your platoon if you like. But you had better stay on as my servant. You’ve less
chance of being killed.”
“Do you want anything of me, signer maggiore?”
“No,” the major said. “Go on and get on with whatever you were doing. Leave the door open
when you go out.”
Pinin went out, leaving the door open. The adjutant looked up at him as he walked awkwardly
across the room and out the door. Pinin was flushed and moved differently than he had moved when
he brought in the wood for the fire. The adjutant looked after him and smiled. Pinin came in with more
wood for the stove. The major, lying on his bunk, looking at his cloth-covered helmet and his snowglasses that hung from a nail on the wall, heard him walk across the floor. The little devil, he thought,
I wonder if he lied to me.
Ten Indians
AFTER ONE FOURTH OF JULY, NICK, DRIVing home late from
town in the big wagon with Joe Garner and his family, passed nine drunken Indians along the road. He
remembered there were nine because Joe Garner, driving along in the dusk, pulled up the horses,
jumped down into the road and dragged an Indian out of the wheel rut. The Indian had been asleep,
face down in the sand. Joe dragged him into bushes and got back up on the wagon-box.
“That makes nine of them,” Joe said, “just between here and the edge of town.”
“Them Indians,” said Mrs. Garner.
Nick was on the back seat with the two Garner boys. He was looking out from the back seat to
see the Indian where Joe had dragged him alongside of the road.
“Was it Billy Tabeshaw?” Carl asked.
“No.”
“His pants looked mighty like Billy.”
“All Indians wear the same kind of pants.”
“I didn’t see him at all,” Frank said. “Pa was down into the road and back up again before I seen
a thing. I thought he was killing a snake.”
“Plenty of Indians’ll kill snakes tonight, I guess,” Joe Garner said.
“Them Indians,” said Mrs. Garner.
They drove along. The road turned off from the main highway and went up into the hills. It was
hard pulling for the horses and the boys got down and walked. The road was sandy. Nick looked back
from the top of the hill by the schoolhouse. He saw the lights of Petoskey and, off across Little
Traverse Bay, the lights of Harbour Springs. They climbed back in the wagon again.
“They ought to put some gravel on that stretch,” Joe Garner said. The wagon went along the road
through the woods. Joe and Mrs. Gamer sat close together on the front seat. Nick sat between the two
boys. The road came out into a clearing.
“Right here was where Pa ran over the skunk.”
“It was further on.”
“It don’t make no difference where it was,” Joe said without turning his head. “One place is just
as good as another to run over a skunk.”
“I saw two skunks last night,” Nick said.
“Where?”
“Down by the lake. They were looking for dead fish along the beach.”
“They were coons probably,” Carl said.
“They were skunks. I guess I know skunks.”
“You ought to,” Carl said. “You got an Indian girl.”
“Stop talking that way. Carl,” said Mrs. Garner.
“Well, they smell about the same.”
Joe Garner laughed.
“You stop laughing, Joe,” Mrs. Garner said. “I won’t have Carl talk that way.”
“Have you got an Indian girl, Nickie?” Joe asked.
“No.”
“He has too, Pa,” Frank said. “Prudence Mitchell’s his girl.”
“She’s not.”
“He goes to see her every day.”
“I don’t.” Nick, sitting between the two boys in the dark, felt hollow and happy inside himself to
be teased about Prudence Mitchell. “She ain’t my girl,” he said.
“Listen to him,” said Carl. “I see them together every day.”
“Carl can’t get a girl,” his mother said, “not even a squaw.”
Carl was quiet.
“Carl ain’t no good with girls,” Frank said.
“You shut up.”
“You’re all right, Carl,” Joe Garner said. “Girls never got a man anywhere. Look at your pa.”
“Yes, that’s what you would say,” Mrs. Garner moved close to Joe as the wagon jolted. “Well,
you had plenty of girls in your time.”
“I’ll bet Pa wouldn’t ever have had a squaw for a girl.”
“Don’t you think it,” Joe said. “You better watch out to keep Prudie, Nick.”
His wife whispered to him and Joe laughed.
“What you laughing at?” asked Frank.
“Don’t you say it. Garner,” his wife warned. Joe laughed again.
“Nickie can have Prudence,” Joe Garner said. “I got a good girl.”
“That’s the way to talk,” Mrs. Garner said.
The horses were pulling heavily in the sand. Joe reached out in the dark with the whip.
“Come on, pull into it. You’ll have to pull harder than this tomorrow.”
They trotted down the long hill, the wagon jolting. At the farmhouse everybody got down. Mrs.
Garner unlocked the door, went inside, and came out with a lamp in her hand. Carl and Nick unloaded
the things from the back of the wagon. Frank sat on the front seat to drive to the barn and put up the
horses. Nick went up the steps and opened the kitchen door. Mrs. Garner was building a fire in the
stove. She turned from pouring kerosene on the wood.
“Good-by, Mrs. Garner,” Nick said. “Thanks for taking me.”
“Oh shucks, Nickie.”
“I had a wonderful time.”
“We like to have you. Won’t you stay and eat some supper?”
“I better go. I think Dad probably waited for me.”
“Well, get along then. Send Carl up to the house, will you?”
“All right.”
“Good-night, Nickie.”
“Good-night, Mrs. Garner.”
Nick went out the farmyard and down to the barn. Joe and Frank were milking.
“Good-night,” Nick said. “I had a swell time.”
“Good-night, Nick,” Joe Garner called. “Aren’t you going to stay and eat?”
“No, I can’t. Will you tell Carl his mother wants him?”
“All right. Good-night, Nickie.”
Nick walked barefoot along the path through the meadow below the barn. The path was smooth
and the dew was cool on his bare feet. He climbed a fence at the end of the meadow, went down
through a ravine, his feet wet in the swamp mud, and then climbed up through the dry beech woods
until he saw the lights of the cottage. He climbed over the fence and walked around to the front porch.
Through the window he saw his father sitting by the table, reading in the light from the big lamp. Nick
opened the door and went in.
“Well, Nickie,” his father said, “was it a good day?”
“I had a swell time. Dad. It was a swell Fourth of July.”
“Are you hungry?”
“You bet.”
“What did you do with your shoes?”
“I left them in the wagon at Garner’s.”
“Come on out to the kitchen.”
Nick’s father went ahead with the lamp. He stopped and lifted the lid of the ice-box. Nick went
on into the kitchen. His father brought in a piece of cold chicken on a plate and a pitcher of milk and
put them on the table before Nick. He put down the lamp.
“There’s some pie too,” he said. “Will that hold you?”
“It’s grand.”
His father sat down in a chair beside the oil-cloth-covered table. He made a big shadow on the
kitchen wall.
“Who won the ball game?”
“Petoskey. Five to three.”
His father sat watching him eat and filled his glass from the milk-pitcher. Nick drank and wiped
his mouth on his napkin. His father reached over to the shelf for the pie. He cut Nick a big piece. It
was huckleberry pie.
“What did you do, Dad?”
“I went out fishing in the morning.”
“What did you get?”
“Only perch.”
His father sat watching Nick eat the pie.
“What did you do this afternoon?” Nick asked.
“I went for a walk up by the Indian camp.”
“Did you see anybody?”
“The Indians were all in town getting drunk.”
“Didn’t you see anybody at all?”
“I saw your friend, Prudie.”
“Where was she?”
“She was in the woods with Frank Washburn. I ran onto them. They were having quite a time.”
His father was not looking at him.
“What were they doing?”
“I didn’t stay to find out.”
“Tell me what they were doing.”
“I don’t know,” his father said. “I just heard them threshing around.”
“How did you know it was them?”
“I saw them.”
“I thought you said you didn’t see them.”
“Oh, yes, I saw them.”
“Who was it with her?” Nick asked.
“Frank Washbum.”
“Were they—were they—”
“Were they what?”
“Were they happy?”
“I guess so.”
His father got up from the table and went out the kitchen screen door. When he came back Nick
was looking at his plate. He had been crying.
“Have some more?” His father picked up the knife to cut the pie.
“No.” said Nick.
“You better have another piece”
“No, I don’t want any.”
His father cleared off the table.
“Where were they in the woods?” Nick asked.
“Up back of the camp.” Nick looked at his plate. His father said, “You better go to bed, Nick.”
“All right.”
Nick went into his room, undressed, and got into bed. He heard his father moving around in the
living room. Nick lay in the bed with his face in the pillow.
“My heart’s broken,” he thought. “If I feel this way my heart must be broken.”
After a while he heard his father blow out the lamp and go into his own room. He heard a wind
come up in the trees outside and felt it come in cool through the screen. He lay for a long time with his
face in the pillow, and after a while he forgot to think about Prudence and finally he went to sleep.
When he awoke in the night he heard the wind in the hemlock trees outside the cottage and the waves
of the lake coming in on the shore, and he went back to sleep. In the morning there was a big wind
blowing and the waves were running high up on the beach and he was awake a long time before he
remembered that his heart was broken.
A Canary for One
THE TRAIN PASSED VERY QUICKLY A LONG , red stone house
with a garden and four thick palm-trees with tables under them in the shade. On the other side was the
sea. Then there was a cutting through red stone and clay, and the sea was only occasionally and far
below against rocks.
“I bought him in Palermo,” the American lady said. “We only had an hour ashore and it was
Sunday morning. The man wanted to be paid in dollars and I gave him a dollar and a half. He really
sings very beautifully.”
It was very hot in the train and it was very hot in the lit salon compartment. There was no breeze
came through the open window. The American lady pulled the window-blind down and there was no
more sea, even occasionally. On the other side there was glass, then the corridor, then an open
window, and outside the window were dusty trees and an oiled road and flat fields of grapes, with
gray-stone hills behind them.
There was smoke from many tall chimneys—coming into Marseilles, and the train slowed down
and followed one track through many others into the station. The train stayed twenty-five minutes in
the station at Marseilles and the American lady bought a copy of The Daily Mail and a half-bottle of
Evian water. She walked a little way along the station platform, but she stayed near the steps of the
car because at Cannes, where it stopped for twelve minutes, the train had left with no signal of
departure and she had gotten on only just in time. The American lady was a little deaf and she was
afraid that perhaps signals of departure were given and that she did not hear them.
The train left the station in Marseilles and there was not only the switchyards and the factory
smoke but, looking back, the town of Marseilles and the harbor with stone hills behind it and the last
of the sun on the water. As it was getting dark the train passed a farmhouse burning in a field. Motorcars were stopped along the road and bedding and things from inside the farmhouse were spread in
the field. Many people were watching the house burn. After it was dark the train was in Avignon.
People got on and off. At the news-stand Frenchmen, returning to Paris, bought that day’s French
papers. On the station platform were negro soldiers. They wore brown uniforms and were tall and
their faces shone, close under the electric light. Their faces were very black and they were too tall to
stare. The train left Avignon station with the negroes standing there. A short white sergeant was with
them.
Inside the lit salon compartment the porter had pulled down the three beds from inside the wall
and prepared them for sleeping. In the night the American lady lay without sleeping because the train
was a rapide and went very fast and she was afraid of the speed in the night. The American lady’s
bed was the one next to the window. The canary from Palermo, a cloth spread over his cage, was out
of the draft in the corridor that went into the compartment wash-room. There was a blue light outside
the compartment, and all night the train went very fast and the American lady lay awake and waited
for a wreck.
In the morning the train was near Paris, and after the American lady had come out from the washroom, looking very wholesome and middle-aged and American in spite of not having slept, and had
taken the cloth off the birdcage and hung the cage in the sun, she went back to the restaurant-car for
breakfast. When she came back to the lit salon compartment again, the beds had been pushed back
into the wall and made into seats, the canary was shaking his feathers in the sunlight that came through
the open window, and the train was much nearer Paris.
“He loves the sun,” the American lady said. “He’ll sing now in a little while.”
The canary shook his feathers and pecked into them. “I’ve always loved birds,” the American
lady said. “I’m taking him home to my little girl. There—he’s singing now.”
The canary chirped and the feathers on his throats stood out, then he dropped his bill and pecked
into his feathers again. The train crossed a river and passed through a very carefully tended forest.
The train passed through many outside of Paris towns. There were tram-cars in the towns and big
advertisements for the Belle Jardinière and Dubonnet and Pernod on the walls toward the train. All
that the train passed through looked as though it were before breakfast. For several minutes I had not
listened to the American lady, who was talking to my wife.
“Is your husband American too?” asked the lady.
“Yes,” said my wife. “We’re both Americans.”
“I thought you were English.”
“Oh, no.”
“Perhaps that was because I wore braces,” I said. I had started to say suspenders and changed it
to braces in the mouth, to keep my English character. The American lady did not hear. She was really
quite deaf; she read lips, and I had not looked toward her. I had looked out of the window. She went
on talking to my wife.
“I’m so glad you’re Americans. American men make the best husbands,” the American lady was
saying. “That was why we left the Continent, you know. My daughter fell in love with a man in
Vevey.” She stopped. “They were simply madly in love.” She stopped again. “I took her away, of
course.”
“Did she get over it?” asked my wife.
“I don’t think so,” said the American lady. “She wouldn’t eat anything and she wouldn’t sleep at
all. I’ve tried so very hard, but she doesn’t seem to take an interest in anything. She doesn’t care about
things. I couldn’t have her marrying a foreigner.” She paused. “Some one, a very good friend, told me
once, ‘No foreigner can make an American girl a good husband.’”
“No,” said my wife, “I suppose not.”
The American lady admired my wife’s travelling-coat, and it turned out that the American lady
had bought her own clothes for twenty years now from the same maison de couture in the Rue Saint
Honoré. They had her measurements, and a vendeuse who knew her and her tastes picked the dresses
out for her and they were sent to America. They came to the post-office near where she lived up-town
in New York, and the duty was never exorbitant because they opened the dresses there in the postoffice to appraise them and they were always very simple-looking and with no gold lace nor
ornaments that would make the dresses look expensive. Before the present vendeuse, named Thérèse,
there had been another vendeuse, named Amélie. Altogether there had only been these two in the
twenty years. It had always been the same couturier. Prices, however, had gone up. The exchange,
though, equalized that. They had her daughter’s measurements now too. She was grown up and there
was not much chance of their changing now.
The train was now coming into Paris. The fortifications were levelled but grass had not grown.
There were many cars standing on tracks—brown wooden restaurant-cars and brown wooden
sleeping-cars that would go to Italy at five o’clock that night, if that train still left at five; the cars
were marked Paris-Rome, and cars, with seats on the roofs, that went back and forth to the suburbs
with, at certain hours, people in all the seats and on the roofs, if that were the way it were still done,
and passing were the white walls and many windows of houses. Nothing had eaten any breakfast.
“Americans make the best husbands,” the American lady said to my wife. I was getting down the
bags. “American men are the only men in the world to marry.”
“How long ago did you leave Vevey?” asked my wife.
“Two years ago this fall. It’s her, you know, that I’m taking the canary to.”
“Was the man your daughter was in love with a Swiss?”
“Yes,” said the American lady. “He was from a very good family in Vevey. He was going to be
an engineer. They met there in Vevey. They used to go on long walks together.”
“I know Vevey,” said my wife. “We were there on our honeymoon.”
“Were you really? That must have been lovely. I had no idea, of course, that she’d fall in love
with him.”
“It was a very lovely place,” said my wife.
“Yes,” said the American lady. “Isn’t it lovely? Where did you stop there?”
“We stayed at the Trois Couronnes,” said my wife.
“It’s such a fine old hotel,” said the American lady.
“Yes,” said my wife. “We had a very fine room and in the fall the country was lovely.”
“Were you there in the fall?”
“Yes,” said my wife.
We were passing three cars that had been in a wreck. They were splintered open and the roofs
sagged in.
“Look,” I said. “There’s been a wreck.”
The American lady looked and saw the last car. “I was afraid of just that all night,” she said. “I
have terrific presentiments about things sometimes. I’ll never travel on a rapide again at night. There
must be other comfortable trains that don’t go so fast.”
Then the train was in the dark of the Gare de Lyons, and then stopped and porters came up to the
windows. I handed bags through the windows, and we were out on the dim longness of the platform,
and the American lady put herself in charge of one of three men from Cook’s who said: “Just a
moment, madame, and I’ll look for your name.”
The porter brought a truck and piled on the baggage, and my wife said good-by and I said goodby to the American lady, whose name had been found by the man from Cook’s on a typewritten page
in a sheaf of typewritten pages which he replaced in his pocket.
We followed the porter with the truck down the long cement platform beside the train. At the end
was a gate and a man took the tickets.
We were returning to Paris to set up separate residences.
An Alpine Idyll
IT WAS HOT COMING DOWN INTO THE VAL ley even in the early
morning. The sun melted the snow from the skis we were carrying and dried the wood. It was spring
in the valley but the sun was very hot. We came along the road into Galtur carrying our skis and
rucksacks. As we passed the churchyard a burial was just over. I said, “Grüss Gott,” to the priest as
he walked past us coming out of the churchyard. The priest bowed.
“It’s funny a priest never speaks to you,” John said.
“You’d think they’d like to say ‘Grüss Gott.’”
“They never answer,” John said.
We stopped in the road and watched the sexton shovelling in the new earth. A peasant with a
black beard and high leather boots stood beside the grave. The sexton stopped shovelling and
straightened his back. The peasant in the high boots took the spade from the sexton and went on filling
in the grave—spreading the earth evenly as a man spreading manure in a garden. In the bright May
morning the grave-filling looked unreal. I could not imagine any one being dead.
“Imagine being buried on a day like this,” I said to John.
“I wouldn’t like it.”
“Well,” I said, “we don’t have to do it.”
We went on up the road past the houses of the town to the inn. We had been skiing in the
Silvretta for a month, and it was good to be down in the valley. In the Silvretta the skiing had been all
right, but it was spring skiing, the snow was good only in the early morning and again in the evening.
The rest of the time it was spoiled by the sun. We were both tired of the sun. You could not get away
from the sun. The only shadows were made by rocks or by the hut that was built under the protection
of a rock beside a glacier, and in the shade the sweat froze in your underclothing. You could not sit
outside the hut without dark glasses. It was pleasant to be burned black but the sun had been very
tiring. You could not rest in it. I was glad to be down away from snow. It was too late in the spring to
be up in the Silvretta. I was a little tired of skiing. We had stayed too long. I could taste the snow
water we had been drinking melted off the tin roof of the hut. The taste was a part of the way I felt
about skiing. I was glad there were other things beside skiing, and I was glad to be down, away from
the unnatural high mountain spring, into this May morning in the valley.
The innkeeper sat on the porch of the inn, his chair tipped back against the wall. Beside him sat
the cook.
“Ski-heil!” said the innkeeper.
“Heil!” we said and leaned the skis against the wall and took off our packs.
“How was it up above?” asked the innkeeper.
“Schön. A little too much sun.”
“Yes. There’s too much sun this time of year.”
The cook sat on in his chair. The innkeeper went in with us and unlocked his office and brought
out our mail. There was a bundle of letters and some papers.
“Let’s get some beer,” John said.
“Good. We’ll drink it inside.”
The proprietor brought two bottles and we drank them while we read the letters.
“We better have some more beer,” John said. A girl brought it this time. She smiled as she
opened the bottles.
“Many letters,” she said.
“Yes. Many.”
“Prosit,” she said and went out, taking the empty bottles.
“I’d forgotten what beer tasted like.”
“I hadn’t,” John said. “Up in the hut I used to think about it a lot.”
“Well,” I said, “we’ve got it now.”
“You oughtn’t to ever do anything too long.”
“No. We were up there too long.”
“Too damn long,” John said. “It’s no good doing a thing too long.”
The sun came through the open window and shone through the beer bottles on the table. The
bottles were half full. There was a little froth on the beer in the bottles, not much because it was very
cold. It collared up when you poured it into the tall glasses. I looked out of the open window at the
white road. The trees beside the road were dusty. Beyond was a green field and a stream. There were
trees along the stream and a mill with a water wheel. Through the open side of the mill I saw a long
log and a saw in it rising and falling. No one seemed to be tending it. There were four crows walking
in the green field. One crow sat in a tree watching. Outside on the porch the cook got off his chair and
passed into the hall that led back into the kitchen. Inside, the sunlight shone through the empty glasses
on the table. John was leaning forward with his head on his arms.
Through the window I saw two men come up the front steps. They came into the drinking room.
One was the bearded peasant in the high boots. The other was the sexton. They sat down at the table
under the window. The girl came in and stood by their table. The peasant did not seem to see her. He
sat with his hands on the table. He wore his old army clothes. There were patches on the elbows.
“What will it be?” asked the sexton. The peasant did not pay any attention.
“What will you drink?”
“Schnapps,” the peasant said.
“And a quarter litre of red wine,” the sexton told the girl.
The girl brought the drinks and the peasant drank the schnapps. He looked out of the window.
The sexton watched him. John had his head forward on the table. He was asleep.
The innkeeper came in and went over to the table. He spoke in dialect and the sexton answered
him. The peasant looked out of the window. The innkeeper went out of the room. The peasant stood
up. He took a folded ten-thousand kronen note out of a leather pocketbook and unfolded it. The girl
came up.
“Alles?” she asked.
“Alles,” he said.
“Let me buy the wine,” the sexton said.
“Alles,” the peasant repeated to the girl. She put her hand in the pocket of her apron, brought it
out full of coins and counted out the change. The peasant went out the door. As soon as he was gone
the innkeeper came into the room again and spoke to the sexton. He sat down at the table. They talked
in dialect. The sexton was amused. The innkeeper was disgusted. The sexton stood up from the table.
He was a little man with a mustache. He leaned out of the window and looked up the road.
“There he goes in,” he said.
“In the Löwen?”
“Ja.”
They talked again and then the innkeeper came over to our table. The innkeeper was a tall man
and old. He looked at John asleep.
“He’s pretty tired.”
“Yes, we were up early.”
“Will you want to eat soon?”
“Any time,” I said. “What is there to eat?”
“Anything you want. The girl will bring the eating-card.”
The girl brought the menu. John woke up. The menu was written in ink on a card and the card
slipped into a wooden paddle.
“There’s the Speisekarte,” I said to John. He looked at it. He was still sleepy.
“Won’t you have a drink with us?” I asked the innkeeper. He sat down. “Those peasants are
beasts,” said the innkeeper.
“We saw that one at a funeral coming into town.”
“That was his wife.”
“Oh.”
“He’s a beast. All these peasants are beasts.”
“How do you mean?”
“You wouldn’t believe it. You wouldn’t believe what just happened about that one.”
“Tell me.”
“You wouldn’t believe it.” The innkeeper spoke to the sexton. “Franz, come over here.” The
sexton came, bringing his little bottle of wine and his glass.
“The gentlemen are just come down from the Wiesbadenerhütte,” the innkeeper said. We shook
hands.
“What will you drink?” I asked.
“Nothing,” Franz shook his finger.
“Another quarter litre?”
“All right.”
“Do you understand dialect?” the innkeeper asked.
“No.”
“What’s it all about?” John asked.
“He’s going to tell us about the peasant we saw filling the grave, coming into town.”
“I can’t understand it, anyway,” John said. “It goes too fast for me.”
“That peasant,” the innkeeper said, “today he brought his wife in to be buried. She died last
November.”
“December,” said the sexton.
“That makes nothing. She died last December then, and he notified the commune.”
“December eighteenth,” said the sexton.
“Anyway, he couldn’t bring her over to be buried until the snow was gone.”
“He lives on the other side of the Paznaun,” said the sexton. “But he belongs to this parish.”
“He couldn’t bring her out at all?” I asked.
“No. He can only come, from where he lives, on skis until the snow melts. So today he brought
her in to be buried and the priest, when he looked at her face, didn’t want to bury her. You go on and
tell it,” he said to the sexton. “Speak German, not dialect.”
“It was very funny with the priest,” said the sexton. “In the report to the commune she died of
heart trouble. We knew she had heart trouble here. She used to faint in church sometimes. She did not
come for a long time. She wasn’t strong to climb. When the priest uncovered her face he asked Olz,
‘Did your wife suffer much?’ ‘No’ said Olz. ‘When I came in the house she was dead across the bed.’
“The priest looked at her again. He didn’t like it.
“ ‘How did her face get that way?’
“‘don’t know,’ Olz said.
“‘You’d better find out,’ the priest said, and put the blanket back. Olz didn’t say anything. The
priest looked at him. Olz looked back at the priest. ‘You want to know?’
“‘must know,’ the priest said.”
“This is where it’s good,” the innkeeper said. “Listen to this. Go on Franz.”
“‘Well,’ said Olz, ‘when she died I made the report to the commune and I put her in the shed
across the top of the big wood. When I started to use the big wood she was stiff and I put her up
against the wall. Her mouth was open and when I came into the shed at night to cut up the big wood, I
hung the lantern from it.’
“‘Why did you do that?’ asked the priest.
“‘don’t know,’ said Olz.
“‘Did you do that many times?’
“‘Every time I went to work in the shed at night.’
“‘It was very wrong,’ said the priest. ‘Did you love your wife?’
“‘Ja, I loved her,’ Olz said. ‘I loved her fine.’”
“Did you understand it all?” asked the innkeeper. “You understand it all about his wife?”
“I heard it.”
“How about eating?” John asked.
“You order,” I said. “Do you think it’s true?” I asked the innkeeper.
“Sure it’s true,” he said. “These peasants are beasts.”
“Where did he go now?”
“He’s gone to drink at my colleague’s, the Löwen.”
“He didn’t want to drink with me,” said the sexton.
“He didn’t want to drink with me, after he knew about his wife,” said the innkeeper.
“Say,” said John. “How about eating?”
“All right,” I said.
A Pursuit Race
WILLIAM CAMPBELL HAD BEEN IN A PUR suit race with a
burlesque show ever since Pittsburgh. In a pursuit race, in bicycle racing, riders start at equal
intervals to ride after one another. They ride very fast because the race is usually limited to a short
distance and if they slow their riding another rider who maintains his pace will make up the space that
separated them equally at the start. As soon as a rider is caught and passed he is out of the race and
must get down from his bicycle and leave the track. If none of the riders are caught the winner of the
race is the one who has gained the most distance. In most pursuit races, if there are only two riders,
one of the riders is caught inside of six miles. The burlesque show caught William Campbell at
Kansas City.
William Campbell had hoped to hold a slight lead over the burlesque show until they reached the
Pacific coast. As long as he preceded the burlesque show as advance man he was being paid. When
the burlesque show caught up with him he was in bed. He was in bed when the manager of the
burlesque troupe came into his room and after the manager had gone out he decided that he might as
well stay in bed. It was very cold in Kansas City and he was in no hurry to go out. He did not like
Kansas City. He reached under the bed for a bottle and drank. It made his stomach feel better. Mr.
Turner, the manager of the burlesque show, had refused a drink.
William Campbell’s interview with Mr. Turner had been a little strange. Mr. Turner had
knocked on the door. Campbell had said: “Come in!” When Mr. Turner came into the room he saw
clothing on a chair, an open suitcase, the bottle on a chair beside the bed, and some one lying in the
bed completely covered by the bed-clothes.
“Mister Campbell,” Mr. Turner said.
“You can’t fire me,” William Campbell said from underneath the covers. It was warm and white
and close under the covers. “You can’t fire me because I’ve got down off my bicycle.”
“You’re drunk,” Mr. Turner said.
“Oh, yes,” William Campbell said, speaking directly against the sheet and feeling the texture
with his lips.
“You’re a fool,” Mr. Turner said. He turned off the electric light. The electric light had been
burning all night. It was now ten o’clock in the morning. “You’re a drunken fool. When did you get
into this town?”
“I got into this town last night,” William Campbell said, speaking against the sheet. He found he
liked to talk through a sheet. “Did you ever talk through a sheet?”
“Don’t try to be funny. You aren’t funny.”
“I’m not being funny. I’m just talking through a sheet.”
“You’re talking through a sheet all right.”
“You can go now, Mr. Turner,” Campbell said. “I don’t work for you any more.”
“You know that anyway.”
“I know a lot,” William Campbell said. He pulled down the sheet and looked at Mr. Turner. “I
know enough so I don’t mind looking at you at all. Do you want to hear what I know?”
“No.”
“Good,” said William Campbell. “Because really I don’t know anything at all. I was just
talking.” He pulled the sheet up over his face again. “I love it under a sheet,” he said. Mr. Turner
stood beside the bed. He was a middle-aged man with a large stomach and a bald head and he had
many things to do. “You ought to stop off here, Billy, and take a cure,” he said. “I’ll fix it up if you
want to do it.”
“I don’t want to take a cure,” William Campbell said. “I don’t want to take a cure at all. I am
perfectly happy. All my life I have been perfectly happy.”
“How long have you been this way?”
“What a question!” William Campbell breathed in and out through the sheet.
“How long have you been stewed, Billy?”
“Haven’t I done my work?”
“Sure. I just asked you how long you’ve been stewed, Billy.”
“I don’t know. But I’ve got my wolf back,” he touched the sheet with his tongue. “I’ve had him
for a week.”
“The hell you have.”
“Oh, yes. My dear wolf. Every time I take a drink he goes outside the room. He can’t stand
alcohol. The poor little fellow.” He moved his tongue round and round on the sheet. “He’s a lovely
wolf. He’s just like he always was.” William Campbell shut his eyes and took a deep breath.
“You got to take a cure, Billy,” Mr. Turner said. “You won’t mind the Keeley. It isn’t bad.”
“The Keeley,” William Campbell said. “It isn’t far from London.” He shut his eyes and opened
them, moving the eyelashes against the sheet. “I just love sheets,” he said. He looked at Mr. Turner.
“Listen, you think I’m drunk.”
“You are drunk.”
“No, I’m not.”
“You’re drunk and you’ve had D.T.’s.”
“No.” William Campbell held the sheet around his head. “Dear sheet,” he said. He breathed
against it gently. “Pretty sheet. You love me, don’t you, sheet? It’s all in the price of the room. Just
like in Japan. No,” he said. “Listen Billy, dear Sliding Billy, I have a surprise for you. I’m not drunk.
I’m hopped to the eyes.”
“No,” said Mr. Turner.
“Take a look.” William Campbell pulled up the right sleeve of his pyjama jacket under the sheet,
then shoved the right forearm out. “Look at that.” On the forearm, from just above the wrist to the
elbow, were small blue circles around tiny dark blue punctures. The circles almost touched one
another. “That’s trie new development,” William Campbell said. “I drink a little now once in a while,
just to drive the wolf out of the room.”
“They got a cure for that,” “Sliding Billy” Turner said.
“No,” William Campbell said. “They haven’t got a cure for anything.”
“You can’t just quit like that, Billy,” Turner said. He sat on the bed.
“Be careful of my sheet,” William Campbell said.
“You can’t just quit at your age and take to pumping yourself full of that stuff just because you got
in a jam.”
“There’s a law against it. If that’s what you mean.”
“No, I mean you got to fight it out.”
Billy Campbell caressed the sheet with his lips and his tongue. “Dear sheet,” he said. “I can kiss
this sheet and see right through it at the same time.”
“Cut it out about the sheet. You can’t just take to that stuff, Billy.”
William Campbell shut his eyes. He was beginning to feel a slight nausea. He knew that this
nausea would increase steadily, without there ever being the relief of sickness, until something were
done against it. It was at this point that he suggested that Mr. Turner have a drink. Mr. Turner
declined. William Campbell took a drink from the bottle. It was a temporary measure. Mr. Turner
watched him. Mr. Turner had been in this room much longer than he should have been, he had many
things to do; although living in daily association with people who used drugs, he had a horror of
drugs, and he was very fond of William Campbell; he did not wish to leave him. He was very sorry
for him and he felt a cure might help. He knew there were good cures in Kansas City. But he had to
go. He stood up.
“Listen, Billy,” William Campbell said, “I want to tell you something. You’re called ‘Sliding
Billy.’ That’s because you can slide. I’m called just Billy. That’s because I never could slide at all. I
can’t slide, Billy. I can’t slide. It just catches. Every time I try it, it catches.” He shut his eyes. “I can’t
slide, Billy. It’s awful when you can’t slide.”
“Yes,” said “Sliding Billy” Turner.
“Yes, what?” William Campbell looked at him.
“You were saying.”
“No,” said William Campbell. “I wasn’t saying. It must have been a mistake.”
“You were saying about sliding.”
“No. It couldn’t have been about sliding. But listen, Billy, and I’ll tell you a secret. Stick to
sheets, Billy. Keep away from women and horses and, and—” he stopped “—eagles, Billy. If you
love horses you’ll get horse-shit, and if you love eagles you’ll get eagle-shit.” He stopped and put his
head under the sheet.
“I got to go,” said “Sliding Billy” Turner.
“If you love women you’ll get a dose,” William Campbell said. “If you love horses—”
“Yes, you said that.”
“Said what?”
“About horses and eagles.”
“Oh, yes. And if you love sheets.” He breathed on the sheet and stroked his nose against it. “I
don’t know about sheets,” he said. “I just started to love this sheet.”
“I have to go,” Mr. Turner said. “I got a lot to do.”
“That’s all right,” William Campbell said. “Everybody’s got to go.”
“I better go.”
“All right, you go.”
“Are you all right, Billy?”
“I was never so happy in my life.”
“And you’re all right?”
“I’m fine. You go along. I’ll just lie here for a little while. Around noon I’ll get up.”
But when Mr. Turner came up to William Campbell’s room at noon William Campbell was
sleeping and as Mr. Turner was a man who knew what things in life were very valuable he did not
wake him.
Today Is Friday
Three Roman soldiers are in a drinking-place at eleven
o’clock at night. There are barrels around the wall. Behind the wooden counter is a Hebrew wineseller. The three Roman soldiers are a little cock-eyed.
1st Roman Soldier—You tried the red?
2d Soldier—No, I ain’t tried it.
1st Soldier—You better try it.
2d Soldier—All right, George, we’ll have a round of the red.
Hebrew Wine-seller—Here you are, gentlemen. You’ll like that. [ He sets down an earthenware
pitcher that he has filled from one of the casks.] That’s a nice little wine.
1st Soldier—Have a drink of it yourself. [He turns to the third Roman soldier who is leaning
on a barrel.] What’s the matter with you?
3d Roman Soldier—I got a gut-ache.
2d Soldier—You’ve been drinking water.
1st Soldier—Try some of the red.
3d Soldier—I can’t drink the damn stuff. It makes my gut sour.
1st Soldier—You been out here too long.
3d Soldier—Hell don’t I know it?
1st Soldier—Say, George, can’t you give this gentleman something to fix up his stomach?
Hebrew Wine-seller—I got it right here.
[The third Roman soldier tastes the cup that the wine-seller has mixed for him.]
3d Soldier—Hey, what you put in that, camel chips?
Wine-seller—You drink that right down, Lootenant. That’ll fix you up right.
3d Soldier—Well, I couldn’t feel any worse.
1st Soldier—Take a chance on it. George fixed me up fine the other day.
Wine-seller—You were in bad shape, Lootenant. I know what fixes up a bad stomach.
[The third Roman soldier drinks the cup down.]
3d Roman Soldier—Jesus Christ. [He makes a face.]
2d Soldier—That false alarm!
1st Soldier—Oh, I don’t know. He was pretty good in there today.
2d Soldier—Why didn’t he come down off the cross?
1st Soldier—He didn’t want to come down off the cross. That’s not his play.
2d Soldier—Show me a guy that doesn’t want to come down off the cross.
1st Soldier—Aw, hell, you don’t know anything about it. Ask George there. Did he want to come
down off the cross, George?
Wine-seller—I’ll tell you, gentlemen, I wasn’t out there. It’s a thing I haven’t taken any interest
in.
2d Soldier—Listen, I seen a lot of them—here and plenty of other places. Any time you show me
one that doesn’t want to get down off the cross when the time comes—when the time comes, I mean—
I’ll climb right up with him.
1st Soldier—I thought he was pretty good in there today.
3d Soldier—He was all right.
2d Roman Soldier—You guys don’t know what I’m talking about. I’m not saying whether he was
good or not. What I mean is, when the time comes. When they first start nailing him, there isn’t none of
them wouldn’t stop it if they could.
1st Soldier—Didn’t you follow it, George?
Wine-seller—No, I didn’t take any interest in it, Lootenant.
1st Soldier—I was surprised how he acted.
3d Soldier—The part I don’t like is the nailing them on. You know, that must get to you pretty
bad.
2d Soldier—It isn’t that that’s so bad, as when they first lift ’em up. [He makes a lifting gesture
with his two palms together.] When the weight starts to pull on ’em. That’s when it gets ’em.
3d Roman Soldier—It take some of them pretty bad.
1st Soldier—Ain’t I seen ’em? I seen plenty of them. I tell you, he was pretty good in there
today.
[The second Roman soldier smiles at the Hebrew wine-seller.]
2d Soldier—You’re a regular Christer, big boy.
1st Soldier—Sure, go on and kid him. But listen while I tell you something. He was pretty good
in there today.
2d Soldier—What about some more wine?
[The wine-seller looks up expectantly. The third Roman soldier is sitting with his head down.
He does not look well.]
3d Soldier—I don’t want any more.
2d Soldier—Just for two, George.
[The wine-seller puts out a pitcher of wine, a size smaller than the last one.
He leans forward on the wooden counter.]
1st Roman Soldier—You see his girl?
2d Soldier—Wasn’t I standing right by her?
1st Soldier—She’s a nice-looker.
2d Soldier—I knew her before he did. [He winks at the wine-seller.]
1st Soldier—I used to see her around the town.
2d Soldier—She used to have a lot of stuff. He never brought her no good luck.
1st Soldier—Oh, he ain’t lucky. But he looked pretty good to me in there today.
2d Soldier—What become of his gang?
1st Soldier—Oh, they faded out. Just the women stuck by him.
2d Roman Soldier—They were a pretty yellow crowd. When they seen him go up there they
didn’t want any of it.
1st Soldier—The women stuck all right.
2d Soldier—Sure, they stuck all right.
1st Roman Soldier—You see me slip the old spear into him?
2d Roman Soldier—You’ll get into trouble doing that some day.
1st Soldier—It was the least I could do for him. I’ll tell you he looked pretty good to me in there
today.
Hebrew Wine-seller—Gentlemen, you know I got to close.
1st Roman Soldier—We’ll have one more round.
2d Roman Soldier—What’s the use? This stuff don’t get you anywhere. Come on, let’s go.
1st Soldier—Just another round.
3d Roman Soldier—[Getting up from the barrel.] No, come on. Let’s go. I feel like hell tonight.
1st Soldier—Just one more.
2d Soldier—No, come on. We’re going to go. Good-night, George. Put it on the bill.
Wine-seller—Good-night, gentlemen. [He looks a little worried.] You couldn’t let me have a
little something on account, Lootenant?
2d Roman Soldier—What the hell, George! Wednesday’s payday.
Wine-seller—It’s all right, Lootenant. Good-night, gentlemen.
[The three Roman soldiers go out the door into the street.]
[Outside in the street.]
2d Roman Soldier—George is a kike just like all the rest of them.
1st Roman Soldier—Oh, George is a nice fella.
2d Soldier—Everybody’s a nice fella to you tonight.
3d Roman Soldier—Come on, let’s go up to the barracks. I feel like hell tonight.
2d Soldier—You been out here too long.
3d Roman Soldier—No, it ain’t just that. I feel like hell.
2d Soldier—You been out here too long. That’s all.
CURTAIN
Banal Story
SO HE ATE AN ORANGE, SLOWLY SPITTING out the seeds.
Outside, the snow was turning to rain. Inside, the electric stove seemed to give no heat and rising
from his writing-table, he sat down upon the stove. How good it felt! Here, at last, was life.
He reached for another orange. Far away in Paris, Mascart had knocked Danny Frush cuckoo in
the second round. Far off in Mesopotamia, twenty-one feet of snow had fallen. Across the world in
distant Australia, the English cricketers were sharpening up their wickets. There was Romance.
Patrons of the arts and letters have discovered The Forum, he read. It is the guide, philosopher,
and friend of the thinking minority. Prize short-stories—will their authors write our best-sellers of
tomorrow?
You will enjoy these warm, homespun, American tales, bits of real life on the open ranch, in
crowded tenement or comfortable home, and all with a healthy undercurrent of humor.
I must read them, he thought.
He read on. Our children’s children—what of them? Who of them? New means must be
discovered to find room for us under the sun. Shall this be done by war or can it be done by peaceful
methods?
Or will we all have to move to Canada?
Our deepest convictions—will Science upset them? Our civilization—is it inferior to older
orders of things?
And meanwhile, in the far-off dripping jungles of Yucatan, sounded the chopping of the axes of
the gum-choppers.
Do we want big men—or do we want them cultured? Take Joyce. Take President Coolidge.
What star must our college students aim at? There is Jack Britton. There is Doctor Henry Van Dyke.
Can we reconcile the two? Take the case of Young Stribling.
And what of our daughters who must make their own Soundings? Nancy Hawthorne is obliged to
make her own Soundings in the sea of life. Bravely and sensibly she faces the problems which come
to every girl of eighteen.
It was a splendid booklet.
Are you a girl of eighteen? Take the case of Joan of Arc. Take the case of Bernard Shaw. Take
the case of Betsy Ross.
Think of these things in 1925—Was there a risqué page in Puritan history? Were there two sides
to Pocahontas? Did she have a fourth dimension?
Are modem paintings—and poetry—Art? Yes and No. Take Picasso.
Have tramps codes of conduct? Send your mind adventuring.
There is Romance everywhere. Forum writers talk to the point, are possessed of humor and wit.
But they do not try to be smart and are never long-winded.
Live the full life of the mind, exhilarated by new ideas, intoxicated by the Romance of the
unusual. He laid down the booklet.
And meanwhile, stretched flat on a bed in a darkened room in his house in Triana, Manuel
Garcia Maera lay with a tube in each lung, drowning with the pneumonia. All the papers in Andalucia
devoted special supplements to his death, which had been expected for some days. Men and boys
bought full-length colored pictures of him to remember him by, and lost the picture they had of him in
their memories by looking at the lithographs. Bull-fighters were very relieved he was dead, because
he did always in the bull-ring the things they could only do sometimes. They all marched in the rain
behind his coffin and there were one hundred and forty-seven bull-fighters followed him out to the
cemetery, where they buried him in the tomb next to Joselito. After the funeral every one sat in the
cafés out of the rain, and many colored pictures of Maera were sold to men who rolled them up and
put them away in their pockets.
Now I Lay Me
THAT NIGHT WE LAY ON THE FLOOR IN the room and I listened
to the silk-worms eating. The silk-worms fed in racks of mulberry leaves and all night you could hear
them eating and a dropping sound in the leaves. I myself did not want to sleep because I had been
living for a long time with the knowledge that if I ever shut my eyes in the dark and let myself go, my
soul would go out of my body. I had been that way for a long time, ever since I had been blown up at
night and felt it go out of me and go off and then come back. I tried never to think about it, but it had
started to go since, in the nights, just at the moment of going off to sleep, and I could only stop it by a
very great effort. So while now I am fairly sure that it would not really have gone out, yet then, that
summer, I was unwilling to make the experiment.
I had different ways of occupying myself while I lay awake. I would think of a trout stream I had
fished along when I was a boy and fish its whole length very carefully in my mind; fishing very
carefully under all the logs, all the turns of the bank, the deep holes and the clear shallow stretches,
sometimes catching trout and sometimes losing them. I would stop fishing at noon to eat my lunch;
sometimes on a log over the stream; sometimes on a high bank under a tree, and I always ate my lunch
very slowly and watched the stream below me while I ate. Often I ran out of bait because I would
take only ten worms with me in a tobacco tin when I started. When I had used them all I had to find
more worms, and sometimes it was very difficult digging in the bank of the stream where the cedar
trees kept out the sun and there was no grass but only the bare moist earth and often I could find no
worms. Always though I found some kind of bait, but one time in the swamp I could find no bait at all
and had to cut up one of the trout I had caught and use him for bait.
Sometimes I found insects in the swamp meadows, in the grass or under ferns, and used them.
There were beetles and insects with legs like grass stems, and grubs in old rotten logs; white grubs
with brown pinching heads that would not stay on the hook and emptied into nothing in the cold water,
and wood ticks under logs where sometimes I found angle-worms that slipped into the ground as soon
as the log was raised. Once I used a salamander from under an old log. The salamander was very
small and neat and agile and a lovely color. He had tiny feet that tried to hold on to the hook, and after
that one time I never used a salamander, although I found them very often. Nor did I use crickets,
because of the way they acted about the hook.
Sometimes the stream ran through an open meadow, and in the dry grass I would catch
grasshoppers and use them for bait and sometimes I would catch grasshoppers and toss them into the
stream and watch them float along swimming on the stream and circling on the surface as the current
took them and then disappear as a trout rose. Sometimes I would fish four or five different streams in
the night; starting as near as I could get to their source and fishing them down stream. When I had
finished too quickly and the time did not go, I would fish the stream over again, starting where it
emptied into the lake and fishing back up stream, trying for all the trout I had missed coming down.
Some nights too I made up streams, and some of them were very exciting, and it was like being awake
and dreaming. Some of those streams I still remember and think that I have fished in them, and they
are confused with streams I really know. I gave them all names and went to them on the train and
sometimes walked for miles to get to them.
But some nights I could not fish, and on those nights I was cold-awake and said my prayers over
and over and tried to pray for all the people I had ever known. That took up a great amount of time,
for if you try to remember all the people you have ever known, going back to the earliest thing you
remember—which was, with me, the attic of the house where I was born and my mother and father’s
wedding-cake in a tin box hanging from one of the rafters, and, in the attic, jars of snakes and other
specimens that my father had collected as a boy and preserved in alcohol, the alcohol sunken in the
jars so the backs of some of the snakes and specimens were exposed and had turned white—if you
thought back that far, you remembered a great many people. If you prayed for all of them, saying a
Hail Mary and an Our Father for each one, it took a long time and finally it would be light, and then
you could go to sleep, if you were in a place where you could sleep in the daylight.
On those nights I tried to remember everything that had ever happened to me, starting with just
before I went to the war and remembering back from one thing to another. I found I could only
remember back to that attic in my grandfather’s house. Then I would start there and remember this
way again, until I reached the war.
I remember, after my grandfather died we moved away from that house and to a new house
designed and built by my mother. Many things that were not to be moved were burned in the backyard and I remember those jars from the attic being thrown in the fire, and how they popped in the
heat and the fire flamed up from the alcohol. I remember the snakes burning in the fire in the backyard. But there were no people in that, only things. I could not remember who burned the things even,
and I would go on until I came to people and then stop and pray for them.
About the new house I remember how my mother was always cleaning things out and making a
good clearance. One time when my father was away on a hunting trip she made a good thorough
cleaning out in the basement and burned everything that should not have been there. When my father
came home and got down from his buggy and hitched the horse, the fire was still burning in the road
beside the house. I went out to meet him. He handed me his shotgun and looked at the fire. “What’s
this?” he asked.
“I’ve been cleaning out the basement, dear,” my mother said from the porch. She was standing
there smiling, to meet him. My father looked at the fire and kicked at something. Then he leaned over
and picked something out of the ashes. “Get a rake, Nick,” he said to me. I went to the basement and
brought a rake and my father raked very carefully in the ashes. He raked out stone axes and stone
skinning knives and tools for making arrow-heads and pieces of pottery and many arrow-heads. They
had all been blackened and chipped by the fire. My father raked them all out very carefully and
spread them on the grass by the road. His shotgun in its leather case and his game-bags were on the
grass where he had left them when he stepped down from the buggy.
“Take the gun and the bags in the house, Nick, and bring me a paper,” he said. My mother had
gone inside the house. I took the shotgun, which was heavy to carry and banged against my legs, and
the two game-bags and started toward the house. “Take them one at a time,” my father said. “Don’t try
and carry too much at once.” I put down the game-bags and took in the shotgun and brought out a
newspaper from the pile in my father’s office. My father spread all the blackened, chipped stone
implements on the paper and then wrapped them up. “The best arrow-heads went all to pieces,” he
said. He walked into the house with the paper package and I stayed outside on the grass with the two
game-bags. After a while I took them in. In remembering that, there were only two people, so I would
pray for them both.
Some nights, though, I could not remember my prayers even. I could only get as far as “On earth
as it is in heaven” and then have to start all over and be absolutely unable to get past that. Then I
would have to recognize that I could not remember and give up saying my prayers that night and try
something else. So on some nights I would try to remember all the animals in the world by name and
then the birds and then fishes and then countries and cities and then kinds of food and the names of all
the streets I could remember in Chicago, and when I could not remember anything at all any more I
would just listen. And I do not remember a night on which you could not hear things. If I could have a
light I was not afraid to sleep, because I knew my soul would only go out of me if it were dark. So, of
course, many nights I was where I could have a light and then I slept because I was nearly always
tired and often very sleepy. And I am sure many times too that I slept without knowing it—but I never
slept knowing it, and on this night I listened to the silk-worms. You can hear silk-worms eating very
clearly in the night and I lay with my eyes open and listened to them.
There was only one other person in the room and he was awake too. I listened to him being
awake, for a long time. He could not lie as quietly as I could because, perhaps, he had not had as
much practice being awake. We were lying on blankets spread over straw and when he moved the
straw was noisy, but the silk-worms were not frightened by any noise we made and ate on steadily.
There were the noises of night seven kilometres behind the lines outside but they were different from
the small noises inside the room in the dark. The other man in the room tried lying quietly. Then he
moved again. I moved too, so he would know I was awake. He had lived ten years in Chicago. They
had taken him for a soldier in nineteen fourteen when he had come back to visit his family, and they
had given him me for an orderly because he spoke English. I heard him listening, so I moved again in
the blankets.
“Can’t you sleep, Signor Tenente?” he asked.
“No.”
“I can’t sleep, either.”
“What’s the matter?”
“I don’t know. I can’t sleep.”
“You feel all right?”
“Sure. I feel good. I just can’t sleep.”
“You want to talk a while?” I asked.
“Sure. What can you talk about in this damn place.”
“This place is pretty good,” I said.
“Sure,” he said. “It’s all right.”
“Tell me about out in Chicago,” I said.
“Oh,” he said, “I told you all that once.”
“Tell me about how you got married.”
“I told you that.”
“Was the letter you got Monday—from her?”
“Sure. She writes me all the time. She’s making good money with the place.”
“You’ll have a nice place when you go back.”
“Sure. She runs it fine. She’s making a lot of money.”
“Don’t you think we’ll wake them up, talking?” I asked.
“No. They can’t hear. Anyway, they sleep like pigs. I’m different,” he said. “I’m nervous.”
“Talk quiet,” I said. “Want a smoke?”
We smoked skilfully in the dark.
“You don’t smoke much. Signor Tenente.”
“No. I’ve just about cut it out.”
“Well,” he said, “it don’t do you any good and I suppose you get so you don’t miss it. Did you
ever hear a blind man won’t smoke because he can’t see the smoke come out?”
“I don’t believe it.”
“I think it’s all bull, myself,” he said. “I just heard it somewhere. You know how you hear
things.”
We were both quiet and I listened to the silk-worms.
“You hear those damn silk-worms?” he asked. “You can hear them chew.”
“It’s funny,” I said.
“Say, Signor Tenente, is there something really the matter that you can’t sleep? I never see you
sleep. You haven’t slept nights ever since I been with you.”
“I don’t know, John,” I said. “I got in pretty bad shape along early last spring and at night it
bothers me.”
“Just like I am,” he said. “I shouldn’t have ever got in this war. I’m too nervous.”
“Maybe it will get better.”
“Say, Signor Tenente, what did you get in this war for, anyway?”
“I don’t know, John. I wanted to, then.”
“Wanted to,” he said. “That’s a hell of a reason.”
“We oughtn’t to talk out loud,” I said.
“They sleep just like pigs,” he said. “They can’t understand the English language, anyway. They
don’t know a damn thing. What are you going to do when it’s over and we go back to the States?”
“I’ll get a job on a paper.”
“In Chicago?”
“Maybe.”
“Do you ever read what this fellow Brisbane writes? My wife cuts it out for me and sends it to
me.”
“Sure.”
“Did you ever meet him?”
“No, but I’ve seen him.”
“I’d like to meet that fellow. He’s a fine writer. My wife don’t read English but she takes the
paper just like when I was home and she cuts out the editorials and the sport page and sends them to
me.”
“How are your kids?”
“They’re fine. One of the girls is in the fourth grade now. You know, Signor Tenente, if I didn’t
have the kids I wouldn’t be your orderly now. They’d have made me stay in the line all the time.”
“I’m glad you’ve got them.”
“So am I. They’re fine kids but I want a boy. Three girls and no boy. That’s a hell of a note.”
“Why don’t you try and go to sleep?”
“No, I can’t sleep now. I’m wide awake now, Signor Tenente. Say, I’m worried about you not
sleeping though.”
“It’ll be all right, John.”
“Imagine a young fellow like you not to sleep.”
“I’ll get all right. It just takes a while.”
“You got to get all right. A man can’t get along that don’t sleep. Do you worry about anything?
You got anything on your mind?”
“No, John, I don’t think so.”
“You ought to get married, Signor Tenente. Then you wouldn’t worry.”
“I don’t know.”
“You ought to get married. Why don’t you pick out some nice Italian girl with plenty of money?
You could get any one you want. You’re young and you got good decorations and you look nice. You
been wounded a couple of times.”
“I can’t talk the language well enough.”
“You talk it fine. To hell with talking the language. You don’t have to talk to them. Marry them.”
“I’ll think about it.”
“You know some girls, don’t you?”
“Sure.”
“Well, you marry the one with the most money. Over here, the way they’re brought up, they’ll all
make you a good wife.”
“I’ll think about it.”
“Don’t think about it, Signor Tenente. Do it.”
“All right.”
“A man ought to be married. You’ll never regret it. Every man ought to be married.”
“All right,” I said. “Let’s try and sleep a while.”
“All right, Signor Tenente. I’ll try it again. But you remember what I said.”
“I’ll remember it,” I said. “Now let’s sleep a while, John.”
“All right,” he said. “I hope you sleep, Signor Tenente.”
I heard him roll in his blankets on the straw and then he was very quiet and I listened to him
breathing regularly. Then he started to snore. I listened to him snore for a long time and then I stopped
listening to him snore and listened to the silk-worms eating. They ate steadily, making a dropping in
the leaves. I had a new thing to think about and I lay in the dark with my eyes open and thought of all
the girls I had ever known and what kind of wives they would make. It was a very interesting thing to
think about and for a while it killed off trout-fishing and interfered with my prayers. Finally, though, I
went back to trout-fishing, because I found that I could remember all the streams and there was
always something new about them, while the girls, after I had thought about them a few times, blurred
and I could not call them into my mind and finally they all blurred and all became rather the same and
I gave up thinking about them almost altogether. But I kept on with my prayers and I prayed very often
for John in the nights and his class was removed from active service before the October offensive. I
was glad he was not there, because he would have been a great worry to me. He came to the hospital
in Milan to see me several months after and was very disappointed that I had not yet married, and I
know he would feel very badly if he knew that, so far, I have never married. He was going back to
America and he was very certain about marriage and knew it would fix up everything.
After the Storm
IT WASN’T ABOUT ANYTHING, SOME thing about making punch,
and then we started fighting and I slipped and he had me down kneeling on my chest and choking me
with both hands like he was trying to kill me and all the time I was trying to get the knife out of my
pocket to cut him loose. Everybody was too drunk to pull him off me. He was choking me and
hammering my head on the floor and I got the knife out and opened it up; and I cut the muscle right
across his arm and he let go of me. He couldn’t have held on if he wanted to. Then he rolled and hung
onto that arm and started to cry and I said:
“What the hell you want to choke me for?”
I’d have killed him. I couldn’t swallow for a week. He hurt my throat bad.
Well, I went out of there and there were plenty of them with him and some came out after me and
I made a turn and was down by the docks and I met a fellow and he said somebody killed a man up
the street. I said “Who killed him?” and he said “I don’t know who killed him but he’s dead all right,”
and it was dark and there was water standing in the street and no lights and windows broke and boats
all up in the town and trees blown down and everything all blown and I got a skiff and went out and
found my boat where I had her inside of Mango Key and she was all right only she was full of water.
So I bailed her out and pumped her out and there was a moon but plenty of clouds and still plenty
rough and I took it down along; and when it was daylight I was off Eastern Harbor.
Brother, that was some storm. I was the first boat out and you never saw water like that was. It
was just as white as a lye barrel and coming from Eastern Harbor to Sou’west Key you couldn’t
recognize the shore. There was a big channel blown right out through the middle of the beach. Trees
and all blown out and a channel cut through and all the water white as chalk and everything on it;
branches and whole trees and dead birds, and all floating. Inside the keys were all the pelicans in the
world and all kinds of birds flying. They must have gone inside there when they knew it was coming.
I lay at Sou’west Key a day and nobody came after me. I was the first boat out and I seen a spar
floating and I knew there must be a wreck and I started out to look for her. I found her. She was a
three-masted schooner and I could just see the stumps of her spars out of water. She was in too deep
water and I didn’t get anything off of her. So I went on looking for something else. I had the start on
all of them and I knew I ought to get whatever there was. I went on down over the sand-bars from
where I left that three-masted schooner and I didn’t find anything and I went on a long way. I was way
out toward the quicksands and I didn’t find anything so I went on. Then when I was in sight of the
Rebecca light I saw all kinds of birds making over something and I headed over for them to see what
it was and there was a cloud of birds all right.
I could see something looked like a spar up out of the water and when I got over close the birds
all went up in the air and stayed all around me. The water was clear out there and there was a spar of
some kind sticking out just above the water and when I come up close to it I saw it was all dark under
water like a long shadow and I came right over it and there under water was a liner; just lying there
all under water as big as the whole world. I drifted over her in the boat. She lay on her side and the
stern was deep down. The port holes were all shut tight and I could see the glass shine in the water
and the whole of her; the biggest boat I ever saw in my life laying there and I went along the whole
length of her and then I went over and anchored and I had the skiff on the deck forward and I shoved it
down into the water and sculled over with the birds all around me.
I had a water glass like we use sponging and my hand shook so I could hardly hold it. All the
port holes were shut that you could see going along over her but way down below near the bottom
something must have been open because there were pieces of things floating out all the time. You
couldn’t tell what they were. Just pieces. That’s what the birds were after. You never saw so many
birds. They were all around me; crazy yelling.
I could see everything sharp and clear. I could see her rounded over and she looked a mile long
under the water. She was lying on a clear white bank of sand and the spar was a sort of foremast or
some sort of tackle that slanted out of water the way she was laying on her side. Her bow wasn’t very
far under. I could stand on the letters of her name on her bow and my head was just out of water. But
the nearest port hole was twelve feet down. I could just reach it with the grains pole and I tried to
break it with that but I couldn’t. The glass was too stout. So I sculled back to the boat and got a
wrench and lashed it to the end of the grains pole and I couldn’t break it. There I was looking down
through the glass at that liner with everything in her and I was the first one to her and I couldn’t get
into her. She must have had five million dollars worth in her.
It made me shaky to think how much she must have in her. Inside the port hole that was closest I
could see something but I couldn’t make it out through the water glass. I couldn’t do any good with the
grains pole and I took off my clothes and stood and took a couple of deep breaths and dove over off
the stern with the wrench in my hand and swam down. I could hold on for a second to the edge of the
port hole and I could see in and there was a woman inside with her hair floating all out. I could see
her floating plain and I hit the glass twice with the wrench hard and I heard the noise clink in my ears
but it wouldn’t break and I had to come up.
I hung onto the dinghy and got my breath and then I climbed in and took a couple of breaths and
dove again. I swam down and took hold of the edge of the port hole with my fingers and held it and hit
the glass as hard as I could with the wrench. I could see the woman floated in the water through the
glass. Her hair was tied once close to her head and it floated all out in the water. I could see the rings
on one of her hands. She was right up close to the port hole and I hit the glass twice and I didn’t even
crack it. When I came up I thought I wouldn’t make it to the top before I’d have to breathe.
I went down once more and I cracked the glass, only cracked it, and when I came up my nose
was bleeding and I stood on the bow of the liner with my bare feet on the letters of her name and my
head just out and rested there and then I swam over to the skiff and pulled up into it and sat there
waiting for my head to stop aching and looking down into the water glass, but I bled so I had to wash
out the water glass. Then I lay back in the skiff and held my hand under my nose to stop it and I lay
there with my head back looking up and there was a million birds above and all around.
When I quit bleeding I took another look through the glass and then I sculled over to the boat to
try and find something heavier than the wrench but I couldn’t find a thing; not even a sponge hook. I
went back and the water was clearer all the time and you could see everything that floated out over
that white bank of sand. I looked for sharks but there weren’t any. You could have seen a shark a long
way away. The water was so clear and the sand white. There was a grapple for an anchor on the skiff
and I cut it off and went overboard and down with it. It carried me right down and past the port hole
and I grabbed and couldn’t hold anything and went on down and down, sliding along the curved side
of her. I had to let go of the grapple. I heard it bump once and it seemed like a year before I came up
through to the top of the water. The skiff was floated away with the tide and I swam over to her with
my nose bleeding in the water while I swam and I was plenty glad there weren’t sharks; but I was
tired.
My head felt cracked open and I lay in the skiff and rested and then I sculled back. It was getting
along in the afternoon. I went down once more with the wrench and it didn’t do any good. That
wrench was too light. It wasn’t any good diving unless you had a big hammer or something heavy
enough to do good. Then I lashed the wrench to the grains pole again and I watched through the water
glass and pounded on the glass and hammered until the wrench came off and I saw it in the glass,
clear and sharp, go sliding down along her and then off and down to the quicksand and go in. Then I
couldn’t do a thing. The wrench was gone and I’d lost the grapple so I sculled back to the boat. I was
too tired to get the skiff aboard and the sun was pretty low. The birds were all pulling out and leaving
her and I headed for Sou’west Key towing the skiff and the birds going on ahead of me and behind me.
I was plenty tired.
That night it came on to blow and it blew for a week. You couldn’t get out to her. They come out
from town and told me the fellow I’d had to cut was all right except for his arm and I went back to
town and they put me under five hundred dollar bond. It came out all right because some of them,
friends of mine, swore he was after me with an ax, but by the time we got back out to her the Greeks
had blown her open and cleaned her out. They got the safe out with dynamite. Nobody ever knows
how much they got. She carried gold and they got it all. They stripped her clean. I found her and I
never got a nickel out of her.
It was a hell of a thing all right. They say she was just outside of Havana harbor when the
hurricane hit and she couldn’t get in or the owners wouldn’t let the captain chance coming in; they say
he wanted to try; so she had to go with it and in the dark they were running with it trying to go through
the gulf between Rebecca and Tortugas when she struck on the quicksands. Maybe her rudder was
carried away. Maybe they weren’t even steering. But anyway they couldn’t have known they were
quicksands and when she struck the captain must have ordered them to open up the ballast tanks so
she’d lay solid. But it was quicksand she’d hit and when they opened the tank she went in stern first
and then over on her beam ends. There were four hundred and fifty passengers and the crew on board
of her and they must all have been aboard of her when I found her. They must have opened the tanks as
soon as she struck and the minute she settled on it the quicksands took her down. Then her boilers
must have burst and that must have been what made those pieces that came out. It was funny there
weren’t any sharks though. There wasn’t a fish. I could have seen them on that clear white sand.
Plenty of fish now though; jewfish, the biggest kind. The biggest part of her’s under the sand now
but they live inside of her; the biggest kind of jewfish. Some weigh three to four hundred pounds.
Sometime we’ll go out and get some. You can see the Rebecca light from where she is. They’ve got a
buoy on her now. She’s right at the end of the quicksand right at the edge of the gulf. She only missed
going through by about a hundred yards. In the dark in the storm they just missed it; raining the way it
was they couldn’t have seen the Rebecca. Then they’re not used to that sort of thing. The captain of a
liner isn’t used to scudding that way. They have a course and they tell me they set some sort of a
compass and it steers itself. They probably didn’t know where they were when they ran with that
blow but they come close to making it. Maybe they’d lost the rudder though. Anyway there wasn’t
another thing for them to hit till they’d get to Mexico once they were in that gulf. Must have been
something though when they struck in that rain and wind and he told them to open her tanks. Nobody
could have been on deck in that blow and rain. Everybody must have been below. They couldn’t have
lived on deck. There must have been some scenes inside all right because you know she settled fast. I
saw that wrench go into the sand. The captain couldn’t have known it was quicksand when she struck
unless he knew these waters. He just knew it wasn’t rock. He must have seen it all up in the bridge.
He must have known what it was about when she settled. I wonder how fast she made it. I wonder if
the mate was there with him. Do you think they stayed inside the bridge or do you think they took it
outside? They never found any bodies. Not a one. Nobody floating. They float a long way with life
belts too. They must have took it inside. Well, the Greeks got it all. Everything. They must have come
fast all right. They picked her clean. First there was the birds, then me, then the Greeks, and even the
birds got more out of her than I did.
A Clean, Well-Lighted Place
IT WAS LATE AND EVERY ONE HAD LEFT the café except an old
man who sat in the shadow the leaves of the tree made against the electric light. In the day time the
street was dusty, but at night the dew settled the dust and the old man liked to sit late because he was
deaf and now at night it was quiet and he felt the difference. The two waiters inside the café knew that
the old man was a little drunk, and while he was a good client they knew that if he became too drunk
he would leave without paying, so they kept watch on him.
“Last week he tried to commit suicide,” one waiter said.
“Why?”
“He was in despair.”
“What about?”
“Nothing.”
“How do you know it was nothing?”
“He has plenty of money.”
They sat together at a table that was close against the wall near the door of the café and looked at
the terrace where the tables were all empty except where the old man sat in the shadow of the leaves
of the tree that moved slightly in the wind. A girl and a soldier went by in the street. The street light
shone on the brass number on his collar. The girl wore no head covering and hurried beside him.
“The guard will pick him up,” one waiter said.
“What does it matter if he gets what he’s after?”
“He had better get off the street now. The guard will get him. They went by five minutes ago.”
The old man sitting in the shadow rapped on his saucer with his glass. The younger waiter went
over to him.
“What do you want?”
The old man looked at him. “Another brandy,” he said.
“You’ll be drunk,” the waiter said. The old man looked at him. The waiter went away.
“He’ll stay all night,” he said to his colleague. “I’m sleepy now. I never get into bed before three
o’clock. He should have killed himself last week.”
The waiter took the brandy bottle and another saucer from the counter inside the café and
marched out to the old man’s table. He put down the saucer and poured the glass full of brandy.
“You should have killed yourself last week,” he said to the deaf man. The old man motioned
with his finger. “A little more,” he said. The waiter poured on into the glass so that the brandy
slopped over and ran down the stem into the top saucer of the pile. “Thank you,” the old man said.
The waiter took the bottle back inside the café. He sat down at the table with his colleague again.
“He’s drunk now,” he said.
“He’s drunk every night.”
“What did he want to kill himself for?”
“How should I know.”
“How did he do it?”
“He hung himself with a rope.”
“Who cut him down?”
“His niece.”
“Why did they do it?”
“Fear for his soul.”
“How much money has he got?”
“He’s got plenty.”
“He must be eighty years old.”
“Anyway I should say he was eighty.”
“I wish he would go home. I never get to bed before three o’clock. What kind of hour is that to
go to bed?”
“He stays up because he likes it.”
“He’s lonely. I’m not lonely. I have a wife waiting in bed for me.”
“He had a wife once too.”
“A wife would be no good to him now.”
“You can’t tell. He might be better with a wife.”
“His niece looks after him. You said she cut him down.”
“I know.”
“I wouldn’t want to be that old. An old man is a nasty thing.”
“Not always. This old man is clean. He drinks without spilling. Even now, drunk. Look at him.”
“I don’t want to look at him. I wish he would go home. He has no regard for those who must
work.”
The old man looked from his glass across the square, then over at the waiters.
“Another brandy,” he said, pointing to his glass. The waiter who was in a hurry came over.
“Finished,” he said, speaking with that omission of syntax stupid people employ when talking to
drunken people or foreigners. “No more tonight. Close now.”
“Another,” said the old man.
“No. Finished.” The waiter wiped the edge of the table with a towel and shook his head.
The old man stood up, slowly counted the saucers, took a leather coin purse from his pocket and
paid for the drinks, leaving half a peseta tip.
The waiter watched him go down the street, a very old man walking unsteadily but with dignity.
“Why didn’t you let him stay and drink?” the unhurried waiter asked. They were putting up the
shutters. “It is not half-past two.”
“I want to go home to bed.”
“What is an hour?”
“More to me than to him.”
“An hour is the same.”
“You talk like an old man yourself. He can buy a bottle and drink at home.”
“It’s not the same.”
“No, it is not,” agreed the waiter with a wife. He did not wish to be unjust. He was only in a
hurry.
“And you? You have no fear of going home before your usual hour?”
“Are you trying to insult me?”
“No, hombre, only to make a joke.”
“No,” the waiter who was in a hurry said, rising from pulling down the metal shutters. “I have
confidence. I am all confidence.”
“You have youth, confidence, and a job,” the older waiter said. “You have everything.”
“And what do you lack?”
“Everything but work.”
“You have everything I have.”
“No. I have never had confidence and I am not young.”
“Come on. Stop talking nonsense and lock up.”
“I am of those who like to stay late at the café,” the older waiter said. “With all those who do not
want to go to bed. With all those who need a light for the night.”
“I want to go home and into bed.”
“We are of two different kinds,” the older waiter said. He was now dressed to go home. “It is
not only a question of youth and confidence although those things are very beautiful. Each night I am
reluctant to close up because there may be some one who needs the café.”
“Hombre, there are bodegas open all night long.”
“You do not understand. This is a clean and pleasant café. It is well lighted. The light is very
good and also, now, there are shadows of the leaves.”
“Good night,” said the younger waiter.
“Good night,” the other said. Turning off the electric light he continued the conversation with
himself. It is the light of course but it is necessary that the place be clean and pleasant. You do not
want music. Certainly you do not want music. Nor can you stand before a bar with dignity although
that is all that is provided for these hours. What did he fear? It was not fear or dread. It was a nothing
that he knew too well. It was all a nothing and a man was nothing too. It was only that and light was
all it needed and a certain cleanness and order. Some lived in it and never felt it but he knew it all
was nada y pues nada y nada y pues nada. Our nada who art in nada, nada be thy name thy kingdom
nada thy will be nada in nada as it is in nada. Give us this nada our daily nada and nada us our
nada as we nada our nadas and nada us not into nada but deliver us from nada; pues nada. Hail
nothing full of nothing, nothing is with thee. He smiled and stood before a bar with a shining steam
pressure coffee machine.
“What’s yours?” asked the barman.
“Nada.”
“Otro loco m ás,” said the barman and turned away.
“A little cup,” said the waiter.
The barman poured it for him.
“The light is very bright and pleasant but the bar is unpolished,” the waiter said.
The barman looked at him but did not answer. It was too late at night for conversation.
“You want another copita?” the barman asked.
“No, thank you,” said the waiter and went out. He disliked bars and bodegas. A clean, welllighted café was a very different thing. Now, without thinking further, he would go home to his room.
He would lie in the bed and finally, with daylight, he would go to sleep. After all, he said to himself,
it is probably only insomnia. Many must have it.
The Light of the World
WHEN HE SAW US COME IN THE DOOR the bartender looked up
and then reached over and put the glass covers on the two free-lunch bowls.
“Give me a beer,” I said. He drew it, cut the top off with the spatula and then held the glass in
his hand. I put the nickel on the wood and he slid the beer toward me.
“What’s yours?” he said to Tom.
“Beer.”
He drew that beer and cut it off and when he saw the money he pushed the beer across to Tom.
“What’s the matter?” Tom asked.
The bartender didn’t answer him. He just looked over our heads and said, “What’s yours?” to a
man who’d come in.
“Rye,” the man said. The bartender put out the bottle and glass and a glass of water.
Tom reached over and took the glass off the free-lunch bowl. It was a bowl of pickled pig’s feet
and there was a wooden thing that worked like a scissors, with two wooden forks at the end to pick
them up with.
“No,” said the bartender and put the glass cover back on the bowl. Tom held the wooden
scissors fork in his hand. “Put it back,” said the bartender.
“You know where,” said Tom.
The bartender reached a hand forward under the bar, watching us both. I put fifty cents on the
wood and he straightened up.
“What was yours?” he said.
“Beer,” I said, and before he drew the beer he uncovered both the bowls.
“Your goddam pig’s feet stink,” Tom said, and spit what he had in his mouth on the floor. The
bartender didn’t say anything. The man who had drunk the rye paid and went out without looking back.
“You stink yourself,” the bartender said. “All you punks stink.”
“He says we’re punks,” Tommy said to me.
“Listen,” I said. “Let’s get out.”
“You punks clear the hell out of here,” the bartender said.
“I said we were going out,” I said. “It wasn’t your idea.”
“We’ll be back,” Tommy said.
“No you won’t,” the bartender told him.
“Tell him how wrong he is,” Tom turned to me.
“Come on,” I said.
Outside it was good and dark.
“What the hell kind of place is this?” Tommy said.
“I don’t know,” I said. “Let’s go down to the station.”
We’d come in that town at one end and we were going out the other. It smelled of hides and tan
bark and the big piles of sawdust. It was getting dark as we came in, and now that it was dark it was
cold and the puddles of water in the road were freezing at the edges.
Down at the station there were five whores waiting for the train to come in, and six white men
and four Indians. It was crowded and hot from the stove and full of stale smoke. As we came in
nobody was talking and the ticket window was down.
“Shut the door, can’t you?” somebody said.
I looked to see who said it. It was one of the white men. He wore slagged trousers and
lumbermen’s rubbers and a mackinaw shirt like the others, but he had no cap and his face was white
and his hands were white and thin.
“Aren’t you going to shut it?”
“Sure,” I said, and shut it.
“Thank you,” he said. One of the other men snickered.
“Ever interfere with a cook?” he said to me.
“No.”
“You can interfere with this one,” he looked at the cook. “He likes it.”
The cook looked away from him holding his lips tight together.
“He puts lemon juice on his hands,” the man said. “He wouldn’t get them in dishwater for
anything. Look how white they are.”
One of the whores laughed out loud. She was the biggest whore I ever saw in my life and the
biggest woman. And she had on one of those silk dresses that change colors. There were two other
whores that were nearly as big but the big one must have weighed three hundred and fifty pounds. You
couldn’t believe she was real when you looked at her. All three had those changeable silk dresses.
They sat side by side on the bench. They were huge. The other two were just ordinary looking
whores, peroxide blondes.
“Look at his hands,” the man said and nodded his head at the cook. The whore laughed again and
shook all over.
The cook turned and said to her quickly, “You big disgusting mountain of flesh.”
She just keep on laughing and shaking.
“Oh, my Christ,” she said. She had a nice voice. “Oh, my sweet Christ.”
The two other whores, the big ones, acted very quiet and placid as though they didn’t have much
sense, but they were big, nearly as big as the biggest one. They’d have both gone well over two
hundred and fifty pounds. The other two were dignified.
Of the men, besides the cook and the one who talked, there were two other lumberjacks, one that
listened, interested but bashful, and the other that seemed getting ready to say something, and two
Swedes. Two Indians were sitting down at the end of the bench and one standing up against the wall.
The man who was getting ready to say something spoke to me very low, “Must be like getting on
top of a hay mow.”
I laughed and said it to Tommy.
“I swear to Christ I’ve never been anywhere like this,” he said. “Look at the three of them.” Then
the cook spoke up.
“How old are you boys?”
“I’m ninety-six and he’s sixty-nine,” Tommy said.
“Ho! Ho! Ho!” the big whore shook with laughing. She had a really pretty voice. The other
whores didn’t smile.
“Oh, can’t you be decent?” the cook said. “I asked just to be friendly.”
“We’re seventeen and nineteen,” I said.
“What’s the matter with you?” Tommy turned to me.
“That’s all right.”
“You can call me Alice,” the big whore said and then she began to shake again.
“Is that your name?” Tommy asked.
“Sure,” she said. “Alice. Isn’t it?” she turned to the man who sat by the cook.
“Alice. That’s right.”
“That’s the sort of name Vou’d have,” the cook said.
“It’s my real name,” Alice said.
“What’s the other girls’ names?” Tom asked.
“Hazel and Ethel,” Alice said. Hazel and Ethel smiled. They weren’t very bright.
“What’s your name?” I said to one of the blondes.
“Frances,” she said.
“Frances what?”
“Frances Wilson. What’s it to you?”
“What’s yours?” I asked the other one.
“Oh, don’t be fresh,” she said.
“He just wants us all to be friends,” the man who talked said. “Don’t you want to be friends?”
“No,” the peroxide one said. “Not with you.”
“She’s just a spitfire,” the man said. “A regular little spitfire.”
The one blonde looked at the other and shook her head.
“Goddamned mossbacks,” she said.
Alice commenced to laugh again and to shake all over.
“There’s nothing funny,” the cook said. “You all laugh but there’s nothing funny. You two young
lads; where are you bound for?”
“Where are you going yourself?” Tom asked him.
“I want to go to Cadillac,” the cook said. “Have you ever been there? My sister lives there.”
“He’s a sister himself,” the man in the slagged trousers said.
“Can’t you stop that sort of thing?” the cook asked. “Can’t we speak decently?”
“Cadillac is where Steve Ketchel came from and where Ad Wolgast is from,” the shy man said.
“Steve Ketchel,” one of the blondes said in a high voice as though the name had pulled a trigger
in her. “His own father shot and killed him. Yes, by Christ, his own father. There aren’t any more men
like Steve Ketchel.”
“Wasn’t his name Stanley Ketchel?” asked the cook.
“Oh, shut up,” said the blonde. “What do you know about Steve? Stanley. He was no Stanley.
Steve Ketchel was the finest and most beautiful man that ever lived. I never saw a man as clean and
as white and as beautiful as Steve Ketchel. There never was a man like that. He moved just like a
tiger and he was the finest, free-est spender that ever lived.”
“Did you know him?” one of the men asked.
“Did I know him? Did I know him? Did I love him? You ask me that? I knew him like you know
nobody in the world and I loved him like you love God. He was the greatest, finest, whitest, most
beautiful man that ever lived, Steve Ketchel, and his own father shot him down like a dog.”
“Were you out on the coast with him?”
“No. I knew him before that. He was the only man I ever loved.”
Every one was very respectful to the peroxide blonde, who said all this in a high stagey way, but
Alice was beginning to shake again. I felt it sitting by her.
“You should have married him,” the cook said.
“I wouldn’t hurt his career,” the peroxide blonde said. “I wouldn’t be a drawback to him. A wife
wasn’t what he needed. Oh, my God, what a man he was.”
“That was a fine way to look at it,” the cook said. “Didn’t Jack Johnson knock him out though?”
“It was a trick,” Peroxide said. “That big dinge took him by surprise. He’d just knocked Jack
Johnson down, the big black bastard. That nigger beat him by a fluke”
The ticket window went up and the three Indians went over to it.
“Steve knocked him down,” Peroxide said. “He turned to smile at me.”
“I thought you said you weren’t on the coast,” some one said.
“I went out just for that fight. Steve turned to smile at me and that black son of a bitch from hell
jumped up and hit him by surprise. Steve could lick a hundred like that black bastard.”
“He was a great fighter,” the lumberjack said.
“I hope to God he was,” Peroxide said. “I hope to God they don’t have fighters like that now. He
was like a god, he was. So white and clean and beautiful and smooth and fast and like a tiger or like
lightning.”
“I saw him in the moving pictures of the fight,” Tom said. We were all very moved. Alice was
shaking all over and I looked and saw she was crying. The Indians had gone outside on the platform.
“He was more than any husband could ever be,” Peroxide said. “We were married in the eyes of
God and I belong to him right now and always will and all of me is his. I don’t care about my body.
They can take my body. My soul belongs to Steve Ketchel. By God, he was a man.”
Everybody felt terribly. It was sad and embarrassing. Then Alice, who was still shaking, spoke.
“You’re a dirty liar,” she said in that low voice. “You never laid Steve Ketchel in your life and you
know it.”
“How can you say that?” Peroxide said proudly.
“I say it because it’s true,” Alice said. “I’m the only one here that ever knew Steve Ketchel and I
come from Mancelona and I knew him there and it’s true and you know it’s true and God can strike
me dead if it isn’t true.”
“He can strike me too,” Peroxide said.
“This is true, true, true, and you know it. Not just made up and I know exactly what he said to
me.”
“What did he say?” Peroxide asked, complacently.
Alice was crying so she could hardly speak from shaking so. “He said ‘You’re a lovely piece,
Alice.’ That’s exactly what he said.”
“It’s a lie,” Peroxide said.
“It’s true,” Alice said. “That’s truly what he said.”
“It’s a lie,” Peroxide said proudly.
“No, it’s true, true, true, to Jesus and Mary true.”
“Steve couldn’t have said that. It wasn’t the way he talked,” Peroxide said happily.
“It’s true,” said Alice in her nice voice. “And it doesn’t make any difference to me whether you
believe it or not.” She wasn’t crying any more and she was calm.
“It would be impossible for Steve to have said that,” Peroxide declared.
“He said it,” Alice said and smiled. “And I remember when he said it and I was a lovely piece
then exactly as he said, and right now I’m a better piece than you, you dried up old hot-water bottle.”
“You can’t insult me,” said Peroxide. “You big mountain of pus. I have my memories.”
“No,” Alice said in that sweet lovely voice, “you haven’t got any real memories except having
your tubes out and when you started C. and M. Everything else you just read in the papers. I’m clean
and you know it and men like me, even though I’m big, and you know it, and I never lie and you know
it.”
“Leave me with my memories,” Peroxide said. “With my true, wonderful memories.”
Alice looked at her and then at us and her face lost that hurt look and she smiled and she had
about the prettiest face I ever saw. She had a pretty face and a nice smooth skin and a lovely voice
and she was nice all right and really friendly. But my God she was big. She was as big as three
women. Tom saw me looking at her and he said, “Come on. Let’s go.”
“Good-bye,” said Alice. She certainly had a nice voice.
“Good-bye,” I said.
“Which way are you boys going?” asked the cook.
“The other way from you,” Tom told him.
God Rest You Merry,
Gentlemen
IN THOSE DAYS THE DISTANCES WERE ALL very different, the
dirt blew off the hills that now have been cut down, and Kansas City was very like Constantinople.
You may not believe this. No one believes this; but it is true. On this afternoon it was snowing and
inside an automobile dealer’s show window, lighted against the early dark, there was a racing motor
car finished entirely in silver with Dans Argent lettered on the hood. This I believed to mean the
silver dance or the silver dancer, and, slightly puzzled which it meant but happy in the sight of the car
and pleased by my knowledge of a foreign language, I went along the street in the snow. I was
walking from the Woolf Brothers’ saloon where, on Christmas and Thanksgiving Day, a free turkey
dinner was served, toward the city hospital which was on a high hill that overlooked the smoke, the
buildings and the streets of the town. In the reception room of the hospital were the two ambulance
surgeons Doc Fischer and Doctor Wilcox, sitting, the one before a desk, the other in a chair against
the wall.
Doc Fischer was thin, sand-blond, with a thin mouth, amused eyes and gambler’s hands. Doctor
Wilcox was short, dark and carried an indexed book. The Young Doctor’s Friend and Guide , which,
being consulted on any given subject, told symptoms and treatment. It was also cross-indexed so that
being consulted on symptoms it gave diagnoses. Doc Fischer had suggested that any future editions
should be further cross-indexed so that if consulted as to the treatments being given, it would reveal
ailments and symptoms. “As an aid to memory,” he said.
Doctor Wilcox was sensitive about this book but could not get along without it. It was bound in
limp leather and fitted his coat pocket and he had bought it at the advice of one of his professors who
had said, “Wilcox, you have no business being a physician and I have done everything in my power to
prevent you from being certified as one. Since you are now a member of this learned profession I
advise you, in the name of humanity, to obtain a copy of The Young Doctor’s Friend and Guide , and
use it. Doctor Wilcox. Learn to use it.”
Doctor Wilcox had said nothing but he had bought the leather-bound guide that same day.
“Well, Horace,” Doc Fischer said as I came in the receiving room which smelt of cigarettes,
iodoform, carbolic and an overheated radiator.
“Gentlemen,” I said.
“What news along the rialto?” Doc Fischer asked. He affected a certain extravagance of speech
which seemed to me to be of the utmost elegance.
“The free turkey at Woolf’s,” I answered.
“You partook?”
“Copiously.”
“Many of the confrères present?”
“All of them. The whole staff.”
“Much Yuletide cheer?”
“Not much.”
“Doctor Wilcox here has partaken slightly,” Doc Fischer said. Doctor Wilcox looked up at him,
then at me.
“Want a drink?” he asked.
“No, thanks,” I said.
“That’s all right,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“Horace,” Doc Fischer said, “you don’t mind me calling you Horace, do you?”
“No.”
“Good old Horace. We’ve had an extremely interesting case.”
“I’ll say,” said Doctor Wilcox.
“You know the lad who was in here yesterday?”
“Which one?”
“The lad who sought eunuch-hood.”
“Yes.” I had been there when he came in. He was a boy about sixteen. He came in with no hat on
and was very excited and frightened but determined. He was curly haired and well built and his lips
were prominent.
“What’s the matter with you, son?” Doctor Wilcox asked him.
“I want to be castrated,” the boy said.
“Why?” Doc Fischer asked.
“I’ve prayed and I’ve done everything and nothing helps.”
“Helps what?”
“That awful lust.”
“What awful lust?”
“The way I get. The way I can’t stop getting. I pray all night about it.”
“Just what happens?” Doc Fischer asked.
The boy told him. “Listen, boy,” Doc Fischer said. “There’s nothing wrong with you. That’s the
way you’re supposed to be. There’s nothing wrong with that.”
“It is wrong,” said the boy. “It’s a sin against purity. It’s a sin against our Lord and Saviour.”
“No,” said Doc Fisher. “It’s a natural thing. It’s the way you are supposed to be and later on you
will think you are very fortunate.”
“Oh, you don’t understand,” the boy said.
“Listen,” Doc Fischer said and he told the boy certain things.
“No. I won’t listen. You can’t make me listen.”
“Please listen,” Doc Fischer said.
“You’re just a goddamned fool,” Doctor Wilcox said to the boy.
“Then you won’t do it?” the boy asked.
“Do what?”
“Castrate me.”
“Listen,” Doc Fischer said. “No one will castrate you. There is nothing wrong with your body.
You have a fine body and you must not think about that. If you are religious remember that what you
complain of is no sinful state but the means of consummating a sacrament.”
“I can’t stop it happening,” the boy said. “I pray all night and I pray in the daytime. It is a sin, a
constant sin against purity.”
“Oh, go and—” Doctor Wilcox said.
“When you talk like that I don’t hear you,” the boy said with dignity to Doctor Wilcox. “Won’t
you please do it?” he asked Doc Fischer.
“No,” said Doc Fischer. “I’ve told you, boy.”
“Get him out of here,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“I’ll get out,” the boy said. “Don’t touch me. I’ll get out.”
That was about five o’clock on the day before.
“So what happened?” I asked.
“So at one o’clock this morning,” Doc Fischer said, “we receive the youth self-mutilated with a
razor.”
“Castrated?”
“No,” said Doc Fisher. “He didn’t know what castrate meant.”
“He may die,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“Why?”
“Loss of blood.”
“The good physician here. Doctor Wilcox, my colleague, was on call and he was unable to find
this emergency listed in his book.”
“The hell with you talking that way,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“I only mean it in the friendliest way. Doctor,” Doc Fischer said, looking at his hands, at his
hands that had, with his willingness to oblige and his lack of respect for Federal statutes, made him
his trouble. “Horace here will bear me out that I only speak of it in the very friendliest way. It was an
amputation the young man performed, Horace.”
“Well, I wish you wouldn’t ride me about it,” Doctor Wilcox said. “There isn’t any need to ride
me.”
“Ride you, Doctor, on the day, the very anniversary, of our Saviour’s birth?”
“Our Saviour? Ain’t you a Jew?” Doctor Wilcox said.
“So I am. So I am. It always is slipping my mind. I’ve never given it its proper importance. So
good of you to remind me. Your Saviour. That’s right. Your Saviour, undoubtedly your Saviour—and
the ride for Palm Sunday.”
“You’re too damned smart,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“An excellent diagnosis, Doctor. I was always too damned smart. Too damned smart on the
coast certainly. Avoid it, Horace. You haven’t much tendency but sometimes I see a gleam. But what a
diagnosis—and without the book.”
“The hell with you,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“All in good time. Doctor,” Doc Fischer said. “All in good time. If there is such a place I shall
certainly visit it. I have even had a very small look into it. No more than a peek, really. I looked away
almost at once. And do you know what the young man said, Horace, when the good Doctor here
brought him in? He said, ‘Oh, I asked you to do it. I asked you so many times to do it.’”
“On Christmas Day, too,” Doctor Wilcox said.
“The significance of the particular day is not important,” Doc Fischer said.
“Maybe not to you,” said Doctor Wilcox.
“You hear him, Horace?” Doc Fischer said. “You hear him? Having discovered my vulnerable
point, my achilles tendon so to speak, the doctor pursues his advantage.”
“You’re too damned smart,” Doctor Wilcox said.
The Sea Change
“ALL RIGHT,” SAID THE MAN. “WHAT about it?”
“No,” said the girl, “I can’t.”
“You mean you won’t.”
“I can’t,” said the girl. “That’s all that I mean.”
“You mean that you won’t.”
“All right,” said the girl. “You have it your own way.”
“I don’t have it my own way. I wish to God I did.”
“You did for a long time,” the girl said.
It was early, and there was no one in the café except the barman and these two who sat together
at a table in the corner. It was the end of the summer and they were both tanned, so that they looked
out of place in Paris. The girl wore a tweed suit, her skin was a smooth golden brown, her blonde
hair was cut short and grew beautifully away from her forehead. The man looked at her.
“I’ll kill her,” he said.
“Please don’t,” the girl said. She had very fine hands and the man looked at them. They were
slim and brown and very beautiful.
“I will. I swear to God I will.”
“It won’t make you happy.”
“Couldn’t you have gotten into something else? Couldn’t you have gotten into some other jam?”
“It seems not,” the girl said. “What are you going to do about it?”
“I told you.”
“No; I mean really.”
“I don’t know,” he said. She looked at him and put out her hand. “Poor old Phil.” she said. He
looked at her hands, but he did not touch her hand with his.
“No, thanks,” he said.
“It doesn’t do any good to say I’m sorry?”
“No.”
“Nor to tell you how it is?”
“I’d rather not hear.”
“I love you very much.”
“Yes, this proves it.”
“I’m sorry,” she said, “if you don’t understand.”
“I understand. That’s the trouble. I understand.”
“You do,” she said. “That makes it worse, of course.”
“Sure,” he said, looking at her. “I’ll understand all the time. All day and all night. Especially all
night. I’ll understand. You don’t have to worry about that.”
“I’m sorry,” she said.
“If it was a man—”
“Don’t say that. It wouldn’t be a man. You know that. Don’t you trust me?”
“That’s funny,” he said. “Trust you. That’s really funny.”
“I’m sorry,” she said. “That’s all I seem to say. But when we do understand each other there’s no
use to pretend we don’t.”
“No,” he said. “I suppose not.”
“I’ll come back if you want me.”
“No. I don’t want you.” Then they did not say anything for a while.
“You don’t believe I love you, do you?” the girl asked.
“Let’s not talk rot,” the man said.
“Don’t you really believe I love you?”
“Why don’t you prove it?”
“You didn’t use to be that way. You never asked me to prove anything. That isn’t polite.”
“You’re a funny girl.”
“You’re not. You’re a fine man and it breaks my heart to go off and leave you—”
“You have to, of course.”
“Yes,” she said. “I have to and you know it.”
He did not say anything and she looked at him and put her hand out again. The barman was at the
far end of the bar. His face was white and so was his jacket. He knew these two and thought them a
handsome young couple. He had seen many handsome young couples break up and new couples form
that were never so handsome long. He was not thinking about this, but about a horse. In half an hour he
could send across the street to find if the horse had won.
“Couldn’t you just be good to me and let me go?” the girl asked.
“What do you think I’m going to do?” Two people came in the door and went up to the bar.
“Yes, sir,” the barman took the orders.
“You can’t forgive me? When you know about it?” the girl asked.
“No.”
“You don’t think things we’ve had and done should make any difference in understanding?”
“‘Vice is a monster of such fearful mien,’” the young man said bitterly, “that to be something or
other needs but to be seen. Then we something, something, then embrace.” He could not remember the
words. “I can’t quote,” he said.
“Let’s not say vice,” she said. “That’s not very polite.”
“Perversion,” he said.
“James,” one of the clients addressed the barman, “you’re looking very well.”
“You’re looking very well yourself,” the barman said.
“Old James,” the other client said. “You’re fatter, James.”
“It’s terrible,” the barman said, “the way I put it on.”
“Don’t neglect to insert the brandy, James,” the first client said.
“No, sir,” said the barman. “Trust me.” The two at the bar looked over at the two at the table,
then looked back at the barman again. Towards the barman was the comfortable direction.
“I’d like it better if you didn’t use words like that,” the girl said. “There’s no necessity to use a
word like that.”
“What do you want me to call it?”
“You don’t have to call it. You don’t have to put any name to it.”
“That’s the name for it.”
“No,” she said. “We’re made up of all sorts of things. You’ve known that. You’ve used it well
enough.”
“You don’t have to say that again.”
“Because that explains it to you.”
“All right,” he said. “All right.”
“You mean all wrong. I know. It’s all wrong. But I’ll come back. I told you I’d come back. I’ll
come back right away.”
“No, you won’t.”
“I’ll come back.”
“No, you won’t. Not to me.”
“You’ll see.”
“Yes,” he said. “That’s the hell of it. You probably will.”
“Of course I will.”
“Go on, then.”
“Really?” She could not believe him, but her voice was happy.
“Go on,” his voice sounded strange to him. He was looking at her, at the way her mouth went and
the curve of her cheek bones, at her eyes and at the way her hair grew on her forehead and at the edge
of her ear and at her neck.
“Not really. Oh, you’re too sweet,” she said. “You’re too good to me.”
“And when you come back tell me all about it.” His voice sounded very strange. He did not
recognize it. She looked at him quickly. He was settled into something.
“You want me to go?” she asked seriously.
“Yes,” he said seriously. “Right away.” His voice was not the same, and his mouth was very
dry. “Now,” he said.
She stood up and went out quickly. She did not look back at him. He watched her go. He was not
the same-looking man as he had been before he had told her to go. He got up from the table, picked up
the two checks and went over to the bar with them.
“I’m a different man, James,” he said to the barman. “You see in me quite a different man.”
“Yes, sir?” said James.
“Vice,” said the brown young man, “is a very strange thing, James.” He looked out the door. He
saw her going down the street. As he looked in the glass, he saw he was really quite a differentlooking man. The other two at the bar moved down to make room for him.
“You’re right there, sir,” James said.
The other two moved down a little more, so that he would be quite comfortable. The young man
saw himself in the mirror behind the bar. “I said I was a different man, James,” he said. Looking into
the mirror he saw that this was quite true.
“You look very well, sir,” James said. “You must have had a very good summer.”
A Way You’ll Never Be
THE ATTACK HAD GONE ACROSS THE field, been held up by
machine-gun fire from the sunken road and from the group of farm houses, encountered no resistance
in the town, and reached the bank of the river. Coming along the road on a bicycle, getting off to push
the machine when the surface of the road became too broken, Nicholas Adams saw what had
happened by the position of the dead.
They lay alone or in clumps in the high grass of the field and along the road, their pockets out,
and over them were flies and around each body or group of bodies were the scattered papers.
In the grass and the grain, beside the road, and in some places scattered over the road, there was
much material: a field kitchen, it must have come over when things were going well; many of the calfskin-covered haversacks, stick bombs, helmets, rifles, sometimes one butt-up, the bayonet stuck in the
dirt, they had dug quite a little at the last; stick bombs, helmets, rifles, intrenching tools, ammunition
boxes, star-shell pistols, their shells scattered about, medical kits, gas masks, empty gas-mask cans, a
squat, tripodded machine gun in a nest of empty shells, full belts protruding from the boxes, the watercooling can empty and on its side, the breech block gone, the crew in odd positions, and around them,
in the grass, more of the typical papers.
There were mass prayer books, group postcards showing the machine-gun unit standing in ranked
and ruddy cheerfulness as in a football picture for a college annual; now they were humped and
swollen in the grass; propaganda postcards showing a soldier in Austrian uniform bending a woman
backward over a bed; the figures were impressionistically drawn; very attractively depicted and had
nothing in common with actual rape in which the woman’s skirts are pulled over her head to smother
her, one comrade sometimes sitting upon the head. There were many of these inciting cards which had
evidently been issued just before the offensive. Now they were scattered with the smutty postcards,
photographic; the small photographs of village girls by village photographers, the occasional pictures
of children, and the letters, letters, letters. There was always much paper about the dead and the
débris of this attack was no exception.
These were new dead and no one had bothered with anything but their pockets. Our own dead, or
what he thought of, still, as our own dead, were surprisingly few, Nick noticed. Their coats had been
opened too and their pockets were out, and they showed, by their positions, the manner and the skill
of the attack. The hot weather had swollen them all alike regardless of nationality.
The town had evidently been defended, at the last, from the line of the sunken road and there had
been few or no Austrians to fall back into it. There were only three bodies in the street and they
looked to have been killed running. The houses of the town were broken by the shelling and the street
had much rubble of plaster and mortar and there were broken beams, broken tiles, and many holes,
some of them yellow-edged from the mustard gas. There were many pieces of shell, and shrapnel
balls were scattered in the rubble. There was no one in the town at all.
Nick Adams had seen no one since he had left Fornaci, although, riding along the road through
the over-foliaged country, he had seen guns hidden under screens of mulberry leaves to the left of the
road, noticing them by the heat-waves in the air above the leaves where the sun hit the metal. Now he
went on through the town, surprised to find it deserted, and came out on the low road beneath the bank
of the river. Leaving the town there was a bare open space where the road slanted down and he could
see the placid reach of the river and the low curve of the opposite bank and the whitened, sun-baked
mud where the Austrians had dug. It was all very lush and over-green since he had seen it last and
becoming historical had made no change in this, the lower river.
The battalion was along the bank to the left. There was a series of holes in the top of the bank
with a few men in them. Nick noticed where the machine guns were posted and the signal rockets in
their racks. The men in the holes in the side of the bank were sleeping. No one challenged. He went
on and as he came around a turn in the mud bank a young second lieutenant with a stubble of beard
and red-rimmed, very blood-shot eyes pointed a pistol at him.
“Who are you?”
Nick told him.
“How do I know this?”
Nick showed him the tessera with photograph and identification and the seal of the third army.
He took hold of it.
“I will keep this.”
“You will not,” Nick said. “Give me back the card and put your gun away. There. In the holster.”
“How am I to know who you are?”
“The tessera tells you.”
“And if the tessera is false? Give me that card.”
“Don’t be a fool,” Nick said cheerfully. “Take me to your company commander.”
“I should send you to battalion headquarters.”
“All right,” said Nick. “Listen, do you know the Captain Paravicini? The tall one with the small
mustache who was an architect and speaks English?”
“You know him?”
“A little.”
“What company does he command?”
“The second.”
“He is commanding the battalion.”
“Good,” said Nick. He was relieved to know that Para was all right. “Let us go to the battalion.”
As Nick had left the edge of the town three shrapnel had burst high and to the right over one of
the wrecked houses and since then there had been no shelling. But the face of this officer looked like
the face of a man during a bombardment. There was the same tightness and the voice did not sound
natural. His pistol made Nick nervous.
“Put it away,” he said. “There’s the whole river between them and you.”
“If I thought you were a spy I would shoot you now,” the second lieutenant said.
“Come on,” said Nick. “Let us go to the battalion.” This officer made him very nervous.
The Captain Paravicini, acting major, thinner and more English-looking than ever, rose when
Nick saluted from behind the table in the dugout that was battalion headquarters.
“Hello,” he said. “I didn’t know you. What are you doing in that uniform?”
“They’ve put me in it.”
“I am very glad to see you, Nicolo.”
“Right. You look well. How was the show?”
“We made a very fine attack. Truly. A very fine attack. I will show you. Look.”
He showed on the map how the attack had gone.
“I came from Fornaci,” Nick said. “I could see how it had been. It was very good.”
“It was extraordinary. Altogether extraordinary. Are you attached to the regiment?”
“No. I am supposed to move around and let them see the uniform.”
“How odd.”
“If they see one American uniform that is supposed to make them believe others are coming.”
“But how will they know it is an American uniform?”
“You will tell them.”
“Oh. Yes, I see. I will send a corporal with you to show you about and you will make a tour of
the lines.”
“Like a bloody politician,” Nick said.
“You would be much more distinguished in civilian clothes. They are what is really
distinguished.”
“With a homburg hat,” said Nick.
“Or with a very furry fedora.”
“I’m supposed to have my pockets full of cigarettes and postal cards and such things,” Nick said.
“I should have a musette full of chocolate. These I should distribute with a kind word and a pat on the
back. But there weren’t any cigarettes and postcards and no chocolate. So they said to circulate
around anyway.”
“I’m sure your appearance will be very heartening to the troops.”
“I wish you wouldn’t,” Nick said. “I feel badly enough about it as it is. In principle, I would
have brought you a bottle of brandy.”
“In principle,” Para said and smiled, for the first time, showing yellowed teeth. “Such a beautiful
expression. Would you like some grappa?”
No, thank you,” Nick said.
“It hasn’t any ether in it.”
“I can taste that still,” Nick remembered suddenly and completely.
“You know I never knew you were drunk until you started talking coming back in the camions.”
“I was stinking in every attack,” Nick said.
“I can’t do it,” Para said. “I took it in the first show, the very first show, and it only made me
very upset and then frightfully thirsty.”
“You don’t need it.”
“You’re much braver in an attack than I am.”
“No,” Nick said. “I know how I am and I prefer to get stinking. I’m not ashamed of it.”
“I’ve never seen you drunk.”
“No?” said Nick. “Never? Not when we rode from Mestre to Portogrande that night and I
wanted to go to sleep and used the bicycle for a blanket and pulled it up under my chin?”
“That wasn’t in the lines.”
“Let’s not talk about how I am,” Nick said. “It’s a subject I know too much about to want to think
about it any more.”
“You might as well stay here a while,” Paravicini said. “You can take a nap if you like. They
didn’t do much to this in the bombardment. It’s too hot to go out yet.”
“I suppose there is no hurry.”
“How are you really?”
“I’m fine. I’m perfectly all right.”
“No. I mean really.”
“I’m all right. I can’t sleep without a light of some sort. That’s all I have now.”
“I said it should have been trepanned. I’m no doctor but I know that.”
“Well, they thought it was better to have it absorb, and that’s what I got. What’s the matter? I
don’t seem crazy to you, do I?”
“You seem in top-hole shape.”
“It’s a hell of a nuisance once they’ve had you certified as nutty,” Nick said. “No one ever has
any confidence in you again.”
“I would take a nap, Nicolo,” Paravicini said. “This isn’t battalion headquarters as we used to
know it. We’re just waiting to be pulled out. You oughtn’t to go out in the heat now—it’s silly. Use
that bunk.”
“I might just lie down,” Nick said.
Nick lay on the bunk. He was very disappointed that he felt this way and more disappointed,
even, that it was so obvious to Captain Paravicini. This was not as large a dugout as the one where
that platoon of the class of 1899, just out at the front, got hysterics during the bombardment before the
attack, and Para had had him walk them two at a time outside to show them nothing would happen, he
wearing his own chin strap tight across his mouth to keep his lips quiet. Knowing they could not hold
it when they took it. Knowing it was all a bloody balls—if he can’t stop crying, break his nose to give
him something else to think about. I’d shoot one but it’s too late now. They’d all be worse. Break his
nose. They’ve put it back to five-twenty. We’ve only got four minutes more. Break that other silly
bugger’s nose and kick his silly ass out of here. Do you think they’ll go over? If they don’t, shoot two
and try to scoop the others out some way. Keep behind them, sergeant. It’s no use to walk ahead and
find there’s nothing coming behind you. Bail them out as you go. What a bloody balls. All right.
That’s right. Then, looking at the watch, in that quiet tone, that valuable quiet tone, “Savoia.” Making
it cold, no time to get it, he couldn’t find his own after the cave-in, one whole end had caved in; it
was that started them; making it cold up that slope the only time he hadn’t done it stinking. And after
they came back the teleferica house burned, it seemed, and some of the wounded got down four days
later and some did not get down, but we went up and we went back and we came down—we always
came down. And there was Gaby Delys, oddly enough, with feathers on; you called me baby doll a
year ago tadada you said that I was rather nice to know tadada with feathers on, with feathers off, the
great Gaby, and my name’s Harry Pilcer, too, we used to step out of the far side of the taxis when it
got steep going up the hill and he could see that hill every night when he dreamed with Sacré Coeur,
blown white, like a soap bubble. Sometimes his girl was there and sometimes she was with some one
else and he could not understand that, but those were the nights the river ran so much wider and stiller
than it should and outside of Fossalta there was a low house painted yellow with willows all around
it and a low stable and there was a canal, and he had been there a thousand times and never seen it,
but there it was every night as plain as the hill, only it frightened him. That house meant more than
anything and every night he had it. That was what he needed but it frightened him especially when the
boat lay there quietly in the willows on the canal, but the banks weren’t like this river. It was all
lower, as it was at Portogrande, where they had seen them come wallowing across the flooded ground
holding the rifles high until they fell with them in the water. Who ordered that one? If it didn’t get so
damned mixed up he could follow it all right. That was why he noticed everything in such detail to
keep it all straight so he would know just where he was, but suddenly it confused without reason as
now, he lying in a bunk at battalion headquarters, with Para commanding a battalion and he in a
bloody American uniform. He sat up and looked around; they all watching him. Para was gone out. He
lay down again.
The Paris part came earlier and he was not frightened of it except when she had gone off with
some one else and the fear that they might take the same driver twice. That was what frightened about
that. Never about the front. He never dreamed about the front now any more but what frightened him
so that he could not get rid of it was that long yellow house and the different width of the river. Now
he was back here at the river, he had gone through that same town, and there was no house. Nor was
the river that way. Then where did he go each night and what was the peril, and why would he wake,
soaking wet, more frightened than he had ever been in a bombardment, because of a house and a long
stable and a canal?
He sat up; swung his legs carefully down; they stiffened any time they were out straight for long;
returned the stares of the adjutant, the signallers and the two runners by the door and put on his clothcovered trench helmet.
“I regret the absence of the chocolate, the postal cards and cigarettes,” he said. “I am, however,
wearing the uniform.”
“The major is coming back at once,” the adjutant said. In that army an adjutant is not a
commissioned officer.
“The uniform is not very correct,” Nick told them. “But it gives you the idea. There will be
several millions of Americans here shortly.”
“Do you think they will send Americans down here?” asked the adjutant.
“Oh, absolutely. Americans twice as large as myself, healthy, with clean hearts, sleep at night,
never been wounded, never been blown up, never had their heads caved in, never been scared, don’t
drink, faithful to the girls they left behind them, many of them never had crabs, wonderful chaps.
You’ll see.”
“Are you an Italian?” asked the adjutant.
“No, American. Look at the uniform. Spagnolini made it but it’s not quite correct.”
“A North or South American?”
“North,” said Nick. He felt it coming on now. He would quiet down.
“But you speak Italian.”
“Why not? Do you mind if I speak Italian? Haven’t I a right to speak Italian?”
“You have Italian medals.”
“Just the ribbons and the papers. The medals come later. Or you give them to people to keep and
the people go away; or they are lost with your baggage. You can purchase others in Milan. It is the
papers that are of importance. You must not feel badly about them. You will have some yourself if
you stay at the front long enough.”
“I am a veteran of the Eritrea campaign,” said the adjutant stiffly. “I fought in Tripoli.”
“It’s quite something to have met you,” Nick put out his hand. “Those must have been trying days.
I noticed the ribbons. Were you, by any chance, on the Carso?”
“I have just been called up for this war. My class was too old.”
“At one time I was under the age limit,” Nick said. “But now I am reformed out of the war.”
“But why are you here now?”
“I am demonstrating the American uniform,” Nick said. “Don’t you think it is very significant? It
is a little tight in the collar but soon you will see untold millions wearing this uniform swarming like
locusts. The grasshopper, you know, what we call the grasshopper in America, is really a locust. The
true grasshopper is small and green and comparatively feeble. You must not, however, make a
confusion with the seven-year locust or cicada which emits a peculiar sustained sound which at the
moment I cannot recall. I try to recall it but I cannot. I can almost hear it and then it is quite gone. You
will pardon me if I break off our conversation?”
“See if you can find the major,” the adjutant said to one of the two runners. “I can see you have
been wounded,” he said to Nick.
“In various places,” Nick said. “If you are interested in scars I can show you some very
interesting ones but I would rather talk about grasshoppers. What we call grasshoppers that is; and
what are, really, locusts. These insects at one time played a very important part in my life. It might
interest you and you can look at the uniform while I am talking.”
The adjutant made a motion with his hand to the second runner who went out.
“Fix your eyes on the uniform. Spagnolini made it, you know. You might as well look, too,” Nick
said to the signallers. “I really have no rank. We’re under the American consul. It’s perfectly all right
for you to look. You can stare, if you like. I will tell you about the American locust. We always
preferred one that we called the medium-brown. They last the best in the water and fish prefer them.
The larger ones that fly making a noise somewhat similar to that produced by a rattlesnake rattling his
rattlers, a very dry sound, have vivid colored wings, some are bright red, others yellow barred with
black, but their wings go to pieces in the water and they make a very blowsy bait, while the mediumbrown is a plump, compact, succulent hopper that I can recommend as far as one may well
recommend something you gentlemen will probably never encounter. But I must insist that you will
never gather a sufficient supply of these insects for a day’s fishing by pursuing them with your hands
or trying to hit them with a bat. That is sheer nonsense and a useless waste of time. I repeat,
gentlemen, that you will get nowhere at it. The correct procedure, and one which should be taught all
young officers at every small-arms course if I had anything to say about it, and who knows but what I
will have, is the employment of a seine or net made of common mosquito netting. Two officers
holding this length of netting at alternate ends, or let us say one at each end, stoop, hold the bottom
extremity of the net in one hand and the top extremity in the other and run into the wind. The hoppers,
flying with the wind, fly against the length of netting and are imprisoned in its folds. It is no trick at all
to catch a very great quantity indeed, and no officer, in my opinion, should be without a length of
mosquito netting suitable for the improvisation of one of these grasshopper seines. I hope I have made
myself clear, gentlemen. Are there any questions? If there is anything in the course you do not
understand please ask questions. Speak up. None? Then I would like to close on this note. In the
words of that great soldier and gentleman, Sir Henry Wilson: Gentlemen, either you must govern or
you must be governed. Let me repeat it. Gentlemen, there is one thing I would like to have you
remember. One thing I would like you to take with you as you leave this room. Gentlemen, either you
must govern—or you must be governed. That is all, gentlemen. Good-day.”
He removed his cloth-covered helmet, put it on again and, stooping, went out the low entrance of
the dugout. Para, accompanied by the two runners, was coming down the line of the sunken road. It
was very hot in the sun and Nick removed the helmet.
“There ought to be a system for wetting these things,” he said. “I shall wet this one in the river.”
He started up the bank.
“Nicolo,” Paravicini called. “Nicolo. Where are you going?”
“I don’t really have to go.” Nick came down the slope, holding the helmet in his hands. “They’re
a damned nuisance wet or dry. Do you wear yours all the time?”
“All the time,” said Para. “It’s making me bald. Come inside.” Inside Para told him to sit down.
“You know they’re absolutely no damned good,” Nick said. “I remember when they were a
comfort when we first had them, but I’ve seen them full of brains too many times.”
“Nicolo,” Para said. “I think you should go back. I think it would be better if you didn’t come up
to the line until you had those supplies. There’s nothing here for you to do. If you move around, even
with something worth giving away, the men will group and that invites shelling. I won’t have it.”
“I know it’s silly,” Nick said. “It wasn’t my idea. I heard the brigade was here so I thought I
would see you or some one else I knew. I could have gone to Zenzon or to San Dona. I’d like to go to
San Dona to see the bridge again.”
“I won’t have you circulating around to no purpose,” Captain Paravicini said.
“All right,” said Nick. He felt it coming on again.
“You understand?”
“Of course,” said Nick. He was trying to hold it in.
“Anything of that sort should be done at night.”
“Naturally,” said Nick. He knew he could not stop it now.
“You see, I am commanding the battalion,” Para said.
“And why shouldn’t you be?” Nick said. Here it came. “You can read and write, can’t you?”
“Yes,” said Para gently.
“The trouble is you have a damned small battalion to command. As soon as it gets to strength
again they’ll give you back your company. Why don’t they bury the dead? I’ve seen them now. I don’t
care about seeing them again. They can bury them any time as far as I’m concerned and it would be
much better for you. You’ll all get bloody sick.”
“Where did you leave your bicycle?”
“Inside the last house.”
“Do you think it will be all right?”
“Don’t worry,” Nick said. “I’ll go in a little while.”
“Lie down a little while, Nicolo.”
“All right.”
He shut his eyes, and in place of the man with the beard who looked at him over the sights of the
rifle, quite calmly before squeezing off, the white flash and clublike impact, on his knees, hot-sweet
choking, coughing it onto the rock while they went past him, he saw a long, yellow house with a low
stable and the river much wider than it was and stiller. “Christ,” he said, “I might as well go.”
He stood up.
“I’m going. Para,” he said. “I’ll ride back now in the afternoon. If any supplies have come I’ll
bring them down tonight. If not I’ll come at night when I have something to bring.”
“It is still hot to ride,” Captain Paravicini said.
“You don’t need to worry,” Nick said. “I’m all right now for quite a while. I had one then but it
was easy. They’re getting much better. I can tell when I’m going to have one because I talk so much.”
“I’ll send a runner with you.”
“I’d rather you didn’t. I know the way.”
“You’ll be back soon?”
“Absolutely.”
“Let me send—”
“No,” said Nick. “As a mark of confidence.”
“Well, ciao then.”
“Ciao,” said Nick. He started back along the sunken road toward where he had left the bicycle.
In the afternoon the road would be shady once he had passed the canal. Beyond that there were trees
on both sides that had not been shelled at all. It was on that stretch that, marching, they had once
passed the Terza Savoia cavalry regiment riding in the snow with their lances. The horses’ breath
made plumes in the cold air. No, that was somewhere else. Where was that?
“
I
’
d
b
e
tt
e
r
g
e
t
t
o
tha
t
d
a
mne
d
b
i
c
yc
l
e
,
”
N
i
c
k
s
a
i
d
t
o
hi
ms
e
l
f. “
I
d
o
n
’
t
w
a
nt
t
o
l
o
s
e
the
w
a
y
t
o
F
o
r
na
c
i.”
The Mother of a Queen
WHEN HIS FATHER DIED HE WAS ONLY A kid and his manager
buried him perpetually. That is, so he would have the plot permanently. But when his mother died his
manager thought they might not always be so hot on each other. They were sweethearts; sure he’s a
queen, didn’t you know that, of course he is. So he just buried her for five years.
Well, when he came back to Mexico from Spain he got the first notice. It said it was the first
notice that the five years were up and would he make arrangements for the continuing of his mother’s
grave. It was only twenty dollars for perpetual. I had the cash box then and I said let me attend to it,
Paco. But he said no, he would look after it. He’d look after it right away. It was his mother and he
wanted to do it himself.
Then in a week he got the second notice. I read it to him and I said I thought he had looked after
it.
No, he said, he hadn’t.
“Let me do it,” I said. “It’s right here in the cash box.”
No, he said. Nobody could tell him what to do. He’d do it himself when he got around to it.
“What’s the sense in spending money sooner than necessary?”
“All right,” I said, “but see you look after it.” At this time he had a contract for six fights at four
thousand pesos a fight besides his benefit fight. He made over fifteen thousand dollars there in the
capital alone. He was just tight, that’s all.
The third notice came in another week and I read it to him. It said that if he did not make the
payment by the following Saturday his mother’s grave would be opened and her remains dumped on
the common boneheap. He said he would go attend to it that afternoon when he went to town.
“Why not have me do it?” I asked him.
“Keep out of my business,” he said. “It’s my business and I’m going to do it.”
“All right, if that’s the way you feel about it,” I said. “Do your own business.”
He got the money out of the cash box, although then he always carried a hundred or more pesos
with him all the time, and he said he would look after it. He went out with the money and so of course
I thought he had attended to it.
A week later the notice came that they had no response to the final warning and so his mother’s
body had been dumped on the boneheap; on the public boneheap.
“Jesus Christ,” I said to him, “you said you’d pay that and you took money out of the cash box to
do it and now what’s happened to your mother? My God, think of it! The public boneheap and your
own mother. Why didn’t you let me look after it? I would have sent it when the first notice came.”
“It’s none of your business. It’s my mother.”
“It’s none of my business, yes, but it was your business. What kind of blood is it in a man that
will let that be done to his mother? You don’t deserve to have a mother.”
“It is my mother,” he said. “Now she is so much dearer to me. Now I don’t have to think of her
buried in one place and be sad. Now she is all about me in the air, like the birds and the flowers.
Now she will always be with me.”
“Jesus Christ,” I said, “what kind of blood have you anyway? I don’t want you to even speak to
me.”
“She is all around me,” he said. “Now I will never be sad.”
At that time he was spending all kinds of money around women trying to make himself seem a
man and fool people, but it didn’t have any effect on people that knew anything about him. He owed
me over six hundred pesos and he wouldn’t pay me. “Why do you want it now?” he’d say. “Don’t you
trust me? Aren’t we friends?”
“It isn’t friends or trusting you. It’s that I paid the accounts out of my own money while you were
away and now I need the money back and you have it to pay me.”
“I haven’t got it.”
“You have it,” I said. “It’s in the cash box now and you can pay me.”
“I need that money for something,” he said. “You don’t know all the needs I have for money.”
“I stayed here all the time you were in Spain and you authorized me to pay these things as they
came up, all these things of the house, and you didn’t send any money while you were gone and I paid
over six hundred pesos in my own money and now I need it and you can pay me.”
“I’ll pay you soon,” he said. “Right now I need the money badly.”
“For what?”
“For my own business.”
“Why don’t you pay me some on account?”
“I can’t,” he said. “I need that money too badly. But I will pay you.”
He had only fought twice in Spain, they couldn’t stand him there, they saw through him quick
enough, and he had seven new fighting suits made and this is the kind of thing he was: he had them
packed so badly that four of them were ruined by sea water on the trip back and he couldn’t even
wear them.
“My God,” I said to him, “you go to Spain. You stay there the whole season and only fight two
times. You spend all the money you took with you on suits and then have them spoiled by salt water so
you can’t wear them. That is the kind of season you have and then you talk to me about running your
own business. Why don’t you pay me the money you owe me so I can leave?”
“I want you here,” he said, “and I will pay you. But now I need the money.”
“You need it too badly to pay for your own mother’s grave to keep your mother buried. Don’t
you?” I said.
“I am happy about what has happened to my mother,” he said. “You cannot understand.”
“Thank Christ I can’t,” I said. “You pay me what you owe me or I will take it out of the cash
box.”
“I will keep the cash box myself,” he said.
“No, you won’t,” I said.
That very afternoon he came to me with a punk, some fellow from his own town who was broke,
and said, “Here is a paisano who needs money to go home because his mother is very sick.” This
fellow was just a punk, you understand, a nobody he’d never seen before, but from his home town,
and he wanted to be the big, generous matador with a fellow townsman.
“Give him fifty pesos from the cash box,” he told me.
“You just told me you had no money to pay me,” I said. “And now you want to give fifty pesos to
this punk.”
“He is a fellow townsman,” he said, “and he is in distress.”
“You bitch,” I said. I gave him the key of the cash box. “Get it yourself. I’m going to town.”
“Don’t be angry,” he said. “I’m going to pay you.”
I got the car out to go to town. It was his car but he knew I drove it better than he did. Everything
he did I could do better. He knew it. He couldn’t even read and write. I was going to see somebody
and see what I could do about making him pay me. He came out and said, “I’m coming with you and
I’m going to pay you. We are good friends. There is no need to quarrel.”
We drove into the city and I was driving. Just before we came into the town he pulled out twenty
pesos.
“Here’s the money,” he said.
“You motherless bitch,” I said to him and told him what he could do with the money. “You give
fifty pesos to that punk and then offer me twenty when you owe me six hundred. I wouldn’t take a
nickel from you. You know what you can do with it.”
I got out of the car without a peso in my pocket and I didn’t know where I was going to sleep that
night. Later I went out with a friend and got my things from his place. I never spoke to him again until
this year. I met him walking with three friends in the evening on the way to the Callao cinema in the
Gran Via in Madrid. He put his hand out to me.
“Hello Roger, old friend,” he said to me. “How are you? People say you are talking against me.
That you say all sorts of unjust things about me.”
“All I say is you never had a mother,” I said to him. That’s the worst thing you can say to insult a
man in Spanish.
“That’s true,” he said. “My poor mother died when I was so young it seems as though I never had
a mother. It’s very sad.”
There’s a queen for you. You can’t touch them. Nothing, nothing can touch them. They spend
money on themselves or for vanity, but they never pay. Try to get one to pay. I told him what I thought
of him right there on the Gran Via, in front of three friends, but he speaks to me now when I meet him
as though we were friends. What kind of blood is it that makes a man like that?
One Reader Writes
SHE SAT AT THE TABLE IN HER BEDROOM with a newspaper
folded open before her and only stopping to look out of the window at the snow which was falling
and melting on the roof as it fell. She wrote this letter, writing it steadily with no necessity to cross
out or rewrite anything.
Roanoke, Virginia
February 6, 1933
Dear Doctor—
May I write you for some very important advice—I have a decision to make and don’t know just
whom to trust most I dare not ask my parents—and so I come to you—and only because I need not see
you, can I confide in you even. Now here is the situation—I married a man in U. S. service in 1929
and that same year he was sent to China, Shanghai—he staid three years—and came home—he was
discharged from the service some few months ago—and went to his mother’s home in Helena,
Arkansas. He wrote for me to come home—I went, and found he is taking a course of injections and I
naturally ask, and found he is being treated for I don’t know how to spell the word but it sound like
this “sifilus”—Do you know what I mean—now tell me will it ever be safe for me to live with him
again—I did not come in close contact with him at any time since his return from China. He assures
me he will be OK after this doctor finishes with him—Do you think it right—I often heard my Father
say one could well wish themselves dead if once they became a victim of that malady—I believe my
Father but want to believe my Husband most—Please, please tell me what to do—I have a daughter
born while her Father was in China—
Thanking you and trusting wholly in your advice I am
and signed her name.
Maybe he can tell me what’s right to do, she said to herself. Maybe he can tell me. In the picture in the
paper he looks like he’d know. He looks smart, all right. Every day he tells somebody what to do. He
ought to know. I want to do whatever is right. It’s such a long time though. It’s a long time. And it’s
been a long time. My Christ, it’s been a long time. He had to go wherever they sent him, I know, but I
don’t know what he had to get it for. Oh, I wish to Christ he wouldn’t have got it. I don’t care what he
did to get it. But I wish to Christ he hadn’t ever got it. It does seem like he didn’t have to have got it. I
don’t know what to do. I wish to Christ he hadn’t got any kind of malady. I don’t know why he had to
get a malady.
Homage to Switzerland
PART I
PORTRAIT OF MR. WHEELER IN MONTREUX
INSIDE THE STATION CAFE IT WAS WARM and light. The wood
of the tables shone from wiping and there were baskets of pretzels in glazed paper sacks. The chairs
were carved, but the seats were worn and comfortable. There was a carved wooden clock on the wall
and a bar at the far end of the room. Outside the window it was snowing.
Two of the station porters sat drinking new wine at the table under the clock. Another porter
came in and said the Simplon-Orient Express was an hour late at Saint-Maurice. He went out. The
waitress came over to Mr. Wheeler’s table.
“The Express is an hour late, sir,” she said. “Can I bring you some coffee?”
“If you think it won’t keep me awake.”
“Please?” asked the waitress.
“Bring me some,” said Mr. Wheeler.
“Thank you.”
She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Wheeler looked out the window at the snow
falling in the light from the station platform.
“Do you speak other languages besides English?” he asked the waitress.
“Oh, yes, sir. I speak German and French and the dialects.”
“Would you like a drink of something?”
“Oh, no, sir. It is not permitted to drink in the café with the clients.”
“You won’t take a cigar?”
“Oh, no, sir. I don’t smoke, sir.”
“That is all right,” said Mr. Wheeler. He looked out of the window again, drank the coffee, and
lit a cigarette.
“Fräulein,” he called. The waitress came over.
“What would you like, sir?”
“You,” he said.
“You must not joke me like that.”
“I’m not joking.”
“Then you must not say it.”
“I haven’t time to argue,” Mr. Wheeler said. “The train comes in forty minutes. If you’ll go
upstairs with me I’ll give you a hundred francs.”
“You should not say such things, sir. I will ask the porter to speak with you.”
“I don’t want a porter,” Mr. Wheeler said. “Nor a policeman nor one of those boys that sell
cigarettes. I want you.”
“If you talk like that you must go out. You cannot stay here and talk like that.”
“Why don’t you go away, then? If you go away I can’t talk to you.”
The waitress went away. Mr. Wheeler watched to see if she spoke to the porters. She did not.
“Mademoiselle!” he called. The waitress came over. “Bring me a bottle of Sion, please.”
“Yes, sir.”
Mr. Wheeler watched her go out, then come in with the wine and bring it to his table. He looked
toward the clock.
“I’ll give you two hundred francs,” he said.
“Please do not say such things.”
“Two hundred francs is a great deal of money.”
“You will not say such things!” the waitress said. She was losing her English. Mr. Wheeler
looked at her interestedly.
“Two hundred francs.”
“You are hateful.”
“Why don’t you go away then? I can’t talk to you if you’re not here.”
The waitress left the table and went over to the bar. Mr. Wheeler drank the wine and smiled to
himself for some time.
“Mademoiselle,” he called. The waitress pretended not to hear him. “Mademoiselle,” he called
again. The waitress came over.
“You wish something?”
“Very much. I’ll give you three hundred francs.”
“You are hateful.”
“Three hundred francs Swiss.”
She went away and Mr. Wheeler looked after her. A porter opened the door. He was the one
who had Mr. Wheeler’s bags in his charge.
“The train is coming, sir,” he said in French. Mr. Wheeler stood up.
“Mademoiselle,” he called. The waitress came toward the table. “How much is the wine?”
“Seven francs.”
Mr. Wheeler counted out eight francs and left them on the table. He put on his coat and followed
the porter onto the platform where the snow was falling.
“Au revoir, Mademoiselle,” he said. The waitress watched him go. He’s ugly, she thought, ugly
and hateful. Three hundred francs for a thing that is nothing to do. How many times have I done that
for nothing. And no place to go here. If he had sense he would know there was no place. No time and
no place to go. Three hundred francs to do that. What people those Americans.
Standing on the cement platform beside his bags, looking down the rails toward the headlight of
the train coming through the snow, Mr. Wheeler was thinking that it was very inexpensive sport. He
had only spent, actually, aside from the dinner, seven francs for a bottle of wine and a franc for the
tip. Seventy-five centimes would have been better. He would have felt better now if the tip had been
seventy-five centimes. One franc Swiss is five francs French. Mr. Wheeler was headed for Paris. He
was very careful about money and did not care for women. He had been in that station before and he
knew there was no upstairs to go to. Mr. Wheeler never took chances.
PART II
MR. JOHNSON TALKS ABOUT IT AT VEVEY
Inside the station café it was warm and light; the tables were shiny from wiping and on some there
were red and white striped table cloths; and there were blue and white striped table cloths on the
others and on all of them baskets with pretzels in glazed paper sacks. The chairs were carved but the
wood seats were worn and comfortable. There was a clock on the wall, a zinc bar at the far end of the
room, and outside the window it was snowing. Two of the station porters sat drinking new wine at the
table under the clock.
Another porter came in and said the Simplon-Orient Express was an hour late at Saint-Maurice.
The waitress came over to Mr. Johnson’s table.
“The Express is an hour late, sir,” she said. “Can I bring you some coffee?”
“If it’s not too much trouble.”
“Please?” asked the waitress.
“I’ll take some.”
“Thank you.”
She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Johnson looked out the window at the snow
falling in the light from the station platform.
“Do you speak other languages besides English?” he asked the waitress.
“Oh, yes, I speak German and French and the dialects.”
“Would you like a drink of something?”
“Oh, no, sir. It is not permitted to drink in the café with the clients.”
“Have a cigar?”
“Oh, no, sir,” she laughed. “I don’t smoke, sir.”
“Neither do I,” said Johnson. “It’s a dirty habit.”
The waitress went away and Johnson lit a cigarette and drank the coffee. The clock on the wall
marked a quarter to ten. His watch was a little fast. The train was due at ten-thirty—an hour late
meant eleven-thirty. Johnson called to the waitress.
“Signorina!”
“What would you like, sir?”
“You wouldn’t like to play with me?” Johnson asked. The waitress blushed.
“No, sir.”
“I don’t mean anything violent. You wouldn’t like to make up a party and see the night life of
Vevey? Bring a girl friend if you like.”
“I must work,” the waitress said. “I have my duty here.”
“I know,” said Johnson. “But couldn’t you get a substitute? They used to do that in the Civil
War.”
“Oh, no, sir. I must be here myself in the person.”
“Where did you learn your English?”
“At the Berlitz school, sir.”
“Tell me about it,” Johnson said. “Were the Berlitz undergraduates a wild lot? What about all
this necking and petting? Were there many smoothies? Did you ever run into Scott Fitzgerald?”
“Please?”
“I mean were your college days the happiest days of your life? What sort of team did Berlitz
have last fall?”
“You are joking, sir?”
“Only feebly,” said Johnson. “You’re an awfully good girl. And you don’t want to play with
me?”
“Oh, no, sir,” said the waitress. “Would you like me to bring you something?”
“Yes,” said Johnson. “Would you bring me the wine list?”
“Yes, sir.”
Johnson walked over with the wine list to the table where the three porters sat. They looked up
at him. They were old men.
“Wollen Sie trinken?” he asked. One of them nodded and smiled.
“Oui, monsieur.”
“You speak French?”
“Oui, monsieur.”
“What shall we drink? Connais-vous des champagnes?”
“Non, monsieur.”
“Faut les connaître,” said Johnson. “Fräulein,” he called the waitress. “We will drink
champagne.”
“Which champagne would you prefer, sir?”
“The best,” said Johnson. “Laquelle est le best?” he asked the porters.
“Le meilleur?” asked the porter who had spoken first.
“By all means.”
The porter took out a pair of gold-rimmed glasses from his coat pocket and looked over the list.
He ran his finger down the four typewritten names and prices.
“Sportsman,” he said. “Sportsman is the best.”
“You agree, gentlemen?” Johnson asked the other porters. The one porter nodded. The other said
in French, “I don’t know them personally but I’ve often heard speak of Sportsman. It’s good.”
“A bottle of Sportsman,” Johnson said to the waitress. He looked at the price on the wine card:
eleven francs Swiss. “Make it two Sportsmen. Do you mind if I sit here with you?” he asked the
porter who had suggested Sportsman.
“Sit down. Put yourself here, please.” The porter smiled at him. He was folding his spectacles
and putting them away in their case. “Is it the gentleman’s birthday?”
“No,” said Johnson. “It’s not a fête. My wife has decided to divorce me.”
“So,” said the porter. “I hope not.” The other porter shook his head. The third porter seemed a
little deaf.
“It is doubtless a common experience,” said Johnson, “like the first visit to the dentist or the first
time a girl is unwell, but I have been upset.”
“It is understandable,” said the oldest porter. “I understand it.”
“None of you gentlemen is divorced?” Johnson asked. He had stopped clowning with the
language and was speaking good French now and had been for some time.
“No,” said the porter who had ordered Sportsman. “They don’t divorce much here. There are
gentlemen who are divorced but not many.”
“With us,” said Johnson, “it’s different. Practically every one is divorced.”
“That’s true,” the porter confirmed. “I’ve read it in the paper.”
“I myself am somewhat in retard,” Johnson went on. “This is the first time I have been divorced.
I am thirty-five.”
“Mais vous êtes encore jeune,” said the porter. He explained to the two others. “Monsieur n’a
que trente-cinq ans.” The other porters nodded. “He’s very young,” said one.
“And it is really the first time you’ve been divorced?” asked the porter.
“Absolutely,” said Johnson. “Please open the wine, mademoiselle.”
“And is it very expensive?”
“Ten thousand francs.”
“Swiss money?”
“No, French money.”
“Oh, yes. Two thousand francs Swiss. All the same it’s not cheap.”
“No.”
“And why does one do it?”
“One is asked to.”
“But why do they ask that?”
“To marry someone else.”
“But it’s idiotic.”
“I agree with you,” said Johnson. The waitress filled the four glasses. They all raised them.
“Prosit,” said Johnson.
“A votre santé, monsieur,” said the porter. The other two porters said “Salut.” The champagne
tasted like sweet pink cider.
“Is it a system always to respond in a different language in Switzerland?” Johnson asked.
“No,” said the porter. “French is more cultivated. Besides, this is La Suisse romande.”
“But you speak German?”
“Yes. Where I come from they speak German.”
“I see,” said Johnson, “and you say you have never been divorced?”
“No. It would be too expensive. Besides I have never married.”
“Ah,” said Johnson. “And these other gentlemen?”
“They are married.”
“You like being married?” Johnson asked one of the porters.
“What?”
“You like the married state?”
“Oui. C’est normale.”
“Exactly,” said Johnson. “Et vous, monsieur?”
“Ça va,” said the other porter.
“Pour moi,” said Johnson, “ça ne va pas.”
“Monsieur is going to divorce,” the first porter explained.
“Oh,” said the second porter.
“Ah ha,” the third porter said.
“Well,” said Johnson, “the subject seems to be exhausted. You’re not interested in my troubles,”
he addressed the first porter.
“But, yes,” said the porter.
“Well, let’s talk about something else.”
“As you wish.”
“What can we talk about?”
“You do the sport?”
“No,” said Johnson. “My wife does, though.”
“What do you do for amusement?”
“I am a writer.”
“Does that make much money?”
“No. But later on when you get known it does.”
“It is interesting.”
“No,” said Johnson, “it is not interesting. I am sorry gentlemen, but I have to leave you. Will you
please drink the other bottle?”
“But the train does not come for three-quarters of an hour.”
“I know,” said Johnson. The waitress came and he paid for the wine and his dinner.
“You’re going out, sir?” she asked.
“Yes,” said Johnson, “just for a little walk. I’ll leave my bags here.”
He put on his muffler, his coat, and his hat. Outside the snow was falling heavily. He looked
back through the window at the three porters sitting at the table. The waitress was filling their glasses
from the last wine of the opened bottle. She took the unopened bottle back to the bar. That makes them
three francs something apiece, Johnson thought. He turned and walked down the platform. Inside the
café he had thought that talking about it would blunt it; but it had not blunted it; it had only made him
feel nasty.
PART III
THE SON OF A FELLOW MEMBER AT TERRITET
In the station café at Territet it was a little too warm; the lights were bright and the tables shiny from
polishing. There were baskets with pretzels in glazed paper sacks on the tables and cardboard pads
for beer glasses in order that the moist glasses would not make rings on the wood. The chairs were
carved but the wooden seats were worn and quite comfortable. There was a clock on the wall, a bar
at the far end of the room, and outside the window it was snowing. There was an old man drinking
coffee at a table under the clock and reading the evening paper. A porter came in and said the
Simplon-Orient Express was an hour late at Saint-Maurice. The waitress came over to Mr. Harris’s
table. Mr. Harris had just finished dinner.
“The Express is an hour late, sir. Can I bring you some coffee?”
“If you like.”
“Please?” asked the waitress.
“All right,” said Mr. Harris.
“Thank you, sir,” said the waitress.
She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Harris put sugar in it, crunched the lumps with
his spoon, and looked out the window at the snow falling in the light from the station platform.
“Do you speak other languages besides English?” he asked the waitress.
“Oh, yes, sir. I speak German and French and the dialects.”
“Which do you like best?”
“They are all very much the same, sir. I can’t say I like one better than another.”
“Would you like a drink of something or a coffee?”
“Oh, no, sir, it is not permitted to drink in the café with the clients.”
“You wouldn’t take a cigar?”
“Oh, no, sir,” she laughed. “I don’t smoke, sir.”
“Neither do I,” said Harris, “I don’t agree with David Belasco.”
“Please?”
“Belasco. David Belasco. You can always tell him because he has his collar on backwards. But
I don’t agree with him. Then, too, he’s dead now.”
“Will you excuse me, sir?” asked the waitress.
“Absolutely,” said Harris. He sat forward in the chair and looked out of the window. Across the
room the old man had folded his paper. He looked at Mr. Harris and then picked up his coffee cup
and saucer and walked to Harris’s table.
“I beg your pardon if I intrude,” he said in English, “but it has just occurred to me that you might
be a member of the National Geographic Society.”
“Please sit down,” Harris said. The gentleman sat down.
“Won’t you have another coffee or a liqueur?”
“Thank you,” said the gentleman.
“Won’t you have a kirsch with me?”
“Perhaps. But you must have it with me.”
“No, I insist.” Harris called the waitress. The old gentleman took out from an inside pocket of
his coat a leather pocket-book. He took off a wide rubber band and drew out several papers, selected
one, and handed it to Harris.
“That is my certificate of membership,” he said. “Do you know Frederick J. Roussel in
America?”
“I’m afraid I don’t.”
“I believe he is very prominent.”
“Where does he come from? Do you know what part of the States?”
“From Washington, of course. Isn’t that the headquarters of the Society?”
“I believe it is.”
“You believe it is. Aren’t you sure?”
“I’ve been away a long time,” Harris said.
“You’re not a member, then?”
“No. But my father is. He’s been a member for a great many years.”
“Then he would know Frederick J. Roussel. He is one of the officers of the society. You will
observe that it is by Mr. Roussel that I was nominated for membership.”
“I’m awfully glad.”
“I am sorry you are not a member. But you could obtain nomination through your father?”
“I think so,” said Harris. “I must when I go back.”
“I would advise you to,” said the gentleman. “You see the magazine, of course?”
“Absolutely.”
“Have you seen the number with the colored plates of the North American fauna?”
“Yes. I have it in Paris.”
“And the number containing the panorama of the volcanoes of Alaska?”
“That was a wonder.”
“I enjoyed very much, too, the wild animal photographs of George Shiras three.”
“They were damned fine.”
“I beg your pardon?”
“They were excellent. That fellow Shiras—”
“You call him that fellow?”
“We’re old friends,” said Harris.
“I see. You know George Shiras three. He must be very interesting.”
“He is. He’s about the most interesting man I know.”
“And do you know George Shiras two? Is he interesting too?”
“Oh, he’s not so interesting.”
“I should imagine he would be very interesting.”
“You know, a funny thing. He’s not so interesting. I’ve often wondered why.”
“H’m,” said the gentleman. “I should have thought any one in that family would be interesting.”
“Do you remember the panorama of the Sahara Desert?” Harris asked.
“The Sahara Desert? That was nearly fifteen years ago.”
“That’s right. That was one of my father’s favorites.”
“He doesn’t prefer the newer numbers?”
“He probably does. But he was very fond of the Sahara panorama.”
“It was excellent. But to me its artistic value far exceeded its scientific interest.”
“I don’t know,” said Harris. “The wind blowing all that sand and that Arab with his camel
kneeling toward Mecca.”
“As I recall, the Arab was standing holding the camel.”
“You’re quite right,” said Harris. “I was thinking of Colonel Lawrence’s book.”
“Lawrence’s book deals with Arabia, I believe.”
“Absolutely,” said Harris. “It was the Arab reminded me of it.”
“He must be a very interesting young man.”
“I believe he is.”
“Do you know what he is doing now?”
“He’s in the Royal Air Force.”
“And why does he do that?”
“He likes it.”
“Do you know if he belongs to the National Geographic Society?”
“I wonder if he does.”
“He would make a very good member. He is the sort of person they want as a member. I would
be very happy to nominate him if you think they would like to have him.”
“I think they would.”
“I have nominated a scientist from Vevey and a colleague of mine from Lausanne and they were
both elected. I believe they would be very pleased if I nominated Colonel Lawrence.”
“It’s a splendid idea,” said Harris. “Do you come here to the café often?”
“I come here for coffee after dinner.”
“Are you in the University?”
“I am not active any longer.”
“I’m just waiting for the train,” said Harris. “I’m going up to Paris and sail from Havre for the
States.”
“I have never been to America. But I would like to go very much. Perhaps I shall attend a
meeting of the society some time. I would be very happy to meet your father.”
“I’m sure he would have liked to meet you but he died last year. Shot himself, oddly enough.”
“I am very truly sorry. I am sure his loss was a blow to science as well as to his family.”
“Science took it awfully well.”
“This is my card,” Harris said. “His initials were E. J. instead of E. D. I know he would have
liked to know you.”
“It would have been a great pleasure.” The gentleman took out a card from the pocketbook and
gave it to Harris. It read:
DR. SIGISMUND WYER, PH.D.
Member of the National Geographic
Society, Washington, D. C., U. S. A.
“I will keep it very carefully,” Harris said.
A Day’s Wait
HE CAME INTO THE ROOM TO SHUT THE windows while we
were still in bed and I saw he looked ill. He was shivering, his face was white, and he walked slowly
as though it ached to move.
“What’s the matter, Schatz?”
“I’ve got a headache.”
“You better go back to bed.”
“No. I’m all right.”
“You go to bed. I’ll see you when I’m dressed.”
But when I came downstairs he was dressed, sitting by the fire, looking a very sick and
miserable boy of nine years. When I put my hand on his forehead I knew he had a fever.
“You go up to bed,” I said, “you’re sick.”
“I’m all right,” he said.
When the doctor came he took the boy’s temperature.
“What is it?” I asked him.
“One hundred and two.”
Downstairs, the doctor left three different medicines in different colored capsules with
instructions for giving them. One was to bring down the fever, another a purgative, the third to
overcome an acid condition. The germs of influenza can only exist in an acid condition, he explained.
He seemed to know all about influenza and said there was nothing to worry about if the fever did not
go above one hundred and four degrees. This was a light epidemic of flu and there was no danger if
you avoided pneumonia.
Back in the room I wrote the boy’s temperature down and made a note of the time to give the
various capsules.
“Do you want me to read to you?”
“All right. If you want to,” said the boy. His face was very white and there were dark areas
under his eyes. He lay still in the bed and seemed very detached from what was going on.
I read aloud from Howard Pyle’s Book of Pirates; but I could see he was not following what I
was reading.
“How do you feel, Schatz?” I asked him.
“Just the same, so far,” he said.
I sat at the foot of the bed and read to myself while I waited for it to be time to give another
capsule. It would have been natural for him to go to sleep, but when I looked up he was looking at the
foot of the bed, looking very strangely.
“Why don’t you try to go to sleep? I’ll wake you up for the medicine.”
“I’d rather stay awake.”
After a while he said to me, “You don’t have to stay in here with me, Papa, if it bothers you.”
“It doesn’t bother me.”
“No, I mean you don’t have to stay if it’s going to bother you.”
I thought perhaps he was a little lightheaded and after giving him the prescribed capsules at
eleven o’clock I went out for a while.
It was a bright, cold day, the ground covered with a sleet that had frozen so that it seemed as if
all the bare trees, the bushes, the cut brush and all the grass and the bare ground had been varnished
with ice. I took the young Irish setter for a little walk up the road and along a frozen creek, but it was
difficult to stand or walk on the glassy surface and the red dog slipped and slithered and I fell twice,
hard, once dropping my gun and having it slide away over the ice.
We flushed a covey of quail under a high clay bank with overhanging brush and I killed two as
they went out of sight over the top of the bank. Some of the covey lit in trees, but most of them
scattered into brush piles and it was necessary to jump on the ice-coated mounds of brush several
times before they would flush. Coming out while you were poised unsteadily on the icy, springy brush
they made difficult shooting and I killed two, missed five, and started back pleased to have found a
covey close to the house and happy there were so many left to find on another day.
At the house they said the boy had refused to let any one come into the room.
“You can’t come in,” he said. “You mustn’t get what I have.”
I went up to him and found him in exactly the position I had left him, white-faced, but with the
tops of his cheeks flushed by the fever, staring still, as he had stared, at the foot of the bed.
I took his temperature.
“What is it?”
“Something like a hundred,” I said. It was one hundred and two and four tenths.
“It was a hundred and two,” he said.
“Who said so?”
“The doctor.”
“Your temperature is all right,” I said. “It’s nothing to worry about.”
“I don’t worry,” he said, “but I can’t keep from thinking.”
“Don’t think,” I said. “Just take it easy.”
“I’m taking it easy,” he said and looked straight ahead. He was evidently holding tight onto
himself about something.
“Take this with water.”
“Do you think it will do any good?”
“Of course it will.”
I sat down and opened the Pirate book and commenced to read, but I could see he was not
following, so I stopped.
“About what time do you think I’m going to die?” he asked.
“What?”
“About how long will it be before I die?”
“You aren’t going to die. What’s the matter with you?”
“Oh, yes, I am. I heard him say a hundred and two.”
“People don’t die with a fever of one hundred and two. That’s a silly way to talk.”
“I know they do. At school in France the boys told me you can’t live with forty-four degrees.
I’ve got a hundred and two.”
He had been waiting to die all day, ever since nine o’clock in the morning.
“You poor Schatz,” I said. “Poor old Schatz. It’s like miles and kilometers. You aren’t going to
die. That’s a different thermometer. On that thermometer thirty-seven is normal. On this kind it’s
ninety-eight.”
“Are you sure?”
“Absolutely,” I said. “It’s like miles and kilometers. You know, like how many kilometers we
make when we do seventy miles in the car?”
“Oh,” he said.
But his gaze at the foot of the bed relaxed slowly. The hold over himself relaxed too, finally, and
the next day it was very slack and he cried very easily at little things that were of no importance.
A Natural History of the
Dead
IT HAS ALWAYS SEEMED TO ME THAT THE war has been omitted
as a field for the observations of the naturalist. We have charming and sound accounts of the flora and
fauna of Patagonia by the late W. H. Hudson, the Reverend Gilbert White has written most
interestingly of the Hoopoe on its occasional and not at all common visits to Selborne, and Bishop
Stanley has given us a valuable, although popular, Familiar History of Birds. Can we not hope to
furnish the reader with a few rational and interesting facts about the dead? I hope so.
When that persevering traveller, Mungo Park, was at one period of his course fainting in the vast
wilderness of an African desert, naked and alone, considering his days as numbered and nothing
appearing to remain for him to do but to lie down and die, a small moss-flower of extraordinary
beauty caught his eye. “Though the whole plant,” says he, “was no larger than one of my fingers, I
could not contemplate the delicate conformation of its roots, leaves and capsules without admiration.
Can that Being who planted, watered and brought to perfection, in this obscure part of the world, a
thing which appears of so small importance, look with unconcern upon the situation and suffering of
creatures formed after his own image? Surely not. Reflections like these would not allow me to
despair; I started up and, disregarding both hunger and fatigue, travelled forward, assured that relief
was at hand; and I was not disappointed.”
With a disposition to wonder and adore in like manner, as Bishop Stanley says, can any branch
of Natural History be studied without increasing that faith, love and hope which we also, every one of
us, need in our journey through the wilderness of life? Let us therefore see what inspiration we may
derive from the dead.
In war the dead are usually the male of the human species although this does not hold true with
animals, and I have frequently seen dead mares among the horses. An interesting aspect of war, too, is
that it is only there that the naturalist has an opportunity to observe the dead of mules. In twenty years
of observation in civil life I had never seen a dead mule and had begun to entertain doubts as to
whether these animals were really mortal. On rare occasions I had seen what I took to be dead mules,
but on close approach these always proved to be living creatures who seemed to be dead through
their quality of complete repose. But in war these animals succumb in much the same manner as the
more common and less hardy horse.
Most of those mules that I saw dead were along mountain roads or lying at the foot of steep
declivities whence they had been pushed to rid the road of their encumbrance. They seemed a fitting
enough sight in the mountains where one was accustomed to their presence and looked less
incongruous there than they did later, at Smyrna, where the Greeks broke the legs of all their baggage
animals and pushed them off the quay into the shallow water to drown. The numbers of broken-legged
mules and horses drowning in the shallow water called for a Goya to depict them. Although, speaking
literally, one can hardly say that they called for a Goya since there has only been one Goya, long
dead, and it is extremely doubtful if these animals, were they able to call, would call for pictorial
representation of their plight but, more likely, would, if they were articulate, call for some one to
alleviate their condition.
Regarding the sex of the dead it is a fact that one becomes so accustomed to the sight of all the
dead being men that the sight of a dead woman is quite shocking. I first saw inversion of the usual sex
of the dead after the explosion of a munition factory which had been situated in the countryside near
Milan, Italy. We drove to the scene of the disaster in trucks along poplar-shaded roads, bordered with
ditches containing much minute animal life, which I could not clearly observe because of the great
clouds of dust raised by the trucks. Arriving where the munition plant had been, some of us were put
to patrolling about those large stocks of munitions which for some reason had not exploded, while
others were put at extinguishing a fire which had gotten into the grass of an adjacent field; which task
being concluded, we were ordered to search the immediate vicinity and surrounding fields for bodies.
We found and carried to an improvised mortuary a good number of these and, I must admit, frankly,
the shock it was to find that these dead were women rather than men. In those days women had not yet
commenced to wear their hair cut short, as they did later for several years in Europe and America,
and the most disturbing thing, perhaps because it was the most unaccustomed, was the presence and,
even more disturbing, the occasional absence of this long hair. I remember that after we had searched
quite thoroughly for the complete dead we collected fragments. Many of these were detached from a
heavy, barbed-wire fence which had surrounded the position of the factory and from the still existent
portions of which we picked many of these detached bits which illustrated only too well the
tremendous energy of high explosive. Many fragments we found a considerable distance away in the
fields, they being carried farther by their own weight.
On our return to Milan I recall one or two of us discussing the occurrence and agreeing that the
quality of unreality and the fact that there were no wounded did much to rob the disaster of a horror
which might have been much greater. Also the fact that it had been so immediate and that the dead
were in consequence still as little unpleasant as possible to carry and deal with made it quite
removed from the usual battlefield experience. The pleasant, though dusty, ride through the beautiful
Lombard countryside also was a compensation for the unpleasantness of the duty and on our return,
while we exchanged impressions, we all agreed that it was indeed fortunate that the fire which broke
out just before we arrived had been brought under control as rapidly as it had and before it had
attained any of the seemingly huge stocks of unexploded munitions. We agreed too that the picking up
of the fragments had been an extraordinary business; it being amazing that the human body should be
blown into pieces which exploded along no anatomical lines, but rather divided as capriciously as the
fragmentation in the burst of a high explosive shell.
A naturalist, to obtain accuracy of observation, may confine himself in his observations to one
limited period and I will take first that following the Austrian offensive of June, 1918, in Italy as one
in which the dead were present in their greatest numbers, a withdrawal having been forced and an
advance later made to recover the ground lost so that the positions after the battle were the same as
before except for the presence of the dead. Until the dead are buried they change somewhat in
appearance each day. The color change in Caucasian races is from white to yellow, to yellow-green,
to black. If left long enough in the heat the flesh comes to resemble coal-tar, especially where it has
been broken or torn, and it has quite a visible tarlike iridescence. The dead grow larger each day until
sometimes they become quite too big for their uniforms, filling these until they seem blown tight
enough to burst. The individual members may increase in girth to an unbelievable extent and faces fill
as taut and globular as balloons. The surprising thing, next to their progressive corpulence, is the
amount of paper that is scattered about the dead. Their ultimate position, before there is any question
of burial, depends on the location of the pockets in the uniform. In the Austrian army these pockets
were in the back of the breeches and the dead, after a short time, all consequently lay on their faces,
the two hip pockets pulled out and, scattered around them in the grass, all those papers their pockets
had contained. The heat, the flies, the indicative positions of the bodies in the grass, and the amount of
paper scattered are the impressions one retains. The smell of a battlefield in hot weather one cannot
recall. You can remember that there was such a smell, but nothing ever happens to you to bring it
back. It is unlike the smell of a regiment, which may come to you suddenly while riding in the street
car and you will look across and see the man who has brought it to you. But the other thing is gone as
completely as when you have been in love; you remember things that happened, but the sensation
cannot be recalled.
One wonders what that persevering traveller, Mungo Park, would have seen on a battlefield in
hot weather to restore his confidence. There were always poppies in the wheat in the end of June and
in July, and the mulberry trees were in full leaf and one could see the heat waves rise from the barrels
of the guns where the sun struck them through the screens of leaves; the earth was turned a bright
yellow at the edge of holes where mustard gas shells had been and the average broken house is finer
to see than one that has been shelled, but few travellers would take a good full breath of that early
summer air and have any such thoughts as Mungo Park about those formed in His own image.
The first thing that you found about the dead was that, hit badly enough, they died like animals.
Some quickly from a little wound you would not think would kill a rabbit. They died from little
wounds as rabbits die sometimes from three or four small grains of shot that hardly seem to break the
skin. Others would die like cats; a skull broken in and iron in the brain, they lie alive two days like
cats that crawl into the coal bin with a bullet in the brain and will not die until you cut their heads off.
Maybe cats do not die then, they say they have nine lives, I do not know, but most men die like
animals, not men. I’d never seen a natural death, so called, and so I blamed it on the war and like the
persevering traveller, Mungo Park, knew that there was something else; that always absent something
else, and then I saw one.
The only natural death I’ve ever seen, outside of loss of blood, which isn’t bad, was death from
Spanish influenza. In this you drown in mucus, choking, and how you know the patient’s dead is: at the
end he turns to be a little child again, though with his manly force, and fills the sheets as full as any
diaper with one vast, final, yellow cataract that flows and dribbles on after he’s gone. So now I want
to see the death of any self-called Humanist
*because a persevering traveller like Mungo Park or me
lives on and maybe yet will live to see the actual death of members of this literary sect and watch the
noble exits that they make. In my musings as a naturalist it has occurred to me that while decorum is
an excellent thing some must be indecorous if the race is to be carried on since the position
prescribed for procreation is indecorous, highly indecorous, and it occurred to me that perhaps that is
what these people are, or were: the children of decorous cohabitation. But regardless of how they
started I hope to see the finish of a few, and speculate how worms will try that long preserved
sterility; with their quaint pamphlets gone to bust and into foot-notes all their lust.
While it is, perhaps, legitimate to deal with these self-designated citizens in a natural history of
the dead, even though the designation may mean nothing by the time this work is published, yet it is
unfair to the other dead, who were not dead in their youth of choice, who owned no magazines, many
of whom had doubtless never even read a review, that one has seen in the hot weather with a half-pint
of maggots working where their mouths have been. It was not always hot weather for the dead, much
of the time it was the rain that washed them clean when they lay in it and made the earth soft when
they were buried in it and sometimes then kept on until the earth was mud and washed them out and
you had to bury them again. Or in the winter in the mountains you had to put them in the snow and
when the snow melted in the spring some one else had to bury them. They had beautiful burying
grounds in the mountains, war in the mountains is the most beautiful of all war, and in one of them, at
a place called Pocol, they buried a general who was shot through the head by a sniper. This is where
those writers are mistaken who write books called Generals Die in Bed, because this general died in
a trench dug in snow, high in the mountains, wearing an Alpine hat with an eagle feather in it and a
hole in front you couldn’t put your little finger in and a hole in back you could put your fist in, if it
were a small fist and you wanted to put it there, and much blood in the snow. He was a damned fine
general, and so was General von Behr who commanded the Bavarian Alpenkorps troops at the battle
of Caporetto and was killed in his staff car by the Italian rearguard as he drove into Udine ahead of
his troops, and the titles of all such books should be Generals Usually Die in Bed, if we are to have
any sort of accuracy in such things.
In the mountains too, sometimes, the snow fell on the dead outside the dressing station on the
side that was protected by the mountain from any shelling. They carried them into a cave that had been
dug into the mountainside before the earth froze. It was in this cave that a man whose head was broken
as a flower-pot may be broken, although it was all held together by membranes and a skillfully
applied bandage now soaked and hardened, with the structure of his brain disturbed by a piece of
broken steel in it, lay a day, a night, and a day. The stretcher-bearers asked the doctor to go in and
have a look at him. They saw him each time they made a trip and even when they did not look at him
they heard him breathing. The doctor’s eyes were red and the lids swollen, almost shut from tear gas.
He looked at the man twice; once in daylight, once with a flashlight. That too would have made a
good etching for Goya, the visit with the flashlight, I mean. After looking at him the second time the
doctor believed the stretcher-bearers when they said the soldier was still alive.
“What do you want me to do about it?” he asked.
There was nothing they wanted done. But after a while they asked permission to carry him out
and lay him with the badly wounded.
“No. No. No!” said the doctor, who was busy. “What’s the matter? Are you afraid of him?”
“We don’t like to hear him in there with the dead.”
“Don’t listen to him. If you take him out of there you will have to carry him right back in.”
“We wouldn’t mind that, Captain Doctor.”
“No,” said the doctor. “No. Didn’t you hear me say no?”
“Why don’t you give him an overdose of morphine?” asked an artillery officer who was waiting
to have a wound in his arm dressed.
“Do you think that is the only use I have for morphine? Would you like me to have to operate
without morphine? You have a pistol, go out and shoot him yourself.”
“He’s been shot already,” said the officer. “If some of you doctors were shot you’d be
different.”
“Thank you very much,” said the doctor waving a forceps in the air. “Thank you a thousand
times. What about these eyes?” He pointed the forceps at them. “How would you like these?”
“Tear gas. We call it lucky if it’s tear gas.”
“Because you leave the line,” said the doctor. “Because you come running here with your tear
gas to be evacuated. You rub onions in your eyes.”
“You are beside yourself. I do not notice your insults. You are crazy.”
The stretcher-bearers came in.
“Captain Doctor,” one of them said.
“Get out of here!” said the doctor.
They went out.
“I will shoot the poor fellow,” the artillery officer said. “I am a humane man. I will not let him
suffer.”
“Shoot him then,” said the doctor. “Shoot him. Assume the responsibility. I will make a report.
Wounded shot by lieutenant of artillery in first curing post. Shoot him. Go ahead shoot him.”
“You are not a human being.”
“My business is to care for the wounded, not to kill them. That is for gentlemen of the artillery.”
“Why don’t you care for him then?”
“I have done so. I have done all that can be done.”
“Why don’t you send him down on the cable railway?”
“Who are you to ask me questions? Are you my superior officer? Are you in command of this
dressing post? Do me the courtesy to answer.”
The lieutenant of artillery said nothing. The others in the room were all soldiers and there were
no other officers present.
“Answer me,” said the doctor holding a needle up in his forceps. “Give me a response.”
“F— yourself,” said the artillery officer.
“So,” said the doctor. “So, you said that. All right. All right. We shall see.”
The lieutenant of artillery stood up and walked toward him.
“F— yourself,” he said. “F— yourself. F— your mother. F— your sister….”
The doctor tossed the saucer full of iodine in his face. As he came toward him, blinded, the
lieutenant fumbled for his pistol. The doctor skipped quickly behind him, tripped him and, as he fell
to the floor, kicked him several times and picked up the pistol in his rubber gloves. The lieutenant sat
on the floor holding his good hand to his eyes.
“I’ll kill you!” he said. “I’ll kill you as soon as I can see.”
“I am the boss,” said the doctor. “All is forgiven since you know I am the boss. You cannot kill
me because I have your pistol. Sergeant! Adjutant! Adjutant!”
“The adjutant is at the cable railway,” said the sergeant.
“Wipe out this officer’s eyes with alcohol and water. He has got iodine in them. Bring me the
basin to wash my hands. I will take this officer next.”
“You won’t touch me.”
“Hold him tight. He is a little delirious.”
One of the stretcher-bearers came in.
“Captain Doctor.”
“What do you want?”
“The man in the dead-house”
“Get out of here.”
“Is dead, Captain Doctor. I thought you would be glad to know.”
“See, my poor lieutenant? We dispute about nothing. In time of war we dispute about nothing.”
“F— you,” said the lieutenant of artillery. He still could not see. “You’ve blinded me.”
“It is nothing,” said the doctor. “Your eyes will be all right. It is nothing. A dispute about
nothing.”
“Ayee! Ayee! Ayee!” suddenly screamed the lieutenant. “You have blinded me! You have
blinded me!”
“Hold him tight,” said the doctor. “He is in much pain. Hold him very tight.”
* The reader’s indulgence is requested for this mention of an extinct phenomenon. The reference, like
all references to fashions, dates the story but it is retained because of its mild historical interest and
because its omission would spoil the rhythm.
Wine of Wyoming
IT WAS A HOT AFTERNOON IN WYOMING; the mountains were a
long way away and you could see snow on their tops, but they made no shadow, and in the valley the
grain-fields were yellow, the road was dusty with cars passing, and all the small wooden houses at
the edge of town were baking in the sun. There was a tree made shade over Fontan’s back porch and I
sat there at a table and Madame Fontan brought up cold beer from the cellar. A motor-car turned off
the main road and came up the side road, and stopped beside the house. Two men got out and came in
through the gate. I put the bottles under the table. Madame Fontan stood up.
“Where’s Sam?” one of the men asked at the screen door.
“He ain’t here. He’s at the mines.”
“You got some beer?”
“No. Ain’t got any beer. That’s a last bottle. All gone.”
“What’s he drinking?”
“That’s a last bottle. All gone.”
“Go on, give us some beer. You know me.”
“Ain’t got any beer. That’s a last bottle. All gone.”
“Come on, let’s go some place where we can get some real beer,” one of them said, and they
went out to the car. One of them walked unsteadily. The motor-car jerked in starting, whirled on the
road, and went on and away.
“Put the beer on the table,” Madame Fontan said. “What’s the matter, yes, all right. What’s the
matter? Don’t drink off the floor.”
“I didn’t know who they were,” I said.
“They’re drunk,” she said. “That’s what makes the trouble. Then they go somewhere else and say
they got it here. Maybe they don’t even remember.” She spoke French, but it was only French
occasionally, and there were many English words and some English constructions.
“Where’s Fontan?”
“Il fait de la vendange. Oh, my God, il est crazy pour le vin.”
“But you like the beer?”
“Oui, j’aime la bière, mais Fontan, il est crazy pour le vin.”
She was a plump old woman with a lovely ruddy complexion and white hair. She was very clean
and the house was very clean and neat. She came from Lens.
“Where did you eat?”
“At the hotel.”
“Mangez ici. Il ne faut pas manger à l’hôtel ou au restaurant. Mangez ici!”
“I don’t want to make you trouble. And besides they eat all right at the hotel.”
“I never eat at the hotel. Maybe they eat all right there. Only once in my life I ate at a restaurant
in America. You know what they gave me? They gave me pork that was raw!”
“Really?”
“I don’t lie to you. It was pork that wasn’t cooked! Et mon fils il est marié avec une américaine,
et tout le temps il a mangé les beans en can.”
“How long has he been married?”
“Oh, my God, I don’t know. His wife weighs two hundred twenty-five pounds. She don’t work.
She don’t cook. She gives him beans en can.”
“What does she do?”
“All the time she reads. Rien que des books. Tout le temps elle stay in the bed and read books.
Already she can’t have another baby. She’s too fat. There ain’t any room.”
“What’s the matter with her?”
“She reads books all the time. He’s a good boy. He works hard. He worked in the mines; now he
works on a ranch. He never worked on a ranch before, and the man that owns the ranch said to Fontan
that he never saw anybody work better on that ranch than that boy. Then he comes home and she feeds
him nothing.”
“Why doesn’t he get a divorce?”
“He ain’t got no money to get a divorce. Besides, il est crazy pour elle.”
“Is she beautiful?”
“He thinks so. When he brought her home I thought I would die. He’s such a good boy and works
hard all the time and never run around or make any trouble. Then he goes away to work in the oilfields and brings home this Indienne that weighs right then one hundred eighty-five pounds.”
“Elle est Indienne?”
“She’s Indian all right. My God, yes. All the time she says sonofabitsh goddam. She don’t
work.”
“Where is she now?”
“Au show.”
“Where’s that?”
“Au show. Moving pictures. All she does is read and go to the show.”
“Have you got any more beer?”
“My God, yes. Sure. You come and eat with us tonight.”
“All right. What should I bring?”
“Don’t bring anything. Nothing at all. Maybe Fontan will have some of the wine.”
That night I had dinner at Fontan’s. We ate in the dining-room and there was a clean tablecloth.
We tried the new wine. It was very light and clear and good, and still tasted of the grapes. At the table
there were Fontan and Madame and the little boy, André.
“What did you do today?” Fontan asked. He was an old man with small mine-tired body, a
drooping gray mustache, and bright eyes, and was from the Centre near Saint-Etienne.
“I worked on my book.”
“Were your books all right?” asked Madame.
“He means he writes a book like a writer. Un roman,” Fontan explained.
“Pa, can I go to the show?” André asked.
“Sure,” said Fontan. André turned to me.
“How old do you think I am? Do you think I look fourteen years old?” He was a thin little boy,
but his face looked sixteen.
“Yes. You look fourteen.”
“When I go to the show I crouch down like this and try to look small.” His voice was very high
and breaking. “If I give them a quarter they keep it all but if I give them only fifteen cents they let me
in all right.”
“I only give you fifteen cents, then,” said Fontan.
“No. Give me the whole quarter. I’ll get it changed on the way.”
“Il faut revenir tout de suite après le show,” Madame Fontan said.
“I come right back.” André went out the door. The night was cooling outside. He left the door
open and a cool breeze came in.
“Mangez!” said Madame Fontan. “You haven’t eaten anything.” I had eaten two helpings of
chicken and French fried potatoes, three ears of sweet com, some sliced cucumbers, and two helpings
of salad.
“Perhaps he wants some kek,” Fontan said.
“I should have gotten some kek for him,” Madame Fontan said. “Mangez du fromage. Mangez du
crimcheez. Vous n’avez rien mangé. I ought have gotten kek. Americans always eat kek.”
“Mais j’ai rudement bien mangé.”
“Mangez! Vous n’avez rien mangé. Eat it all. We don’t save anything. Eat it all up.”
“Eat some more salad,” Fontan said.
“I’ll get some more beer,” Madame Fontan said. “If you work all day in a book-factory you get
hungry.”
“Elle ne comprend pas que vous êtes écrivain,” Fontan said. He was a delicate old man who
used the slang and knew the popular songs of his period of military service in the end of the 1890’s.
“He writes the books himself,” he explained to Madame.
“You write the books yourself?” Madame asked.
“Sometimes.”
“Oh!” she said. “Oh! You write them yourself. Oh! Well, you get hungry if you do that too.
Mangez! Je vais chercher de la bière.”
We heard her walking on the stairs to the cellar. Fontan smiled at me. He was very tolerant of
people who had not his experience and worldly knowledge.
When André came home from the show we were still sitting in the kitchen and were talking
about hunting.
“Labor day we all went to Clear Creek,” Madame said. “Oh, my God, you ought to have been
there all right. We all went in the truck. Tout le monde est allé dans le truck. Nous sommes partis le
dimanche. C’est le truck de Charley.”
“On a mangé, on a bu du vin, de la bière, et il y avait aussi un français qui a apporté de
l’absinthe,” Fontan said. “Un français de la Californie!”
“My God, nous avons chanté. There’s a farmer comes to see what’s the matter, and we give him
something to drink, and he stayed with us awhile. There was some Italians come too, and they want to
stay with us too. We sung a song about the Italians and they don’t understand it. They didn’t know we
didn’t want them, but we didn’t have nothing to do with them, and after a while they went away.”
“How many fish did you catch?”
“Très peu. We went to fish a little while, but then we came back to sing again. Nous avons
chanté, vous savez.”
“In the night,” said Madame, “toutes les femmes ont dormi dans le truck. Les hommes à côté du
feu. In the night I hear Fontan come to get some more wine, and I tell him, Fontan, my God, leave
some for tomorrow. Tomorrow they won’ have anything to drink, and then they’ll be sorry.”
“Mais nous avons tout bu,” Fontan said. “Et le lendemain il ne reste rien.”
“What did you do?”
“Nous avons pêché sérieusement.”
“Good trout, all right, too. My God, yes. All the same; half-pound one ounce.”
“How big?”
“Half-pound one ounce. Just right to eat. All the same size; half-pound one ounce.”
“How do you like America?” Fontan asked me.
“It’s my country, you see. So I like it, because it’s my country. Mais on ne mange pas très bien.
D’antan, oui. Mais maintenant, no.”
“No,” said Madame. “On ne mange pas bien.” She shook her head. “Et aussi, il y a trop de
Polack. Quand jétais petite ma mère m’a dit, ‘vous mangez comme les Polacks.’ Je n’ai jamais
compris ce que c’est qu’un Polack. Mais maintenant en Amérique je comprends. Il y a trop de Polack.
Et, my God, ils sont sales, les Polacks.”
“It is fine for hunting and fishing,” I said.
“Oui. Ça, c’est le meilleur. La chasse et la pêche,” Fontan said. “Qu’estce que vous avez comme
fusil?”
“A twelve-gauge pump.”
“Il est bon, le pump,” Fontan nodded his head.
“Je veux aller à la chasse moi-même,” André said in his high, little boy’s voice.
“Tu ne peux pas,” Fontan said. He turned to me.
“Ils sont des sauvages, les boys, vous savez. Ils sont des sauvages. Ils veulent shooter les uns les
autres.”
“Je veux aller tout seul,” André said, very shrill and excited.
“You can’t go,” Madame Fontan said. “You are too young.”
“Je veux aller tout seul,” André said shrilly. “Je veux shooter les rats d’eau.”
“What are rats d’eau?” I asked.
“You don’t know them? Sure you know them. What they call the muskrats.”
André had brought the twenty-two-calibre rifle out from the cupboard and was holding it in his
hands under the light.
“Ils sont des sauvages,” Fontan explained. “Ils veulent shooter les uns les autres.”
“Je veux aller tout seul,” André shrilled. He looked desperately along the barrel of the gun. “Je
veux shooter les rats d’eau. Je connais beaucoup de rats d’eau.”
“Give me the gun,” Fontan said. He explained again to me. “They’re savages. They would shoot
one another.”
André held tight on to the gun.
“On peut looker. On ne fait pas de mal. On peut looker.”
“Il est crazy pour le shooting,” Madame Fontan said. “Mais il est trop jeune.”
André put the twenty-two-calibre rifle back in the cupboard.
“When I’m bigger I’ll shoot the muskrats and the jack-rabbits too,” he said in English. “One time
I went out with Papa and he shot a jack-rabbit just a little bit and I shot it and hit it.”
“C’est vrai,” Fontan nodded. “Il a tué un jack.”
“But he hit it first,” André said. “I want to go all by myself and shoot all by myself. Next year I
can do it.” He went over in a corner and sat down to read a book. I had picked it up when we came
into the kitchen to sit after supper. It was a library book—Frank on a Gunboat.
“Il aime les books,” Madame Fontan said. “But it’s better than to run around at night with the
other boys and steal things.”
“Books are all right,” Fontan said. “Monsieur il fait les books.”
“Yes, that’s so, all right. But too many books are bad,” Madame Fontan said. “Ici, c’est une
maladie, les books. C’est comme les churches. Ici il y a trop de churches. En France il y a seulement
les catholiques et les protestants—et très peu de protestants. Mais ici rien que de churches. Quand
j’étais venu ici je disais, oh, my God, what are all the churches?”
“C’est vrai,” Fontan said. “Il y a trop de churches.”
“The other day,” Madame Fontan said, “there was a little French girl here with her mother, the
cousin of Fontan, and she said to me, ‘En Amérique il ne faut pas être catholique. It’s not good to be
catholique. The Americans don’t like you to be catholique. It’s like the dry law.’ I said to her, ‘What
you going to be? Heh? It’s better to be catholique if you’re catholique.’ But she said, ‘No, it isn’t any
good to be catholique in America.’ But I think it’s better to be catholique if you are. Ce n’est pas bon
de changer sa religion. My God, no.”
“You go to the mass here?”
“No. I don’t go in America, only sometimes in a long while. Mais je reste catholique. It’s no
good to change the religion.”
“On dit que Schmidt est catholique,” Fontan said.
“On dit, mais on ne sait jamais,” Madame Fontan said. “I don’t think Schmidt is catholique.
There’s not many catholique in America.”
“We are catholique,” I said.
“Sure, but you live in France,” Madame Fontan said. “Je ne crois pas que Schmidt est
catholique. Did he ever live in France?”
“Les Polacks sont catholiques,” Fontan said.
“That’s true,” Madame Fontan said. “They go to church, then they fight with knives all the way
home and kill each other all day Sunday. But they’re not real catholiques. They’re Polack
catholiques.”
“All catholiques are the same,” Fontan said. “One catholique is like another.”
“I don’t believe Schmidt is catholique,” Madame Fontan said. “That’s awful funny if he’s
catholique. Moi, je ne crois pas.”
“Il est catholique,” I said.
“Schmidt is catholique,” Madame Fontan mused. “I wouldn’t have believed it. My God, il est
catholique.”
“Marie va chercher de la bière,” Fontan said. “Monsieur a soif—moi aussi.”
“Yes, all right,” Madame Fontan said from the next room. She went downstairs and we heard the
stairs creaking. André sat reading in the corner. Fontan and I sat at the table, and he poured the beer
from the last bottle into our two glasses, leaving a little in the bottom.
“C’est un bon pays pour la chasse,” Fontan said. “J’aime beaucoup shooter les canards.”
“Mais il y a très bonne chasse aussi en France,” I said.
“C’est vrai,” Fontan said. “Nous avons beaucoup de gibier là-bas.”
Madame Fontan came up the stairs with the beer bottles in her hands, “Il est catholique,” she
said “My God, Schmidt est catholique.”
“You think he’ll be the President?” Fontan asked.
“No,” I said.
The next afternoon I drove out to Fontan’s, through the shade of the town, then along the dusty
road, turning up the side road and leaving the car beside the fence. It was another hot day. Madame
Fontan came to the back door. She looked like Mrs. Santa Claus, clean and rosy-faced and whitehaired, and waddling when she walked.
“My God, hello,” she said. “It’s hot, my God.” She went back into the house to get some beer. I
sat on the back porch and looked through the screen and the leaves of the tree at the heat and, away
off, the mountains. There were furrowed brown mountains, and above them three peaks and a glacier
with snow that you could see through the trees. The snow looked very white and pure and unreal.
Madame Fontan came out and put down the bottles on the table.
“What you see out there?”
“The snow.”
“C’est jolie, la neige.”
“Have a glass, too.”
“All right.”
She sat down on a chair beside me. “Schmidt,” she said. “If he’s the President, you think we get
the wine and beer all right?”
“Sure,” I said. “Trust Schmidt.”
“Already we paid seven hundred fifty-five dollars in fines when they arrested Fontan. Twice the
police arrested us and once the government. All the money we made all the time Fontan worked in the
mines and I did washing. We paid it all. They put Fontan in jail. Il n’a jamais fait de mal à personne.”
“He’s a good man,” I said. “It’s a crime.”
“We don’t charge too much money. The wine one dollar a litre. The beer ten cents a bottle. We
never sell the beer before it’s good. Lots of places they sell the beer right away when they make it,
and then it gives everybody a headache. What’s the matter with that? They put Fontan in jail and they
take seven hundred fifty-five dollars.”
“It’s wicked,” I said. “Where is Fontan?”
“He stays with the wine. He has to watch it now to catch it just right,” she smiled. She did not
think about the money any more. “Vous savez, il est crazy pour le vin. Last night he brought a little bit
home with him, what you drank, and a little bit of the new. The last new. It ain’t ready yet, but he
drank a little bit, and this morning he put a little bit in his coffee. Dans son café, vous savez! Il est
crazy pour le vin! Il est comme ça. Son pays est comme ça. Where I live in the north they don’t drink
any wine. Everybody drinks beer. By where we lived there was a big brewery right near us. When I
was a little girl I didn’t like the smell of the hops in the carts. Nor in the fields. Je n’aime pas les
houblons. No, my God, not a bit. The man that owns the brewery said to me and my sister to go to the
brewery and drink the beer, and then we’d like the hops. That’s true. Then we liked them all right. He
had them give us the beer. We liked them all right then. But Fontan, il est crazy pour le vin. One time
he killed a jack-rabbit and he wanted me to cook it with a sauce with wine, make a black sauce with
wine and butter and mushrooms and onion and everything in it, for the jack. My God, I make the sauce
all right, and he eat it all and said, ‘La sauce est meilleure que le jack.’ Dans son pays c’est comme
ça. Il y a beaucoup de gibier et de vin. Moi, j’aime les pommes de terre, le saucisson, et la bière.
C’est bon, la bière. C’est très bon pour la santé.”
“It’s good,” I said. “It and wine too.”
“You’re like Fontan. But there was a thing here that I never saw. I don’t think you’ve ever seen it
either. There were Americans came here and they put whiskey in the beer.”
“No,” I said.
“Oui. My God, yes, that’s true. Et aussi une femme qui a vomis sur la table!”
“Comment?”
“C’est vrai. Elle a vomis sur la table. Et après elle a vomis dans ses shoes. And afterward they
come back and say they want to come again and have another party the next Saturday, and I say no, my
God, no! When they came I locked the door.”
“They’re bad when they’re drunk.”
“In the winter-time when the boys go to the dance they come in the cars and wait outside and say
to Fontan, ‘Hey, Sam, sell us a bottle wine,’ or they buy the beer, and then they take the moonshine out
of their pockets in a bottle and pour it in the beer and drink it. My God, that’s the first time I ever saw
that in my life. They put whiskey in the beer. My God, I don’t understand that!”
“They want to get sick, so they’ll know they’re drunk.”
“One time a fellow comes here came to me and said he wanted me to cook them a big supper and
they drink one two bottles of wine, and their girls come too, and then they go to the dance. All right, I
said. So I made a big supper, and when they come already they drank a lot. Then they put whiskey in
the wine. My God, yes. I said to Fontan, ‘On va être malade!’ ‘Oui,’ il dit. Then these girls were sick,
nice girls too, all-right girls. They were sick right at the table. Fontan tried to take them by the arm
and show them where they could be sick all right in the cabinet, but the fellows said no, they were all
right right there at the table.”
Fontan had come in. “When they come again I locked the door. ‘No,’ I said. ‘Not for hundred
fifty dollars.’ My God, no.”
“There is a word for such people when they do like that, in French,” Fontan said. He stood
looking very old and tired from the heat.
“What?”
“Cochon,” he said delicately, hesitating to use such a strong word. “They were like the cochon.
C’est un mot très fort,” he apologized, “mais vomir sur la table—” he shook his head sadly.
“Cochons,” I said. “That’s what they are—cochons. Salauds.”
The grossness of the words was distasteful to Fontan. He was glad to speak of something else.
“Il y a des gens très gentils, très sensibles, qui viennent aussi,” he said. “There are officers from
the fort. Very nice men. Good fellas. Everybody that was ever in France they want to come and drink
wine. They like wine all right.”
“There was one man,” Madame Fontan said, “and his wife never lets him get out. So he tells her
he’s tired, and goes to bed, and when she goes to the show he comes straight down here, sometimes in
his pyjamas just with a coat over them. ‘Maria, some beer,’ he says, ‘for God’s sake.’ He sits in his
pyjamas and drinks the beer, and then he goes up to the fort and gets back in bed before his wife
comes home from the show.”
“C’est un original,” Fontan said, “mais vraiment gentil. He’s a nice fella.”
“My God, yes, nice fella all right,” Madame Fontan said. “He’s always in bed when his wife
gets back from the show.”
“I have to go away tomorrow,” I said. “To the Crow Reservation. We go there for the opening of
the prairie-chicken season.”
“Yes? You come back here before you go away. You come back here all right?”
“Absolutely.”
“Then the wine will be done,” Fontan said. “We’ll drink a bottle together.”
“Three bottles,” Madame Fontan said.
“I’ll be back,” I said.
“We count on you,” Fontan said.
“Good night,” I said.
We got in early in the afternoon from the shooting-trip. We had been up that morning since five
o’clock. The day before we had had good shooting, but that morning we had not seen a prairiechicken. Riding in the open car, we were very hot and we stopped to eat our lunch out of the sun,
under a tree beside the road. The sun was high and the patch of shade was very small. We ate
sandwiches and crackers with sandwich filling on them, and were thirsty and tired, and glad when we
finally were out and on the main road back to town. We came up behind a prairie-dog town and
stopped the car to shoot at the prairie-dogs with the pistol. We shot two, but then stopped, because the
bullets that missed glanced off the rocks and the dirt, and sung off across the fields, and beyond the
fields there were some trees along a watercourse, with a house, and we did not want to get in trouble
from stray bullets going toward the house. So we drove on, and finally were on the road coming
down-hill toward the outlying houses of the town. Across the plain we could see the mountains. They
were blue that day, and the snow on the high mountains shone like glass. The summer was ending, but
the new snow had not yet come to stay on the high mountains; there was only the old sun-melted snow
and the ice, and from a long way away it shone very brightly.
We wanted something cool and some shade. We were sun-burned and our lips blistered from the
sun and alkali dust. We turned up the side road to Fontan’s, stopped the car outside the house, and
went in. It was cool inside the dining-room. Madame Fontan was alone.
“Only two bottles beer,” she said. “It’s all gone. The new is no good yet.”
I gave her some birds. “That’s good,” she said. “All right. Thanks. That’s good.” She went out to
put the birds away where it was cooler. When we finished the beer I stood up. “We have to go,” I
said.
“You come back tonight all right? Fontan he’s going to have the wine.”
“We’ll come back before we go away.”
“You go away?”
“Yes. We have to leave in the morning.”
“That’s too bad you go away. You come tonight. Fontan will have the wine. We’ll make a fête
before you go.”
“We’ll come before we go.”
But that afternoon there were telegrams to send, the car to be gone over—a tire had been cut by a
stone and needed vulcanizing—and, without the car, I walked into the town, doing things that had to
be done before we could go. When it was supper-time I was too tired to go out. We did not want a
foreign language. All we wanted was to go early to bed.
As I lay in bed before I went to sleep, with all the things of the summer piled around ready to be
packed, the windows open and the air coming in cool from the mountains, I thought it was a shame not
to have gone to Fontan’s—but in a little while I was asleep. The next day we were busy all morning
packing and ending the summer. We had lunch and were ready to start by two o’clock.
“We must go and say good-by to the Fontans,” I said.
“Yes, we must.”
“I’m afraid they expected us last night.”
“I suppose we could have gone.”
“I wish we’d gone.”
We said good-by to the man at the desk at the hotel, and to Larry and our other friends in the
town, and then drove out to Fontan’s. Both Monsieur and Madame were there. They were glad to see
us. Fontan looked old and tired.
“We thought you would come last night,” Madame Fontan said. “Fontan had three bottles of
wine. When you did not come he drank it all up.”
“We can only stay a minute,” I said. “We just came to say good-by. We wanted to come last
night. We intended to come, but we were too tired after the trip.”
“Go get some wine,” Fontan said.
“There is no wine. You drank it all up.”
Fontan looked very upset.
“I’ll go get some,” he said. “I’ll just be gone a few minutes. I drank it up last night. We had it for
you.”
“I knew you were tired. ‘My God,’ I said, ‘they’re too tired all right to come,’” Madame Fontan
said. “Go get some wine, Fontan.”
“I’ll take you in the car,” I said.
“All right,” Fontan said. “That way we’ll go faster.”
We drove down the road in the motor-car and turned up a side road about a mile away.
“You’ll like that wine,” Fontan said. “It’s come out well. You can drink it for supper tonight.”
We stopped in front of a frame house. Fontan knocked on the door. There was no answer. We
went around to the back. The back door was locked too. There were empty tin cans around the back
door. We looked in the window. There was nobody inside. The kitchen was dirty and sloppy, but all
the doors and windows were tight shut.”
“That son of a bitch. Where is she gone out?” Fontan said. He was desperate.
“I know where I can get a key,” he said. “You stay here.” I watched him go down to the next
house down the road, knock on the door, talk to the woman who came out, and finally come back. He
had a key. We tried it on the front door and the back, but it wouldn’t work.
“That son of a bitch,” Fontan said. “She’s gone away somewhere.”
Looking through the window I could see where the wine was stored. Close to the window you
could smell the inside of the house. It smelled sweet and sickish like an Indian house. Suddenly
Fontan took a loose board and commenced digging at the earth beside the back door.
“I can get in,” he said. “Son of a bitch, I can get in.”
There was a man in the back yard of the next house doing something to one of the front wheels of
an old Ford.
“You better not,” I said. “That man will see you. He’s watching.”
Fontan straightened up. “We’ll try the key once more,” he said. We tried the key and it did not
work. It turned half-way in either direction.
“We can’t get in,” I said. “We better go back.”
“I’ll dig up the back,” Fontan offered.
“No, I wouldn’t let you take the chance.”
“I’ll do it.”
“No,” I said. “That man would see. Then they would seize it.”
We went out to the car and drove back to Fontan’s, stopping on the way to leave the key. Fontan
did not say anything but swear in English. He was incoherent and crushed. We went in the house.
“That son of a bitch!” he said. “We couldn’t get the wine. My own wine that I made.”
All the happiness went from Madame Fontan’s face. Fontan sat down in a corner with his head
in his hands.
“We must go,” I said. “It doesn’t make any difference about the wine. You drink to us when
we’re gone.”
“Where did that crazy go?” Madame Fontan asked.
“I don’t know,” Fontan said. “I don’t know where she go. Now you go away without any wine.”
“That’s all right,” I said.
“That’s no good,” Madame Fontan said. She shook her head.
“We have to go,” I said. “Good-by and good luck. Thank you for the fine times.”
Fontan shook his head. He was disgraced. Madame Fontan looked sad.
“Don’t feel bad about the wine,” I said.
“He wanted you to drink his wine,” Madame Fontan said. “You can come back next year?”
“No. Maybe the year after.”
“You see?” Fontan said to her.
“Good-by,” I said. “Don’t think about the wine. Drink some for us when we’re gone.” Fontan
shook his head. He did not smile. He knew when he was ruined.
“That son of a bitch,” Fontan said to himself.
“Last night he had three bottles,” Madame Fontan said to comfort him. He shook his head.
“Good-by,” he said.
Madame Fontan had tears in her eyes.
“Good-by,” she said. She felt badly for Fontan.
“Good-by,” we said. We all felt very badly. They stood in the doorway and we got in, and I
started the motor. We waved. They stood together sadly on the porch. Fontan looked very old, and
Madame Fontan looked sad. She waved to us and Fontan went in the house. We turned up the road.
“They felt so badly. Fontan felt terribly.”
“We ought to have gone last night.”
“Yes, we ought to have.”
We were through the town and out on the smooth road beyond, with the stubble of grain-fields on
each side and the mountains off to the right. It looked like Spain, but it was Wyoming.
“I hope they have a lot of good luck.”
“They won’t,” I said, “and Schmidt won’t be President either.”
The cement road stopped. The road was gravelled now and we left the plain and started up
between two foot-hills; the road in a curve and commencing to climb. The soil of the hills was red,
the sage grew in gray clumps, and as the road rose we could see across the hills and away across the
plain of the valley to the mountains. They were farther away now and they looked more like Spain
than ever. The road curved and climbed again, and ahead there were some grouse dusting in the road.
They flew as we came toward them, their wings beating fast, then sailing in long slants, and lit on the
hillside below.
“They are so big and lovely. They’re bigger than European patridges.”
“It’s a fine country for la chasse, Fontan says.”
“And when the chasse is gone?”
“They’ll be dead then.”
“The boy won’t.”
“There’s nothing to prove he won’t be,” I said.
“We ought to have gone last night.”
“Oh, yes,” I said. “We ought to have gone.”
The Gambler, The Nun, and
the Radio
THEY BROUGHT THEM IN AROUND MID -night and then, all night
long, every one along the corridor heard the Russian.
“Where is he shot?” Mr. Frazer asked the night nurse.
“In the thigh, I think.”
“What about the other one?”
“Oh, he’s going to die, I’m afraid.”
“Where is he shot?”
“Twice in the abdomen. They only found one of the bullets.”
They were both beet workers, a Mexican and a Russian, and they were sitting drinking coffee in
an all-night restaurant when some one came in the door and started shooting at the Mexican. The
Russian crawled under a table and was hit, finally, by a stray shot fired at the Mexican as he lay on
the floor with two bullets in his abdomen. That was what the paper said.
The Mexican told the police he had no idea who shot him. He believed it to be an accident.
“An accident that he fired eight shots at you and hit you twice, there?”
“Sí, señor,” said the Mexican, who was named Cayetano Ruiz.
“An accident that he hit me at all, the cabrón,” he said to the interpreter.
“What does he say?” asked the detective sergeant, looking across the bed at the interpreter.
“He says it was an accident.”
“Tell him to tell the truth, that he is going to die,” the detective said.
“Na,” said Cayetano. “But tell him that I feel very sick and would prefer not to talk so much.”
“He says that he is telling the truth,” the interpreter said. Then, speaking confidently, to the
detective, “He don’t know who shot him. They shot him in the back.”
“Yes,” said the detective. “I understand that, but why did the bullets all go in the front?”
“Maybe he is spinning around,” said the interpreter.
“Listen,” said the detective, shaking his finger almost at Cayetano’s nose, which projected,
waxen yellow, from his dead-man’s face in which his eyes were alive as a hawk’s. “I don’t give a
damn who shot you, but I’ve got to clear this thing up. Don’t you want the man who shot you to be
punished? Tell him that,” he said to the interpreter.
“He says to tell who shot you.”
“Mandarlo al carajo,” said Cayetano, who was very tired.
“He says he never saw the fellow at all,” the interpreter said. “I tell you straight they shot him in
the back.”
“Ask him who shot the Russian.”
“Poor Russian,” said Cayetano. “He was on the floor with his head enveloped in his arms. He
started to give cries when they shoot him and he is giving cries ever since. Poor Russian.”
“He says some fellow that he doesn’t know. Maybe the same fellow that shot him.”
“Listen,” the detective said. “This isn’t Chicago. You’re not a gangster. You don’t have to act
like a moving picture. It’s all right to tell who shot you. Anybody would tell who shot them. That’s all
right to do. Suppose you don’t tell who he is and he shoots somebody else. Suppose he shoots a
woman or a child. You can’t let him get away with that. You tell him,” he said to Mr. Frazer. “I don’t
trust that damn interpreter.”
“I am very reliable,” the interpreter said. Cayetano looked at Mr. Frazer.
“Listen, amigo,” said Mr. Frazer. “The policeman says that we are not in Chicago but in Hailey,
Montana. You are not a bandit and this has nothing to do with the cinema.”
“I believe him,” said Cayetano softly. “Ya lo creo.”
“One can, with honor, denounce one’s assailant. Every one does it here, he says. He says what
happens if after shooting you, this man shoots a woman or a child?”
“I am not married,” Cayetano said.
“He says any woman, any child.”
“The man is not crazy,” Cayetano said.
“He says you should denounce him,” Mr. Frazer finished.
“Thank you,” Cayetano said. “You are of the great translators. I speak English, but badly. I
understand it all right. How did you break your leg?”
“A fall off a horse.”
“What bad luck. I am very sorry. Does it hurt much?”
“Not now. At first, yes.”
“Listen, amigo,” Cayetano began, “I am very weak. You will pardon me. Also I have much pain;
enough pain. It is very possible that I die. Please get this policeman out of here because I am very
tired.” He made as though to roll to one side; then held himself still.
“I told him everything exactly as you said and he said to tell you, truly, that he doesn’t know who
shot him and that he is very weak and wishes you would question him later on,” Mr. Frazer said.
“He’ll probably be dead later on.”
“That’s quite possible.”
“That’s why I want to question him now.”
“Somebody shot him in the back, I tell you,” the interpreter said.
“Oh, for Chrisake,” the detective sergeant said, and put his notebook in his pocket.
Outside in the corridor the detective sergeant stood with the interpreter beside Mr. Frazer’s
wheeled chair.
“I suppose you think somebody shot him in the back too?”
“Yes,” Frazer said. “Somebody shot him in the back. What’s it to you?”
“Don’t get sore,” the sergeant said. “I wish I could talk spick.”
“Why don’t you learn?”
“You don’t have to get sore. I don’t get any fun out of asking that spick questions. If I could talk
spick it would be different.”
“You don’t need to talk Spanish,” the interpreter said. “I am a very reliable interpreter.”
“Oh, for Chrisake,” the sergeant said. “Well, so long. I’ll come up and see you.”
“Thanks. I’m always in.”
“I guess you are all right. That was bad luck all right. Plenty bad luck.”
“It’s coming along good now since he spliced the bone.”
“Yes, but it’s a long time. A long, long time.”
“Don’t let anybody shoot you in the back.”
“That’s right,” he said. “That’s right. Well, I’m glad you’re not sore.”
“So long,” said Mr. Frazer.
Mr. Frazer did not see Cayetano again for a long time, but each morning Sister Cecilia brought
news of him. He was so uncomplaining she said and he was very bad now. He had peritonitis and
they thought he could not live. Poor Cayetano, she said. He had such beautiful hands and such a fine
face and he never complains. The odor, now, was really terrific. He would point toward his nose
with one finger and smile and shake his head, she said. He felt badly about the odor. It embarrassed
him, Sister Cecilia said. Oh, he was such a fine patient. He always smiled. He wouldn’t go to
confession to Father but he promised to say his prayers, and not a Mexican had been to see him since
he had been brought in. The Russian was going out at the end of the week. I could never feel anything
about the Russian, Sister Cecilia said. Poor fellow, he suffered too. It was a greased bullet and dirty
and the wound infected, but he made so much noise and then I always like the bad ones. That
Cayetano, he’s a bad one. Oh, he must really be a bad one, a thoroughly bad one, he’s so fine and
delicately made and he’s never done any work with his hands. He’s not a beet worker. I know he’s
not a beet worker. His hands are as smooth and not a callous on them. I know he’s a bad one of some
sort. I’m going down and pray for him now. Poor Cayetano, he’s having a dreadful time and he
doesn’t make a sound. What did they have to shoot him for? Oh, that poor Cayetano! I’m going right
down and pray for him.
She went right down and prayed for him.
In that hospital a radio did not work very well until it was dusk. They said it was because there
was so much ore in the ground or something about the mountains, but anyway it did not work well at
all until it began to get dark outside; but all night it worked beautifully and when one station stopped
you could go farther west and pick up another. The last one that you could get was Seattle,
Washington, and due to the difference in time, when they signed off at four o’clock in the morning it
was five o’clock in the morning in the hospital; and at six o’clock you could get the morning revellers
in Minneapolis. That was on account of the difference in time, too, and Mr. Frazer used to like to
think of the morning revellers arriving at the studio and picture how they would look getting off a
street-car before daylight in the morning carrying their instruments. Maybe that was wrong and they
kept their instruments at the place they revelled, but he always pictured them with their instruments.
He had never been in Minneapolis and believed he probably would never go there, but he knew what
it looked like that early in the morning.
Out of the window of the hospital you could see a field with tumbleweed coming out of the
snow, and a bare clay butte. One morning the doctor wanted to show Mr. Frazer two pheasants that
were out there in the snow, and pulling the bed toward the window, the reading light fell off the iron
bedstead and hit Mr. Frazer on the head. This does not sound so funny now but it was very funny then.
Every one was looking out the window, and the doctor, who was a most excellent doctor, was
pointing at the pheasants and pulling the bed toward the window, and then, just as in a comic section,
Mr. Frazer was knocked out by the leaded base of the lamp hitting the top of his head. It seemed the
antithesis of healing or whatever people were in the hospital for, and every one thought it was very
funny, as a joke on Mr. Frazer and on the doctor. Everything is much simpler in a hospital, including
the jokes.
From the other window, if the bed was turned, you could see the town, with a little smoke above
it, and the Dawson mountains looking like real mountains with the winter snow on them. Those were
the two views since the wheeled chair had proved to be premature. It is really best to be in bed if you
are in a hospital; since two views, with time to observe them, from a room the temperature of which
you control, are much better than any number of views seen for a few minutes from hot, empty rooms
that are waiting for some one else, or just abandoned, which you are wheeled in and out of. If you stay
long enough in a room the view, whatever it is, acquires a great value and becomes very important
and you would not change it, not even by a different angle. Just as, with the radio, there are certain
things that you become fond of, and you welcome them and resent the new things. The best tunes they
had that winter were “Sing Something Simple,” “Singsong Girl,” and “Little White Lies.” No other
tunes were as satisfactory, Mr. Frazer felt. “Betty Co-ed” was a good tune too, but the parody of the
words which came unavoidably into Mr. Frazer’s mind, grew so steadily and increasingly obscene
that there being no one to appreciate it, he finally abandoned it and let the song go back to football.
About nine o’clock in the morning they would start using the X-ray machine, and then the radio,
which, by then, was only getting Hailey, became useless. Many people in Hailey who owned radios
protested about the hospital’s X-ray machine which ruined their morning reception, but there was
never any action taken, although many felt it was a shame the hospital could not use their machine at a
time when people were not using their radios.
About the time when it became necessary to turn off the radio Sister Cecilia came in.
“How’s Cayetano, Sister Cecilia?” Mr. Frazer asked.
“Oh, he’s very bad.”
“Is he out of his head?”
“No, but I’m afraid he’s going to die.”
“How are you?”
“I’m very worried about him, and do you know that absolutely no one has come to see him? He
could die just like a dog for all those Mexicans care. They’re really dreadful.”
“Do you want to come up and hear the game this afternoon?”
“Oh, no,” she said. “I’d be too excited. I’ll be in the chapel praying.”
“We ought to be able to hear it pretty well,” Mr. Frazer said. “They’re playing out on the coast
and the difference in time will bring it late enough so we can get it all right.”
“Oh, no. I couldn’t do it. The world series nearly finished me. When the Athletics were at bat I
was praying right out loud: ‘Oh, Lord, direct their batting eyes! Oh, Lord, may he hit one! Oh, Lord,
may he hit safely!’ Then when they filled the bases in the third game, you remember, it was too much
for me. ‘Oh, Lord, may he hit it out of the lot! Oh, Lord, may he drive it clean over the fence!’ Then
you know when the Cardinals would come to bat it was simply dreadful. ‘Oh, Lord, may they not see
it! Oh, Lord, don’t let them even catch a glimpse of it! Oh, Lord, may they fan!’And this game is even
worse. It’s Notre Dame. Our Lady. No, I’ll be in the chapel. For Our Lady. They’re playing for Our
Lady. I wish you’d write something sometime for Our Lady. You could do it. You know you could do
it, Mr. Frazer.”
“I don’t know anything about her that I could write. It’s mostly been written already,” Mr. Frazer
said. “You wouldn’t like the way I write. She wouldn’t care for it either.”
“You’ll write about her sometime,” Sister said. “I know you will. You must write about Our
Lady.”
“You’d better come up and hear the game.”
“It would be too much for me. No, I’ll be in the chapel doing what I can.”
That afternoon they had been playing about five minutes when a probationer came into the room
and said, “Sister Cecilia wants to know how the game is going?”
“Tell her they have a touchdown already.”
In a little while the probationer came into the room again.
“Tell her they’re playing them off their feet,” Mr. Frazer said.
A little later he rang the bell for the nurse who was on floor duty. “Would you mind going down
to the chapel or sending word down to Sister Cecilia that Notre Dame has them fourteen to nothing at
the end of the first quarter and that it’s all right. She can stop praying.”
In a few minutes Sister Cecilia came into the room. She was very excited. “What does fourteen
to nothing mean? I don’t know anything about this game. That’s a nice safe lead in baseball. But I
don’t know anything about football. It may not mean a thing. I’m going right back down to the chapel
and pray until it’s finished.”
“They have them beaten,” Frazer said. “I promise you. Stay and listen with me.”
“No. No. No. No. No. No. No,” she said. “I’m going right down to the chapel to pray.”
Mr. Frazer sent down word whenever Notre Dame scored, and finally, when it had been dark a
long time, the final result.
“How’s Sister Cecilia?”
“They’re all at chapel,” she said.
The next morning Sister Cecilia came in. She was very pleased and confident.
“I knew they couldn’t beat Our Lady,” she said. “They couldn’t. Cayetano’s better too. He’s
much better. He’s going to have visitors. He can’t see them yet, but they are going to come and that
will make him feel better and know he’s not forgotten by his own people. I went down and saw that
O’Brien boy at Police Headquarters and told him that he’s got to send some Mexicans up to see poor
Cayetano. He’s going to send some this afternoon. Then that poor man will feel better. It’s wicked the
way no one has come to see him.”
That afternoon about five o’clock three Mexicans came into the room.
“Can one?” asked the biggest one, who had very thick lips and was quite fat.
“Why not?” Mr. Frazer answered. “Sit down, gentlemen. Will you take something?”
“Many thanks,” said the big one.
“Thanks,” said the darkest and smallest one.
“Thanks, no,” said the thin one. “It mounts to my head.” He tapped his head.
The nurse brought some glasses. “Please give them the bottle,” Frazer said. “It is from Red
Lodge,” he explained.
“That of Red Lodge is the best,” said the big one. “Much better than that of Big Timber.”
“Clearly,” said the smallest one, “and costs more too.”
“In Red Lodge it is of all prices,” said the big one.
“How many tubes has the radio?” asked the one who did not drink.
“Seven.”
“Very beautiful,” he said. “What does it cost?”
“I don’t know,” Mr. Frazer said. “It is rented.”
“You gentlemen are friends of Cayetano?”
“No,” said the big one. “We are friends of he who wounded him.”
“We were sent here by the police,” the smallest one said.
“We have a little place,” the big one said. “He and I,” indicating the one who did not drink. “He
has a little place too,” indicating the small, dark one. “The police tell us we have to come—so we
come.”
“I am very happy you have come.”
“Equally,” said the big one.
“Will you have another little cup?”
“Why not?” said the big one.
“With your permission,” said the smallest one.
“Not me,” said the thin one. “It mounts to my head.”
“It is very good,” said the smallest one.
“Why not try some,” Mr. Frazer asked the thin one. “Let a little mount to your head.”
“Afterwards comes the headache,” said the thin one.
“Could you not send friends of Cayetano to see him?” Frazer asked.
“He has no friends.”
“Every man has friends.”
“This one, no.”
“What does he do?”
“He is a card-player.”
“Is he good?”
“I believe it.”
“From me,” said the smallest one, “he won one hundred and eighty dollars. Now there is no
longer one hundred and eighty dollars in the world.”
“From me,” said the thin one, “he won two hundred and eleven dollars. Fix yourself on that
figure.”
“I never played with him,” said the fat one.
“He must be very rich,” Mr. Frazer suggested.
“He is poorer than we,” said the little Mexican. “He has no more than the shirt on his back.”
“And that shirt is of little value now,” Mr. Frazer said. “Perforated as it is.”
“Clearly.”
“The one who wounded him was a card-player?”
“No, a beet worker. He has had to leave town.”
“Fix yourself on this,” said the smallest one. “He was the best guitar player ever in this town.
The finest.”
“What a shame.”
“I believe it,” said the biggest one. “How he could touch the guitar.”
“There are no good guitar players left?”
“Not the shadow of a guitar player.”
“There is an accordion player who is worth something,” the thin man said.
“There are a few who touch various instruments,” the big one said. “You like music?”
“How would I not?”
“We will come one night with music? You think the sister would allow it? She seems very
amiable.”
“I am sure she would permit it when Cayetano is able to hear it.”
“Is she a little crazy?” asked the thin one.
“Who?”
“That sister.”
“No,” Mr. Frazer said. “She is a fine woman of great intelligence and sympathy.”
“I distrust all priests, monks, and sisters,” said the thin one.
“He had bad experiences when a boy,” the smallest one said.
“I was acolyte,” the thin one said proudly. “Now I believe in nothing. Neither do I go to mass.”
“Why? Does it mount to your head?”
“No,” said the thin one. “It is alcohol that mounts to my head. Religion is the opium of the poor.”
“I thought marijuana was the opium of the poor,” Frazer said.
“Did you ever smoke opium?” the big one asked.
“No.”
“Nor I,” he said. “It seems it is very bad. One commences and cannot stop. It is a vice.”
“Like religion,” said the thin one.
“This one,” said the smallest Mexican, “is very strong against religion.”
“It is necessary to be very strong against something,” Mr. Frazer said politely.
“I respect those who have faith even though they are ignorant,” the thin one said.
“Good,” said Mr. Frazer.
“What can we bring you?” asked the big Mexican. “Do you lack for anything?”
“I would be glad to buy some beer if there is good beer.”
“We will bring beer.”
“Another copita before you go?”
“It is very good.”
“We are robbing you.”
“I can’t take it. It goes to my head. Then I have a bad headache and sick at the stomach.”
“Good-by, gentlemen.”
“Good-by and thanks.”
They went out and there was supper and then the radio, turned to be as quiet as possible and still
be heard, and the stations finally signing off in this order: Denver, Salt Lake City, Los Angeles, and
Seattle. Mr. Frazer received no picture of Denver from the radio. He could see Denver from the
Denver Post, and correct the picture from The Rocky Mountain News. Nor did he ever have any feel
of Salt Lake City or Los Angeles from what he heard from those places. All he felt about Salt Lake
City was that it was dean, but dull, and there were too many ballrooms mentioned in too many big
hotels for him to see Los Angeles. He could not feel it for the ballrooms. But Seattle he came to know
very well, the taxicab company with the big white cabs (each cab equipped with radio itself) he rode
in every night out to the roadhouse on the Canadian side where he followed the course of parties by
the musical selections they phoned for. He lived in Seattle from two o’clock on, each night, hearing
the pieces that all the different people asked for, and it was as real as Minneapolis, where the
revellers left their beds each morning to make that trip down to the studio. Mr. Frazer grew very fond
of Seattle, Washington.
The Mexicans came and brought beer but it was not good beer. Mr. Frazer saw them but he did
not feel like talking, and when they went he knew they would not come again. His nerves had become
tricky and he disliked seeing people while he was in this condition. His nerves went bad at the end of
five weeks, and while he was pleased they lasted that long yet he resented being forced to make the
same experiment when he already knew the answer. Mr. Frazer had been through this all before. The
only thing which was new to him was the radio. He played it all night long, turned so low he could
barely hear it, and he was learning to listen to it without thinking.
Sister Cecilia came into the room about ten o’clock in the morning on that day and brought the
mail. She was very handsome, and Mr. Frazer liked to see her and to hear her talk, but the mail,
supposedly coming from a different world, was more important. However, there was nothing in the
mail of any interest.
“You look so much better,” she said. “You’ll be leaving us soon.”
“Yes,” Mr. Frazer said. “You look very happy this morning.”
“Oh, I am. This morning I feel as though I might be a saint.”
Mr. Frazer was a little taken aback at this.
“Yes,” Sister Cecilia went on. “That’s what I want to be. A saint. Ever since I was a little girl
I’ve wanted to be a saint. When I was a girl I thought if I renounced the world and went into the
convent I would be a saint. That was what I wanted to be and that was what I thought I had to do to be
one. I expected I would be a saint. I was absolutely sure I would be one. For just a moment I thought I
was one. I was so happy and it seemed so simple and easy. When I awoke in the morning I expected I
would be a saint, but I wasn’t. I’ve never become one. I want so to be one. All I want is to be a saint.
That is all I’ve ever wanted. And this morning I feel as though I might be one. Oh, I hope I will get to
be one.”
“You’ll be one. Everybody gets what they want. That’s what they always tell me.”
“I don’t know now. When I was a girl it seemed so simple. I knew I would be a saint. Only I
believed it took time when I found it did not happen suddenly. Now it seems almost impossible.”
“I’d say you had a good chance.”
“Do you really think so? No, I don’t want just to be encouraged. Don’t just encourage me. I want
to be a saint. I want so to be a saint.”
“Of course you’ll be a saint,” Mr. Frazer said.
“No, probably I won’t be. But, oh, if I could only be a saint! I’d be perfectly happy.”
“You’re three to one to be a saint.”
“No, don’t encourage me. But, oh, if I could only be a saint! If I could only be a saint!”
“How’s your friend Cayetano?”
“He’s going to get well but he’s paralyzed. One of the bullets hit the big nerve that goes down
through his thigh and that leg is paralyzed. They only found it out when he got well enough so that he
could move.”
“Maybe the nerve will regenerate.”
“I’m praying that it will,” Sister Cecilia said. “You ought to see him.”
“I don’t feel like seeing anybody.”
“You know you’d like to see him. They could wheel him in here.”
“All right.”
They wheeled him in, thin, his skin transparent, his hair black and needing to be cut, his eyes
very laughing, his teeth bad when he smiled.
“Hola, amigo! Qué tal?”
“As you see,” said Mr. Frazer. “And thou?”
“Alive and with the leg paralyzed.”
“Bad,” Mr. Frazer said. “But the nerve can regenerate and be as good as new.”
“So they tell me.”
“What about the pain?”
“Not now. For a while I was crazy with it in the belly. I thought the pain alone would kill me.”
Sister Cecilia was observing them happily.
“She tells me you never made a sound,” Mr. Frazer said.
“So many people in the ward,” the Mexican said deprecatingly. “What class of pain do you
have?”
“Big enough. Clearly not as bad as yours. When the nurse goes out I cry an hour, two hours. It
rests me. My nerves are bad now.”
“You have the radio. If I had a private room and a radio I would be crying and yelling all night
long.”
“I doubt it.”
“Hombre, sí. It’s very healthy. But you cannot do it with so many people.”
“At least,” Mr. Frazer said, “the hands are still good. They tell me you make your living with the
hands.”
“And the head,” he said, tapping his forehead. “But the head isn’t worth as much.”
“Three of your countrymen were here.”
“Sent by the police to see me.”
“They brought some beer.”
“It probably was bad.”
“It was bad.”
“Tonight, sent by the police, they come to serenade me.” He laughed, then tapped his stomach. “I
cannot laugh yet. As musicians they are fatal.”
“And the one who shot you?”
“Another fool. I won thirty-eight dollars from him at cards. That is not to kill about.”
“The three told me you win much money.”
“And am poorer than the birds.”
“How?”
“I am a poor idealist. I am the victim of illusions.” He laughed, then grinned and tapped his
stomach. “I am a professional gambler but I like to gamble. To really gamble. Little gambling is all
crooked. For real gambling you need luck. I have no luck.”
“Never?”
“Never. I am completely without luck. Look, this cabrón who shoots me just now. Can he shoot?
No. The first shot he fires into nothing. The second is intercepted by a poor Russian. That would seem
to be luck. What happens? He shoots me twice in the belly. He is a lucky man. I have no luck. He
could not hit a horse if he were holding the stirrup. All luck.”
“I thought he shot you first and the Russian after.”
“No, the Russian first, me after. The paper was mistaken.”
“Why didn’t you shoot him?”
“I never carry a gun. With my luck, if I carried a gun I would be hanged ten times a year. I am a
cheap card player, only that.” He stopped, then continued. “When I make a sum of money I gamble and
when I gamble I lose. I have passed at dice for three thousand dollars and crapped out for the six.
With good dice. More than once.”
“Why continue?”
“If I live long enough the luck will change. I have bad luck now for fifteen years. If I ever get any
good luck I will be rich.” He grinned. “I am a good gambler, really I would enjoy being rich.”
“Do you have bad luck with all games?”
“With everything and with women.” He smiled again, showing his bad teeth.
“Truly?”
“Truly.”
“And what is there to do?”
“Continue, slowly, and wait for luck to change.”
“But with women?”
“No gambler has luck with women. He is too concentrated. He works nights. When he should be
with the woman. No man who works nights can hold a woman if the woman is worth anything.”
“You are a philosopher.”
“No, hombre. A gambler of the small towns. One small town, then another, another, then a big
town, then start over again.”
“Then shot in the belly.”
“The first time,” he said. “That has only happened once.”
“I tire you talking?” Mr. Frazer suggested.
“No,” he said. “I must tire you.”
“And the leg?”
“I have no great use for the leg. I am all right with the leg or not. I will be able to circulate.”
“I wish you luck, truly, and with all my heart,” Mr. Frazer said.
“Equally,” he said. “And that the pain stops.”
“It will not last, certainly. It is passing. It is of no importance.”
“That it passes quickly.”
“Equally.”
That night the Mexicans played the accordion and other instruments in the ward and it was
cheerful and the noise of the inhalations and exhalations of the accordion, and of the bells, the traps,
and the drum came down the corridor. In that ward there was a rodeo rider who had come out of the
chutes on Midnight on a hot dusty afternoon with the big crowd watching, and now, with a broken
back, was going to learn to work in leather and to cane chairs when he got well enough to leave the
hospital. There was a carpenter who had fallen with a scaffolding and broken both ankles and both
wrists. He had lit like a cat but without a cat’s resiliency. They could fix him up so that he could work
again but it would take a long time. There was a boy from a farm, about sixteen years old, with a
broken leg that had been badly set and was to be rebroken. There was Cayetano Ruiz, a small-town
gambler with a paralyzed leg. Down the corridor Mr. Frazer could hear them all laughing and merry
with the music made by the Mexicans who had been sent by the police. The Mexicans were having a
good time. They came in, very excited, to see Mr. Frazer and wanted to know if there was anything he
wanted them to play, and they came twice more to play at night of their own accord.
The last time they played Mr. Frazer lay in his room with the door open and listened to the noisy,
bad music and could not keep from thinking. When they wanted to know what he wished played, he
asked for the Cucaracha, which has the sinister lightness and deftness of so many of the tunes men
have gone to die to. They played noisily and with emotion. The tune was better than most of such
tunes, to Mr. Frazer’s mind, but the effect was all the same.
In spite of this introduction of emotion, Mr. Frazer went on thinking. Usually he avoided thinking
all he could, except when he was writing, but now he was thinking about those who were playing and
what the little one had said.
Religion is the opium of the people. He believed that, that dyspeptic little joint-keeper. Yes, and
music is the opium of the people. Old mount-to-the-head hadn’t thought of that. And now economics is
the opium of the people; along with patriotism the opium of the people in Italy and Germany. What
about sexual intercourse; was that an opium of the people? Of some of the people. Of some of the best
of the people. But drink was a sovereign opium of the people, oh, an excellent opium. Although some
prefer the radio, another opium of the people, a cheap one he had just been using. Along with these
went gambling, an opium of the people if there ever was one, one of the oldest. Ambition was
another, an opium of the people, along with a belief in any new form of government. What you wanted
was the minimum of government, always less government. Liberty, what we believed in, now the
name of a MacFadden publication. We believed in that although they had not found a new name for it
yet. But what was the real one? What was the real, the actual, opium of the people? He knew it very
well. It was gone just a little way around the corner in that well-lighted part of his mind that was there
after two or more drinks in the evening; that he knew was there (it was not really there of course).
What was it? He knew very well. What was it? Of course; bread was the opium of the people. Would
he remember that and would it make sense in the daylight? Bread is the opium of the people.
“Listen,” Mr. Frazer said to the nurse when she came. “Get that little thin Mexican in here, will
you, please?”
“How do you like it?” the Mexican said at the door.
“Very much.”
“It is a historic tune,” the Mexican said. “It is the tune of the real revolution.”
“Listen,” said Mr. Frazer. “Why should the people be operated on without an anæsthetic?”
“I do not understand.”
“Why are not all the opiums of the people good? What do you want to do with the people?”
“They should be rescued from ignorance.”
“Don’t talk nonsense. Education is an opium of the people. You ought to know that. You’ve had a
little.”
“You do not believe in education?”
“No,” said Mr. Frazer. “In knowledge, yes.”
“I do not follow you.”
“Many times I do not follow myself with pleasure.”
“You want to hear the Cucaracha another time?” asked the Mexican worriedly.
“Yes,” said Mr. Frazer. “Play the Cucaracha another time. It’s better than the radio.”
Revolution, Mr. Frazer thought, is no opium. Revolution is a catharsis; an ecstasy which can only
be prolonged by tyranny. The opiums are for before and for after. He was thinking well, a little too
well.
They would go now in a little while, he thought, and they would take the Cucaracha with them.
Then he would have a little spot of the giant killer and play the radio, you could play the radio so that
you could hardly hear it.
Fathers and Sons
THERE HAD BEEN A SIGN TO DETOUR IN the center of the main
street of this town, but cars had obviously gone through, so, believing it was some repair which had
been completed, Nicholas Adams drove on through the town along the empty, brick-paved street,
stopped by traffic lights that flashed on and off on this traffic-less Sunday, and would be gone next
year when the payments on the system were not met; on under the heavy trees of the small town that
are a part of your heart if it is your town and you have walked under them, but that are only too heavy,
that shut out the sun and that dampen the houses for a stranger; out past the last house and onto the
highway that rose and fell straight away ahead with banks of red dirt sliced cleanly away and the
second-growth timber on both sides. It was not his country but it was the middle of fall and all of this
country was good to drive through and to see. The cotton was picked and in the clearings there were
patches of corn, some cut with streaks of red sorghum, and, driving easily, his son asleep on the seat
by his side, the day’s run made, knowing the town he would reach for the night, Nick noticed which
corn fields had soy beans or peas in them, how the thickets and the cut-over land lay, where the
cabins and houses were in relation to the fields and the thickets; hunting the country in his mind as he
went by; sizing up each clearing as to feed and cover and figuring where you would find a covey and
which way they would fly.
In shooting quail you must not get between them and their habitual cover, once the dogs have
found them, or when they flush they will come pouring at you, some rising steep, some skimming by
your ears, whirring into a size you have never seen them in the air as they pass, the only way being to
turn and take them over your shoulder as they go, before they set their wings and angle down into the
thicket. Hunting this country for quail as his father had taught him, Nicholas Adams started thinking
about his father. When he first thought about him it was always the eyes. The big frame, the quick
movements, the wide shoulders, the hooked, hawk nose, the beard that covered the weak chin, you
never thought about—it was always the eyes. They were protected in his head by the formation of the
brows; set deep as though a special protection had been devised for some very valuable instrument.
They saw much farther and much quicker than the human eye sees and they were the great gift his
father had. His father saw as a big-horn ram or as an eagle sees, literally.
He would be standing with his father on one shore of the lake, his own eyes were very good
then, and his father would say, “They’ve run up the flag.” Nick could not see the flag or the flag pole.
“There,” his father would say, “it’s your sister Dorothy. She’s got the flag up and she’s walking out
onto the dock.”
Nick would look across the lake and he could see the long wooded shore-line, the higher timber
behind, the point that guarded the bay, the clear hills of the farm and the white of their cottage in the
trees but he could not see any flag pole, or any dock, only the white of the beach and the curve of the
shore.
“Can you see the sheep on the hillside toward the point?”
“Yes.”
They were a whitish patch on the gray-green of the hill.
“I can count them,” his father said.
Like all men with a faculty that surpasses human requirements, his father was very nervous.
Then, too, he was sentimental, and, like most sentimental people, he was both cruel and abused. Also,
he had much bad luck, and it was not all of it his own. He had died in a trap that he had helped only a
little to set, and they had all betrayed him in their various ways before he died. All sentimental people
are betrayed so many times. Nick could not write about him yet, although he would, later, but the quail
country made him remember him as he was when Nick was a boy and he was very grateful to him for
two things: fishing and shooting. His father was as sound on those two things as he was unsound on
sex, for instance, and Nick was glad that it had been that way; for some one has to give you your first
gun or the opportunity to get it and use it, and you have to live where there is game or fish if you are to
learn about them, and now, at thirty-eight, he loved to fish and to shoot exactly as much as when he
first had gone with his father. It was a passion that had never slackened and he was very grateful to
his father for bringing him to know it.
While for the other, that his father was not sound about, all the equipment you will ever have is
provided and each man learns all there is for him to know about it without advice; and it makes no
difference where you live. He remembered very clearly the only two pieces of information his father
had given him about that. Once when they were out shooting together Nick shot a red squirrel out of a
hemlock tree. The squirrel fell, wounded, and when Nick picked him up bit the boy clean through the
ball of the thumb.
“The dirty little bugger,” Nick said and smacked the squirrel’s head against the tree. “Look how
he bit me.”
His father looked and said, “Suck it out clean and put some iodine on when you get home.”
“The little bugger,” Nick said.
“Do you know what a bugger is?” his father asked him.
“We call anything a bugger,” Nick said.
“A bugger is a man who has intercourse with animals.”
“Why?” Nick said.
“I don’t know,” his father said. “But it is a heinous crime.”
Nick’s imagination was both stirred and horrified by this and he thought of various animals but
none seemed attractive or practical and that was the sum total of direct sexual knowledge bequeathed
him by his father except on one other subject. One morning he read in the paper that Enrico Caruso
had been arrested for mashing.
“What is mashing?”
“It is one of the most heinous of crimes,” his father answered. Nick’s imagination pictured the
great tenor doing something strange, bizarre, and heinous with a potato masher to a beautiful lady who
looked like the pictures of Anna Held on the inside of cigar boxes. He resolved, with considerable
horror, that when he was old enough he would try mashing at least once.
His father had summed up the whole matter by stating that masturbation produced blindness,
insanity, and death, while a man who went with prostitutes would contract hideous venereal diseases
and that the thing to do was to keep your hands off of people. On the other hand his father had the
finest pair of eyes he had ever seen and Nick had loved him very much and for a long time. Now,
knowing how it had all been, even remembering the earliest times before things had gone badly was
not good remembering. If he wrote it he could get rid of it. He had gotten rid of many things by writing
them. But it was still too early for that. There were still too many people. So he decided to think of
something else. There was nothing to do about his father and he had thought it all through many times.
The handsome job the undertaker had done on his father’s face had not blurred in his mind and all the
rest of it was quite clear, including the responsibilities. He had complimented the undertaker. The
undertaker had been both proud and smugly pleased. But it was not the undertaker that had given him
that last face. The undertaker had only made certain dashingly executed repairs of doubtful artistic
merit. The face had been making itself and being made for a long time. It had modelled fast in the last
three years. It was a good story but there were still too many people alive for him to write it.
Nick’s own education in those earlier matters had been acquired in the hemlock woods behind
the Indian camp. This was reached by a trail which ran from the cottage through the woods to the farm
and then by a road which wound through the slashings to the camp. Now if he could still feel all of
that trail with bare feet. First there was the pine-needle loam through the hemlock woods behind the
cottage where the fallen logs crumbled into wood dust and long splintered pieces of wood hung like
javelins in the tree that had been struck by lightning. You crossed the creek on a log and if you
stepped off there was the black muck of the swamp. You climbed a fence out of the woods and the
trail was hard in the sun across the field with cropped grass and sheep sorrel and mullen growing and
to the left the quaky bog of the creek bottom where the killdeer plover fed. The spring house was in
that creek. Below the barn there was fresh warm manure and the other older manure that was caked
dry on top. Then there was another fence and the hard, hot trail from the barn to the house and the hot
sandy road that ran down to the woods, crossing the creek, on a bridge this time, where the cat-tails
grew that you soaked in kerosene to make jack-lights with for spearing fish at night.
Then the main road went off to the left, skirting the woods and climbing the hill, while you went
into the woods on the wide clay and shale road, cool under the trees, and broadened for them to skid
out the hemlock bark the Indians cut. The hemlock bark was piled in long rows of stacks, roofed over
with more bark, like houses, and the peeled logs lay huge and yellow where the trees had been felled.
They left the logs in the woods to rot, they did not even clear away or burn the tops. It was only the
bark they wanted for the tannery at Boyne City; hauling it across the lake on the ice in winter, and
each year there was less forest and more open, hot, shadeless, weed-grown slashing.
But there was still much forest then, virgin forest where the trees grew high before there were
any branches and you walked on the brown, clean, springy-needled ground with no undergrowth and it
was cool on the hottest days and they three lay against the trunk of a hemlock wider than two beds are
long, with the breeze high in the tops and the cool light that came in patches, and Billy said:
“You want Trudy again?”
“You want to?”
“Un Huh.”
“Come on.”
“No, here.”
“But Billy—”
“I no mind Billy. He my brother.”
Then afterwards they sat, the three of them, listening for a black squirrel that was in the top
branches where they could not see him. They were waiting for him to bark again because when he
barked he would jerk his tail and Nick would shoot where he saw any movement. His father gave him
only three cartridges a day to hunt with and he had a single-barrel twenty-gauge shotgun with a very
long barrel.
“Son of a bitch never move,” Billy said.
“You shoot, Nickie. Scare him. We see him jump. Shoot him again,” Trudy said. It was a long
speech for her.
“I’ve only got two shells,” Nick said.
“Son of a bitch,” said Billy.
They sat against the tree and were quiet. Nick was feeling hollow and happy.
“Eddie says he going to come some night sleep in bed with you sister Dorothy.”
“What?”
“He said.”
Trudy nodded.
“That’s all he want do,” she said. Eddie was their older half-brother. He was seventeen.
“If Eddie Gilby ever comes at night and even speaks to Dorothy you know what I’d do to him?
I’d kill him like this.” Nick cocked the gun and hardly taking aim pulled the trigger, blowing a hole as
big as your hand in the head or belly of that half-breed bastard Eddie Gilby. “Like that. I’d kill him
like that.”
“He better not come then,” Trudy said. She put her hand in Nick’s pocket.
“He better watch out plenty,” said Billy.
“He’s big bluff,” Trudy was exploring with her hand in Nick’s pocket. “But don’t you kill him.
You get plenty trouble.”
“I’d kill him like that,” Nick said. Eddie Gilby lay on the ground with all his chest shot away.
Nick put his foot on him proudly.
“I’d scalp him,” he said happily.
“No,” said Trudy. “That’s dirty.”
“I’d scalp him and send it to his mother.”
“His mother dead,” Trudy said. “Don’t you kill him, Nickie. Don’t you kill him for me.”
“After I scalped him I’d throw him to the dogs.”
Billy was very depressed. “He better watch out,” he said gloomily.
“They’d tear him to pieces,” Nick said, pleased with the picture. Then, having scalped that halfbreed renegade and standing, watching the dogs tear him, his face unchanging, he fell backward
against the tree, held tight around the neck, Trudy holding, choking him, and crying, “No kill him! No
kill him! No kill him! No. No. No. Nickie. Nickie. Nickie!”
“What’s the matter with you?”
“No kill him.”
“I got to kill him.”
“He just a big bluff.”
“All right,” Nickie said. “I won’t kill him unless he comes around the house. Let go of me.”
“That’s good,” Trudy said. “You want to do anything now? I feel good now.”
“If Billy goes away.” Nick had killed Eddie Gilby, then pardoned him his life, and he was a man
now.
“You go, Billy. You hang around all the time. Go on.”
“Son a bitch,” Billy said. “I get tired this. What we come? Hunt or what?”
“You can take the gun. There’s one shell.”
“All right. I get a big black one all right.”
“I’ll holler,” Nick said.
Then, later, it was a long time after and Billy was still away.
“You think we make a baby?” Trudy folded her brown legs together happily and rubbed against
him. Something inside Nick had gone a long way away.
“I don’t think so,” he said.
“Make plenty baby what the hell.”
They heard Billy shoot.
“I wonder if he got one.”
“Don’t care,” said Trudy.
Billy came through the trees. He had the gun over his shoulder and he held a black squirrel by the
front paws.
“Look,” he said. “Bigger than a cat. You all through?”
“Where’d you get him?”
“Over there. Saw him jump first.”
“Got to go home,” Nick said.
“No,” said Trudy.
“I got to get there for supper.”
“All right.”
“Want to hunt tomorrow?”
“All right.”
“You can have the squirrel.”
“All right.”
“Come out after supper?”
“No.”
“How you feel?”
“Good.”
“All right.”
“Give me kiss on the face,” said Trudy.
Now, as he rode along the highway in the car and it was getting dark, Nick was all through
thinking about his father. The end of the day never made him think of him. The end of the day had
always belonged to Nick alone and he never felt right unless he was alone at it. His father came back
to him in the fall of the year, or in the early spring when there had been jacksnipe on the prairie, or
when he saw shocks of corn, or when he saw a lake, or if he ever saw a horse and buggy, or when he
saw, or heard, wild geese, or in a duck blind; remembering the time an eagle dropped through the
whirling snow to strike a canvas-covered decoy, rising, his wings beating, the talons caught in the
canvas. His father was with him, suddenly, in deserted orchards and in new-plowed fields, in
thickets, on small hills, or when going through dead grass, whenever splitting wood or hauling water,
by grist mills, cider mills and dams and always with open fires. The towns he lived in were not towns
his father knew. After he was fifteen he had shared nothing with him.
His father had frost in his beard in cold weather and in hot weather he sweated very much. He
liked to work in the sun on the farm because he did not have to and he loved manual work, which
Nick did not. Nick loved his father but hated the smell of him and once when he had to wear a suit of
his father’s underwear that had gotten too small for his father it made him feel sick and he took it off
and put it under two stones in the creek and said that he had lost it. He had told his father how it was
when his father had made him put it on but his father had said it was freshly washed. It had been, too.
When Nick had asked him to smell of it his father sniffed at it indignantly and said that it was clean
and fresh. When Nick came home from fishing without it and said he lost it he was whipped for lying.
Afterwards he had sat inside the woodshed with the door open, his shotgun loaded and cocked,
looking across at his father sitting on the screen porch reading the paper, and thought, “I can blow him
to hell. I can kill him.” Finally he felt his anger go out of him and he felt a little sick about it being the
gun that his father had given him. Then he had gone to the Indian camp, walking there in the dark, to
get rid of the smell. There was only one person in his family that he liked the smell of; one sister. All
the others he avoided all contact with. That sense blunted when he started to smoke. It was a good
thing. It was good for a bird dog but it did not help a man.
“What was it like, Papa, when you were a little boy and used to hunt with the Indians?”
“I don’t know,” Nick was startled. He had not even noticed the boy was awake. He looked at
him sitting beside him on the seat. He had felt quite alone but this boy had been with him. He
wondered for how long. “We used to go all day to hunt black squirrels,” he said. “My father only
gave me three shells a day because he said that would teach me to hunt and it wasn’t good for a boy to
go banging around. I went with a boy named Billy Gilby and his sister Trudy. We used to go out
nearly every day all one summer.”
“Those are funny names for Indians.”
“Yes, aren’t they,” Nick said.
“But tell me what they were like.”
“They were Ojibways,” Nick said. “And they were very nice.”
“But what were they like to be with?”
“It’s hard to say,” Nick Adams said. Could you say she did first what no one has ever done
better and mention plump brown legs, flat belly, hard little breasts, well holding arms, quick
searching tongue, the flat eyes, the good taste of mouth, then uncomfortably, tightly, sweetly, moistly,
lovely, tightly, achingly, fully, finally, unendingly, never-endingly, never-to-endingly, suddenly ended,
the great bird flown like an owl in the twilight, only it was daylight in the woods and hemlock needles
stuck against your belly. So that when you go in a place where Indians have lived you smell them gone
and all the empty pain killer bottles and the flies that buzz do not kill the sweetgrass smell, the smoke
smell and that other like a fresh cased marten skin. Nor any jokes about them nor old squaws take that
away. Nor the sick sweet smell they get to have. Nor what they did finally. It wasn’t how they ended.
They all ended the same. Long time ago good. Now no good.
And about the other. When you have shot one bird flying you have shot all birds flying. They are
all different and they fly in different ways but the sensation is the same and the last one is as good as
the first. He could thank his father for that.
“You might not like them,” Nick said to the boy. “But I think you would.”
“And my grandfather lived with them too when he was a boy, didn’t he?”
“Yes. When I asked him what they were like he said that he had many friends among them.”
“Will I ever live with them?”
“I don’t know,” Nick said. “That’s up to you.”
“How old will I be when I get a shotgun and can hunt by myself?”
“Twelve years old if I see you are careful.”
“’I wish I was twelve now.”
“You will be, soon enough.”
“What was my grandfather like? I can’t remember him except that he gave me an air rifle and an
American flag when I came over from France that time. What was he like?”
“He’s hard to describe. He was a great hunter and fisherman and he had wonderful eyes.”
“’Was he greater than you?”
“He was a much better shot and his father was a great wing shot too.”
“I’ll bet he wasn’t better than you.”
“Oh, yes he was. He shot very quickly and beautifully. I’d rather see him shoot than any man I
ever knew. He was always very disappointed in the way I shot.”
“Why do we never go to pray at the tomb of my grandfather?”
“We live in a different pan of the country. It’s a long way from here.”
“In France that wouldn’t make any difference. In France we’d go. I think I ought to go to pray at
the tomb of my grandfather.”
“Sometime we’ll go.”
“I hope we won’t live somewhere so that I can never go to pray at your tomb when you are
dead.”
“We’ll have to arrange it.”
“Don’t you think we might all be buried at a convenient place? We could all be buried in France.
That would be fine.”
“I don’t want to be buried in France,” Nick said.
“Well, then, we’ll have to get some convenient place in America. Couldn’t we all be buried out
at the ranch?”
“That’s an idea.”
“Then I could stop and pray at the tomb of my grandfather on the way to the ranch.”
“You’re awfully practical.”
“Well, I don’t feel good never to have even visited the tomb of my grandfather.”
“We’ll have to go,” Nick said. “I can see we’ll have to go.”
Part II
Short Stories Published in Books
or Magazines Subsequent to
“The First Forty-nine”
One Trip Across
YOU KNOW HOW IT IS THERE EARLY IN the morning in Havana
with the bums still asleep against the walls of the buildings; before even the ice wagons come by with
ice for the bars? Well, we came across the square from the dock to the Pearl of San Francisco Café to
get coffee and there was only one beggar awake in the square and he was getting a drink out of the
fountain. But when we got inside the café and sat down, there were the three of them waiting for us.
We sat down and one of them came over.
“Well,” he said.
“I can’t do it,” I told him. “I’d like to do it as a favor. But I told you last night I couldn’t.”
“You can name your own price.”
“It isn’t that. I can’t do it. That’s all.”
The two others had come over and they stood there looking sad. They were nice-looking fellows
all right and I would have liked to have done them the favor.
“A thousand apiece,” said the one who spoke good English.
“Don’t make me feel bad,” I told him. “I tell you true I can’t do it.”
“Afterwards, when things are changed, it would mean a good deal to you.”
“I know it. I’m all for you. But I can’t do it.”
“Why not?”
“I make my living with the boat. If I lose her I lose my living.”
“With the money you buy another boat.”
“Not in jail.”
They must have thought I just needed to be argued into it because the one kept on.
“You would have three thousand dollars and it could mean a great deal to you later. All this will
not last, you know.”
“Listen,” I said. “I don’t care who is President here. But I don’t carry anything to the States that
can talk.”
“You mean we would talk?” one of them who hadn’t spoken said. He was angry.
“I said anything that can talk.”
“Do you think we are lenguas largas?”
“No.”
“Do you know what a lengua larga is?”
“Yes. One with a long tongue.”
“Do you know what we do with them?”
“Don’t be tough with me,” I said. “You propositioned me. I didn’t offer you anything.”
“Shut up, Pancho,” the one who had done the talking before said to the angry one.
“He said we would talk,” Pancho said.
“Listen,” I said. “I told you I didn’t carry anything that can talk. Sacked liquor can’t talk.
Demijohns can’t talk. There’s other things that can’t talk. Men can talk.”
“Can Chinamen talk?” Pancho said, pretty nasty.
“They can talk, but I can’t understand them,” I told him.
“So you won’t?”
“It’s just like I told you last night. I can’t.”
“But you won’t talk?” Pancho said.
The one thing that he hadn’t understood right had made him nasty. I guess it was disappointment,
too. I didn’t even answer him.
“You’re not a lengua larga, are you?” he asked, still nasty.
“I don’t think so.”
“What’s that? A threat?”
“Listen,” I told him. “Don’t be so tough so early in the morning. I’m sure you’ve cut plenty
people’s throats. I haven’t even had my coffee yet.”
“So you’re sure I’ve cut people’s throats?”
“No,” I said. “And I don’t give a damn. Can’t you do business without getting angry?”
“I am angry now,” he said. “I would like to kill you.”
“Oh, hell,” I told him, “don’t talk so much.”
“Come on, Pancho, the first one said. Then, to me, “I am very sorry. I wish you would take us.”
“I’m sorry, too. But I can’t.”
The three of them started for the door, and I watched them go. They were good-looking young
fellows, wore good clothes; none of them wore hats, and they looked like they had plenty of money.
They talked plenty of money, anyway, and they spoke the kind of English Cubans with money speak.
Two of them looked like brothers and the other one, Pancho, was a little taller but the same sort
of looking kid. You know, slim, good clothes, and shiny hair. I didn’t figure he was as mean as he
talked. I figured he was plenty nervous.
As they turned out of the door to the right, I saw a closed car come across the square toward
them. The first thing a pane of glass went and the bullet smashed into the row of bottles on the showcase wall to the right. I heard the gun going and, bop, bop, bop, there were bottles smashing all along
the wall.
I jumped behind the bar on the left side and could see looking over the edge. The car was
stopped and there were two fellows crouched down by it. One had a Thompson gun and the other had
a sawed-off automatic shotgun. The one with the Thompson gun was a nigger. The other had a
chauffeur’s white duster on.
One of the boys was spread out on the sidewalk, face down, just outside the big window that
was smashed. The other two were behind one of the Tropical beer ice wagons that was stopped in
front of the Cunard bar next door. One of the ice-wagon horses was down in the harness, kicking, and
the other was plunging his head off.
One of the boys shot from the rear corner of the wagon and it ricocheted off the sidewalk. The
nigger with the tommy gun got his face almost into the street and gave the back of the wagon a burst
from underneath and sure enough one came down, falling toward the sidewalk with his head above the
curb. He flopped there, putting his hands over his head, and the chauffeur shot at him with the shotgun
while the nigger put in a fresh pan, but it was a long shot. You could see the buckshot marks all over
the sidewalk like silver splatters.
The other fellow pulled the one who was hit back by the legs to behind the wagon, and I saw the
nigger getting his face down on the paving to give them another burst. Then I saw old Pancho come
around the corner of the wagon and step into the lee of the horse that was still up. He stepped clear of
the horse, his face white as a dirty sheet, and got the chauffeur with the big Luger he had, holding it in
both hands to keep it steady. He shot twice over the nigger’s head, coming on, and once low.
He hit a tire on the car because I saw dust blowing in a spurt on the street as the air came out,
and at ten feet the nigger shot him in the belly with his tommy gun, with what must have been the last
shot in it because I saw him throw it down, and old Pancho sat down hard and went over forward. He
was trying to come up, still holding onto the Luger, only he couldn’t get his head up, when the nigger
took the shotgun that was lying against the wheel of the car by the chauffeur and blew the side of his
head off. Some nigger.
I took a quick one out of the first bottle I saw open and I couldn’t tell you yet what it was. The
whole thing made me feel pretty bad. I slipped along behind the bar and out through the kitchen in
back and all the way out. I went clean around the outside of the square and never even looked over
toward the crowd there was coming fast in front of the café and went in through the gate and out onto
the dock and got on board.
The fellow who had her chartered was on board waiting. I told him what had happened.
“Where’s Eddy?” this fellow Johnson that had her chartered asked me.
“I never saw him after the shooting started.”
“Do you suppose he was hit?”
“Hell no. I tell you the only shots that came in the café were into the show case. That was when
the car was coming behind them. That was when they shot the first fellow right in front of the window.
They came at an angle like this—”
“You seem awfully sure about it,” he said.
“I was watching,” I told him.
Then, as I looked up, I saw Eddy coming along the dock looking taller and sloppier than ever.
He walked with his joints all slung wrong.
“There he is.”
Eddy looked pretty bad. He never looked too good early in the morning but he looked plenty bad
now.
“Where were you?” I asked him.
“On the floor.”
“Did you see it?” Johnson asked him.
“Don’t talk about it, Mr. Johnson,” Eddy said to him. “It makes me sick to even think about it.”
“You better have a drink,” Johnson told him. Then he said to me, “Well, are we going out?”
“That’s up to you.”
“What sort of a day will it be?”
“Just about like yesterday. Maybe better.”
“Let’s get out then.”
“All right, as soon as the bait comes.”
We’d had this bird out three weeks fishing the stream and I hadn’t seen any of his money yet
except one hundred dollars he gave me to pay the consul and clear and get some grub and put gas in
her before we came across. I was furnishing all the tackle and he had her chartered at thirty-five
dollars a day. He slept at a hotel and came aboard every morning. Eddy got me the charter so I had to
carry him. I was giving him four dollars a day.
“I’ve got to put gas in her,” I told Johnson.
“All right.”
“I’ll need some money for that.”
“How much?”
“It’s twenty-eight cents a gallon. I ought to put in forty gallons anyway. That’s eleven-twenty.”
He got out fifteen dollars.
“Do you want to put the rest on the beer and the ice?” I asked him.
“That’s fine,” he said. “Just put it down against what I owe you.”
I was thinking three weeks was a long time to let him go but if he was good for it what difference
was there? He should have paid every week anyway. But I’ve let them run a month and got the money.
It was my fault but I was glad to see it run at first. It was only the last few days he made me nervous
but I didn’t want to say anything for fear of getting him plugged at me. If he was good for it, the longer
he went the better.
“Have a bottle of beer?” he asked me, opening the box.
“No thanks.”
Just then this nigger we had getting bait comes down the dock and I told Eddy to get ready to cast
her off.
The nigger came on board with the bait and we cast off and started out of the harbor, the nigger
fixing on a couple of mackerel; passing the hook through their mouth, out the gills, slitting the side and
then putting the hook through the other side and out, tying the mouth shut on the wire leader and tying
the hook good so it couldn’t slip and so the bait would troll smooth without spinning.
He’s a real black nigger, smart and gloomy, with blue voodoo beads around his neck under his
shirt and an old straw hat. What he liked to do on board was sleep and read the papers. But he put on
a nice bait and he was fast.
“Can’t you put on a bait like that, Captain?” Johnson asked me.
“Yes, sir.”
“Why do you carry a nigger to do it?”
“When the big fish run you’ll see,” I told him.
“What’s the idea?”
“The nigger can do it faster than I can.”
“Can’t Eddy do it?”
“No, sir.”
“It seems an unnecessary expense to me.” He’d been giving the nigger a dollar a day and the
nigger had been on a rumba every night. I could see him getting sleepy already.
“He’s necessary,” I said.
By then we had passed the smacks with their fish cars anchored in front of Cabanas and the skiffs
anchored fishing for mutton fish on the rock bottom by the Morro, and I headed her out where the gulf
made a dark line. Eddy put the two big teasers out and the nigger had baits on three rods.
The stream was in nearly to soundings and as we came toward the edge you could see her
running nearly purple with regular whirlpools. There was a light east breeze coming up and we put up
plenty of flying fish, those big ones that look like the picture of Lindbergh crossing the Atlantic when
they sail off.
Those big flying fish are the best sign there is. As far as you could see, there was that faded
yellow gulfweed in small patches that means the main stream is well in and there were birds ahead
working over a school of little tuna. You could see them jumping; just little ones weighing a couple of
pounds apiece.
“Put out any time you want,” I told Johnson.
He put on his belt and his harness and put out the big rod with the Hardy reel with six hundred
yards of thirty-six thread. I looked back and his bait was trolling nice, just bouncing along on the
swell and the two teasers were diving and jumping. We were going just about the right speed and I
headed her into the stream.
“Keep the rod butt in the socket on the chair,” I told him. “Then the rod won’t be as heavy. Keep
the drag off so you can slack to him when he hits. If one ever hits with the drag on he’ll jerk you
overboard.”
Every day I’d have to tell him the same thing but I didn’t mind that. One out of fifty parties you
get know how to fish. Then when they do know, half the time they’re goofy and want to use line that
isn’t strong enough to hold anything big.
“How does the day look?” he asked me.
“It couldn’t be better,” I told him. It was a pretty day all right.
I gave the nigger the wheel and told him to work along the edge of the stream to the eastward and
went back to where Johnson was sitting watching his bait bouncing along.
“Want me to put out another rod?” I asked him.
“I don’t think so,” he said. “I want to hook, fight, and land my fish myself.”
“Good,” I said. “Do you want Eddy to put it out and hand it to you if one strikes so you can hook
him?”
“No,” he said. “I prefer to have only one rod out.”
“All right.”
The nigger was still taking her out and I looked and saw he had seen a patch of flying fish burst
out ahead and up the stream a little. Looking back, I could see Havana looking fine in the sun and a
ship just coming out of the harbor past the Morro.
“I think you’re going to have a chance to fight one today, Mr. Johnson,” I told him.
“It’s about time,” he said. “How long have we been out?”
“Three weeks today.”
“That’s a long time to fish.”
“They’re a funny fish,” I told him. “They aren’t here until they come. But when they come there’s
plenty of them. And they’ve always come. If they don’t come now they’re never coming. The moon is
right. There’s a good stream and we’re going to have a good breeze.”
“There were some small ones when we first came.”
“Yes,” I said. “Like I told you. The small ones thin out and stop before the big ones come.”
“You party-boat captains always have the same line. Either it’s too early or too late or the wind
isn’t right or the moon is wrong. But you take the money just the same.”
“Well,” I told him, “the hell of it is that it usually is too early or too late and plenty of time the
wind is wrong. Then when you get a day that’s perfect you’re ashore without a party.”
“But you think today’s a good day?”
“Well,” I told him, “I’ve had action enough for me already today. But I’d like to bet you’re going
to have plenty.”
“I hope so,” he said.
We settled down to troll. Eddy went forward and lay down. I was standing up watching for a tail
to show. Every once in a while the nigger would doze off and I was watching him, too. I bet he had
some nights.
“Would you mind getting me a bottle of beer, Captain?” Johnson asked me.
“No, sir,” I said, and I dug down in the ice to get him a cold one.
“Won’t you have one?” he asked.
“No, sir,” I said. “I’ll wait till tonight.”
I opened the bottle and was reaching it toward him when I saw this big brown bugger with a
spear on him longer than your arm burst head and shoulders out of the water and smash at that
mackerel. He looked as big around as a saw log.
“Slack it to him!” I yelled.
“He hasn’t got it,” Johnson said.
“Hold it, then.”
He’d come up from deep down and missed it. I knew he’d turn and come for it again.
“Get ready to turn it loose to him the minute he grabs it.”
Then I saw him coming from behind under water. You could see his fins out wide like purple
wings and the purple stripes across the brown. He came on like a submarine and his top fin came out
and you could see it slice the water. Then he came right behind the bait and his spear came out too,
sort of wagging clean out of water.
“Let it go into his mouth,” I said. Johnson took his hand off the reel spool and it started to whiz
and the old marlin turned and went down and I could see the whole length of him shine bright silver
as he turned broadside and headed off fast toward shore.
“Put on a little drag,” I said. “Not much.”
He screwed down on the drag.
“Not too much,” I said. I could see the line slant up. “Shut her down hard and sock him,” I said.
“You’ve got to sock him. He’s going to jump anyway.”
Johnson screwed the drag down and came back on the rod.
“Sock him,” I told him. “Stick it into him. Hit him half a dozen times.”
He hit him pretty hard a couple of times more, and then the rod bent double and the reel
commenced to screech and out he came, boom, in a long straight jump, shining silver in the sun and
making a splash like throwing a horse off a cliff.
“Ease up on the drag,” I told him.
“He’s gone,” said Johnson.
“The hell he is,” I told him. “Ease up on the drag quick.”
I could see the curve in the line and the next time he jumped he was astern and headed out to sea.
Then he came out again and smashed the water white and I could see he was hooked in the side of his
mouth. The stripes showed clear on him. He was a fine fish, bright silver now, barred with purple and
as big around as a log.
“He’s gone,” Johnson said. The line was slack.
“Reel on him,” I said. “He’s hooked good. Put her ahead with all the machine!” I yelled to the
nigger.
Then once, twice, he came out stiff as a post, the whole length of him jumping straight toward us,
throwing the water high each time he landed. The line came taut and I saw he was headed inshore
again and I could see he was turning.
“Now he’ll make his run,” I said. “If he hooks up I’ll chase him. Keep your drag light. There’s
plenty of line.”
The old marlin headed out to the nor’west like all the big ones go, and brother, did he hook up.
He started jumping in those long lopes and every splash would be like a speed boat in a sea. We went
after him, keeping him on the quarter once I’d made the turn. I had the wheel and I kept yelling to
Johnson to keep his drag light and reel fast. All of a sudden I see his rod jerk and the line go slack. It
wouldn’t look slack unless you knew about it because of the pull of the belly of the line in the water.
But I knew.
“He’s gone,” I told him. The fish was still jumping and he went on jumping until he was out of
sight. He was a fine fish all right.
“I can still feel him pull,” Johnson said.
“That’s the weight of the line.”
“I can hardly reel it. Maybe he’s dead.”
“Look at him,” I said. “He’s still jumping.” You could see him out a half a mile, still throwing
spouts of water.
I felt his drag. He had it screwed down tight. You couldn’t pull out any line. It had to break.
“Didn’t I tell you to keep your drag light?”
“But he kept taking out line.”
“So what?”
“So I tightened it.”
“Listen,” I told him. “If you don’t give them line when they hook up like that they break it. There
isn’t any line will hold them. When they want it you’ve got to give it to them. You have to keep a light
drag. The market fishermen can’t hold them tight when they do that even with a harpoon line. What we
have to do is use the boat to chase them so they don’t take it all when they make their run. After they
make their run they’ll sound and you can tighten up the drag and get it back.”
“Then if it hadn’t broken I would have caught him?”
“You’d have had a chance.”
“He couldn’t have kept that up, could he?”
“He can do plenty of other things. It isn’t until after he’s made his run that the fight starts.”
“Well, let’s catch one,” he said.
“You have to reel that line in first,” I told him.
We’d hooked that fish and lost him without waking Eddy up. Now old Eddy came back astern.
“What’s the matter?” he said.
Eddy was a good man on a boat once, before he got to be a rummy, but he isn’t any good now. I
looked at him standing there tall and hollowcheeked with his mouth loose and that white stuff in the
corners of his eyes and his hair all faded in the sun. I knew he woke up dead for a drink.
“You’d better drink a bottle of beer,” I told him. He took one out of the box and drank it.
“Well, Mr. Johnson,” he said, “I guess I better finish my nap. Much obliged for the beer, sir.”
Some Eddy. The fish didn’t make any difference to him.
Well, we hooked another one around noon and he jumped off. You could see the hook go thirty
feet in the air when he threw it.
“What did I do wrong then?” Johnson asked.
“Nothing,” I said. “He just threw it.”
“Mr. Johnson,” said Eddy, who’d waked up to have another bottle of beer— “Mr. Johnson,
you’re just unlucky. Now maybe you’re lucky with women. Mr. Johnson, what do you say we go out
tonight?” Then he went back and lay down again.
About four o’clock when we’re coming back close in to shore against the stream, it going like a
mill race, us with the sun at our backs, the biggest black marlin I ever saw in my life hit Johnson’s
bait. We’d put out a feather squid and caught four of those little tuna and the nigger put one on his
hook for bait. It trolled pretty heavy but it made a big splash in the wake.
Johnson took the harness off the reel so he could put the rod across his knees because his arms
got tired holding it in position all the time. Because his hands got tired holding the spool of the reel
against the drag of the big bait, he screwed the drag down when I wasn’t looking. I never knew he had
it down. I didn’t like to see him hold the rod that way but I hated to be crabbing at him all the time.
Besides, with the drag off, line would go out so there wasn’t any danger. But it was a sloppy way to
fish.
I was at the wheel and was working the edge of the stream opposite that old cement factory
where it makes deep so close in to shore and where it makes a son of eddy where there is always lots
of bait. Then I saw a splash like a depth bomb and the sword and eye and open lower jaw and huge
purple-black head of a black marlin. The whole top fin was up out of water looking as high as a fullrigged ship, and the whole scythe tall was out as he smashed at that tuna. The bill was as big around
as a baseball bat and slanted up, and as he grabbed the bait he sliced the ocean wide open. He was
solid purple-black and he had an eye as big as a soup bowl. He was huge. I bet he’d go a thousand
pounds.
I yelled to Johnson to let him have line but before I could say a word I saw Johnson rise up in the
air off the chair as though he was being derricked, and him holding just for a second onto that rod and
the rod bending like a bow, and then the butt caught him in the belly and the whole works went
overboard.
He’d screwed the drag tight, and when the fish struck, it lifted Johnson right out of the chair and
he couldn’t hold it. He’d had the butt under one leg and the rod across his lap. If he’d had the harness
on it would have taken him along, too.
I cut out the engine and went back to the stern. He was sitting there holding onto his belly where
the rod butt had hit him.
“I guess that’s enough for today,” I said.
“What was it?” he said to me.
“Black marlin,” I said.
“How did it happen?”
“You figure it out,” I said. “The reel cost two hundred and fifty dollars. It costs more now. The
rod cost me forty-five. There was a little under six hundred yards of thirty-six thread.”
Just then Eddy slaps him on the back. “Mr. Johnson,” he says, “you’re just unlucky. You know I
never saw that happen before in my life.”
“Shut up, you rummy,” I said to him.
“I tell you, Mr. Johnson,” Eddy said, “that’s the rarest occurrence I ever saw in my life.”
“What would I do if I was hooked to a fish like that?” Johnson said.
“That’s what you wanted to fight all by yourself,” I told him. I was plenty sore.
“They’re too big,” Johnson said. “Why, it would just be punishment.”
“Listen,” I said. “A fish like that would kill you.”
“They catch them.”
“People who know how to fish catch them. But don’t think they don’t take punishment.”
“I saw a picture of a girl who caught one.”
“Sure,” I said. “Still fishing. He swallowed the bait and they pulled his stomach out and he came
to the top and died. I’m talking about trolling them when they’re hooked in the mouth.”
“Well,” said Johnson, “they’re too big. If it isn’t enjoyable, why do it?”
“That’s right, Mr. Johnson,” Eddy said. “If it isn’t enjoyable, why do it? Listen, Mr. Johnson.
You hit the nail on the head there. If it isn’t enjoyable—why do it?”
I was still shaky from seeing that fish and feeling plenty sick about the tackle and I couldn’t listen
to them. I told the nigger to head her for the Morro. I didn’t say anything to them and there they sat,
Eddy in one of the chairs with a bottle of beer and Johnson with another.
“Captain,” he said to me after a while, “could you make me a highball?”
I made him one without saying anything, and then I made myself a real one. I was thinking to
myself that this Johnson had fished fifteen days, finally he hooks into a fish a fisherman would give a
year to tie into, he loses him, he loses my heavy tackle, he makes a fool of himself and he sits there
perfectly content drinking with a rummy.
When we got in to the dock and the nigger was standing there waiting, I said, “What about
tomorrow?”
“I don’t think so,” Johnson said. “I’m about fed up with this kind of fishing.”
“You want to pay off the nigger?”
“How much do I owe him?”
“A dollar. You can give him a tip if you want.”
So Johnson gave the nigger a dollar and two Cuban twenty-cent pieces.
“What’s this for?” the nigger asks me, showing the coins.
“A tip,” I told him in Spanish. “You’re through. He gives you that.”
“Don’t come tomorrow?”
“No.”
The nigger gets his ball of twine he used for tying baits and his dark glasses, puts on his straw
hat and goes without saying good-bye. He was a nigger that never thought much of any of us.
“When do you want to settle up, Mr. Johnson?” I asked him.
“I’ll go to the bank in the morning,” Johnson said. “We can settle up in the afternoon.”
“Do you know how many days there are?”
“Fifteen.”
“No. There’s sixteen with today and a day each way makes eighteen. Then there’s the rod and
reel and the line from today.”
“The tackle’s your risk.”
“No, sir. Not when you lose it that way.”
“I’ve paid every day for the rent of it. It’s your risk.”
“No, sir,” I said. “If a fish broke it and it wasn’t your fault, that would be something else. You
lost that whole outfit by carelessness.”
“The fish pulled it out of my hands.”
“Because you had the drag on and didn’t have the rod in the socket.”
“You have no business to charge for that.”
“If you hired a car and ran it off a cliff, don’t you think you’d have to pay for it?”
“Not if I was in it,” Johnson said.
“That’s pretty good, Mr. Johnson,” Eddy said. “You see it, don’t you, Cap? If he was in it he’d
be killed. So he wouldn’t have to pay. That’s a good one.”
I didn’t pay any attention to the rummy. “You owe two hundred and ninety five dollars for that
rod and reel and line,” I told Johnson.
“Well, it’s not right,” he said. “But if that’s the way you feel about it why not split the
difference?”
“I can’t replace it for under three hundred and sixty. I’m not charging you for the line. A fish like
that could get all your line and it not be your fault. If there was anyone here but a rummy they’d tell
you how square I’m being with you. I know it seems like a lot of money but it was a lot of money
when I bought the tackle, too. You can’t fish like that without the best tackle you can buy.”
“Mr. Johnson, he says I’m a rummy. Maybe I am. But I tell you he’s right. He’s right and he’s
reasonable,” Eddy told him.
“I don’t want to make any difficulties,” Johnson said finally. “I’ll pay for it, even though I don’t
see it. That’s eighteen days at thirty-five dollars and two ninety-five extra.”
“You gave me a hundred,” I told him. “I’ll give you a list of what I spent and I’ll deduct what
grub there is left. What you bought for provisions going over and back.”
“That’s reasonable,” Johnson said.
“Listen, Mr. Johnson,” Eddy said. “If you knew the way they usually charge a stranger you’d
know it was more than reasonable. Do you know what it is? It’s exceptional. The cap is treating you
like you were his own mother.”
“I’ll go to the bank tomorrow and come down in the afternoon. Then I’ll get the boat day after
tomorrow.”
“You can go back with us and save the boat fare.”
“No,” he said. “I’ll save time with the boat.”
“Well,” I said. “What about a drink?”
“Fine,” said Johnson. “No hard feelings now, are there?”
“No, sir,” I told him. So the three of us sat there in the stern and drank a highball together.
The next day I worked around her all morning, changing the oil in her base and one thing and
another. At noon I went uptown and ate at a Chink place where you get a good meal for forty cents,
and then I bought some things to take home to my wife and our three girls. You know, perfume, a
couple of fans and two of those high combs. When I finished I stopped in at Donovan’s and had a beer
and talked with the old man and then walked back to the San Francisco docks, stopping in at three or
four places for a beer on the way. I bought Frankie a couple at the Cunard bar and I came on board
feeling pretty good. When I came on board I had just forty cents left. Frankie came on board with me,
and while we sat and waited for Johnson I drank a couple of cold ones out of the ice box with
Frankie.
Eddy hadn’t shown up all night or all day but I knew he would be around sooner or later, as soon
as his credit ran out. Donovan told me he’d been in there the night before a little while with Johnson,
and Eddy had been setting them up on credit. We waited and I began to wonder about Johnson not
showing up. I’d left word at the dock for them to tell him to go on board and wait for me but they said
he hadn’t come. Still, I figured he had been out late and probably didn’t get up till around noon. The
banks were open until three-thirty. We saw the plane go out, and about five-thirty I was all over
feeling good and was getting plenty worried.
At six o’clock I sent Frankie up to the hotel to see if Johnson was there. I still thought he might
be out on a time or he might be there at the hotel feeling too bad to get up. I kept waiting and waiting
until it was late. But I was getting plenty worried because he owed me eight hundred and twenty-five
dollars.
Frankie was gone about a little over half an hour. When I saw him coming he was walking fast
and shaking his head.
“He went on the plane,” he said.
All right. There it was. The consulate was closed. I had forty cents, and anyhow the plane was in
Miami by now. I couldn’t even send a wire. Some Mr. Johnson, all right. It was my fault. I should
have known better.
“Well,” I said to Frankie, “we might as well have a cold one. Mr. Johnson bought them.” There
were three bottles of Tropical left.
Frankie felt as bad as I did. I don’t know how he could but he seemed to. He just kept slapping
me on the back and shaking his head.
So there it was. I was broke. I’d lost five hundred and thirty dollars of the charter, and tackle I
couldn’t replace for three hundred and fifty more. How some of that gang that hangs around the dock
would be pleased at that, I thought. It certainly would make some conchs happy. And the day before I
turned down three thousand dollars to land three aliens on the Keys. Anywhere, just to get them out of
the country.
All right, what was I going to do now? I couldn’t bring in a load because you have to have
money to buy the booze and besides there’s no money in it any more. The town is flooded with it and
there’s nobody to buy it. But I was damned if I was going home broke and starve a summer in that
town. Besides I’ve got a family. The clearance was paid when we came in. You usually pay the
broker in advance and he enters you and clears you. Hell, I didn’t even have enough money to put in
gas. It was a hell of a note, all right. Some Mr. Johnson.
“I’ve got to carry something, Frankie,” I said. “I’ve got to make some money.”
“I’ll see,” said Frankie. He hangs around the water front and does odd jobs and is pretty deaf
and drinks too much every night. But you never saw a fellow more loyal nor with a better heart. I’ve
known him since I first started to run over there. He used to help me load plenty of times. Then when I
got handling stuff and went party-boating and broke out this swordfishing in Cuba I used to see him a
lot around the dock and around the café. He seems dumb and he usually smiles instead of talking but
that’s because he’s deaf.
“You carry anything?” Frankie asked.
“Sure,” I said. “I can’t choose now.”
“Anything?”
“Sure.”
“I’ll see,” Frankie said. “Where will you be?”
“I’ll be at the Perla,” I told him. “I have to eat.”
You can get a good meal at the Perla for twenty-five cents. Everything on the menu is a dime
except soup, and that is a nickel. I walked as far as there with Frankie, and I went in and he went on.
Before he went he shook me by the hand and clapped me on the back again.
“Don’t worry,” he said. “Me Frankie much politics. Much business. Much drinking. No money.
But big friend. Don’t worry.”
“So long, Frankie,” I said. “Don’t you worry either, boy.”
I went in the Perla and sat down at a table. They had a new pane of glass in the window that had
been shot up and the show case was all fixed up. There were a lot of gallegos drinking at the bar and
some eating. One table was playing dominoes already. I had black bean soup and a beef stew with
boiled potatoes for fifteen cents. A bottle of Hatuey beer brought it up to a quarter. When I spoke to
the waiter about the shooting he wouldn’t say anything. They were all plenty scared.
I finished the meal and sat back and smoked a cigarette and worried my head off. Then I saw
Frankie coming in the door with someone behind him. Yellow stuff, I thought to myself. So it’s yellow
stuff.
“This is Mr. Sing,” Frankie said, and he smiled. He’d been pretty fast all right and he knew it.
“How do you do?” said Mr. Sing.
Mr. Sing was about the smoothest-looking thing I’d ever seen. He was a Chink all right, but he
talked like an Englishman and he was dressed in a white suit with a silk shirt and black tie and one of
those hundred-and-twenty-five-dollar Panama hats.
“You will have some coffee?” he asked me.
“If you do.”
“Thank you,” said Mr. Sing. “We are quite alone here?”
“Except for everybody in the café,” I told him.
“That is all right,” Mr. Sing said. “You have a boat?”
“Thirty-eight feet,” I said. “Hundred horse Kermath.”
“Ah,” said Mr. Sing. “I had imagined it was a lugger.”
“It can carry two hundred and sixty-five cases without being loaded.”
“Would you care to charter it to me?”
“On what terms?”
“You need not go. I will provide a captain and a crew.”
“No,” I said. “I go on her wherever she goes.”
“I see,” said Mr. Sing. “Would you mind leaving us?” he said to Frankie. Frankie looked as
interested as ever and smiled at him.
“He’s deaf,” I said. “He doesn’t understand much English.”
“I see,” said Mr. Sing. “You speak Spanish. Tell him to rejoin us later.”
I motioned to Frankie with my thumb. He got up and went over to the bar.
“You don’t speak Spanish?” I said.
“Oh, yes,” said Mr. Sing. “Now what are the circumstances that would—that have made you
consider …”
“I’m broke.”
“I see,” said Mr. Sing. “Does the boat owe any money? Can she be libeled?”
“No.”
“Quite so,” Mr. Sing said. “How many of my unfortunate compatriots could your boat
accommodate?”
“You mean carry?”
“That’s it.”
“How far?”
“A day’s voyage.”
“I don’t know,” I said. “She can take a dozen if they didn’t have any baggage.”
“They would not have baggage.”
“Where do you want to carry them?”
“I’d leave that to you,” Mr. Sing said.
“You mean where to land them?”
“You would embark them for the Tortugas where a schooner would pick them up.”
“Listen,” I said. “There’s a lighthouse at the Tortugas on Loggerhead Key with a radio that
works both ways.”
“Quite,” said Mr. Sing. “It would certainly be very silly to land them there.”
“Then what?”
“I said you would embark them for there. That is what their passage calls for.”
“Yes,” I said.
“You would land them wherever your best judgment dictated.”
“Will the schooner come to Tortugas to get them?”
“Of course not,” said Mr. Sing. “How silly.”
“How much are they worth a head?”
“Fifty dollars,” said Mr. Sing.
“No.”
“How would seventy-five do?”
“What do you get a head?”
“Oh, that’s quite beside the point. You see, there are a great many facets, or shall we say angles,
to my issuing the tickets. It doesn’t stop there.”
“Yes,” I said. “And what I’m supposed to do doesn’t have to be paid for, either. Eh?”
“I see your point absolutely,” said Mr. Sing. “Should we say a hundred dollars apiece?”
“Listen,” I said. “Do you know how long I would go to jail if they pick me up on this?”
“Ten years,” said Mr. Sing. “Ten years at least. But there is no reason to go to jail, my dear
Captain. You run only one risk—when you load your passengers. Everything else is left to your
discretion.”
“And if they come back on your hands?”
“That’s quite simple. I would accuse you to them of having betrayed me. I will make a partial
refund and ship them out again. They realize, of course, that it is a difficult voyage.”
“What about me?”
“I suppose I should send some word to the consulate.”
“I see.”
“Twelve hundred dollars, Captain, is not to be despised at present.”
“When would I get the money?”
“Two hundred when you agree and a thousand when you load.”
“If I would go off with the two hundred?”
“I could do nothing, of course,” he smiled. “But I know you wouldn’t do such a thing, Captain.”
“Have you got the two hundred with you?”
“Of course.”
“Put it under the plate.” He did. “All right,” I said. “I’ll clear in the morning and pull out at dark.
Now, where do we load?”
“How would Bacuranao be?”
“All right. Have you got it fixed?”
“Of course.”
“Now, about the loading,” I said. “You show two lights, one above the other, at the point. I’ll
come in when I see them. You come out in a boat and load from the boat. You come yourself and you
bring the money. I won’t take one on board until I have it.”
“No,” he said; “one-half when you start to load and the other when you are finished.”
“All right,” I said. “That’s reasonable.”
“So everything is understood?”
“I guess so,” I said. “There’s no baggage and no arms. No guns, knives, or razors; nothing. I have
to know about that.”
“Captain,” said Mr. Sing, “have you no trust in me? Don’t you see our interests are identical?”
“You’ll make sure?”
“Please do not embarrass me,” he said. “Do you not see how our interests coincide?”
“All right,” I told him. “What time will you be there?”
“Before midnight.”
“All right,” I said. “I guess that’s all.”
“How do you want the money?”
“In hundreds is all right.”
He stood up and I watched him go out. Frankie smiled at him as he went. He was a smooth-
looking Chink all right. Some Chink.
Frankie came over to the table. “Well?” he said.
“Where did you know Mr. Sing?”
“He ships Chinamen,” Frankie said. “Big business.”
“How long you know him?”
“He’s here about two years,” Frankie said. “Another one ship them before him. Somebody kill
him.”
“Somebody will kill Mr. Sing, too.”
“Sure,” said Frankie. “Why not? Plenty big business.”
“Some business,” I said.
“Big business,” said Frankie. “Ship Chinamen never come back. Other Chinamen write letters
say everything fine.”
“Wonderful,” I said.
“This kind of Chinamen no understand write. Chinamen can write all rich. Eat nothing. Live on
rice. Hundred thousand Chinamen here. Only three Chinese women.”
“Why?”
“Government no let.”
“Hell of a situation,” I said.
“You do business him?”
“Maybe.”
“Good business,” said Frankie. “Better than politics. Much money. Plenty big business.”
“Have a bottle of beer,” I told him.
“You not worry any more?”
“Hell no,” I said. “Plenty big business. Much obliged.”
“Good,” said Frankie and patted me on the back. “Make me happier than nothing. All I want is
you happy. Chinamen good business, eh?”
“Wonderful.”
“Make me happy,” said Frankie. I saw he was about ready to cry because he was so pleased
everything was all right, so I patted him on the back. Some Frankie.
First thing in the morning I got hold of the broker and told him to clear us. He wanted the crew
list and I told him nobody.
“You’re going to cross alone, Captain?”
“That’s right.”
“What’s become of your mate?”
“He’s on a drunk,” I told him.
“It’s very dangerous to go alone.”
“It’s only ninety miles,” I said. “Do you think having a rummy on board makes any difference?”
I ran her over to the Standard Oil dock across the harbor and filled up both the tanks. She held
nearly two hundred gallons when I had her full. I hated to buy it at twenty-eight cents a gallon but I
didn’t know where we might go.
Ever since I’d seen the Chink and taken the money I’d been worrying about the business. I don’t
think I slept all night. I brought her back to the San Francisco dock, and there was Eddy waiting on the
dock for me.
“Hello, Harry,” he said to me and waved. I threw him the stern line and he made her fast, and
then came aboard; longer, blearier, drunker than ever. I didn’t say anything to him.
“What do you think about that fellow Johnson going off like that, Harry?” he asked me. “What do
you know about that?”
“Get out of here,” I told him. “You’re poison to me.”
“Brother, don’t I feel as bad about it as you do?”
“Get off of her,” I told him.
He just settled back in the chair and stretched his legs out. “I hear we’re going across today,” he
said. “Well, I guess there isn’t any use to stay around.”
“You’re not going.”
“What’s the matter, Harry? There’s no sense to get plugged with me.”
“No? Get off her.”
“Oh, take it easy.”
I hit him in the face and he stood up and then climbed up onto the dock.
“I wouldn’t do a thing like that to you, Harry,” he said.
“I’m not going to carry you,” I told him. “That’s all.”
“Well, what did you have to hit me for?”
“So you’d believe it.”
“What do you want me to do? Stay here and starve?”
“Starve, hell,” I said. “You can get work on the ferry. You can work your way back.”
“You aren’t treating me square,” he said.
“Who did you treat square, you rummy?” I told him. “You’d double-cross your own mother.”
That was true, too. But I felt bad about hitting him. You know how you feel when you hit a drunk.
But I wouldn’t carry him the way things were now, not even if I wanted to.
He started to walk off down the dock looking longer than a day without breakfast. Then he turned
and came back.
“How’s to let me take a couple of dollars, Harry?”
I gave him a five-dollar bill of the Chink’s.
“I always knew you were my pal. Harry, why don’t you carry me?”
“You’re bad luck.”
“You’re just plugged,” he said. “Never mind, old pal. You’ll be glad to see me yet.”
Now he had money he went off a good deal faster but I tell you it was poison to see him walk,
even. He walked just like his joints were backwards.
I went up to the Perla and met the broker and he gave me the papers and I bought him a drink.
Then I had lunch and Frankie came in.
“Fellow gave me this for you,” he said and handed me a rolled-up sort of tube wrapped in paper
and tied with a piece of red string. It looked like a photograph when I unwrapped it and I unrolled it
thinking it was maybe a picture someone around the dock had taken of the boat.
All right. It was a close-up picture of the head and chest of a dead nigger with his throat cut clear
across from ear to ear and then stitched up neat and a card on his chest saying in Spanish: “This is
what we do to lenguas largas.”
“Who gave it to you?” I asked Frankie.
He pointed out a Spanish boy that works around the docks who is just about gone with the con.
This kid was standing at the lunch counter.
“Ask him to come over.”
The kid came over. He said two young fellows gave it to him about eleven o’clock. They asked
him if he knew me and he said yes. Then he gave it to Frankie for me. They gave him a dollar to see
that I got it. They were well dressed, he said.
“Politics,” Frankie said.
“Oh, yes,” I said.
“They think you told the police you were meeting those boys here that morning.”
“Oh, yes.”
“Bad politics,” Frankie said. “Good thing you go.”
“Did they leave any message?” I asked the Spanish boy.
“No,” he said. “Just to give you that.”
“I’m going to have to leave now,” I said to Frankie.
“Bad politics,” Frankie said. “Very bad politics.”
I had all the papers in a bunch that the broker had given me and I paid the bill and walked out of
that café and across the square and through the gate and I was plenty glad to come through the
warehouse and get out on the dock. Those kids had me spooked all right. They were just dumb enough
to think I’d tipped somebody off about that other bunch. Those kids were like Pancho. When they
were scared they got excited, and when they got excited they wanted to kill somebody.
I got on board and warmed up the engine. Frankie stood on the dock watching. He was smiling
that funny deaf smile. I went back to him.
“Listen,” I said. “Don’t you get in any trouble about this.”
He couldn’t hear me. I had to yell it at him.
“Me good politics,” Frankie said. He cast her off.
I waved to Frankie, who’d thrown the bowline on board, and I headed her out of the slip and
dropped down the channel with her. A British freighter was going out and I ran along beside her and
passed her. I went out the harbor and past the Morro and put her on the course for Key West; due
north. I left the wheel and went forward and coiled up the bowline and then came back and held her
on her course, spreading Havana out astern and then dropping it off behind us as we brought the
mountains up.
I dropped the Morro out of sight after a while and then the National Hotel and finally I could just
see the dome of the Capitol. There wasn’t much current compared to the last day we had fished and
there was only a light breeze. I saw a couple of smacks headed in toward Havana and they were
coming from the westward so I knew the current was light.
I cut the switch and killed the motor. There wasn’t any sense in wasting gas. I’d let her drift.
When it got dark I could always pick up the light of the Morro or, if she drifted up too far, the lights of
Cojimar, and steer in and run along to Bacuranao. I figured the way the current looked she would drift
the twelve miles up to Bacuranao by dark and I’d see the lights of Baracóa.
Well, I killed the engine and climbed up forward to have a look around. All there was to see
was the two smacks off to the westward headed in, and way back the dome of the Capitol standing up
white out of the edge of the sea. There was some gulfweed on the stream and a few birds working, but
not many. I sat up there awhile on top of the house and watched, but the only fish I saw were those
little brown ones that rise around the gulfweed. Brother, don’t let anybody tell you there isn’t plenty
of water between Havana and Key West. I was just on the edge of it.
After a while I went down into the cockpit again and there was Eddy!
“What’s the matter? What’s the matter with the engine?”
“She broke down.”
“Why haven’t you got the hatch up?”
“Oh, hell!” I said.
Do you know what he’d done? He’d come back again and slipped the forward hatch and gone
down into the cabin and gone to sleep. He had two quarts with him. He’d gone into the first bodega
he’d seen and bought it and come aboard. When I started out he woke up and went back to sleep
again. When I stopped her out in the gulf and she began to roll a little with the swell it woke him up.
“I knew you’d carry me, Harry,” he said.
“Carry you to hell,” I said. “You aren’t even on the crew list. I’ve got a good mind to make you
jump overboard now.”
“You’re an old joker, Harry,” he said. “Us conchs ought to stick together when we’re in
trouble.”
“You,” I said, “with your mouth. Who’s going to trust your mouth when you’re hot?”
“I’m a good man, Harry. You put me to the test and see what a good man I am.”
“Get me the two quarts,” I told him. I was thinking of something else.
He brought them out and I took a drink from the open one and put them forward by the wheel. He
stood there and I looked at him. I was sorry for him and for what I knew I’d have to do. Hell, I knew
him when he was a good man.
“What’s the matter with her, Harry?”
“She’s all right.”
“What’s the matter, then? What are you looking at me like that for?”
“Brother,” I told him, and I was sorry for him, “you’re in plenty of trouble.”
“What do you mean, Harry?”
“I don’t know yet,” I said. “I haven’t got it all figured out yet.”
We sat there awhile and I didn’t feel like talking to him any more. Once I knew it, it was hard to
talk to him. Then I went below and got out the pump-gun and the Winchester thirty-thirty that I always
had below in the cabin and hung them up in their cases from the top of the house where we hung the
rods usually, right over the wheel where I could reach them. I keep them in those full-length clipped
sheep’s-wool cases soaked in oil. That’s the only way you can keep them from rusting on a boat.
I loosened up the pump and worked her a few times, and then filled her up and pumped one into
the barrel. I put a shell in the chamber of the Winchester and filled up the magazine. I got out the Smith
and Wesson thirty-eight special I had when I was on the police force up in Miami from under the
mattress and cleaned and oiled it and filled it up and put it on my belt.
“What’s the matter?” Eddy said. “What the hell’s the matter?”
“Nothing,” I told him.
“What’s all the damn guns for?”
“I always carry them on board,” I said. “To shoot birds that bother the baits or to shoot sharks
cruising along the keys.”
“What’s the matter, damn it?” said Eddy. “What’s the matter?”
“Nothing,” I told him. I sat there with the old thirty-eight flopping against my leg when she
rolled, and I looked at him. I thought, there’s no sense to do it now. I’m going to need him now.
“We’re going to do a little job,” I said. “In at Bacuranao. I’ll tell you what to do when it’s time.”
I didn’t want to tell him too far ahead because he would get to worrying and get so spooked he
wouldn’t be any use.
“You couldn’t have anybody better than me. Harry,” he said. “I’m the man for you. I’m with you
on anything.”
I looked at him, tall and bleary and shaky, and I didn’t say anything.
“Listen, Harry. Would you give me just one?” he asked me. “I don’t want to get the shakes.”
I gave him one and we sat and waited for it to get dark. It was a fine sunset and there was a nice
light breeze, and when the sun got pretty well down I started the engine and headed her in slow
toward land.
We lay offshore about a mile in the dark. The current had freshened up with the sun down and I
noticed it running in. I could see the Morro light way down to the westward and the glow of Havana,
and the lights opposite us were Rincón and Baracóa. I headed her up against the current until I was
past Bacuranao and nearly to Cojimar. Then I let her drift down. It was plenty dark but I could tell
good where we were. I had all the lights out.
“What’s it going to be, Harry?” Eddy asked me. He was beginning to be spooked again.
“What do you think?”
“I don’t know,” he said. “You’ve got me worried.” He was pretty close to the shakes and when
he came near me he had a breath like a buzzard.
“What time is it?”
“I’ll go down and see,” he said. He came back up and said it was half past nine.
“Are you hungry?” I asked him.
“No,” he said. “You know I couldn’t eat, Harry.”
“All right,” I told him. “You can have one.”
After he had it I asked him how he felt. He said he felt fine.
“I’m going to give you a couple more in a little while,” I told him. “I know you haven’t got any
guts unless you’ve got rum and there isn’t much on board. So you’d better go easy.”
“Tell me what’s up,” said Eddy.
“Listen,” I said, talking to him in the dark. “We’re going in to Bacuranao and pick up twelve
Chinks. You take the wheel when I tell you to and do what I tell you to. We’ll take the twelve Chinks
on board and we’ll lock them below forward. Go on forward now and fasten the hatch from the
outside.”
He went up and I saw him shadowed against the dark. He came back and he said, “Harry, can I
have one of those now?”
“No,” I said. “I want you rum-brave. I don’t want you useless.”
“I’m a good man, Harry. You’ll see.”
“You’re a rummy,” I said. “Listen. One Chink is going to bring those twelve out. He’s going to
give me some money at the start. When they’re all on board he’s going to give me some more money.
When you see him start to hand me money the second time you put her ahead and hook her up and head
her out to sea. Don’t you pay any attention to what happens. You keep her going out no matter what
happens. Do you understand?”
“Yes.”
“If any Chink starts bursting out of the cabin or coming through the hatch, once we’re out and
under way, you take that pump-gun and blow them back as fast as they come out. Do you know how to
use the pump-gun?”
“No. But you can show me.”
“You’d never remember. Do you know how to use the Winchester?”
“Just pump the lever and shoot it.”
“That’s right,” I said. “Only don’t shoot any holes in the hull.”
“You’d better give me that other drink,” Eddy said.
“All right. I’ll give you a little one.”
I gave him a real one. I knew they wouldn’t make him drunk now; not pouring into all that fear.
But each one would work for a little while. After he drank this Eddy said, just as though he was
happy, “So we’re going to run Chinks. Well, by God, I always said I’d run Chinamen if I was ever
broke.”
“But you never got broke before, eh?” I said to him. He was funny all right.
I gave him three more drinks to keep him brave before it was half past ten. It was funny watching
him and it kept me from thinking about it myself. I hadn’t figured on all this wait. I’d planned to leave
after dark, run out, just out of the glare, and coast along to Cojimar.
At a little before eleven I saw the two lights show on the point. I waited a little while and then I
took her in slow. Bacuranao is a cove where there used to be a big dock for loading sand. There is a
little river that comes in when the rains open the bar across the mouth. The northers, in the winter,
pile the sand up and close it.
They used to go in with schooners and load guavas from the river and there used to be a town.
But the hurricane took it and it is all gone now except one house that some gallegos built out of the
shacks the hurricane blew down and that they use for a clubhouse on Sundays when they come out to
swim and picnic from Havana. There is one other house where the delegate lives but it is back from
the beach.
Each little place like that all down the coast has a government delegate, but I figured the Chink
must use his own boat and have him fixed. As we came in I could smell the sea grape and that sweet
smell from the brush you get off the land.
“Get up forward,” I said to Eddy.
“You can’t hit anything on that side,” he said. “The reef’s on the other side as you go in.” You
see, he’d been a good man once.
“Watch her,” I said, and I took her in to where I knew they could see us. With no surf they could
hear the engine. I didn’t want to wait around, not knowing whether they saw us or not, so I flashed the
running lights on once, just the green and red, and turned them off. Then I turned her and headed her
out and let her lay there, just outside, with the engine just ticking. There was quite a little swell that
close in.
“Come on back here,” I said to Eddy and I gave him a real drink.
“Do you cock it first with your thumb?” he whispered to me. He was sitting at the wheel now,
and I had reached up and had both the cases open and the butts pulled out about six inches.
“That’s right.”
“Oh boy,” he said.
It certainly was wonderful what a drink would do to him and how quick.
We lay there and I could see a light from the delegate’s house back through the bush. I saw the
two lights on the point go down, and one of them moving off around the point. They must have blown
the other one out.
Then, in a little while, coming out of the cove, I see a boat come toward us with a man sculling. I
could tell by the way he swung back and forth. I knew he had a big oar. I was pretty pleased. If they
were sculling that meant one man.
They came alongside.
“Good evening. Captain,” said Mr. Sing.
“Come astern and put her broadside,” I said to him.
He said something to the man who was sculling but he couldn’t scull her backwards, so I took
hold of the gunwale and passed her astern. There were eight men in the boat. The six Chinks, Mr.
Sing, and the kid sculling. While I was pulling her astern I was waiting for something to hit me on top
of the head but nothing did. I straightened up and let Mr. Sing hold onto the stern.
“Let’s see what it looks like,” I said.
He handed it to me and I took it up to where Eddy was at the wheel and put on the binnacle light.
I looked at it carefully. It looked all right to me and I turned off the light. Eddy was trembling.
“Pour one yourself,” I said. I saw him reach for the bottle and tip it up.
I went back to the stern.
“All right,” I said. “Let six come on board.”
Mr. Sing and the Cuban that sculled were having a job holding their boat from knocking in what
little swell there was. I heard Mr. Sing say something in Chink and all the Chinks in the boat started to
climb onto the stern.
“One at a time,” I said.
He said something again, and then one after another six Chinks came over the stern. They were
all lengths and sizes.
“Show them forward,” I said to Eddy.
“Right this way, gentlemen,” said Eddy. By God, I knew he had taken a big one.
“Lock the cabin,” I said, when they were all in.
“Yes, sir,” said Eddy.
“I will return with the others,” said Mr. Sing.
“O.K.,” I told him.
I pushed them clear and the boy with him started sculling off.
“Listen,” I said to Eddy. “You lay off that bottle. You’re brave enough now.”
“O.K., chief,” said Eddy.
“What’s the matter with you?”
“This is what I like to do,” said Eddy. “You say you just pull it backward with your thumb?”
“You lousy rummy,” I told him. “Give me a drink out of that.”
“All gone,” said Eddy. “Sorry, chief.”
“Listen. What you have to do now is watch her when he hands me the money and put her ahead.”
“O.K., chief,” said Eddy.
I reached up and took the other bottle and got the corkscrew and drew the cork. I took a good
drink and went back to the stem, putting the cork in tight and laying the bottle behind two wicker jugs
full of water.
“Here comes Mr. Sing,” I said to Eddy.
“Yes, sir,” said Eddy.
The boat came out sculling toward us.
He brought her astern and I let them do the holding in. Mr. Sing had hold of the roller we had
across the stern to slide a big fish on board.
“Let them come aboard,” I said, “one at a time.”
Six more assorted Chinks came on board over the stern.
“Open up and show them forward,” I told Eddy.
“Yes, sir,” said Eddy.
“Lock the cabin.”
“Yes, sir.”
I saw he was at the wheel.
“All right, Mr. Sing,” I said. “Let’s see the rest of it.”
He put his hand in his pocket and reached the money out toward me. I reached for it and grabbed
his wrist with the money in his hand, and as he came forward on the stern I grabbed his throat with the
other hand. I felt her start and then churn ahead as she hooked up and I was plenty busy with Mr. Sing
but I could see the Cuban standing in the stem of the boat holding the sculling oar through all the
flopping and bouncing Mr. Sing was doing. He was flopping and bouncing worse than any dolphin on
a gaff.
I got his arm around behind him and came up on it but I brought it too far because I felt it go.
When it went he made a funny little noise and came forward, me holding him throat and all, and bit me
on the shoulder. But when I felt the arm go I dropped it. It wasn’t any good to him any more and I took
him by the throat with both hands, and brother, that Mr. Sing would flop just like a fish, true, his loose
arm flailing, but I got him forward onto his knees and had both thumbs well in behind his talk box and
I bent the whole thing back until she cracked. Don’t think you can’t hear it crack, either.
I held him quiet just a second, and then I laid him down across the stem. He lay there, face up,
quiet, in his good clothes, with his feet in the cockpit, and I left him.
I picked up the money off the cockpit floor and took it up and put it on the binnacle and counted
it. Then I took the wheel and told Eddy to look under the stem for some pieces of iron that I used for
anchoring whenever we fished bottom fishing on patches or rocky bottom where you wouldn’t want to
risk an anchor.
“I can’t find anything,” he said. He was scared being down there by Mr. Sing.
“Take the wheel,” I said. “Keep her out.”
There was a certain amount of moving around going on below but I wasn’t spooked about them.
I found a couple of pieces of what I wanted—iron from the old coaling dock at Tortugas—and I
took some snapper line and made a couple of good big pieces fast to Mr. Sing’s ankles. Then when
we were about two miles offshore I slid him over. He slid over smooth off the roller. I never even
looked in his pockets. I didn’t feel like fooling with him.
He’d bled a little on the stern from his nose and his mouth, and I dipped a bucket of water that
nearly pulled me overboard the way we were going, and cleaned her off good with a scrub brush from
under the stern.
“Slow her down,” I said to Eddy.
“What if he floats up?” Eddy said.
“I dropped him in about seven hundred fathoms,” I said. “He’s going down all that way. That’s a
long way, brother. He won’t float till the gas brings him up and all the time he’s going with the current
and baiting up fish. Hell,” I said, “you don’t have to worry about Mr. Sing.”
“What did you have against him?” Eddy asked me.
“Nothing,” I said. “He was the easiest man to do business with I ever met. I thought there must be
something wrong all the time.”
“What did you kill him for?”
“To keep from killing twelve other Chinks,” I told him.
“Harry,” he said, “you’ve got to give me one because I can feel them coming on. It made me sick
to see his head all loose like that.”
So I gave him one.
“What about the Chinks?” Eddy said.
“I want to get them out as quick as I can,” I told him. “Before they smell up the cabin.”
“Where are you going to put them?”
“We’ll run them right in to the long beach,” I told him.
“Take her in now?”
“Sure,” I said. “Take her in slow.”
We came in slow over the reef and to where I could see the beach shine. There is plenty of water
over the reef and inside it’s all sandy bottom and slopes right in to shore.
“Get up forward and give me the depth.”
He kept sounding with a grains pole, motioning me on with the pole. He came back and motioned
me to stop. I came astern on her.
“You’ve got about five feet.”
“We’ve got to anchor,” I said. “If anything happens so we haven’t time to get her up, we can cut
loose or break her off.”
Eddy paid out rope and when finally she didn’t drag he made her fast. She swung stern in.
“It’s sandy bottom, you know,” he said.
“How much water have we got at the stern?”
“Not over five feet.”
“You take the rifle,” I said. “And be careful,”
“Let me have one,” he said. He was plenty nervous.
I gave him one and took down the pump-gun. I unlocked the cabin door, opened it, and said:
“Come on out.”
Nothing happened.
Then one Chink put his head out and saw Eddy standing there with a rifle and ducked back.
“Come on out. Nobody’s going to hurt you,” I said.
Nothing doing. Only lots of talk in Chink.
“Come on out, you!” Eddy said. My God, I knew he’d had the bottle.
“Put that bottle away,” I said to him, “or I’ll blow you out of the boat.”
“Come on out,” I said to them, “or I’ll shoot in at you.”
I saw one of them looking at the corner of the door and he saw the beach evidently because he
begins to chatter.
“Come on,” I said, “or I’ll shoot.”
Out they came.
Now I tell you it would take a hell of a mean man to butcher a bunch of Chinks like that and I’ll
bet there would be plenty of trouble, too, let alone mess.
They came out and they were scared and they didn’t have any guns but there were twelve of
them. I walked backwards down to the stem holding the pump gun. “Get overboard,” I said. “It’s not
over your heads.”
Nobody moved.
“Over you go.”
Nobody moved.
“You yellow rat-eating aliens,” Eddy said, “get overboard.”
“Shut your drunken mouth,” I told him.
“No swim,” one Chink said.
“No need swim,” I said. “No deep.”
“Come on, get overboard,” Eddy said.
“Come astern here,” I said. “Take your gun in one hand and your grains pole in the other and
show them how deep it is.”
He showed them.
“No need swim?” the one asked me.
“No.”
“True?”
“Yes.”
“Where we?”
“Cuba.”
“You damn crook,” he said and went over the side, hanging on and then letting go. His head went
under but he came up and his chin was out of water. “Damn crook,” he said. “Damn crook.”
He was mad and he was plenty brave. He said something in Chink and the others started going
into the water off the stern.
“All right,” I said to Eddy. “Get the anchor up.”
As we headed her out, the moon started to come up and you could see the Chinks with just their
heads out of water walking ashore, and the shine of the beach and the brush behind.
We got out past the reef and I looked back once and saw the beach and the mountains starting to
show up; then I put her on her course for Key West.
“Now you can take a sleep,” I said to Eddy. “No, wait, go below and open up all the ports to get
the stink out and bring me the iodine.”
“What’s the matter?” he said when he brought it.
“I cut my finger.”
“Do you want me to steer?”
“Get a sleep,” I said. “I’ll wake you up.”
He lay down on the built-in bunk in the cockpit, over the gas tank, and in a little while he was
asleep.
I held the wheel with my knee and opened up my shirt and saw where Mr. Sing bit me. It was
quite a bite and I put iodine on it, and then I sat there steering and wondering whether a bite from a
Chinaman was poisonous and listened to her running nice and smooth and the water washing along her
and I figured, Hell no, that bite wasn’t poisonous. A man like that Mr. Sing probably scrubbed his
teeth two or three times a day. Some Mr. Sing. He certainly wasn’t much of a business man. Maybe he
was. Maybe he just trusted me. I tell you I couldn’t figure him.
Well, now it was all simple except for Eddy. Because he’s a rummy he’ll talk when he gets hot. I
sat there steering and I looked at him and I thought, Hell, he’s as well off dead as the way he is, and
then I’m all clear. When I found he was on board I decided I’d have to do away with him but then
when everything had come out so nice I didn’t have the heart. But looking at him lying there it
certainly was a temptation. But then I thought there’s no sense spoiling it by doing something you’d be
sorry for afterwards. Then I started to think he wasn’t even on the crew list and I’d have a fine to pay
for bringing him in and I didn’t know how to consider him.
Well, I had plenty of time to think about it and I held her on her course and every once in a while
I’d take a drink out of the bottle he’d brought on board. There wasn’t much in it, and when I’d finished
it, I opened up the only one I had left, and I tell you I felt pretty good steering, and it was a pretty night
to cross. It had turned out a good trip all right, finally, even though it had looked plenty bad plenty of
times.
When it got daylight Eddy woke up. He said he felt terrible.
“Take the wheel a minute,” I told him. “I want to look around.”
I went back to the stem and threw a little water on her. But she was perfectly clean. I scrubbed
the brush over the side. I unloaded the guns and stowed them below. But I still kept the gun on my
belt. It was fresh and nice as you want it below, no smell at all. A little water had come in through the
starboard port onto one of the bunks was all; so I shut the ports. There wasn’t a customhouse officer
in the world could smell Chink in her now.
I saw the clearance papers in the net bag hanging up under her framed license where I’d shoved
them when I came on board and I took them out to look them over. Then I went up to the cockpit.
“Listen,” I said. “How did you get on the crew list?”
“I met the broker when he was leaving for the consulate and told him I was going.”
“God looks after rummies,” I told him and I took the thirty-eight off and stowed it down below.
I made some coffee down below and then I came up and took the wheel.
“There’s coffee below,” I told him.
“Brother, coffee wouldn’t do me any good.” You knew you had to be sorry for him. He certainly
looked bad.
About nine o’clock we saw the Sand Key light just about dead ahead. We’d seen tankers going
up the gulf for quite a while.
“We’ll be in now,” I said to him. “I’m going to give you the same four dollars a day just as if
Johnson had paid.”
“How much did you get out of last night?” he asked me.
“Only six hundred,” I told him.
I don’t know whether he believed me or not.
“Don’t I share in it?”
“That’s your share,” I told him. “What I just told you, and if you ever open your mouth about last
night I’ll hear of it and I’ll do away with you.”
“You know I’m no squealer, Harry.”
“You’re a rummy. But no matter how rum dumb you get, if you ever talk about that, I promise
you.”
“I’m a good man,” he said. “You oughtn’t to talk to me like that.”
“They can’t make it fast enough to keep you a good man,” I told him. But I didn’t worry about
him any more, because who was going to believe him? Mr. Sing wouldn’t make any complaints. The
Chinks weren’t going to. You know the boy that sculled them out wasn’t. Eddy would mouth about it
sooner or later, maybe, but who believes a rummy?
Why, who could prove anything? Naturally it would have made plenty more talk when they saw
his name on the crew list. That was luck for me, all right. I could have said he fell overboard, but it
makes plenty talk. Plenty of luck for Eddy, too. Plenty of luck, all right.
Then we came to the edge of the stream and the water quit being blue and was light and greenish
and inside I could see the stakes on the Long Reef and on the Western Dry Rocks and the wireless
masts at Key West and the La Concha hotel up high out of all the low houses and plenty smoke from
out where they’re burning garbage. Sand Key light was plenty close now and you could see the
boathouse and the little dock alongside the light and I knew we were only forty minutes away now and
I felt good to be getting back and I had a good stake now for the summertime.
“What do you say about a drink, Eddy?” I said to him.
“Ah, Harry,” he said, “I always knew you were my pal.”
The Tradesman’s Return
THEY CAME ON ACROSS IN THE NIGHT AND it blew a big breeze
from the northwest. When the sun was up he sighted a tanker coming down the gulf and she stood up
so high and white with the sun on her in that cold air that it looked like tall buildings rising out of the
sea and he said to the nigger, “Where the hell are we?”
The nigger raised himself up to look.
“Ain’t nothing like that this side of Miami.”
“You know damn well we ain’t been carried up to no Miami,” he told the nigger.
“All I say ain’t no buildings like that on no Florida keys.”
“We’ve been steering for Sand Key.”
“We’ve got to see it then. It or American shoals.”
Then in a little while he saw it was a tanker and not buildings and then in less than an hour he
saw Sand Key light, straight, thin and brown, rising out of the sea right where it ought to be.
“You got to have confidence steering,” he told the nigger.
“I got confidence,” the nigger said. “But the way this trip gone I ain’t got confidence no more.”
“How’s your leg?”
“It hurts me all the time.”
“It ain’t nothing,” the man said. “You keep it clean and wrapped up and it’ll heal by itself.”
He was steering to the westward now to go in to lay up for the day in the mangroves by Woman
Key where he would not see anybody and where the boat was to come out to meet them.
“You’re going to be all right,” he told the Negro.
“I don’t know,” the nigger said. “I hurt bad.”
“I’m going to fix you up good when we get in to the place,” he told him. “You aren’t shot bad.
Quit worrying.”
“I’m shot,” he said. “I ain’t never been shot before. Anyway I’m shot is bad.”
“You’re just scared.”
“No sir. I’m shot. And I’m hurting bad. I’ve been throbbing all night.”
The nigger went on grumbling like that and he could not keep from taking the bandage off to look
at it.
“Leave it alone,” the man who was steering told him. The nigger lay on the floor of the cockpit
and there were sacks of liquor, shaped like hams, piled everywhere. He had made himself a place in
them to lie down in. Every time he moved there was the noise of broken glass in the sacks and there
was the odor of spilled liquor. The liquor had run all over everything. The man was steering in for
Woman Key now. He could see it now plainly.
“I hurt,” the nigger said. “I hurt worse all the time.”
“I’m sorry, Wesley,” the man said. “But I got to steer.”
“You treat a man no better than a dog,” the nigger said. He was getting ugly now, but the man
was still sorry for him.
“I’m going to make you comfortable, Wesley,” he said. “You lay quiet now.”
“You don’t care what happens to a man,” the nigger said. “You ain’t hardly human.”
“I’m going to fix you up good,” the man said. “You just lay quiet.”
“You ain’t going to fix me up,” the nigger said. The man, whose name was Harry, said nothing
then because he liked the nigger and there was nothing to do now but hit him, and he couldn’t hit him.
The nigger kept on talking.
“Why we didn’t stop when they started shooting?”
The man did not answer.
“Ain’t a man’s life worth more than a load of liquor?”
The man was intent on his steering.
“All we have to do is stop and let them take the liquor.”
“No,” the man said. “They take the liquor and the boat and you go to jail.”
“I don’t mind jail,” the nigger said. “But I never wanted to get shot.”
He was getting on the man’s nerves now and the man was becoming tired of hearing him talk.
“Who the hell’s shot worse?” he asked him. “You or me?”
“You’re shot worse,” the nigger said. “But I ain’t never been shot. I didn’t figure to get shot. I
ain’t paid to get shot. I don’t want to be shot.”
“Take it easy, Wesley,” the man told him. “It don’t do you any good to talk like that.”
They were coming up on the key now. They were inside the shoals and as he headed her into the
channel it was hard to see with the sun on the water. The nigger was going out of his head, or
becoming religious because he was hurt; anyway he was talking all the time.
“Why they ran liquor now?” he said. “Prohibition’s over. Why they keep up a traffic like that?
Whyn’t they bring the liquor in on the ferry?”
The man steering was watching the channel closely.
“Why don’t people be honest and decent and make a decent honest living?”
The man saw where the water was rippling smooth off the bank even when he could not see the
bank in the sun and he named her off. He swung her around, spinning the wheel with one arm, and then
the channel opened out and he took her slowly right up to the edge of the mangroves. He came astern
on the engines and threw out the two clutches.
“I can put a anchor down,” he said. “But I can’t get no anchor up.”
“I can’t even move,” the nigger said.
“You’re certainly in a hell of a shape,” the man told him.
He had a difficult time breaking out, lifting and dropping the small anchor but he got it over, and
paid out quite a lot of rope and the boat swung in against the mangroves so they came right into the
cockpit. Then he went back and down into the cockpit. He thought the cockpit was a hell of a sight, all
right.
All night after he had dressed the nigger’s wound and the nigger had bandaged his arm he had
been watching the compass, steering, and when it came daylight he had seen the nigger lying there in
the sacks in the middle of the cockpit, but then he was watching the seas and the compass and looking
for the Sand Key light and he had never observed carefully how things were. Things were bad.
The nigger was lying in the middle of the load of sacked liquor with his leg up. There were eight
bullet holes through the cockpit splintered wide. The glass was broken in the windshield. He did not
know how much stuff was smashed and wherever the nigger had not bled he himself had bled. But the
worst thing, the way he felt at the moment, was the smell of booze. Everything was soaked in it. Now
the boat was lying quietly against the mangroves but he could not stop feeling the motion of the big sea
they had been in all night in the gulf.
“I’m going to make some coffee,” he told the nigger. “Then I’ll fix you up again.”
“I don’t want no coffee.”
“I do,” the man told him. But down below he began to feel dizzy so he came out on deck again.
“I guess we won’t have coffee,” he said.
“I want some water.”
“All right.”
He gave the Negro a cup of water out of a demijohn.
“Why you want to keep on running for when they started to shoot?”
“Why they want to shoot?” the man answered.
“I want a doctor,” the nigger told him.
“What’s a doctor going to do that I ain’t done for you?”
“Doctor going to cure me.”
“You’ll have a doctor tonight when the boat comes out.”
“I don’t want to wait for no boat.”
“All right,” the man said. “We’re going to dump this liquor now.”
He started to dump it and it was hard work one-handed. A sack of liquor only weighs about forty
pounds but he had not dumped very many of them before he became dizzy again. He sat down in the
cockpit and then he lay down.
“You going to kill yourself,” the nigger said.
The man lay quietly in the cockpit with his head against one of the sacks.
The branches of the mangroves had come into the cockpit and they made a shadow over him
where he lay. He could hear the wind above the mangroves and looking out at the high, cold sky see
the thin brown clouds of the norther.
“Nobody going to come out with this breeze,” he thought. “They won’t look for us to have started
with this blowing.”
“You think they’ll come out?” the nigger asked.
“Sure,” the man said. “Why not?”
“It’s blowing too hard.”
“They’re looking for us.”
“Not with it like this. What you want to lie to me for?” The nigger was talking with his mouth
almost against a sack.
“Take it easy, Wesley,” the man told him.
“Take it easy, the man says,” the nigger went on. “Take it easy. Take what easy? Take dyin’ like
a dog easy? You got me here. Get me out.”
“Take it easy,” the man said, kindly.
“They ain’t coming,” the nigger said. “I know they ain’t coming. I’m cold I tell you. I can’t stand
this pain and cold I tell you.”
The man sat up feeling hollow and unsteady. The nigger’s eyes watched him as he rose on one
knee, his right arm dangling, took the hand of his right arm in his left hand and placed it between his
knees and then pulled himself up by the plank nailed above the gunwale until he stood, looking down
at the nigger, his right hand still held between his thighs. He was thinking that he had never really felt
pain before.
“If I keep it out straight, pulled out straight, it don’t hurt so bad,” he said.
“Let me tie it up in a sling,” the nigger said.
“I can’t make a bend in the elbow,” the man said. “It stiffened that way.”
“What we goin’ to do?”
“Dump this liquor,” the man told him. “Can’t you put over what you can reach, Wesley?”
The nigger tried to move to reach a sack, then groaned and lay back.
“Do you hurt that bad, Wesley?”
“Oh God,” the nigger said.
“You don’t think once you moved it it wouldn’t hurt so bad?”
“I’m shot,” the nigger said. “I ain’t going to move. The man wants me to go to dumpin’ liquor
when I’m shot.”
“Take it easy.”
“You say that once more I go crazy.”
“Take it easy,” the man said quietly.
The nigger made a howling noise and shuffling with his hands on the deck picked up the
whetstone from under the coaming.
“I’ll kill you,” he said. “I’ll cut your heart out.”
“Not with no whetstone,” the man said. “Take it easy, Wesley.”
The nigger blubbered with his face against a sack. The man went on slowly lifting the sacked
packages of liquor and dropping them over the side.
While he was dumping the liquor he heard the sound of a motor and looking he saw a boat
headed toward them coming down the channel around the end of the key. It was a white boat with a
buff painted house and a windshield.
“Boat coming,” he said. “Come on Wesley.”
“I can’t.”
“I’m remembering from now on,” the man said. “Before was different.”
“Go ahead an’ remember,” The nigger told him. “I ain’t forgot nothing either.”
Working fast now, the sweat running down his face, not stopping to watch the boat coming
slowly down the channel, the man picked up the sacked packages of liquor with his good arm and
dropped them over the side.
“Roll over.” He reached for the package under the nigger’s head and swung it over the side. The
nigger raised himself up and looked.
“Here they are,” he said. The boat was almost abeam of them.
“It’s Captain Willie,” the nigger said. “With a party.”
In the stern of the white boat two men in flannels and white cloth hats sat in fishing chairs
trolling and an old man in a felt hat and a windbreaker held the tiller and steered the boat close past
the mangroves where the booze boat lay.
“What you say, Harry?” the old man called as he passed. The man called Harry waved his good
arm in reply. The boat went on past, the two men who were fishing looking toward the booze boat and
talking to the old man. Harry could not hear what they were saying.
“He’ll make a turn at the mouth and come back,” Harry said to the Negro. He went below and
came up with a blanket. “Let me cover you up.”
“ ’Bout time you cover me up. They couldn’t help but see that liquor. What we goin’ to do?”
“Willie’s a good skate,” the man said. “He’ll tell them in town we’re out here. Those fellows
fishing ain’t going to bother us. What they care about us?”
He felt very shaky now and he sat down on the steering seat and held his right arm tight between
his thighs. His knees were shaking and with the shaking he could feel the ends of the bone in his upper
arm grate. He opened his knees, lifted his arm out, and let it hang by his side. He was sitting there, his
arm hanging, when the boat passed them coming back up the channel. The two men in the fishing
chairs were talking. They had put up their rods and one of them was looking at them through a pair of
glasses. They were too far out for him to hear what they were saying. It would not have helped him if
he had heard it.
On board the charter boat South Florida, trolling down the Woman Key channel because it was
too rough to go out to the reef, Captain Willie Adams was thinking. So Harry crossed last night. That
boy’s got cojones. He must have got that whole blow. She’s a sea boat all right. How you suppose he
smashed his windshield? Damned if I’d cross a night like last night. Damned if I’d ever run liquor
from Cuba. They bring it all from Mariel now! Just go in and out. It’s supposed to be wide open.
“What’s that you say, Cap?”
“What boat is that?” asked one of the men in the fishing chairs.
“That boat?”
“Yes, that boat.”
“Oh that’s a Key West boat.”
“What I said was, whose boat is it?”
“I wouldn’t know that, Cap.”
“Is the owner a fisherman?”
“Well, some say he is.”
“What do you mean?”
“He does a little of everything.”
“You don’t know his name?”
“No sir.”
“You called him Harry.”
“Not me.”
“I heard you call him Harry.”
Captain Willie Adams took a good look at the man who was speaking to him. He saw a highcheekboned, thin-lipped, slightly pudgy face with deep set grey eyes and a contemptuous mouth
looking at him from under a canvas hat. There was no way that Captain Willie Adams could know that
this man was regarded as irresistibly handsome by a great many women in Washington.
“I must have called him that by mistake,” Captain Willie said.
“You can see that the man is wounded, Doctor,” the other man said, handing the glasses to his
companion.
“I can see that without glasses,” the man addressed as Doctor said. “Who is that man?”
“I wouldn’t know,” said Captain Willie.
“Well, you will know,” the man with the contemptuous mouth said. “Write down the numbers on
the bow.”
“I have them. Doctor.”
“We’ll go over and have a look,” the Doctor said.
“Are you a doctor?” Captain Willie asked.
“Not of medicine,” the grey-eyed man told him.
“If you’re not a medical doctor I wouldn’t go over there.”
“Why not?”
“If he wanted us he would have signaled us. If fie don’t want us it’s none of our business. Down
here everybody aims to mind their own business.”
“All right. Suppose you mind yours then. Take us over to that boat.”
Captain Willie continued on his way up the channel, the two-cylinder Palmer coughing steadily.
“Didn’t you hear me?”
“Yes sir.”
“Why don’t you obey my order?”
“Who the hell you think you are?” asked Captain Willie.
“That’s not the question. Do as I tell you.”
“Who do you think you are?” Captain Willie asked again.
“All right. For your information I’m one of the three most important men in the United States
today.”
“What the hell you doing in Key West then?”
The other man leaned forward. “He’s —”—, he said impressively.
“I never heard of him,” said Captain Willie.
“Well, you will,” said the man called Doctor. “And so will everyone in this stinking jerkwater
little town if I have to grub it out by the roots.”
“You’re a nice fellow,” said Captain Willie. “How did you get so important?”
“He’s the most intimate friend and closest adviser of ———, said the other man.
“Nuts,” said Captain Willie. “If he’s all that what’s he doing in Key West?”
“He’s just here for a rest,” the secretary explained. “He’s going to be———.
“That’s enough, Harris,” the man called Doctor said. “Now will you take us over to that boat,”
he said smiling. He had a smile which was reserved for such occasions.
“No sir.”
“Listen you half-witted fisherman. I’ll make life so miserable for you—”
“Yes,” said Captain Willie.
“You don’t know who I am.”
“None of it don’t mean anything to me,” said Captain Willie. “And you don’t know where you
are.”
“That man is a bootlegger, isn’t he?”
“What do you think?”
“There’s probably a reward for him.”
“I doubt that.”
“He’s a lawbreaker.”
“He’s got a family and he’s got to eat and feed them. Who the hell do you eat off of with people
working here in Key West for the Government for six dollars and a half a week?”
“He’s wounded. That means he’s been in trouble.”
“Unless he shot hisself for fun.”
“You can save that sarcasm. You’re going over to that boat and we’re going to take that man and
that boat into custody.”
“Into where?”
“Into Key West.”
“Are you an officer?”
“I’ve told you who he is,” the secretary said.
“All right,” said Captain Willie. He pushed the tiller hard over and turned the boat, coming so
close to the edge of the channel that the propeller threw up a circling cloud of marl.
He chugged down the channel toward where the other boat lay against the mangroves.
“Have you a gun aboard?” the man called the Doctor asked Captain Willie.
“No sir.”
The two men in flannels were standing up now watching the booze boat.
“This is better fun than fishing, eh Doctor?” the secretary said.
“Fishing is nonsense,” said the Doctor. “If you catch a sailfish what do you do with it? You can’t
eat it. This is really interesting. I’m glad to see this at first hand. Wounded as he is that man cannot
escape. It’s too rough at sea. We know his boat.”
“You’re really capturing him single-handed,” said the secretary admiringly.
“And unarmed too,” said the Doctor.
“With no G-men nonsense,” said the secretary.
“Edgar Hoover exaggerates his publicity,” said the Doctor. “I feel we’ve given him about
enough rope.” Then, “Pull alongside,” he said to Captain Willie.
Captain Willie threw out his clutch and the boat drifted.
“Hey,” Captain Willie called to the other boat. “Keep your heads down.”
“What’s that?” the Doctor said angrily.
“Shut up,” said Captain Willie. “Hey,” he called over to the other boat. “Listen. Get on into town
and take it easy. Never mind the boat. They’ll take the boat. Dump your load and get into town. I got a
guy here on board, some kind of a stool from Washington. Not a G-man. Just a stool. One of the heads
of the alphabet. More important than the President, he says. He wants to pinch you. He thinks you’re a
bootlegger. He’s got the numbers of the boat. I ain’t never seen you so I don’t know who you are. I
couldn’t identify you—”
The boats had drifted apart. Captain Willie went on shouting, “I don’t know where this place is
where I seen you. I wouldn’t know how to get back here.”
“O.K.,” came a shout from the booze boat.
“I’m taking this big alphabet man fishing until dark,” Captain Willie shouted.
“O.K.”
“He loves to fish,” Captain Willie yelled, his voice almost breaking. “But the son of a bitch
claims you can’t eat ’em.”
“Thanks brother,” came the voice of Harry.
“That chap your brother?” asked the Doctor, his face very red but his love for information still
unappeased.
“No sir,” said Captain Willie. “Most everybody goes in boats calls each other brother.”
“We’ll go into Key West,” the Doctor said; but he said it without great conviction.
“No sir,” said Captain Willie. “You gentlemen chartered me for a day. I’m going to see you get
your money’s worth. You called me a halfwit but I’ll see you get a full day’s charter.”
“He’s an old man,” said the Doctor to his secretary. “Should we rush him?”
“Don’t you try it,” said Captain Willie. “I’d hit you right over the head with this.”
He showed them a length of iron pipe that he used for clubbing shark.
“Why don’t you gentlemen just put your lines out and enjoy yourselves? You didn’t come down
here to get in no trouble. You come down here for a rest. You say you can’t eat sailfish but you won’t
catch no sailfish in these channels. You’d be lucky to catch a grouper.”
“What do you think?” asked the Doctor.
“Better leave him alone.” The secretary eyed the iron pipe.
“Besides you made another mistake,” Captain Willie went on. “Sailfish is just as good eating as
kingfish. When we used to sell them to Rios for the Havana market we got ten cents a pound same as
kings.”
“Oh shut up,” said the Doctor.
“I thought you’d be interested in these things as a Government man. Ain’t you mixed up in the
prices of things that we eat or something? Ain’t that it? Making them more costly or something.
Making the grits dearer and the grunts cheapter. Fish goin’ down in price all the time.”
“Oh shut up,” said the Doctor.
On the booze boat Harry had the last sack over.
“Get me the fish knife,” he said to the nigger.
“It’s gone.”
Harry pressed the self-starters and started the engines. He got the hatchet and with his left hand
chopped the anchor rope through against the bit. It’ll sink and they’ll grapple it when they pick up the
load, he thought. I’ll run her up into the Garrison Bight and if they’re going to take her they’ll take her.
I got to get to a doctor. I don’t want to lose my arm and the boat both. The load is worth as much as
the boat. There wasn’t too much of it smashed. A little smashed can smell plenty.
He shoved the port clutch in and swung out away from the mangroves with the tide. The engines
ran smoothly. Captain Willie’s boat was two miles away now headed for Boca Grande. I guess the
tide’s high enough to go through the lakes now, Harry thought. He shoved in his starboard clutch and
the engines roared as he pushed up the throttle. He could feel her bow rise and the green mangroves
coasted swiftly alongside as the boat sucked the water away from their roots. I hope they don’t take
her, he thought. I hope they can fix my arm. How was we to know they’d shoot at us in Mariel after
we could go and come there open for six months? That’s Cubans for you. Somebody didn’t pay
somebody so we got the shooting. That’s Cubans all right.
“Hey Wesley,” he said, looking back into the cockpit where the nigger lay with the blanket over
him. “How you feeling, Boogie?”
“God,” said Wesley. “I couldn’t feel no worse.”
“You’ll feel worse when the old doctor probes for it,” Harry told him.
“You ain’t human,” the nigger said. “You ain’t got human feelings.”
That old Willie is a good skate, Harry was thinking. There’s a good skate, that old Willie. We
done better to come in than to wait. It was foolish to wait. I felt so dizzy and sicklike I lost my
judgment.
Ahead now he could see the white of the La Concha hotel, the wireless masts, and the houses of
town. He could see the car ferries lying at the Trumbo dock where he would go around to head up for
the Garrison Bight. That old Willie, he thought. He was giving them hell. Wonder who those buzzards
was? Damn if I don’t feel plenty bad right now. I feel plenty dizzy. We done right to come in. We
done right not to wait.
“Mr. Harry,” said the nigger. “I’m sorry I couldn’t help dump that stuff.”
“Hell,” said Harry. “Ain’t no nigger any good when he’s shot. You’re a all right nigger,
Wesley.”
Above the roar of the motors and the high, slapping rush of the boat through the water he felt a
strange hollow singing in his heart. He always felt this way coming home at the end of a trip. I hope
they can fix that arm, he thought. I got a lot of use for that arm.
The Denunciation
CHICOTE’S IN THE OLD DAYS IN MADRID was a place sort of
like The Stork, without the music and the debutantes, or the Waldorfs men’s bar if they let girls in.
You know, they came in, but it was a man’s place and they didn’t have any status. Pedro Chicote was
the proprietor and he had one of those personalities that make a place. He was a great bartender and
he was always pleasant, always cheerful, and he had a lot of zest. Now zest is a rare enough thing and
few people have it for long. It should not be confused with showmanship either. Chicote had it and it
was not faked or put on. He was also modest, simple and friendly. He really was as nice and pleasant
and still as marvelously efficient as George, the chasseur at the Ritz bar in Paris, which is about the
strongest comparison you can make to anyone who has been around, and he ran a fine bar.
In those days the snobs among the rich young men of Madrid hung out at something called the
Nuevo Club and the good guys went to Chicote’s. A lot of people went there that I did not like, the
same as at The Stork, say, but I was never in Chicote’s that it wasn’t pleasant. One reason was that
you did not talk politics there. There were cafés where you went for politics and nothing else but you
didn’t talk politics at Chicote’s. You talked plenty of the other five subjects though and in the evening
the best looking girls in the town showed up there and it was the place to start an evening from, all
right, and we had all started some fine ones from there.
Then it was the place where you dropped in to find out who was in town, or where they had gone
to if they were out of town. And if it was summer, and there was no one in town, you could always sit
and enjoy a drink because the waiters were all pleasant.
It was a club only you didn’t have to pay any dues and you could pick a girl up there. It was the
best bar in Spain, certainly, and I think one of the best bars in the world, and all of us that used to
hang out there had a great affection for it.
Another thing was that the drinks were wonderful. If you ordered a martini it was made with the
best gin that money could buy, and Chicote had a barrel whisky that came from Scotland that was so
much better than the advertised brands that it was pitiful to compare it with ordinary Scotch. Well,
when the revolt started, Chicote was up at San Sebastian running the summer place he had there. He is
still running it and they say it is the best bar in Franco’s Spain. The waiters took over the Madrid
place and they are still running it, but the good liquor is all gone now.
Most of Chicote’s old customers are on Franco’s side; but some of them are on the Government
side. Because it was a very cheerful place, and because really cheerful people are usually the
bravest, and the bravest get killed quickest, a big part of Chicote’s old customers are now dead. The
barrel whisky had all been gone for many months now and we finished the last of the yellow gin in
May of 1938. There’s not much there to go for now so I suppose Luis Delgado, if he had come to
Madrid a little later, might have stayed away from there and not gotten into that trouble. But when he
came to Madrid in the month of November of 1937 they still had the yellow gin and they still had
Indian quinine water. They do not seem worth risking your life for, so maybe he just wanted to have a
drink in the old place. Knowing him, and knowing the place in the old days, it would be perfectly
understandable.
They had butchered a cow at the Embassy that day and the porter had called up at the Hotel
Florida to tell us that they had saved us ten pounds of fresh meat. I walked over to get it through the
early dusk of a Madrid winter. Two assault guards with rifles sat on chairs outside the Embassy gate
and the meat was waiting at the porter’s lodge.
The porter said it was a very good cut but that the cow was lean. I offered him some roasted
sunflower seeds and some acorns from the pocket of my mackinaw jacket and we joked a little
standing outside the lodge on the gravel of the Embassy driveway.
I walked home across the town with the meat heavy under my arm. They were shelling up the
Gran Via and I went into Chicote’s to wait it out. It was noisy and crowded and I sat at a little table in
one corner against the sandbagged window with the meat on the bench beside me and drank a gin and
tonic water. It was that week that we discovered they still had tonic water. No one had ordered any
since the war started and it was still the same price as before the revolt. The evening papers were not
yet out so I bought three party tracts from an old woman. They were ten centavos apiece and I told her
to keep the change from a peseta. She said God would bless me. I doubted this but read the three
leaflets and drank the gin and tonic.
A waiter I had known in the old days came over to the table and said something to me.
“No,” I said. “I don’t believe it.”
“Yes,” he insisted, slanting his tray and his head in the same direction. “Don’t look now. There
he is.”
“It’s not my business,” I told him.
“Nor mine either.”
He went away and I bought the evening papers which had just come in from another old woman
and read them. There was no doubt about the man the waiter had pointed out. We both knew him very
well. All I could think was: the fool. The utter bloody fool.
Just then a Greek comrade came over and sat down at the table. He was a company commander
in the Fifteenth Brigade who had been buried by an airplane bomb which had killed four other men
and he had been sent in to be under observation for a while and then sent to a rest home or something
of the sort.
“How are you, John?” I asked him. “Try one of these.”
“What you call that drink, Mr. Emmunds?”
“Gin and tonic.”
“What is that kind of tonic?”
“Quinine. Try one.”
“Listen, I don’t drink very much but is a quinine very good for fever. I try little one.”
“What did the doctor say about you, John?”
“Is a no necessity see doctor. I am all right. Only I have like buzzing noises all the time in the
head.”
“You have to go to see him, John.”
“I go all right. But he not understand. He says I have no papers to admit.”
“I’ll call up about it,” I said. “I know the people there. Is the doctor a German?”
“That’s right,” said John. “Is a German. No talk English very good.”
Just then the waiter came over. He was an old man with a bald head and very old-fashioned
manners which the war had not changed. He was very worried.
“I have a son at the front,” he said. “I have another son killed. Now about this.”
“It is thy problem.”
“And you? Already I have told you.”
“I came in here to have a drink before eating.”
“And I work here. But tell me.”
“It is thy problem,” I said. “I am not a politician.”
“Do you understand Spanish, John?” I asked the Greek comrade.
“No, I understand few words but I speak Greek, English, Arabic. One time I speak good Arabic.
Listen, you know how I get buried?”
“No. I knew you were buried. That’s all.”
He had a dark good-looking face and very dark hands that he moved about when he talked. He
came from one of the islands and he spoke with great intensity.
“Well, I tell you now. You see I have very much experience in war. Before I am captain in
Greek army too. I am good soldier. So when I see plane come over there when we are in trenches
there at Fuentes del Ebro I look at him close. I look at plane come over, bank, turn like this” (he
turned and banked with his hands), “look down on us and I say, ‘Ah ha. Is for the General Staff. Is
made the observation. Pretty soon come others.’
“So just like I say come others. So I am stand there and watch. I watch close. I look up and I
point out to company what happens. Is come three and three. One first and two behind. Is pass one
group of three and I say to company, ‘See? Now is pass one formation.’
“Is pass the other three and I say to company, ‘Now is hokay. Now is all right. Now is nothing
more to worry.’ That the last thing I remember for two weeks.”
“When did it happen?”
“About one month ago. You see is my helmet forced down over my face when am buried by
bomb so I have the air in that helmet to breathe until they dig me out but I know nothing about that. But
in that air I breathe is the smoke from the explosion and that make me sick for long time. Now am I
hokay, only with the ringing in the head. What you call this drink?”
“Gin and tonic. Schweppes Indian tonic water. This was a very fancy café before the war and
this used to cost five pesetas when there were only seven pesetas to the dollar. We just found out they
still have the tonic water and they’re charging the same price for it. There’s only a case left.”
“Is a good drink all right. Tell me, how was this city before the war?”
“Fine. Like now only lots to eat.”
The waiter came over and leaned toward the table.
“And if I don’t?” he said. “It is my responsibility.”
“If you wish to, go to the telephone and call this number. Write it down.”
He wrote it down. “Ask for Pepé,” I said.
“I have nothing against him,” the waiter said. “But it is the Causa. Certainly such a man is
dangerous to our cause.”
“Don’t the other waiters recognize him?”
“I think so. But no one has said anything. He is an old client.”
“I am an old client, too.”
“Perhaps then he is on our side now, too.”
“No,” I said. “I know he is not.”
“I have never denounced anyone.”
“It is your problem. Maybe one of the other waiters will denounce him.”
“No. Only the old waiters know him and the old waiters do not denounce.”
“Bring another of the yellow gins and some bitters,” I said. “There is tonic water still in the
bottle.”
“What’s he talk about?” asked John. “I only understand little bit.”
“There is a man here that we both knew in the old days. He used to be a marvelous pigeon shot
and I used to see him at shoots. He is a fascist and for him to come here now, no matter what his
reasons, is very foolish. But he was always very brave and very foolish.”
“Show him to me.”
“There at that table with the flyers.”
“Which one?”
“With the very brown face; the cap over one eye. Who is laughing now.”
“He is fascist?”
“Yes.”
“That’s a closest I see fascist since Fuentes del Ebro. Is a many fascist here?”
“Quite a few from time to time.”
“Is drink the same drink as you,” said John. “We drink that other people think we fascists, eh?
Listen you ever been South America, West Coast, Magallanes?”
“No.”
“Is all right. Only too many oc-toe-pus.”
“Too many what?”
“Oc-toe-pus.” He pronounced it with the accent on the toe as oc-toepus. “You know with the
eight arms.”
“Oh,” I said. “Octopus.”
“Oc-toe-pus,” said John. “You see I am diver too. Is a good place to work all right make plenty
money only too many oc-toe-pus.”
“Did they bother you?”
“I don’t know about that. First time I go down in Magallanes harbor I see oc-toe-pus. He is stand
on his feet like this.” John pointed his fingers on the table and brought his hands up, at the same time
bringing up his shoulders and raising his eyebrows. “He is stand up taller than I am and he is look me
right in the eye. I jerk cord for them to bring me up.”
“How big was he, John?”
“I cannot say absolutely because the glass in the helmet make distort a little. But the head was
big around more than four feet anyway. And he was stand on his feet like on tip-toes and look at me
like this.” (He peered in my face.) “So when I get up out of water they take off the helmet and so I say
I don’t go down there any more. Then the man of the job says, ‘What a matter with you, John? The octoe-pus is more afraid of you than you afraid of oc-toe-pus.’ So I say to him ‘Impossible!’ What you
say we drink some more this fascist drink?”
“All right,” I said.
I was watching the man at the table. His name was Luis Delgado and the last time I had seen him
had been in 1933 shooting pigeons at Saint Sebastian and I remembered standing with him up on top
of the stand watching the final of the big shoot. We had a bet, more than I could afford to bet, and I
believed a good deal more than he could afford to lose that year, and when he paid coming down the
stairs, I remembered how pleasant he was and how he made it seem a great privilege to pay. Then I
remembered our standing at the bar having a martini, and I had that wonderful feeling of relief that
comes when you have bet yourself out of a bad hole and I was wondering how badly the bet had hit
him. I had shot rottenly all week and he had shot beautifully but drawn almost impossible birds and he
had bet on himself steadily.
“Should we match a duro?” he asked.
“You really want to?”
“Yes, if you like.”
“For how much?”
He took out a notecase and looked in it and laughed.
“I’d say for anything you like,” he said. “But suppose we say for eight thousand pesetas. That’s
what seems to be there.”
That was close to a thousand dollars then.
“Good,” I said, all the fine inner quiet gone now and the hollow that gambling makes come back
again. “Who’s matching who?”
“I’ll match you.”
We shook the heavy five-peseta pieces in our cupped hands; then each man laid his coin on the
back of his left hand, each coin covered with the right hand.
“What’s yours?” he asked.
I uncovered the big silver piece with the profile of Alfonso XIII as a baby showing.
“Heads,” I said.
“Take these damned things and be a good man and buy me a drink.” He emptied out the notecase.
“You wouldn’t like to buy a good Purdey gun would you?”
“No,” I said. “But look, Luis, if you need some money—”
I was holding the stiffly folded, shiny-heavy-paper, green thousandpeseta notes toward him.
“Don’t be silly, Enrique,” he said. “We’ve been gambling, haven’t we?”
“Yes. But we know each other quite well.”
“Not that well.”
“Right,” I said. “You’re the judge of that. Then what will you drink?”
“What about a gin and tonic? That’s a marvelous drink you know.”
So we had a gin and tonic and I felt very badly to have broken him and I felt awfully good to
have won the money, and a gin and tonic never tasted better to me in all my life. There is no use to lie
about these things or pretend you do not enjoy winning; but this boy Luis Delgado was a very pretty
gambler.
“I don’t think if people gambled for what they could afford it would be very interesting. Do you,
Enrique?”
“I don’t know. I’ve never been able to afford it.”
“Don’t be silly. You have lots of money.”
“No I haven’t,” I said. “Really.”
“Oh, everyone has money,” he said. “It’s just a question of selling something or other to get hold
of it.”
“I don’t have much. Really.”
“Oh, don’t be silly. I’ve never known an American who wasn’t rich.”
I guess that was the truth all right. He wouldn’t have met them at the Ritz bar or at Chicote’s
either in those days. And now he was back in Chicote’s and all the Americans he would meet there
now were the kind he would never have met; except me, and I was a mistake. But I would have given
plenty not to have seen him in there.
Still, if he wanted to do an absolutely damn fool thing like that it was his own business. But as I
looked at the table and remembered the old days I felt badly about him and I felt very badly too that I
had given the waiter the number of the counterespionage bureau in Seguridad headquarters. He could
have had Seguridad by simply asking on the telephone. But I had given him the shortest cut to having
Delgado arrested in one of those excesses of impartiality, righteousness and Pontius Pilatry, and the
always-dirty desire to see how people act under an emotional conflict, that makes writers such
attractive friends.
The waiter came over.
“What do you think?” he asked.
“I would never denounce him myself,” I said, now trying to undo for myself what I had done with
the number. “But I am a foreigner and it is your war and your problem.”
“But you are with us.”
“Absolutely and always. But it does not include denouncing old friends.”
“But for me?”
“For you it is different.”
I knew this was true and there was nothing else to say, only I wished I had never heard of any of
it.
My curiosity as to how people would act in this case had been long ago, and shamefully,
satisfied. I turned to John and did not look at the table where Luis Delgado was sitting. I knew he had
been flying with the fascists for over a year, and here he was, in a loyalist uniform, talking to three
young loyalist flyers of the last crop that had been trained in France.
None of those new kids would know him and I wondered whether he had come to try to steal a
plane or for what. Whatever he was there for, he was a fool to come to Chicote’s now.
“How do you feel, John?” I asked.
“Feel good,” said John. “Is a good drink hokay. Makes me feel little bit drunk maybe. Is a good
for the buzzing in the head.”
The waiter came over. He was very excited.
“I have denounced him,” he said.
“Well then,” I said, “now you haven’t any problem.”
“No,” he said proudly. “I have denounced him. They are on their way now to get him.”
“Let’s go,” I said to John. “There is going to be some trouble here.”
“Is best go then,” said John. “Is a plenty trouble always come, even if you do best to avoid. How
much we owe?”
“You aren’t going to stay?” the waiter asked.
“No.”
“But you gave me the telephone number.”
“I know it. You get to know too many telephone numbers if you stay around in this town.”
“But it was my duty.”
“Yes. Why not? Duty is a very strong thing.”
“But now?”
“Well, you felt good about it just now, didn’t you? Maybe you will feel good about it again.
Maybe you will get to like it.”
“You have forgotten the package,” the waiter said. He handed me the meat which was wrapped
in two envelopes which had brought copies of the Spur to the piles of magazines which accumulated
in one of the office rooms of the Embassy.
“I understand,” I said to the waiter. “Truly.”
“He was an old client and a good client. Also I have never denounced anyone before. I did not
denounce for pleasure.”
“Also I should not speak cynically or brutally. Tell him that I denounced him. He hates me
anyway by now for differences in politics. He’d feel badly if he knew it was you.”
“No. Each man must take his responsibility. But you understand?”
“Yes,” I said. Then lied. “I understand and I approve.” You have to lie very often in a war and
when you have to lie you should do it quickly and as well as you can.
We shook hands and I went out the door with John. I looked back at the table where Luis
Delgado sat as I went out. He had another gin and tonic in front of him and everyone at the table was
laughing at something he had said. He had a very gay, brown face, and shooter’s eyes, and I wondered
what he was passing himself off as.
He was a fool to go to Chicote’s. But that was exactly the sort of thing that he would do in order
to be able to boast of it when he was back with his own people.
As we went out of the door and turned to walk up the street, a big Seguridad car drew up in front
of Chicote’s and eight men got out of it. Six with submachine guns took up positions outside the door.
Two in plain clothes went inside. A man asked us for our papers and when I said, “Foreigners,” he
said to go along; that it was all right.
In the dark going up the Gran Via there was much new broken glass on the sidewalk and much
rubble under foot from the shelling. The air was still smoky and all up the street it smelled of high
explosive and blasted granite.
“Where you go eat?” asked John.
“I have some meat for all of us, and we can cook it in the room.”
“I cook it,” said John. “I cook good. I remember one time when I cook on ship—”
“It will be pretty tough,” I said. “It’s just been freshly butchered.”
“Oh no,” said John. “Is a no such thing as a touch meat in a war.”
People were hurrying by in the dark on their way home from the cinemas where they had stayed
until the shelling was over.
“What’s a matter that fascist he come to that café where they know him?”
“He was crazy to do it.”
“Is a trouble with a war,” John said. “Is a too many people crazy.”
“John,” I said, “I think you’ve got something there.”
Back at the hotel we went in the door past the sandbags piled to protect the porter’s desk and I
asked for the key, but the porter said there were two comrades upstairs in the room taking a bath. He
had given them the keys.
“Go on up, John,” I said. “I want to telephone.”
I went over to the booth and called the same number I had given the waiter.
“Hello? Pepé?”
A thin-lipped voice came over the phone. “¿Qué tal Enrique?”
“Listen, Pepé, did you pick up a certain Luis Delgado at Chicote’s?”
“Sí, hombre, sí. Sin novedad. Without trouble.”
“He doesn’t know anything about the waiter?”
“No, hombre, no.”
“Then don’t tell him. Tell him I denounced him then, will you? Nothing about the waiter.”
“Why when it will make no difference? He is a spy. He will be shot. There is no choice in the
matter.”
“I know,” I said. “But it makes a difference.”
“As you want, hombre. As you want. When shall I see thee?”
“Lunch tomorrow. We have some meat.”
“And whisky before. Good, hombre, good.”
“Salud, Pepé, and thank you.”
“Salud, Enrique. It is nothing. Salud.”
It was a strange and very deadly voice and I never got used to hearing it, but as I walked up the
stairs now, I felt much better.
All we old clients of Chicote’s had a sort of feeling about the place. I knew that was why Luis
Delgado had been such a fool as to go back there. He could have done his business some place else.
But if he was in Madrid he had to go there. He had been a good client as the waiter had said and we
had been friends. Certainly any small acts of kindness you can do in life are worth doing. So I was
glad I had called my friend Pepé at Seguridad headquarters because Luis Delgado was an old client
of Chicote’s and I did not wish him to be disillusioned or bitter about the waiters there before he
died.
The Butterfly and the Tank
ON THIS EVENING I WAS WALKING HOME from the censorship
office to the Florida Hotel and it was raining. So about halfway home I got sick of the rain and
stopped into Chicote’s for a quick one. It was the second winter of shelling in the siege of Madrid and
everything was short including tobacco and people’s tempers and you were a little hungry all the time
and would become suddenly and unreasonably irritated at things you could do nothing about such as
the weather. I should have gone on home. It was only five blocks more, but when I saw Chicote’s
doorway I thought I would get a quick one and then do those six blocks up the Gran Via through the
mud and rubble of the streets broken by the bombardment.
The place was crowded. You couldn’t get near the bar and all the tables were full. It was full of
smoke, singing, men in uniform, and the smell of wet leather coats, and they were handing drinks over
a crowd that was three deep at the bar.
A waiter I knew found a chair from another table and I sat down with a thin, white-faced,
Adam’s-appled German I knew who was working at the censorship and two other people I did not
know. The table was in the middle of the room a little on your right as you go in.
You couldn’t hear yourself talk for the singing and I ordered a gin and Angostura and put it down
against the rain. The place was really packed and everybody was very jolly; maybe getting just a little
bit too jolly from the newly made Catalan liquor most of them were drinking. A couple of people I
did not know slapped me on the back and when the girl at our table said something to me, I couldn’t
hear it and said, “Sure.”
She was pretty terrible looking now I had stopped looking around and was looking at our table;
really pretty terrible. But it turned out, when the waiter came, that what she had asked me was to have
a drink. The fellow with her was not very forceful looking but she was forceful enough for both of
them. She had one of those strong, semi-classical faces and was built like a lion tamer; and the boy
with her looked as though he ought to be wearing an old school tie. He wasn’t though. He was
wearing a leather coat just like all the rest of us. Only it wasn’t wet because they had been there since
before the rain started. She had on a leather coat too and it was becoming to the sort of face she had.
By this time I was wishing I had not stopped into Chicote’s but had gone straight on home where
you could change your clothes and be dry and have a drink in comfort on the bed with your feet up,
and I was tired of looking at both of these young people. Life is very short and ugly women are very
long and sitting there at the table I decided that even though I was a writer and supposed to have an
insatiable curiosity about all sorts of people, I did not really care to know whether these two were
married, or what they saw in each other, or what their politics were, or whether he had a little money,
or she had a little money, or anything about them. I decided they must be in the radio. Any time you
saw really strange looking civilians in Madrid they were always in the radio. So to say something I
raised my voice above the noise and asked, “You in the radio?”
“We are,” the girl said. So that was that. They were in the radio.
“How are you comrade?” I said to the German.
“Fine. And you?”
“Wet,” I said, and he laughed with his head on one side.
“You haven’t got a cigarette?” he asked. I handed him my next to the last pack of cigarettes and
he took two. The forceful girl took two and the young man with the old school tie face took one.
“Take another,” I shouted.
“No thanks,” he answered and the German took it instead.
“Do you mind?” he smiled.
“Of course not,” I said. I really minded and he knew it. But he wanted the cigarettes so badly that
it did not matter. The singing had died down momentarily, or there was a break in it as there is
sometimes in a storm, and we could all hear what we said.
“You been here long?” the forceful girl asked me. She pronounced it bean as in bean soup.
“Off and on,” I said.
“We must have a serious talk,” the German said. “I want to have a talk with you. When can we
have it?”
“I’ll call you up,” I said. This German was a very strange German indeed and none of the good
Germans liked him. He lived under the delusion that he could play the piano, but if you kept him away
from pianos he was all right unless he was exposed to liquor, or the opportunity to gossip, and
nobody had even been able to keep him away from those two things yet.
Gossip was the best thing he did and he always knew something new and highly discreditable
about anyone you could mention in Madrid, Valencia, Barcelona, and other political centers.
Just then the singing really started in again, and you cannot gossip very well shouting, so it
looked like a dull afternoon at Chicote’s and I decided to leave as soon as I should have bought a
round myself.
Just then it started. A civilian in a brown suit, a white shirt, black tie, his hair brushed straight
back from a rather high forehead, who had been clowning around from table to table, squirted one of
the waiters with a flit gun. Everybody laughed except the waiter who was carrying a tray full of
drinks at the time. He was indignant.
“No hay derecho,” the waiter said. This means, “You have no right to do that,” and is the
simplest and the strongest protest in Spain.
The flit gun man, delighted with his success, and not seeming to give any importance to the fact
that it was well into the second year of the war, that he was in a city under siege where everyone was
under a strain, and that he was one of only four men in civilian clothes in the place, now squirted
another waiter.
I looked around for a place to duck to. This waiter, also, was indignant and the flit gun man
squirted him twice more, lightheartedly. Some people still thought it was funny, including the forceful
girl. But the waiter stood, shaking his head. His lips were trembling. He was an old man and he had
worked in Chicote’s for ten years that I knew of.
“No hay derecho, ” he said with dignity.
People had laughed, however, and the flit gun man, not noticing how the singing had fallen off,
squirted his flit gun at the back of a waiter’s neck. The waiter turned, holding his tray.
“No hay derecho,” he said. This time it was no protest. It was an indictment and I saw three men
in uniform start from a table for the flit gun man and the next thing all four of them were going out the
revolving door in a rush and you heard a smack when someone hit the flit gun man on the mouth.
Somebody else picked up the flit gun and threw it out the door after him.
The three men came back in looking serious, tough and very righteous. Then the door revolved
and in came the flit gun man. His hair was down in his eyes, there was blood on his face, his necktie
was pulled to one side and his shirt was torn open. He had the flit gun again and as he pushed, wild-
eyed and white-faced, into the room he made one general, unaimed, challenging squirt with it, holding
it toward the whole company.
I saw one of the three men start for him and I saw this man’s face. There were more men with
him now and they forced the flit gun man back between two tables on the left of the room as you go in,
the flit gun man struggling wildly now, and when the shot went off I grabbed the forceful girl by the
arm and dove for the kitchen door.
The kitchen door was shut and when I put my shoulder against it it did not give.
“Get down here behind the angle of the bar,” I said. She knelt there.
“Flat,” I said and pushed her down. She was furious.
Every man in the room except the German, who lay behind a table, and the public-school-looking
boy who stood in a corner drawn up against the wall, had a gun up. On a bench along the wall three
over-blonde girls, their hair dark at the roots, were standing on tiptoe to see and screaming steadily.
“I’m not afraid,” the forceful one said. “This is ridiculous.”
“You don’t want to get shot in a café brawl,” I said. “If that flit king has any friends here this can
be very bad.”
But he had no friends, evidently, because people began putting their pistols away and somebody
lifted down the blonde screamers and everyone who had started over there when the shot came drew
back away from the flit man who lay, quietly, on his back on the floor.
“No one is to leave until the police come,” someone shouted from the door.
Two policemen with rifles, who had come in off the street patrol, were standing by the door and
at this announcement I saw six men form up just like the line-up of a football team coming out of a
huddle and head out through the door. Three of them were the men who had first thrown the flit king
out. One of them was the man who shot him. They went right through the policemen with the rifles like
good interference taking out an end and a tackle. And as they went out one of the policemen got his
rifle across the door and shouted, “No one can leave. Absolutely no one.”
“Why did those men go? Why hold us if anyone’s gone?”
“They were mechanics who had to return to their air field,” someone said.
“But if anyone’s gone it’s silly to old the others.”
“Everyone must wait for the Seguridad. Things must be done legally and in order.”
“But don’t you see that if any person has gone it is silly to hold the others?”
“No one can leave. Everyone must wait.”
“It’s comic,” I said to the forceful girl.
“No it’s not. It’s simply horrible.”
We were standing up now and she was staring indignantly at where the flit king was lying. His
arms were spread wide and he had one leg drawn up.
“I’m going over to help that poor wounded man. Why has no one helped him or done anything for
him?”
“I’d leave him alone,” I said. “You want to keep out of this.”
“But it’s simply inhuman. I’ve nurse’s training and I’m going to give him first aid.”
“I wouldn’t,” I said. “Don’t go near him.”
“Why not?” She was very upset and almost hysterical.
“Because he’s dead,” I said.
When the police came they held everybody there for three hours. They commenced by smelling
of all the pistols. In this manner they would detect one which had been fired recently. After about
forty pistols they seemed to get bored with this and anyway all you could smell was wet leather coats.
Then they sat at a table placed directly behind the late flit king, who lay on the floor looking like a
grey wax caricature of himself, with grey wax hands and a grey wax face, and examined people’s
papers.
With his shirt ripped open you could see the flit king had no undershirt and the soles of his shoes
were worn through. He looked very small and pitiful lying there on the floor. You had to step over
him to get to the table where two plain clothes policemen sat and examined everyone’s identification
papers. The husband lost and found his papers several times with nervousness. He had a safe conduct
pass somewhere but he had mislaid it in a pocket and he kept on searching and perspiring until he
found it. Then he would put it in a different pocket and have to go searching again. He perspired
heavily while doing this and it made his hair very curly and his face red. He now looked as though he
should have not only an old school tie but one of those little caps boys in the lower forms wear. You
have heard how events age people. Well, this shooting had made him look about ten years younger.
While we were waiting around I told the forceful girl I thought the whole thing was a pretty good
story and that I would write it sometime. The way the six had lined up in single file and rushed that
door was very impressive. She was shocked and said that I could not write it because it would be
prejudicial to the cause of the Spanish Republic. I said that I had been in Spain for a long time and
that they used to have a phenomenal number of shootings in the old days around Valencia under the
monarchy, and that for hundreds of years before the Republic people had been cutting each other with
large knives called navajas in Andalucia, and that if I saw a comic shooting in Chicote’s during the
war I could write about it just as though it had been in New York, Chicago, Key West or Marseilles.
It did not have anything to do with politics. She said I shouldn’t. Probably a lot of other people will
say I shouldn’t too. The German seemed to think it was a pretty good story, however, and I gave him
the last of the Camels. Well, anyway, finally, after about three hours the police said we could go.
They were sort of worried about me at the Florida because in those days, with the shelling, if
you started for home on foot and didn’t get there after the bars were closed at seven-thirty, people
worried. I was glad to get home and I told the story while we were cooking supper on an electric
stove and it had quite a success.
Well, it stopped raining during the night, and the next morning it was a fine, bright, cold early
winter day and at twelve forty-five I pushed open the revolving doors at Chicote’s to try a little gin
and tonic before lunch. There were very few people there at that hour and two waiters and the
manager came over to the table. They were all smiling.
“Did they catch the murderer?” I asked.
“Don’t make jokes so early in the day,” the manager said. “Did you see him shot?”
“Yes,” I told him.
“Me too,” he said. “I was just here when it happened.” He pointed to a comer table. “He placed
the pistol right against the man’s chest when he fired.”
“How late did they hold people?”
“Oh, until past two this morning.”
“They only came for the fiambre,” using the Spanish slang word for corpse, the same used on
menus for cold meat, “at eleven o’clock this morning.”
“But you don’t know about it yet,” the manager said.
“No. He doesn’t know,” a waiter said.
“It is a very rare thing,” another waiter said. “Muy raro.”
“And sad too,” the manager said. He shook his head.
“Yes. Sad and curious,” the waiter said. “Very sad.”
“Tell me.”
“It is a very rare thing,” the manager said.
“Tell me. Come on, tell me.”
The manager leaned over the table in great confidence.
“In the flit gun, you know,” he said. “He had eau de cologne. Poor fellow.”
“It was not a joke in such bad taste, you see?” the waiter said.
“It was really just gaiety. No one should have taken offense,” the manager said. “Poor fellow.”
“I see,” I said. “He just wanted everyone to have a good time.”
“Yes,” said the manager. “It was really just an unfortunate misunderstanding.”
“And what about the flit gun?”
“The police took it. They have sent it around to his family.”
“I imagine they will be glad to have it,” I said.
“Yes,” said the manager. “Certainly. A flit gun is always useful.”
“Who was he?”
“A cabinet maker.”
“Married?”
“Yes, the wife was here with the police this morning.”
“What did she say?”
“She dropped down by him and said, ‘Pedro, what have they done to thee, Pedro? Who has done
this to thee? Oh, Pedro.’ ”
“Then the police had to take her away because she could not control herself,” the waiter said.
“It seems he was feeble of the chest,” the manager said. “He fought in the first days of the
movement. They said he fought in the Sierra but he was too weak in the chest to continue.”
“And yesterday afternoon he just went out on the town to cheer things up,” I suggested.
“No,” said the manager. “You see it is very rare. Everything is muy raro. This I learn from the
police who are very efficient if given time. They have interrogated comrades from the shop where he
worked. This they located from the card of his syndicate which was in his pocket. Yesterday he
bought the flit gun and agua de colonia to use for a joke at a wedding. He had announced this
intention. He bought them across the street. There was a label on the cologne bottle with the address.
The bottle was in the washroom. It was there he filled the flit gun. After buying them he must have
come in here when the rain started.”
“I remember when he came in,” a waiter said.
“In the gaiety, with the singing, he became gay too.”
“He was gay all right,” I said. “He was practically floating around.”
The manager kept on with the relentless Spanish logic.
“That is the gaiety of drinking with a weakness of the chest,” he said.
“I don’t like this story very well,” I said.
“Listen,” said the manager. “How rare it is. His gaiety comes in contact with the seriousness of
the war like a butterfly—”
“Oh, very like a butterfly,” I said. “Too much like a butterfly.”
“I am not joking,” said the manager. “You see it? Like a butterfly and a tank.”
This pleased him enormously. He was getting into the real Spanish metaphysics.
“Have a drink on the house,” he said. “You must write a story about this.”
I remembered the flit gun man with his grey wax hands and his grey wax face, his arms spread
wide and his legs drawn up and he did look a little like a butterfly; not too much, you know. But he
did not look very human either. He reminded me more of a dead sparrow.
“I’ll take gin and Schweppes quinine tonic water,” I said.
“You must write a story about it,” the manager said. “Here. Here’s luck.”
“Luck,” I said. “Look, an English girl last night told me I shouldn’t write about it. That it would
be very bad for the cause.”
“What nonsense,” the manager said. “It is very interesting and important, the misunderstood
gaiety coming in contact with the deadly seriousness that is here always. To me it is the rarest and
most interesting thing which I have seen for some time. You must write it.”
“All right,” I said. “Sure. Has he any children?”
“No,” he said. “I asked the police. But you must write it and you must call it ‘The Butterfly and
the Tank.’ ”
“All right,” I said. “Sure. But I don’t like the title much.”
“The title is very elegant,” the manager said. “It is pure literature.”
“All right,” I said. “Sure. That’s what we’ll call it. ‘The Butterfly and the Tank.’ ”
And I sat there on that bright cheerful morning, the place smelling clean and newly aired and
swept, with the manager who was an old friend and who was now very pleased with the literature we
were making together and I took a sip of the gin and tonic water and looked out the sandbagged
window and thought of the wife kneeling there and saying, “Pedro. Pedro, who has done this to thee,
Pedro?” And I thought that the police would never be able to tell her that even if they had the name of
the man who pulled the trigger.
Night Before Battle
AT THIS TIME WE WERE WORKING IN A shell-smashed house
that overlooked the Casa del Campo in Madrid. Below us a battle was being fought. You could see it
spread out below you and over the hills, could smell it, could taste the dust of it, and the noise of it
was one great slithering sheet of rifle and automatic rifle fire rising and dropping, and in it came the
crack of the guns and the bubbly rumbling of the outgoing shells fired from the batteries behind us, the
thud of their bursts, and then the rolling yellow clouds of dust. But it was just too far to film well. We
had tried working closer but they kept sniping at the camera and you could not work.
The big camera was the most expensive thing we had and if it was smashed we were through.
We were making the film on almost nothing and all the money was in the cans of film and the cameras.
We could not afford to waste film and you had to be awfully careful of the cameras.
The day before we had been sniped out of a good place to film from and I had to crawl back
holding the small camera to my belly, trying to keep my head lower than my shoulders, hitching along
on my elbows, the bullets whocking into the brick wall over my back and twice spurting dirt over me.
Our heaviest attacks were made in the afternoon, God knows why, as the fascists then had the sun
at their backs, and it shone on the camera lenses and made them blink like a helio and the Moors
would open up on the flash. They knew all about helios and officers’ glasses from the Riff and if you
wanted to be properly sniped, all you had to do was use a pair of glasses without shading them
adequately. They could shoot too, and they had kept my mouth dry all day.
In the afternoon we moved up into the house. It was a fine place to work and we made a son of a
blind for the camera on a balcony with the broken latticed curtains; but, as I said, it was too far.
It was not too far to get the pine studded hillside, the lake and the outline of the stone farm
buildings that disappeared in the sudden smashes of stone dust from the hits by high explosive shells,
nor was it too far to get the clouds of smoke and dirt that thundered up on the hill crest as the bombers
droned over. But at eight hundred to a thousand yards the tanks looked like small mud-colored beetles
bustling in the trees and spitting tiny flashes and the men behind them were toy men who lay flat, then
crouched and ran, and then dropped to run again, or to stay where they lay, spotting the hillside as the
tanks moved on. Still we hoped to get the shape of the battle. We had many close shots and would get
others with luck and if we could get the sudden fountainings of earth, the puffs of shrapnel, the rolling
louds of smoke and dust lit by the yellow flash and white blossoming of grenades that is the very
shape of battle we would have something that we needed.
So when the light failed we carried the big camera down the stairs, took off the tripod, made
three loads, and then, one at a time, sprinted across the fire-swept corner of the Paseo Rosales into
the lee of the stone wall of the stables of the old Montana Barracks. We knew we had a good place to
work and we felt cheerful. But we were kidding ourselves plenty that it was not too far.
“Come on, let’s go to Chicote’s,” I said when we had come up the hill to the Hotel Florida.
But they had to repair a camera, to change film and seal up what we had made so I went alone.
You were never alone in Spain and it felt good for a change.
As I started to walk down the Gran Via to Chicote’s in the April twilight I felt happy, cheerful
and excited. We had worked hard, and I thought well. But walking down the street alone, all my
elation died. Now that I was alone and there was no excitement, I knew we had been too far away and
any fool could see the offensive was a failure. I had known it all day but you are often deceived by
hope and optimism. But remembering how it looked now, I knew this was just another blood bath like
the Somme. The people’s army was on the offensive finally. But it was attacking in a way that could
do only one thing: destroy itself. And as I put together now what I had seen all day and what I had
heard, I felt plenty bad.
I knew in the smoke and din of Chicote’s that the offensive was a failure and I knew it even
stronger when I took my first drink at the crowded bar. When things are all right and it is you that is
feeling low a drink can make you feel better. But when things are really bad and you are all right, a
drink just makes it clearer. Now, in Chicote’s it was so crowded that you had to make room with your
elbows to get your drink to your mouth. I had one good long swallow and then someone jostled me so
that I spilled pan of the glass of whisky and soda. I looked around angrily and the man who had
jostled me laughed.
“Hello fish face,” he said.
“Hello you goat.”
“Let’s get a table,” he said. “You certainly looked sore when I bumped you.”
“Where did you come from?” I asked. His leather coat was dirty and greasy, his eyes were
hollow and he needed a shave. He had the big Colt automatic that had belonged to three other men that
I had known of, and that we were always trying to get shells for, strapped to his leg. He was very tall
and his face was smoke-darkened and grease-smudged. He had a leather helment with a heavy leather
padded ridge longitudinally over the top and a heavily padded leather rim.
“Where’d you come from?”
“Casa del Campo,” he said, pronouncing it in a sing-song mocking way we had heard a page boy
use in calling in the lobby of a hotel in New Orleans one time and still kept as a private joke.
“There’s a table,” I said as two soldiers and two girls got up to go. “Let’s get it.”
We sat at this table in the middle of the room and I watched him raise his glass. His hands were
greasy and the forks of both thumbs black as graphite from the back spit of the machine gun. The hand
holding the drink was shaking.
“Look at them.” He put out the other hand. It was shaking too. “Both the same,” he said in that
same comic lilt. Then, seriously, “You been down there?”
“We’re making a picture of it.”
“Photograph well?”
“Not too.”
“See us?”
“Where?”
“Attack on the farm. Three twenty-five this afternoon.”
“Oh, yes.”
“Like it?”
“Nope.”
“Me either,” he said. “Listen the whole thing is just as crazy as a bedbug. Why do they want to
make a frontal attack against positions like those? Who in hell thought it up?”
“An S.O.B. named Largo Caballero,” said a short man with thick glasses who was sitting at the
table when we came over to it. “The first time they let him look through a pair of field glasses he
became a general. This is his masterpiece.”
We both looked at the man who spoke. Al Wagner, the tank man, looked at me and raised what
had been his eyebrows before they were burnt off. The little man smiled at us.
“If anyone around here speaks English you’re liable to get shot, comrade,” Al said to him.
“No,” said the little short man. “Largo Caballero is liable to be shot. He ought to be shot.”
“Listen, comrade,” said Al. “Just speak a little quieter, will you? Somebody might overhear you
and think we were with you.”
“I know what I’m talking about,” said the short man with the very thick glasses. I looked at him
carefully. He gave you a certain feeling that he did.
“Just the same it isn’t always a good thing to say what you know,” I said. “Have a drink?”
“Certainly,” he said. “It’s all right to talk to you. I know you. You’re all right.”
“I’m not that all right,” I said. “And this is a public bar.”
“A public bar is the only private place there is. Nobody can hear what we say here. What is your
unit, comrade?”
“I’ve got some tanks about eight minutes from here on foot,” Al told him. “We are through for the
day and I have the early part of this evening off.”
“Why don’t you ever get washed?” I said.
“I plan to,” said Al. “In your room. When we leave here. Have you got any mechanic’s soap?”
“No.”
“That’s all right,” he said. “I’ve got a little here with me in my pocket that I’ve been saving.”
The little man with the thick-lensed glasses was looking at Al intently.
“Are you a party member, comrade?” he asked.
“Sure,” said Al.
“I know Comrade Henry here is not,” the little man said.
“I wouldn’t trust him then,” Al said. “I never do.”
“You bastid,” I said. “Want to go?”
“No,” Al said. “I need another drink very badly.”
“I know all about Comrade Henry,” the little man said. “Now let me tell you something more
about Largo Caballero.”
“Do we have to hear it?” Al asked. “Remember I’m in the people’s army. You don’t think it will
discourage me, do you?”
“You know his head is swelled so badly now he’s getting sort of mad. He is Prime Minister and
War Minister and nobody can even talk to him any more. You know he’s just a good honest trade
union leader somewhere between the late Sam Gompers and John L. Lewis but this man Araquistain
who invented him?”
“Take it easy,” said Al. “I don’t follow.”
“Oh, Araquistain invented him! Araquistain who is Ambassador in Paris now. He made him up
you know. He called him the Spanish Lenin and then the poor man tried to live up to it and somebody
let him look through a pair of field glasses and he thought he was Clausewitz.”
“You said that before,” Al told him coldly. “What do you base it on?”
“Why three days ago in the Cabinet meeting he was talking about military affairs. They were
talking about this business we’ve got now and Jesus Hernandez, just ribbing him, you know, asked
him what was the difference between tactics and strategy. Do you know what the old boy said?”
“No,” Al said. I could see this new comrade was getting a little on his nerves.
“He said, ‘In tactics you attack the enemy from in front. In strategy you take him from the sides.’
Now isn’t that something?”
“You better run along, comrade,” Al said. “You’re getting so awfully discouraged.”
“But we’ll get rid of Largo Caballero,” the short comrade said. “We’ll get rid of him right after
his offensive. This last piece of stupidity will be the end of him.”
“O.K., comrade,” Al told him. “But I’ve got to attack in the morning.”
“Oh, you are going to attack again?”
“Listen, comrade. You can tell me any sort of crap you want because it’s interesting and I’m
grown up enough to sort things out. But don’t ask me any questions, see? Because you’ll be in
trouble.”
“I just meant it personally. Not as information.”
“We don’t know each other well enough to ask personal questions, comrade,” Al said. “Why
don’t you just go to another table and let Comrade Henry and me talk. I want to ask him some things.”
“Salud, comrade,” the little man said, standing up. “We’ll meet another time.”
“Good,” said Al. “Another time.”
We watched him go over to another table. He excused himself, some soldiers made room for
him, and as we watched we could see him starting to talk. They all looked interested.
“What do you make of that little guy?” Al asked.
“I don’t know.”
“Me either,” Al said. “He certainly had this offensive sized up.” He took a drink and showed his
hand. “See? It’s all right now. I’m not any rummy either. I never take a drink before an attack.”
“How was it today?”
“You saw it. How did it look?”
“Terrible.”
“That’s it. That’s the word for it all right. It was terrible. I guess he’s using strategy and tactics
both now because we are attacking from straight in front and from both sides. How’s the rest of it
going?”
“Duran took the new race track. The hipódromo. We’ve narrowed down on the corridor that
runs up into University City. Up above we crossed the Coruña road. And we’re stopped at the Cerro
de Aguilar since yesterday morning. We were up that way this morning. Duran lost over half his
brigade, I heard. How is it with you?”
“Tomorrow we’re going to try those farm houses and the church again. The church on the hill, the
one they call the hermit, is the objective. The whole hillside is cut by those gullies and it’s all
enfiladed at least three ways by machine-gun posts. They’re dug deep all through there and it’s well
done. We haven’t got enough artillery to give any kind of real covering fire to keep them down and
we haven’t heavy artillery to blow them out. They’ve got anti-tanks in those three houses and an antitank battery by the church. It’s going to be murder.”
“When’s it for?”
“Don’t ask me. I’ve got no right to tell you that.”
“If we have to film it, I meant,” I said. “The money from the film all goes for ambulances. We’ve
got the Twelfth Brigade in the counter-attack at the Argada Bridge. And we’ve got the Twelfth again
in that attack last week by Pingarron. We got some good tank shots there.”
“The tanks were no good there,” Al said.
“I know,” I said, “but they photographed very well. What about tomorrow?”
“Just get out early and wait,” he said. “Not too early.”
“How you feel now?”
“I’m awfully tired,” he said. “And I’ve got a bad headache. But I feel a lot better. Let’s have
another one and then go up to your place and get a bath.”
“Maybe we ought to eat first.”
“I’m too dirty to eat. You can hold a place and I’ll go get a bath and join you at the Gran Via.”
“I’ll go up with you.”
“No. It’s better to hold a place and I’ll join you.” He leaned his head forward on the table. “Boy
I got a headache. It’s the noise in those buckets. I never hear it any more but it does something to your
ears just the same.”
“Why don’t you go to bed?”
“No. I’d rather stay up with you for a while and then sleep when I got back down there. I don’t
want to wake up twice.”
“You haven’t got the horrors, have you?”
“No,” he said. “I’m fine. Listen, Hank. I don’t want to talk a lot of crap but I think I’m going to
get killed tomorrow.”
I touched the table three times with my fingertips.
“Everybody feels like that. I’ve felt like that plenty of times.”
“No,” he said. “It’s not natural with me. But where we’ve got to go tomorrow doesn’t make
sense. I don’t even know that I can get them up there. You can’t make them move if they won’t go. You
can shoot them afterwards. But at the time if they won’t go they won’t go. If you shoot them they still
won’t go.”
“Maybe it will be all right.”
“No. We’ve got good infantry tomorrow. They’ll go anyway. Not like those yellow bastids we
had the first day.”
“Maybe it will be all right.”
“No,” he said. “It won’t be all right. But it will be just exactly as good as I can make it. I can
make them start all right and I can take them up to where they will have to quit one at a time. Maybe
they can make it. I’ve got three I can rely on. If only one of the good ones doesn’t get knocked out at
the start.”
“Who are your good ones?”
“I’ve got a big Greek from Chicago that will go anywhere. He’s just as good as they come. I’ve
got a Frenchman from Marseille that’s got his left shoulder in a cast with two wounds still draining
that asked to come out of the hospital in the Palace Hotel for this show and has to be strapped in and I
don’t know how he can do it. Just technically I mean. He’d break your bloody heart. He used to be a
taxi driver.” He stopped. “I’m talking too much. Stop me if I talk too much.”
“Who’s the third one?” I asked.
“The third one? Did I say I had a third one?”
“Sure.”
“Oh, yes,” he said. “That’s me.”
“What about the others?”
“They’re mechanics, but they couldn’t learn to soldier. They can’t size up what’s happening. And
they’re all afraid to die. I tried to get them over it,” he said. “But it comes back on them every attack.
They look like tank men when you see them by the tanks with the helmets on. They look like tank men
when they get in. But when they shut the traps down there’s really nothing inside. They aren’t tank
men. And so far we haven’t had time to make new ones.”
“Do you want to take the bath?”
“Let’s sit here a little while longer,” he said. “It’s nice here.”
“It’s funny all right, with a war right down the end of the street so you can walk to it, and then
leave it and come here.”
“And then walk back to it,” Al said.
“What about a girl? There’s two American girls at the Florida. Newspaper correspondents.
Maybe you could make one.”
“I don’t want to have to talk to them. I’m too tired.”
“There’s the two Moor girls from Ceuta at that corner table.”
He looked over at them. They were both dark and bushy-headed. One was large and one was
small and they certainly both looked strong and active.
“No,” said Al. “I’m going to see plenty Moors tomorrow without having to fool with them
tonight.”
“There’s plenty of girls,” I said. “Manolita’s at the Florida. That Seguridad bird she lives with
has gone to Valencia and she’s being true to him with everybody.”
“Listen, Hank, what are you trying to promote me?”
“I just wanted to cheer you up.”
“Grow up,” he said. “What’s one more?”
“One more.”
“I don’t mind dying a bit,” he said. “Dying is just a lot of crap. Only it’s wasteful. The attack is
wrong and it’s wasteful. I can handle tanks good now. If I had time I could make good tankists too.
And if we had tanks that were a little bit faster the anti-tanks wouldn’t bother them the way it does
when you haven’t got the mobility. Listen, Hank, they aren’t what we thought they were though. Do
you remember when everybody thought if we only had tanks?”
“They were good at Gaudalajara.”
“Sure. But those were the old boys. They were soldiers. And it was against Italians.”
“But what’s happened?”
“A lot of things. The mercenaries signed up for six months. Most of them were Frenchmen. They
soldiered good for five but now all they want to do is live through the last month and go home. They
aren’t worth a damn now. The Russians that came out as demonstrators when the government bought
the tanks were perfect. But they’re pulling them back now for China they say. The new Spaniards are
some of them good and some not. It takes six months to make a good tank man, I mean to know
anything. And to be able to size up and work intelligently you have to have a talent. We’ve been
having to make them in six weeks and there aren’t so many with a talent.”
“They make fine flyers.”
“They’ll make fine tank guys too. But you have to get the ones with a vocation for it. It’s sort of
like being a priest. You have to be cut out for it. Especially now they’ve got so much anti-tank.”
They had pulled down the shutters in Chicote’s and now they were locking the door. No one
would be allowed in now. But you had a half an hour more before they closed.
“I like it here,” said Al. “It isn’t so noisy now. Remember that time I met you in New Orleans
when I was on a ship and we went in to have a drink in the Monteleone bar and that kid that looked
just like Saint Sebastian was paging people with that funny voice like he was singing and I gave him a
quarter to page Mr. B. F. Slob?”
“That’s the same way you said ‘Casa del Campo.’ ”
“Yeah,” he said. “I laugh every time I think of that.” Then he went on, “You see, now, they’re not
frightened of tanks any more. Nobody is. We aren’t either. But they’re still useful. Really useful. Only
with the anti-tank now they’re so damn vulnerable. Maybe I ought to be in something else. Not really.
Because they’re still useful. But the way they are now you’ve got to have a vocation for them. You got
to have a lot of political development to be a good tank man now.”
“You’re a good tank man.”
“I’d like to be something else tomorrow,” he said. “I’m talking awfully wet but you have a right
to talk wet if it isn’t going to hurt anybody else. You know I like tanks too, only we don’t use them
right because the infantry don’t know enough yet. They just want the old tank ahead to give them some
cover while they go. That’s no good. Then they get to depending on the tanks and they won’t move
without them. Sometimes they won’t even deploy.”
“I know.”
“But you see if you had tankists that knew their stuff they’d go out ahead and develop the
machine-gun fire and then drop back behind the infantry and fire on the gun and knock it out and give
the infantry covering fire when they attacked. And other tanks could rush the machine-gun posts as
though they were cavalry. And they could straddle a trench and enfilade and put flaking fire down it.
And they could bring up infantry when it was right to or cover their advance when that was best.”
“But instead?”
“Instead it’s like it will be tomorrow. We have so damned few guns that we’re just used as
slightly mobile armored artillery units. And as soon as you are standing still and being light artillery,
you’ve lost your mobility and that’s your safety and they start sniping at you with the anti-tanks. And if
we’re not that we’re just sort of iron perambulators to push ahead of the infantry. And lately you don’t
know whether the perambulator will push or whether the guys inside will push them. And you never
know if there’s going to be anybody behind you when you get there.”
“How many are you now to a brigade?”
“Six to a battalion. Thirty to a brigade. That’s in principle.”
“Why don’t you come along now and get the bath and we’ll go and eat?”
“All right. But don’t you start taking care of me or thinking I’m worried or anything because I’m
not. I’m just tired and I wanted to talk. And don’t give me any pep talk either because we’ve got a
political commissar and I know what I’m fighting for and I’m not worried. But I’d like things to be
efficient and used as intelligently as possible.”
“What made you think I was going to give you any pep talk?”
“You started to look like it.”
“All I tried to do was see if you wanted a girl and not to talk too wet about getting killed.”
“Well, I don’t want any girl tonight and I’ll talk just as wet as I please unless it does damage to
others. Does it damage you?”
“Come on and get the bath,” I said. “You can talk just as bloody wet as you want.”
“Who do you suppose that little guy was that talked as though he knew so much?”
“I don’t know,” I said. “But I’m going to find out.”
“He made me gloomy,” said Al. “Come on. Let’s go.”
The old waiter with the bald head unlocked the outside door of Chicote’s and let us out into the
street.
“How is the offensive, comrades?” he said at the door.
“It’s O.K., comrade,” said Al. “It’s all right.”
“I am happy,” said the waiter. “My boy is in the One Hundred and Forty-fifth Brigade. Have you
seen them?”
“I am of the tanks,” said Al. “This comrade makes a cinema. Have you seen the Hundred and
Forty-fifth?”
“No,” I said.
“They are up the Extremadura road,” the old waiter said. “My boy is political commissar of the
machine-gun company of his battalion. He is my youngest boy. He is twenty.”
“What party are you comrade?” Al asked him.
“I am of no party,” the waiter said. “But my boy is a Communist.”
“So am I,” said Al. “The offensive, comrade, has not yet reached a decision. It is very difficult.
The fascists hold very strong positions. You, in the rear-guard, must be as firm as we will be at the
front. We may not take these positions now but we have proved we now have an army capable of
going on the offensive and you will see what it will do.”
“And the Extremadura road?” asked the old waiter, still holding on to the door. “Is it very
dangerous there?”
“No,” said Al. “It’s fine up there. You don’t need to worry about him up there.”
“God bless you,” said the waiter. “God guard you and keep you.”
Outside in the dark street, Al said, “Jees he’s kind of confused politically, isn’t he?”
“He is a good guy,” I said. “I’ve known him for a long time.”
“He seems like a good guy,” Al said. “But he ought to get wise to himself politically.”
The room at the Florida was crowded. They were playing the gramophone and it was full of
smoke and there was a crap game going on the floor. Comrades kept coming in to use the bathtub and
the room smelt of smoke, soap, dirty uniforms, and steam from the bathroom.
The Spanish girl called Manolita, very neat, demurely dressed, with a sort of false French chic,
with much joviality, much dignity and closely set cold eyes, was sitting on the bed talking with an
English newspaper man. Except for the gramophone it wasn’t very noisy.
“It is your room, isn’t it?” the English newspaper man said.
“It’s in my name at the desk,” I said. “I sleep in it sometimes.”
“But whose is the whisky?” he asked.
“Mine,” said Manolita. “They drank that bottle so I got another.”
“You’re a good girl, daughter,” I said. “That’s three I owe you.”
“Two,” she said. “The other was a present.”
There was a huge cooked ham, rosy and white edged in a half-opened tin on the table beside my
typewriter and a comrade would reach up, cut himself a slice of ham with his pocket knife, and go
back to the crap game. I cut myself a slice of ham.
“You’re next on the tub,” I said to Al. He had been looking around the room.
“It’s nice here,” he said. “Where did the ham come from?”
“We bought it from the intendencia of one of the brigades,” she said. “Isn’t it beautiful?”
“Who’s we?”
“He and I,” she said, turning her head toward the English correspondent. “Don’t you think he’s
cute?”
“Manolita has been most kind,” said the Englishman. “I hope we’re not disturbing you.”
“Not at all,” I said. “Later on I might want to use the bed but that won’t be until much later.”
“We can have a party in my room,” Manolita said. “You aren’t cross are you, Henry?”
“Never,” I said. “Who are the comrades shooting craps?”
“I don’t know,” said Manolita. “They came in for baths and then they stayed to shoot craps.
Everyone has been very nice. You know my bad news?”
“No.”
“It’s very bad. You knew my fiancé who was in the police and went to Barcelona?”
“Yes. Sure.”
Al went into the bathroom.
“Well, he was shot in an accident and I haven’t any one I can depend on in police circles and he
never got me the papers he had promised me and today I heard I was going to be arrested.”
“Why?”
“Because I have no papers and they say I hang around with you people and with people from the
brigades all the time so I am probably a spy. If my fiancé had not gotten himself shot it would have
been all right. Will you help me?”
“Sure,” I said. “Nothing will happen to you if you’re all right.”
“I think I’d better stay with you to be sure.”
“And if you’re not all right that would be fine for me, wouldn’t it?”
“Can’t I stay with you?”
“No. If you get in trouble call me up. I never heard you ask anybody any military questions. I
think you’re all right.”
“I’m really all right,” she said then, leaning over, away from the Englishman. “You think it’s all
right to stay with him? Is he all right?”
“How do I know?” I said. “I never saw him before.”
“You’re being cross,” she said. “Let’s not think about it now but everyone be happy and go out
to dinner.”
I went over to the crap game.
“You want to go out to dinner?”
“No, comrade,” said the man handling the dice without looking up. “You want to get in the
game?”
“I want to eat.”
“We’ll be here when you get back,” said another crap shooter. “Come on, roll, I’ve got you
covered.”
“If you run into any money bring it up here to the game.”
There was one in the room I knew besides Manolita. He was from the Twelfth Brigade and he
was playing the gramophone. He was a Hungarian, a sad Hungarian, not one of the cheerful kind.
“Salud camarade,” he said. “Thank you for your hospitality.”
“Don’t you shoot craps?” I asked him.
“I haven’t that sort of money,” he said. “They are aviators with contracts. Mercenaries … They
make a thousand dollars a month. They were on the Teruel front and now they have come here.”
“How did they come up here?”
“One of them knows you. But he had to go out to his field. They came for him in a car and the
game had already started.”
“I’m glad you came up,” I said. “Come up any time and make yourself at home.”
“I came to play the new discs,” he said. “It does not disturb you?”
“No. It’s fine. Have a drink.”
“A little ham,” he said.
One of the crap shooters reached up and cut a slice of ham.
“You haven’t seen this guy Henry around that owns the place, have you?” he asked me.
“That’s me.”
“Oh,” he said. “Sorry. Want to get in the game?”
“Later on,” I said.
“O.K.,” he said. Then his mouth full of ham, “Listen you tar heel bastid. Make your dice hit the
wall and bounce.”
“Won’t make no difference to you, comrade,” said the man handling the dice.
Al came out of the bathroom. He looked all clean except for some smudges around his eyes.
“You can take those off with a towel,” I said.
“What?”
“Look at yourself once more in the mirror.”
“It’s too steamy.” he said. “To hell with it, I feel clean.”
“Let’s eat,” I said. “Come on, Manolita. You know each other?”
I watched her eyes run over Al.
“How are you?” Manolita said.
“I say that is a sound idea,” the Englishman said. “Do let’s eat. But where?”
“Is that a crap game?” Al said.
“Didn’t you see it when you came in?”
“No,” he said. “All I saw was the ham.”
“It’s a crap game.”
“You go and eat,” Al said. “I’m staying here.”
As we went out there were six of them on the floor and Al Wagner was reaching up to cut a slice
of ham.
“What do you do, comrade?” I heard one of the flyers say to Al.
“Tanks.”
“Tell me they aren’t any good any more,” said the flyer.
“Tell you a lot of things,” Al said. “What you got there? Some dice?”
“Want to look at them?”
“No,” said Al. “I want to handle them.”
We went down the hall, Manolita, me and the tall Englishman, and found the boys had left
already for the Gran Via restaurant. The Hungarian had stayed behind to replay the new discs. I was
very hungry and the food at the Gran Via was lousy. The two who were making the film had already
eaten and gone back to work on the bad camera.
This restaurant was in the basement and you had to pass a guard and go through the kitchen and
down a stairs to get to it. It was a racket.
They had a millet and water soup, yellow rice with horse meat in it, and oranges for dessert.
There had been another dish of chickpeas with sausage in it that everybody said was terrible but it
had run out. The newspaper men all sat at one table and the other tables were filled with officers and
girls from Chicote’s, people from the censorship, which was then in the telephone building across the
street, and various unknown citizens.
The restaurant was run by an anarchist syndicate and they sold you wine that was all stamped
with the label of the royal cellars and the date it had been put in the bins. Most of it was so old that it
was either corked or just plain faded out and gone to pieces. You can’t drink labels and I sent three
bottles back as bad before we got a drinkable one. There was a row about this.
The waiters didn’t know the different wines. They just brought you a bottle of wine and you took
your chances. They were as different from the Chicote’s waiters as black from white. These waiters
were all snotty, all over-tipped and they regularly had special dishes such as lobster or chicken that
they sold extra for gigantic prices. But these had all been bought up before we got there so we just
drew the soup, the rice and the oranges. The place always made me angry because the waiters were a
crooked lot of profiteers and it was about as expensive to eat in, if you had one of the special dishes,
as 21 or the Colony in New York.
We were sitting at the table with a bottle of wine that just wasn’t bad, you know you could taste
it starting to go, but it wouldn’t justify making a row about, when Al Wagner came in. He looked
around the room, saw us and came over.
“What’s the matter?” I said.
“They broke me,” he said.
“It didn’t take very long.”
“Not with those guys,” he said. “That’s a big game. What have they got to eat?”
I called a waiter over.
“It’s too late,” he said. “We can’t serve anything now.”
“This comrade is in the tanks,” I said. “He has fought all day and he will fight tomorrow and he
hasn’t eaten.”
“That’s not my fault,” the waiter said. “It’s too late. There isn’t anything more. Why doesn’t the
comrade eat with his unit? The army has plenty of food.”
“I asked him to eat with me.”
“You should have said something about it. It’s too late now. We are not serving anything any
more.”
“Get the head waiter.”
The headwaiter said the cook had gone home and there was no fire in the kitchen. He went away.
They were angry because we had sent the bad wine back.
“The hell with it,” said Al. “Let’s go somewhere else.”
“There’s no place you can eat at this hour. They’ve got food. I’ll just have to go over and suck up
to the headwaiter and give him some more money.”
I went over and did just that and the sullen waiter brought a plate of cold sliced meats, then half
a spiny lobster with mayonnaise, and a salad of lettuce and lentils. The headwaiter sold this out of his
private stock which he was holding out either to take home, or sell to late comers.
“Cost you much?” Al asked.
“No,” I lied.
“I’ll bet it did,” he said. “I’ll fix up with you when I get paid.”
“What do you get now?”
“I don’t know yet. It was ten pesetas a day but they’ve raised it now I’m an officer. But we
haven’t got it yet and I haven’t asked.”
“Comrade,” I called the waiter. He came over, still angry that the headwaiter had gone over his
head and served Al. “Bring another bottle of wine, please.”
“What kind?”
“Any that is not too old so that the red is faded.”
“It’s all the same.”
I said the equivalent of like hell it is in Spanish, and the waiter brought over a bottle of Château
Mouton-Rothschild 1906 that was just as good as the last claret we had was rotten.
“Boy that’s wine,” Al said. “What did you tell him to get that?”
“Nothing. He just made a lucky draw out of the bin.”
“Most of that stuff from the palace stinks.”
“It’s too old. This is a hell of a climate on wine.”
“There’s that wise comrade,” Al nodded across at another table.
The little man with the thick glasses that had talked to us about Largo Caballero was talking with
some people I knew were very big shots indeed.
“I guess he’s a big shot,” I said.
“When they’re high enough up they don’t give a damn what they say. But I wish he would have
waited until after tomorrow. It’s kind of spoiled tomorrow for me.”
I filled his glass.
“What he said sounded pretty sensible,” Al went on. “I’ve been thinking it over. But my duty is
to do what I’m ordered to do.”
“Don’t worry about it and get some sleep.”
“I’m going to get in that game again if you’ll let me take a thousand pesetas,” Al said. “I’ve got a
lot more than that coming to me and I’ll give you an order on my pay.”
“I don’t want any order. You can pay me when you get it.”
“I don’t think I’m going to draw it,” Al said. “I certainly sound wet, don’t I? And I know
gambling’s bohemianism too. But in a game like that is the only time I don’t think about tomorrow.”
“Did you like that Manolita girl? She liked you.”
“She’s got eyes like a snake.”
“She’s not a bad girl. She’s friendly and she’s all right.”
“I don’t want any girl. I want to get back in that crap game.”
Down the table Manolita was laughing at something the new Englishman had said in Spanish.
Most of the people had left the table.
“Let’s finish the wine and go,” Al said. “Don’t you want to get in that game?”
“I’ll watch you for a while,” I said and called the waiter over to bring us the bill.
“Where you go?” Manolita called down the table.
“To the room.”
“We come by later on,” she said. “This man is very funny.”
“She is making most awful sport of me,” the Englishman said. “She picks up on my errors in
Spanish. I say, doesn’t leche mean milk?”
“That’s one interpretation of it.”
“Does it mean something beastly too?”
“I’m afraid so,” I said.
“You know it is a beastly language,” he said. “Now Manolita, stop pulling my leg. I say stop it.”
“I’m not pulling your leg,” Manolita laughed. “I never touched your leg. I am just laughing about
the leche.”
“But it does mean milk. Didn’t you just hear Edwin Henry say so?”
Manolita started to laugh again and we got up to go.
“He’s a silly piece of work,” Al said. “I’d almost like to take her away because he’s so silly.”
“You can never tell about an Englishman,” I said. It was such a profound remark that I knew we
had ordered too many bottles. Outside, in the street, it was turning cold and in the moonlight the
clouds were passing very big and white across the wide, building-sided canyon of the Gran Via and
we walked up the sidewalk with the day’s fresh shell holes neatly cut in the cement, their rubble still
not swept away, on up the rise of the hill toward the Plaza Callao where the Florida Hotel faced
down the other little hill where the wide street ran that ended at the front.
We went past the two guards in the dark outside the door of the hotel and listened a minute in the
doorway as the shooting down the street strengthened into a roll of firing, then dropped off.
“If it keeps up I guess I ought to go down,” Al said listening.
“That wasn’t anything,” I said. “Anyway that was off to the left by Carabanchel.”
“It sounded straight down in the Campo.”
“That’s the way the sound throws here at night. It always fools you.”
“They aren’t going to counterattack us tonight,” Al said. “When they’ve got those positions and
we are up that creek they aren’t going to leave their positions to try to kick us out of that creek.”
“What creek?”
“You know the name of that creek.”
“Oh. That creek.”
“Yeah. Up that creek without a paddle.”
“Come on inside. You didn’t have to listen to that firing. That’s the way it is every night.”
We went inside, crossed the lobby, passing the night watchman at the concierge’s desk and the
night watchman got up and went with us to the elevator. He pushed a button and the elevator came
down. In it was a man with a white curly sheep’s wool jacket, the wool worn inside, a pink bald
head, and a pink, angry face. He had six bottles of champagne under his arms and in his hands and he
said, “What the hell’s the idea of bringing the elevator down?”
“You’ve been riding in the elevator for an hour,” the night watchman said.
“I can’t help it,” said the wooly jacket man. Then to me, “Where’s Frank?”
“Frank who?”
“You know Frank,” he said. “Come on, help me with this elevator.”
“You’re drunk,” I said to him. “Come on, skip it and let us get upstairs.”
“So would you be drunk,” said the white woolly jacket man. “So would you be drunk comrade
old comrade. Listen, where’s Frank?”
“Where do you think he is?”
“In this fellow Henry’s room where the crap game is.”
“Come on with us,” I said. “Don’t fool with those buttons. That’s why you stop it all the time.”
“I can fly anything,” said the woolly jacket man. “And I can fly this old elevator. Want me to
stunt it?”
“Skip it,” Al said to him. “You’re drunk. We want to get to the crap game.”
“Who are you? I’ll hit you with a bottle full of champagne wine.”
“Try it,” said Al. “I’d like to cool you, you rummy fake Santa Claus.”
“A rummy fake Santa Claus,” said the bald man. “A rummy fake Santa Claus. And that’s the
thanks of the Republic.”
We had gotten the elevator stopped at my floor and were walking down the hall. “Take some
bottles,” said the bald man. Then, “Do you know why I’m drunk?”
“No.”
“Well, I won’t tell you. But you’d be surprised. A rummy fake Santa Claus. Well well well.
What are you in, comrade?”
“Tanks.”
“And you, comrade?”
“Making a picture.”
“And I’m a rummy fake Santa Claus. Well. Well. Well. I repeat. Well. Well. Well.”
“Go and drown in it,” said Al. “You rummy fake Santa Claus.”
We were outside the room now. The man in the white woolly coat took hold of Al’s arm with his
thumb and forefinger.
“You amuse me, comrade,” he said. “You truly amuse me.”
I opened the door. The room was full of smoke and the game looked just as when we had left it
except the ham was all gone off the table and the whisky all gone out of the bottle.
“It’s Baldy,” said one of the crap shooters.
“How do you do, comrades,” said Baldy, bowing. “How do you do? How do you do? How do
you do?”
The game broke up and they all started to shoot questions at him.
“I have made my report, comrades,” Baldy said. “And here is a little champagne wine. I am no
longer interested in any but the picturesque aspects of the whole affair.”
“Where did your wingmen muck off to?”
“It wasn’t their fault,” said Baldy. “I was engaged in contemplating a terrific spectacle and I was
ob-livious of the fact that I had any wingmen until all of those Fiats started coming down over, past
and under me and I realized that my trusty little air-o-plane no longer had any tail.”
“Jees I wish you weren’t drunk,” said one of the flyers.
“But I am drunk,” said Baldy. “And I hope all you gentlemen and comrades will join me because
I am very happy tonight even though I have been insulted by an ignorant tank man who has called me a
rummy fake Santa Claus.”
“I wish you were sober,” the other flyer said. “How’d you get back to the field?”
“Don’t ask me any questions,” Baldy said with great dignity. “I returned in a staff car of the
Twelfth Brigade. When I alighted with my trusty para-chute there was a tendency to regard me as a
criminal fascist due to my inability to master the Lanish Spanguage. But all difficulties were smoothed
away when I convinced them of my identity and I was treated with rare consideration. Oh boy you
ought to have seen that Junker when she started to burn. That’s what I was watching when the Fiats
dove on me. Oh boy I wish I could tell you.”
“He shot a tri-moter Junker down today over the Jarama and his wingmen mucked off on him and
he got shot down and bailed out,” one of the flyers said. “You know him. Baldy Jackson.”
“How far did you drop before you pulled your rip cord, Baldy?” asked another flyer.
“All of six thousand feet and I think my diaphragm is busted loose in front from when she came
taut. I thought it would cut me in two. There must have been fifteen Fiats and I wanted to get
completely clear. I had to fool with the chute plenty to get down on the right side of the river. I had to
slip her plenty and I hit pretty hard. The wind was good.”
“Frank had to go back to Alcalá,” another flyer said. “We started a crap game. We got to get
back there before daylight.”
“I am in no mood to toy with the dice,” said Baldy. “I am in a mood to drink champagne wine out
of glasses with cigarette butts in them.”
“I’ll wash them,” said Al.
“For Comrade Fake Santa Claus,” said Baldy. “For old Comrade Claus.”
“Skip it,” said Al. He picked up the glasses and took them to the bathroom.
“Is he in the tanks?” asked one of the flyers.
“Yes. He’s been there since the start.”
“They tell me the tanks aren’t any good any more,” a flyer said.
“You told him that once,” I said. “Why don’t you lay off? He’s been working all day.”
“So have we. But I mean really they aren’t any good, are they?”
“Not so good. But he’s good.”
“I guess he’s all right. He looks like a nice fellow. What kind of money do they make?”
“They got ten pesetas a day,” I said. “Now he gets a lieutenant’s pay.”
“Spanish lieutenant?”
“Yes.”
“I guess he’s nuts all right. Or has he got politics?”
“He’s got politics.”
“Oh, well,” he said. “That explains it. Say Baldy, you must have had a hell of a time bailing out
with that wind pressure with the tail gone.”
“Yes, comrade,” said Baldy.
“How did you feel?”
“I was thinking all the time, comrade.”
“Baldy, how many bailed out of the Junker?”
“Four,” said Baldy, “out of a crew of six. I was sure I’d killed the pilot. I noticed when he quit
firing. There’s a co-pilot that’s a gunner too and I’m pretty sure I got him too. I must have because he
quit firing too. But maybe it was the heat. Anyhow four came out. Would you like me to describe the
scene? I can describe the scene very well.”
He was sitting on the bed now with a large water glass of champagne in his hand and his pink
head and pink face were moist with sweat.
“Why doesn’t anyone drink to me?” asked Baldy. “I would like all comrades to drink to me and
then I will describe the scene in all its horror and its beauty.”
We all drank.
“Where was I?” asked Baldy.
“Just coming out of the McAlester Hotel,” a flyer said. “In all your horror and your beauty—
don’t clown, Baldy. Oddly enough we’re interested.”
“I will describe it,” said Baldy. “But first I must have more champagne wine.” He had drained
the glass when we drank to him.
“If he drinks like that he’ll go to sleep,” another flyer said. “Only give him half a glass.”
Baldy drank it off.
“I will describe it,” he said. “After another little drink.”
“Listen, Baldy, take it easy will you? This is something we want to get straight. You got no ship
now for a few days but we’re flying tomorrow and this is important as well as interesting.”
“I made my report,” said Baldy. “You can read it out at the field. They’ll have a copy.”
“Come on, Baldy, snap out of it.”
“I will describe it eventually,” said Baldy. He shut and opened his eyes several times, then said,
“Hello Comrade Santa Claus” to Al. “I will describe it eventually. All you comrades have to do is
listen.”
And he described it.
“It was very strange and very beautiful,” Baldy said and drank off the glass of champagne.
“Cut it out, Baldy,” a flyer said.
“I have experienced profound emotions,” Baldy said. “Highly profound emotions. Emotions of
the deepest dye.”
“Let’s get back to Alcalá,” one flyer said. “That pink head isn’t going to make sense. What about
the game?”
“He’s going to make sense,” another flyer said. “He’s just winding up.”
“Are you criticizing me?” asked Baldy. “Is that the thanks of the Republic?”
“Listen, Santa Claus,” Al said. “What was it like?”
“Are you asking me?” Baldy stared at him. “Are you putting questions to me? Have you ever
been in action, comrade?”
“No,” said Al. “I got these eyebrows burnt off when I was shaving.”
“Keep your drawers on, comrade,” said Baldy. “I will describe the strange and beautiful scene.
I’m a writer, you know, as well as a flyer.”
He nodded his head in confirmation of his own statement.
“He writes for the Meridian, Mississippi, Argus,” said a flyer. “All the time. They can’t stop
him.”
“I have talent as a writer,” said Baldy. “I have a fresh and original talent for description. I have
a newspaper clipping which I have lost which says so. Now I will launch myself on the description.”
“O.K. What did it look like?”
“Comrades,” said Baldy. “You can’t describe it.” He held out his glass.
“What did I tell you?” said a flyer. “He couldn’t make sense in a month. He never could make
sense.”
“You,” said Baldy, “you unfortunate little fellow. All right. When I banked out of it I looked
down and of course she had been pouring back smoke but she was holding right on her course to get
over the mountains. She was losing altitude fast and I came up and over and dove on her again. There
were still wingmen then and she’d lurched and started to smoke twice as much and then the door of
the cockpit came open and it was just like looking into a blast furnace, and then they started to come
out. I’d half rolled, dove, and then pulled up out of it and I was looking back and down and they were
coming out of her, out through the blast furnace door, dropping out trying to get clear, and the chutes
opened up and they looked like great big beautiful morning glories opening up and she was just one
big thing of flame now like you never saw and going round and round and there were four chutes just
as beautiful as anything you could see just pulling slow against the sky and then one started to burn at
the edge and as it burned the man started to drop fast and I was watching him when the bullets started
to come by and the Fiats right behind them and the bullets and the Fiats.”
“You’re a writer all right,” said one flyer. “You ought to write for War Aces. Do you mind
telling me in plain language what happened?”
“No,” said Baldy. “I’ll tell you. But you know, no kidding, it was something to see. And I never
shot down any big tri-motor Junkers before and I’m happy.”
“Everybody’s happy, Baldy. Tell us what happened, really.”
“O.K.” said Baldy. “I’ll just drink a little wine and then I’ll tell you.”
“How were you when you sighted them?”
“We were in a left echelon of V’s. Then we went into a left echelon of echelons and dove onto
them with all four guns until you could have touched them before we rolled out of it. We crippled
three others. The Fiats were hanging up in the sun. They didn’t come down until I was sightseeing all
by myself.”
“Did your wingmen muck off?”
“No. It was my fault. I started watching the spectacle and they were gone. There isn’t any
formation for watching spectacles. I guess they went on and picked up the echelon. I don’t know.
Don’t ask me. And I’m tired. I was elated. But now I’m tired.”
“You’re sleepy you mean. You’re rum-dumb and sleepy.”
“I am simply tired,” said Baldy. “A man in my position has the right to be tired. And if I become
sleepy I have the right to be sleepy. Don’t I Santa Claus?” he said to Al.
“Yeah,” said Al. “I guess you have the right to be sleepy. I’m even sleepy myself. Isn’t there
going to be any crap game?”
“We got to get him out to Alcalá and we’ve got to get out there too,” a flyer said. “Why? You
lost money in the game?”
“A little,” said Al.
“ou want to try to pass for it once?” the flyer asked him.
“I’ll shoot a thousand,” Al said.
“I’ll fade you,” the flyer said. “You guys don’t make much, do you?”
“No,” said Al. “We don’t make much.”
He laid the thousand-peseta note down on the floor, rolled the dice between his palms so they
clicked over and over, and shot them out on the floor with a snap. Two ones showed.
“They’re still your dice,” the flyer said, picking up the bill and looking at Al.
“I don’t need them,” said Al. He stood up.
“Need any dough?” the flyer asked him. Looking at him curiously.
“Got no use for it,” Al said.
“We’ve got to get the hell out to Alcalá,” the flyer said. “We’ll have a game some night soon.
We’ll get hold of Frank and the rest of them. We could get up a pretty good game. Can we give you a
lift?”
“Yes. Want a ride?”
“No,” Al said. “I’m walking. It’s just down the street.”
“Well, we’re going out to Alcalá. Does anybody know the password for tonight?”
“Oh, the chauffeur will have it. He’ll have gone by and picked it up before dark.”
“Come on, Baldy. You drunken sleepy bum.”
“Not me,” said Baldy. “I am a potential ace of the people’s army.”
“Takes ten to be an ace. Even if you count Italians. You’ve only got one, Baldy.”
“It wasn’t Italians,” said Baldy. “It was Germans. And you didn’t see her when she was all hot
like that inside. She was a raging inferno.”
“Carry him out,” said a flyer. “He’s writing for that Meridian, Mississippi, paper again. Well,
so long. Thanks for having us up in the room.”
They all shook hands and they were gone. I went to the head of the stairs with them. The elevator
was no longer running and I watched them go down the stairs. One was on each side of Baldy and he
was nodding his head slowly. He was really sleepy now.
In their room the two I was working on the picture with were still working over the bad camera.
It was delicate, eye-straining work and when I asked, “Do you think you’ll get her?” the tall one said,
“Yes. Sure. We have to. I make a piece now which was broken.”
“What was the party?” asked the other. “We work always on this damn camera.”
“American flyers,” I said. “And a fellow I used to know who’s in tanks.”
“Goot fun? I am sorry not to be there.”
“All right,” I said. “Kind of funny.”
“You must get sleep. We must all be up early. We must be fresh for tomorrow.”
“How much more have you got on that camera?”
“There it goes again. Damn such shape springs.”
“Leave him alone. We finish it. Then we all sleep. What time you call us?”
“Five?”
“All right. As soon as is light.”
“Good night.”
“Salud. Get some sleep.”
“Salud,” I said. “We’ve got to be closer tomorrow.”
“Yes,” he said. “I have thought so too. Much closer. I am glad you know.”
Al was asleep in the big chair in the room with the light on his face. I put a blanket over him but
he woke.
“I’m going down.”
“Sleep here. I’ll set the alarm and call you.”
“Something might happen with the alarm,” he said. “I better go down. I don’t want to get there
late.”
“I’m sorry about the game.”
“They’d have broke me anyway,” he said. “Those guys are poisonous with dice.”
“You had the dice there on that last play.”
“They’re poisonous fading you too. They’re strange guys too. I guess they don’t get overpaid. I
guess if you are doing it for dough there isn’t enough dough to pay for doing it.”
“Want me to walk down with you?”
“No,” he said, standing up, and buckling on the big web-belted Colt he had taken off when he
came back after dinner to the game. “No, I feel fine now. I’ve got my perspective back again. All you
need is a perspective.”
“I’d like to walk down.”
“No. Get some sleep. I’ll go down and I’ll get a good five hours’ sleep before it starts.”
“That early?”
“Yeah. You won’t have any light to film by. You might as well stay in bed.” He took an envelope
out of his leather coat and laid it on the table. “Take this stuff, will you, and send it to my brother in
N.Y. His address is on the back of the envelope.”
“Sure. But I won’t have to send it.”
“No,” he said. “I don’t think you will now. But there’s some pictures and stuff they’ll like to
have. He’s got a nice wife. Want to see her picture?”
He took it out of his pocket. It was inside his identity book.
It showed a pretty, dark girl standing by a rowboat on the shore of a lake.
“Up in the Catskills,” said Al. “Yeah. He’s got a nice wife. She’s a Jewish girl. Yes,” he said.
“Don’t let me get wet again. So long, kid. Take it easy. I tell you truly I feel O.K. now. And I didn’t
feel good when I came out this afternoon.”
“Let me walk down.”
“No. You might have trouble coming back through the Plaza de Espana. Some of those guys are
nervous at night. Good night. See you tomorrow night.”
“That’s the way to talk.”
Upstairs in the room above mine, Manolita and the Englishman were making quite a lot of noise.
So she evidently hadn’t been arrested.
“That’s right. That’s the way to talk,” Al said. “Takes you sometimes three or four hours to get
so you can do it though.”
He’d put the leather helmet on now with the raised padded ridge and his face looked dark and I
noticed the dark hollows under his eyes.
“See you tomorrow night at Chicote’s,” I said.
“That’s right,” he said, and wouldn’t look me in the eye. “See you tomorrow night at Chicote’s.”
“What time?”
“Listen, that’s enough,” he said. “Tomorrow night at Chicote’s. We don’t have to go into the
time.” And he went out.
If you hadn’t known him pretty well and if you hadn’t seen the terrain where he was going to
attack tomorrow, you would have thought he was very angry about something. I guess somewhere
inside of himself he was angry, very angry. You get angry about a lot of things and you, yourself,
dying uselessly is one of them. But then I guess angry is about the best way that you can be when you
attack.
Under the Ridge
IN THE HEAT OF THE DAY WITH THE DUST blowing, we came
back, dry-mouthed, nose-clogged and heavy-loaded, down out of the battle to the long ridge above the
river where the Spanish troops lay in reserve.
I sat down with my back against the shallow trench, my shoulders and the back of my head
against the earth, clear now from even stray bullets, and looked at what lay below us in the hollow.
There was the tank reserve, the tanks covered with branches chopped from olive trees. To their left
were the staff cars, mud-daubed and branch-covered, and between the two a long line of men carrying
stretchers wound down through the gap to where, on the flat at the foot of the ridge, ambulances were
loading. Commissary mules loaded with sacks of bread and kegs of wine, and a train of ammunition
mules, led by their drivers, were coming up the gap in the ridge, and men with empty stretchers were
walking slowly up the trail with the mules.
To the right, below the curve of the ridge, I could see the entrance to the cave where the brigade
staff was working, and their signaling wires ran out of the top of the cave and curved on over the
ridge in the shelter of which we lay.
Motorcyclists in leather suits and helmets came up and down the cut on their cycles or, where it
was too steep, walking them, and leaving them beside the cut, walked over to the entrance to the cave
and ducked inside. As I watched, a big Hungarian cyclist that I knew came out of the cave, tucked
some papers in his leather wallet, walked over to his motorcycle and, pushing it up through the stream
of mules and stretcher-bearers, threw a leg over the saddle and roared on over the ridge, his machine
churning a storm of dust.
Below, across the flat where the ambulances were coming and going, was the green foliage that
marked the line of the river. There was a large house with a red tile roof and there was a gray stone
mill, and from the trees around the big house beyond the river came the flashes of our guns. They were
firing straight at us and there were the twin flashes, then the throaty, short bung-bung of the three-inch
pieces and then the rising cry of the shells coming toward us and going on over our heads. As always,
we were short of artillery. There were only four batteries down there, when there should have been
forty, and they were firing only two guns at a time. The attack had failed before we came down.
“Are you Russians?” a Spanish soldier asked me.
“No, Americans,” I said. “Have you any water?”
“Yes, comrade.” He handed over a pigskin bag. These troops in reserve were soldiers only in
name and from the fact that they were in uniform. They were not intended to be used in the attack, and
they sprawled along this line under the crest of the ridge, huddled in groups, eating, drinking and
talking, or simply sitting dumbly, waiting. The attack was being made by an International Brigade.
We both drank. The water tasted of asphalt and pig bristles.
“Wine is better,” the soldier said. “I will get wine.”
“Yes. But for the thirst, water.”
“There is no thirst like the thirst of battle. Even here, in reserve, I have much thirst.”
“That is fear,” said another soldier. “Thirst is fear.”
“No,” said another. “With fear there is thirst, always. But in battle there is much thirst even when
there is no fear.”
“There is always fear in battle,” said the first soldier.
“For you,” said the second soldier.
“It is normal,” the first soldier said.
“For you.”
“Shut your dirty mouth,” said the first soldier. “I am simply a man who tells the truth.”
It was a bright April day and the wind was blowing wildly so that each mule that came up the
gap raised a cloud of dust, and the two men at the ends of a stretcher each raised a cloud of dust that
blew together and made one, and below, across the flat, long streams of dust moved out from the
ambulances and blew away in the wind.
I felt quite sure I was not going to be killed on that day now, since we had done our work well in
the morning, and twice during the early part of the attack we should have been killed and were not;
and this had given me confidence. The first time had been when we had gone up with the tanks and
picked a place from which to film the attack. Later I had a sudden distrust for the place and we had
moved the cameras about two hundred yards to the left. Just before leaving, I had marked the place in
quite the oldest way there is of marking a place, and within ten minutes a six-inch shell had lit on the
exact place where I had been and there was no trace of any human being ever having been there.
Instead, there was a large and clearly blasted hole in the earth.
Then, two hours later, a Polish officer, recently detached from the batalion and attached to the
staff, had offered to show us the positions the Poles had just captured and, coming from under the lee
of a fold of hill, we had walked into machine-gun fire that we had to crawl out from under with our
chins tight to the ground and dust in our noses, and at the same time made the sad discovery that the
Poles had captured no positions at all that day but were a little further back than the place they had
started from. And now, lying in the shelter of the trench, I was wet with sweat, hungry and thirsty and
hollow inside from the now-finished danger of the attack.
“You are sure you are not Russians?” asked a soldier. “There are Russians here today.”
“Yes. But we are not Russians.”
“You have the face of a Russian.”
“No,” I said. “You are wrong, comrade. I have quite a funny face but it is not the face of a
Russian.”
“He has the face of a Russian,” pointing at the other one of us who was working on a camera.
“Perhaps. But still he is not Russian. Where you from?”
“Extremadura,” he said proudly.
“Are there any Russians in Extremadura?” I asked.
“No,” he told me, even more proudly. “There are no Russians in Extremadura, and there are no
Extremadurans in Russia.”
“What are your politics?”
“I hate all foreigners,” he said.
“That’s a broad political program.”
“I hate the Moors, the English, the French, the Italians, the Germans, the North Americans and the
Russians.”
“You hate them in that order?”
“Yes. But perhaps I hate the Russians the most.”
“Man, you have very interesting ideas,” I said. “Are you a fascist?”
“No. I am an Extremaduran and I hate foreigners.”
“He has very rare ideas,” said another soldier. “Do not give him too much importance. Me, I like
foreigners. I am from Valencia. Take another cup of wine, please.”
I reached up and took the cup, the other wine still brassy in my mouth. I looked at the
Extremaduran. He was tall and thin. His face was haggard and unshaven, and his cheeks were sunken.
He stood straight up in his rage, his blanket cape around his shoulders.
“Keep your head down,” I told him. “There are many lost bullets coming over.”
“I have no fear of bullets and I hate all foreigners,” he said fiercely.
“You don’t have to fear bullets,” I said, “but you should avoid them when you are in reserve. It
is not intelligent to be wounded when it can be avoided.”
“I am not afraid of anything,” the Extremaduran said.
“You are very lucky, comrade.”
“It’s true,” the other, with the wine cup, said. “He has no fear, not even of the aviones.”
“He is crazy,” another soldier said. “Everyone fears planes. They kill little but make much fear.”
“I have no fear. Neither of planes nor of nothing,” the Extremaduran said. “And I hate every
foreigner alive.”
Down the gap, walking beside two stretcher-bearers and seeming to pay no attention at all to
where he was, came a tall man in International Brigade uniform with a blanket rolled over his
shoulder and tied at his waist. His head was held high and he looked like a man walking in his sleep.
He was middle-aged. He was not carrying a rifle and, from where I lay, he did not look wounded.
I watched him walking alone down out of the war. Before he came to the staff cars he turned to
the left and his head still held high in that strange way, he walked over the edge of the ridge and out of
sight.
The one who was with me, busy changing film in the hand cameras, had not noticed him.
A single shell came in over the ridge and fountained in the dirt and black smoke just short of the
tank reserve.
Someone put his head out of the cave where brigade headquarters was and then disappeared
inside. I thought it looked like a good place to go, but knew they would all be furious in there because
the attack was a failure, and I did not want to face them. If an operation was successful they were
happy to have motion pictures of it. But if it was a failure everyone was in such a rage there was
always a chance of being sent back under arrest.
“They may shell us now,” I said.
“That makes no difference to me,” said the Extremaduran. I was beginning to be a little tired of
the Extremaduran.
“Have you any more wine to spare?” I asked. My mouth was still dry.
“Yes, man. There are gallons of it,” the friendly soldier said. He was short, big-fisted and very
dirty, with a stubble of beard about the same length as the hair on his cropped head. “Do you think
they will shell us now?”
“They should,” I said. “But in this war you can never tell.”
“What is the matter with this war?” asked the Extremaduran angrily. “Don’t you like this war?”
“Shut up!” said the friendly soldier. “I command here, and these comrades are our guests.”
“Then let him not talk against our war,” said the Extremaduran. “No foreigners shall come here
and talk against our war.”
“What town are you from, comrade?” I asked the Extremaduran.
“Badajoz,” he said. “I am from Badajoz. In Badajoz, we have been sacked and pillaged and our
women violated by the English, the French and now the Moors. What the Moors have done now is no
worse than what the English did under Wellington. You should read history. My great-grandmother
was killed by the English. The house where my family lived was burned by the English.”
“I regret it,” I said. “Why do you hate the North Americans?”
“My father was killed by the North Americans in Cuba while he was there as a conscript.”
“I am sorry for that, too. Truly sorry. Believe me. And why do you hate the Russians?”
“Because they are the representatives of tyranny and I hate their faces. You have the face of a
Russian.”
“Maybe we better get out of here,” I said to the one who was with me and who did not speak
Spanish. “It seems I have the face of a Russian and it’s getting me into trouble.”
“I’m going to sleep,” he said. “This is a good place. Don’t talk so much and you won’t get into
trouble.”
“There’s a comrade here that doesn’t like me. I think he’s an anarchist.”
“Well, watch out he doesn’t shoot you, then. I’m going to sleep.”
Just then two men in leather coats, one short and stocky, the other of medium height, both with
civilian caps, flat, high-cheekboned faces, wooden-holstered Mauser pistols strapped to their legs,
came out of the gap and headed toward us.
The taller of them spoke to me in French. “Have you seen a French comrade pass through here?”
he asked. “A comrade with a blanket tied around his shoulders in the form of a bandoleer? A comrade
of about forty-five or fifty years old? Have you seen such a comrade going in the direction away from
the front?”
“No,” I said. “I have not seen such a comrade.”
He looked at me a moment and I noticed his eyes were a grayish-yellow and that they did not
blink at all.
“Thank you, comrade,” he said, in his odd French, and then spoke rapidly to the other man with
him in a language I did not understand. They went off and climbed the highest part of the ridge, from
where they could see down all the gullies.
“There is the true face of Russians,” the Extremaduran said.
“Shut up!” I said. I was watching the two men in the leather coats. They were standing there,
under considerable fire, looking carefully over all the broken country below the ridge and toward the
river.
Suddenly one of them saw what he was looking for, and pointed. Then the two started to run like
hunting dogs, one straight down over the ridge, the other at an angle as though to cut someone off.
Before the second one went over the crest I could see him drawing his pistol and holding it ahead of
him as he ran.
“And how do you like that?” asked the Extremaduran.
“No better than you,” I said.
Over the crest of the parallel ridge I heard the Mausers’ jerky barking. They kept it up for more
than a dozen shots. They must have opened fire at too long a range. After all the burst of shooting there
was a pause and then a single shot.
The Extremaduran looked at me sullenly and said nothing. I thought it would be simpler if the
shelling started. But it did not start.
The two in the leather coats and civilian caps came back over the ridge, walking together, and
then down to the gap, walking downhill with that odd bent-kneed way of the two-legged animal
coming down a steep slope. They turned up the gap as a tank came whirring and clanking down and
moved to one side to let it pass.
The tanks had failed again that day, and the drivers coming down from the lines in their leather
helmets, the tank turrets open now as they came into the shelter of the ridge, had the straight-ahead
stare of football players who have been removed from a game for yellowness.
The two flat-faced men in the leather coats stood by us on the ridge to let the tank pass.
“Did you find the comrade you were looking for?” I asked the taller one of them in French.
“Yes, comrade. Thank you,” he said and looked me over very carefully.
“What does he say?” the Extremaduran asked.
“He says they found the comrade they were looking for,” I told him. The Extremaduran said
nothing.
We had been all that morning in the place the middle-aged Frenchman had walked out of. We
had been there in the dust, the smoke, the noise, the receiving of wounds, the death, the fear of death,
the bravery, the cowardice, the insanity and failure of an unsuccessful attack. We had been there on
that plowed field men could not cross and live. You dropped and lay flat; making a mound to shield
your head; working your chin into the dirt; waiting for the order to go up that slope no man could go
up and live.
We had been with those who lay there waiting for the tanks that did not come; waiting under the
inrushing shriek and roaring crash of the shelling; the metal and the earth thrown like clods from a dirt
fountain; and overhead the cracking, whispering fire like a curtain. We knew how those felt, waiting.
They were as far forward as they could get. And men could not move further and live, when the order
came to move ahead.
We had been there all morning in the place the middle-aged Frenchman had come walking away
from. I understood how a man might suddenly, seeing clearly the stupidity of dying in an unsuccessful
attack; or suddenly seeing it clearly, as you can see clearly and justly before you die; seeing its
hopelessness, seeing its idiocy, seeing how it really was, simply get back and walk away from it as
the Frenchman had done. He could walk out of it not from cowardice, but simply from seeing too
clearly; knowing suddenly that he had to leave it; knowing there was no other thing to do.
The Frenchman had come walking out of the attack with great dignity and I understood him as a
man. But, as a soldier, these other men who policed the battle had hunted him down, and the death he
had walked away from had found him when he was just over the ridge, clear of the bullets and the
shelling, and walking toward the river.
“And that,” the Extremaduran said to me, nodding toward the battle police.
“Is war,” I said. “In war, it is necessary to have discipline.”
“And to live under that sort of discipline we should die?”
“Without discipline everyone will die anyway.”
“There is one kind of discipline and another kind of discipline,” the Extremaduran said. “Listen
to me. In February we were here where we are now and the fascists attacked. They drove us from the
hills that you Internationals tried to take today and that you could not take. We fell back to here; to this
ridge. Internationals came up and took the line ahead of us.”
“I know that,” I said.
“But you do not know this,” he went on angrily. “There was a boy from my province who
became frightened during the bombardment, and he shot himself in the hand so that he could leave the
line because he was afraid.”
The other soldiers were all listening now. Several nodded.
“Such people have their wounds dressed and are returned at once to the line,” the Extremaduran
went on. “It is just.”
“Yes,” I said. “That is as it should be.”
“That is as it should be,” said the Extremaduran. “But this boy shot himself so badly that the
bone was all smashed and there surged up an infection and his hand was amputated.”
Several soldiers nodded.
“Go on, tell him the rest,” said one.
“It might be better not to speak of it,” said the cropped-headed, bristly-faced man who said he
was in command.
“It is my duty to speak,” the Extremaduran said.
The one in command shrugged his shoulders. “I did not like it either,” he said. “Go on, then. But
I do not like to hear it spoken of either.”
“This boy remained in the hospital in the valley since February,” the Extremaduran said. “Some
of us have seen him in the hospital. All say he was well liked in the hospital and made himself as
useful as a man with one hand can be useful. Never was he under arrest. Never was there anything to
prepare him.”
The man in command handed me the cup of wine again without saying anything. They were all
listening; as men who cannot read or write listen to a story.
“Yesterday, at the close of day, before we knew there was to be an attack. Yesterday, before the
sun set, when we thought today was to be as any other day, they brought him up the trail in the gap
there from the flat. We were cooking the evening meal and they brought him up. There were only four
of them. Him, the boy Paco, those two you have just seen in the leather coats and the caps, and an
officer from the brigade. We saw the four of them climbing together up the gap, and we saw Pace’s
hands were not tied, nor was he bound in any way.
“When we saw him we all crowded around and said, ‘Hello, Paco. How are you, Paco? How is
everything, Paco, old boy, old Paco?’
“Then he said, ‘Everything’s all right. Everything is good except this’— and showed us the
stump.
“Paco said, ‘That was a cowardly and foolish thing. I am sorry that I did that thing. But I try to be
useful with one hand. I will do what I can with one hand for the Cause.’”
“Yes,” interrupted a soldier. “He said that. I heard him say that.”
“We spoke with him,” the Extremaduran said. “And he spoke with us. When such people with
the leather coats and the pistols come it is always a bad omen in a war, as is the arrival of people
with map cases and field glasses. Still we thought they had brought him for a visit, and all of us who
had not been to the hospital were happy to see him, and as I say, it was the hour of the evening meal
and the evening was clear and warm.”
“This wind only rose during the night,” a soldier said.
“Then,” the Extremaduran went on somberly, “one of them said to the officer in Spanish, ‘Where
is the place?’
“‘Where is the place this Paco was wounded?’ asked the officer.”
“I answered him,” said the man in command. “I showed the place. It is a little further down than
where you are.”
“Here is the place,” said a soldier. He pointed, and I could see it was the place. It showed
clearly that it was the place.
“Then one of them led Paco by the arm to the place and held him there by the arm while the other
spoke in Spanish. He spoke in Spanish, making many mistakes in the language. At first we wanted to
laugh, and Paco started to smile. I could not understand all the speech, but it was that Paco must be
punished as an example, in order that there would be no more self-inflicted wounds, and that all
others would be punished in the same way.
“Then, while the one held Paco by the arm; Paco, looking very ashamed to be spoken of this way
when he was already ashamed and sorry; the other took his pistol out and shot Paco in the back of the
head without any word to Paco. Nor any word more.”
The soldiers all nodded.
“It was thus,” said one. “You can see the place. He fell with his mouth there. You can see it.”
I had seen the place clearly enough from where I lay.
“He had no warning and no chance to prepare himself,” the one in command said. “It was very
brutal.”
“It is for this that I now hate Russians as well as all other foreigners,” said the Extremaduran.
“We can give ourselves no illusions about foreigners. If you are a foreigner, I am sorry. But for
myself, now, I can make no exceptions. You have eaten bread and drunk wine with us. Now I think
you should go.”
“Do not speak in that way,” the man in command said to the Extremaduran. “It is necessary to be
formal.”
“I think we had better go,” I said.
“You are not angry?” the man in command said. “You can stay in this shelter as long as you
wish. Are you thirsty? Do you wish more wine?”
“Thank you very much,” I said. “I think we had better go.”
“You understand my hatred?” asked the Extremaduran.
“I understand your hatred,” I said.
“Good,” he said and put out his hand. “I do not refuse to shake hands. And that you, personally,
have much luck.”
“Equally to you,” I said. “Personally, and as a Spaniard.”
I woke the one who took the pictures and we started down the ridge toward brigade
headquarters. The tanks were all coming back now and you could hardly hear yourself talk for the
noise.
“Were you talking all that time?”
“Listening.”
“Hear anything interesting?”
“Plenty.”
“What do you want to do now?”
“Get back to Madrid.”
“We should see the general.”
“Yes,” I said. “We must.”
The general was coldly furious. He had been ordered to make the attack as a surprise with one
brigade only, bringing everything up before daylight. It should have been made by at least a division.
He had used three battalions and held one in reserve. The French tank commander had got drunk to be
brave for the attack and finally was too drunk to function. He was to be shot when he sobered up.
The tanks had not come up in time and finally had refused to advance, and two of the battalions
had failed to attain their objectives. The third had taken theirs, but it formed an untenable salient. The
only real result had been a few prisoners, and these had been confided to the tank men to bring back
and the tank men had killed them. The general had only failure to show, and they had killed his
prisoners.
“What can I write on it?” I asked.
“Nothing that is not in the official communiqué. Have you any whisky in that long flask?”
“Yes.”
He took a drink and licked his lips carefully. He had once been a captain of Hungarian Hussars,
and he had once captured a gold train in Siberia when he was a leader of irregular cavalry with the
Red Army and held it all one winter when the thermometer went down to forty below zero. We were
good friends and he loved whisky, and he is now dead.
“Get out of here now,” he said. “Have you transport?”
“Yes.”
“Did you get any pictures?”
“Some. The tanks.”
“The tanks,” he said bitterly. “The swine. The cowards. Watch out you don’t get killed,” he said.
“You are supposed to be a writer.”
“I can’t write now.”
“Write it afterwards. You can write it all afterwards. And don’t get killed. Especially, don’t get
killed. Now, get out of here.”
He could not take his own advice because he was killed two months later. But the oddest thing
about that day was how marvelously the pictures we took of the tanks came out. On the screen they
advanced over the hill irresistibly, mounting the crests like great ships, to crawl clanking on toward
the illusion of victory we screened.
The nearest any man was to victory that day was probably the Frenchman who came, with his
head held high, walking out of the battle. But his victory only lasted until he had walked halfway
down the ridge. We saw him lying stretched out there on the slope of the ridge, still wearing his
blanket, as we came walking down the cut to get into the staff car that would take us to Madrid.
Nobody Ever Dies
THE HOUSE WAS BUILT OF ROSE-COLORED plaster that had
peeled and faded with the dampness and from its porch you could see the sea, very blue, at the end of
the street. There were laurel trees along the sidewalk that grew high enough to shade the upper porch
and in the shade it was cool. A mockingbird hung in a wicker cage at a corner of the porch, and it was
not singing now, nor even chirping, because a young man of about twenty-eight, thin, dark, with bluish
circles under his eyes and a stubble of beard, had just taken off a sweater that he wore and spread it
over the cage. The young man was standing now, his mouth slightly open, listening. Someone was
trying the locked and bolted front door.
As he listened he heard the wind in the laurels close beside the porch, the horn of a taxi coming
along the street and the voices of the children playing in a vacant lot. Then he heard a key turn again in
the lock of the front door. He heard it unlock the door, heard the door pulled against the bolt, and then
the lock being turned again. At the same time he heard the sound of a bat against a baseball and shrill
shouting in Spanish from the vacant lot. He stood there, moistening his lips, and listened while
someone tried the back door.
The young man, who was named Enrique, took off his shoes and, putting them down carefully,
moved softly along the tiling of the porch until he could look down at the back door. There was no
one there. He slipped back to the front of the house and, keeping out of sight, looked down the street.
A Negro in a narrow-brimmed flat-topped straw hat and a gray alpaca coat and black trousers
was walking along the sidewalk under the laurel trees. Enrique watched, but there was no one else.
He stood there for some time watching and listening, then he took his sweater off the bird cage and put
it on.
He had been sweating heavily while he had been listening and now he was cold in the shade and
the cool northeast wind. The sweater covered a leather shoulder holster, the leather ringed and saltwhitened with perspiration, that he wore with a forty-five-caliber Colt pistol which, by its constant
pressure, had given him a boil a little below his armpit. He lay down on a canvas cot now close to the
wall of the house. He was still listening.
The bird chirped and hopped about the cage and the young man looked up at it. Then he got up
and unhooked the door of the cage and opened it. The bird cocked his head at the open door and drew
it back, then jerked his head forward again, his bill pointing at an angle.
“Go on,” the young man said softly. “It’s not a trick.”
He put his hand into the cage and the bird flew against the back, fluttering against the withes.
“You’re silly,” the young man said. He took his hand out of the cage. “I’ll leave it open.”
He lay face down on the cot, his chin on his folded arms, and he was still listening. He heard the
bird fly out of the cage and then he heard him sing in one of the laurel trees.
“It was foolish to keep the bird if the house is supposed to be empty,” he thought. “It is just such
foolishness that makes all the trouble. How can I blame others when I am that stupid?”
In the vacant lot the boys were still playing baseball and it was quite cool now. The young man
unbuckled the leather shoulder holster and laid the big pistol by his leg. Then he went to sleep.
When he woke it was dark and the street light on the comer shone through the leaves of the
laurels. He stood up and walked to the front of the house and, keeping in the shadow and the shelter of
the wall, looked up and down the street. A man in a narrow-brimmed, flat-topped straw hat stood
under a tree on the comer. Enrique could not see the color of his coat or trousers, but he was a Negro.
Enrique went quickly to the back of the porch but there was no light there except that which
shone on the weedy field from the back windows of the next two houses. There could be any number
of people in the back. He knew that, since he could no longer really hear as he had in the afternoon,
because a radio was going in the second house away.
Suddenly there came the mechanical crescendo of a siren and the young man felt a prickling
wave go over his scalp. It came as suddenly as a person blushes, it felt like prickly heat, and it was
gone as quickly as it came. The siren was on the radio; it was part of an advertisement, and the
announcer’s voice followed, “Gavis tooth paste. Unaltering, insuperable, the best.”
Enrique smiled in the dark. It was time someone should be coming now.
After the siren on the recorded announcements came a crying baby which the announcer said
would be satisfied with Malta-Malta, and then there was a motor horn and a customer who demanded
green gas. “Don’t tell me any stories. I asked for green gas. More economical, more mileage. The
best.”
Enrique knew all the advertisements by heart. They had not changed in the fifteen months that he
had been away at war; they must still be using the same discs in the broadcasting station, and still the
siren had deceived him and given him that thin, quick prickle across the scalp that was as definite a
reaction to danger as a bird dog stiffening to the warm scent of quail.
He had not had that prickle when he started. Danger and the fear of it had once made him feel
empty in his stomach. They had made him feel weak as you are weak with a fever, and he had known
the inability to move; when you must force movement forward by legs that feel as dead as though they
were asleep. That was all gone now, and he did without difficulty whatever he should do. The
prickling was all that remained of the vast capacity for fear some brave men start with. It was his only
remaining reaction to danger except for the perspiring which, he knew, he would always have, and
now it served as a warning and nothing more.
As he stood, looking out at the tree where the man with the straw hat sat now, on the curb, a
stone fell on the tiled floor of the porch. Enrique looked for it against the wall but did not find it. He
passed his hands under the cot but it was not there. As he knelt, another pebble fell on the tiled floor,
bounced and rolled into the corner toward the side of the house and into the street. Enrique picked it
up. It was a smooth-feeling ordinary pebble and he put it in his pocket and went inside the house and
down the stairs to the back door.
He stood to one side of the door and took the Colt out of the holster and held it, heavy in his right
hand.
“The victory,” he said very quietly in Spanish, his mouth disdaining the word, and shifted softly
on his bare feet to the other side of the door.
“To those who earn it,” someone said outside the door. It was a woman’s voice, giving the
second half of the password, and it spoke quickly and unsteadily.
Enrique drew back the double bolt on the door and opened it with his left hand, the Colt still in
his right.
There was a girl there in the dark, holding a basket. She wore a handkerchief over her head.
“Hello,” he said and shut the door and bolted it. He could hear her breathing in the dark. He took
the basket from her and patted her shoulder.
“Enrique,” she said, and he could not see the way her eyes were shining nor the look on her face.
“Come upstairs,” he said. “There is someone watching the front of the house. Did he see you?”
“No,” she said. “I came across the vacant lot.”
“I will show him to you. Come up to the porch.”
They went up the stairs, Enrique carrying the basket. He put it down by the bed and walked to the
edge of the porch and looked. The Negro who wore the narrow-brimmed flat-topped straw hat was
gone.
“So,” Enrique said quietly.
“So what?” asked the girl, holding his arm now and looking out.
“So he is gone. What is there to eat?”
“I am sorry you were here alone all day” she said. “It was so stupid that I had to wait until it was
dark to come. I have wanted to come all day.”
“It was stupid to be here at all. They brought me here from the boat before daylight and left me,
with a password and nothing to eat, in a house that is watched. You cannot eat a password. I should
not be put in a house that is being watched for other reasons. It is very Cuban. But at least, in the old
days we ate. How are you, Maria?”
In the dark she kissed him, hard, on the mouth. He felt the tight-pressed fullness of her lips and
the way her body shivered against his and then came the stab of white pain in the small of his back.
“Ayee! Be careful.”
“What is it?”
“The back.”
“What of the back? Is it a wound?”
“You should see it,” he said.
“Can I see it now?”
“Afterwards. We must eat and get out of here. What have they stored here?”
“Too many things. Things left over from the failure of April. Things kept for the future.”
“The long-distant future,” he said. “Did they know it was watched?”
“I am sure not.”
“What is there?”
“There are some rifles in cases. There are boxes of ammunition.”
“Everything should be moved tonight.” His mouth was full. “There will be years of work before
we will need this again.”
“Do you like the escabeche?”
“It’s very good; sit here close.”
“Enrique,” she said, sitting tight against him. She put a hand on his thigh and with the other she
stroked the back of his neck. “My Enrique.”
“Touch me carefully,” he said, eating. “The back is bad.”
“Are you happy to be back from the war?”
“I have not thought about it,” he said.
“Enrique, how is Chucho?”
“Dead at Lérida.”
“Felipe?”
“Dead. Also at Lérida.”
“And Arturo?”
“Dead at Teruel.”
“And Vicente?” she asked in a flat voice, her two hands folded on his thigh now.
“Dead. At the attack across the road at Celadas.”
“Vicente is my brother.” She sat stiff and alone now, her hands away from him.
“I know,” said Enrique. He went on eating.
“He is my only brother.”
“I thought you knew,” said Enrique.
“I did not know and he is my brother.”
“I am sorry, Maria. I should have said it another way.”
“And he is dead? You know he is dead? It is not just a report?”
“Listen. Rogello, Basilio, Esteban, Fel and I are alive. The others are dead.”
“All?”
“All,” said Enrique.
“I cannot stand it,” said Maria. “Please, I cannot stand it.”
“It does no good to discuss it. They are dead.”
“But it is not only that Vicente is my brother. I can give up my brother. It is the flower of our
party.”
“Yes. The flower of the party.”
“It is not worth it. It has destroyed the best.”
“Yes. It is worth it.”
“How can you say that? That is criminal.”
“No. It is worth it.”
She was crying now and Enrique went on eating. “Don’t cry,” he said. “The thing to do is to
think how we can work to take their places.”
“But he is my brother. Don’ you uderstand? My brother.”
“We are all brothers. Some are dead and others still live. They send us home now, so there will
be some left. Otherwise there would be none. Now we must work.”
“But why were they all killed?”
“We were with an attack division. You are either killed or wounded. We others have been
wounded.”
“How was Vicente killed?”
“He was crossing the road when he was struck by machine-gun fire from a farmhouse on the
right. The road was enfiladed from that house.”
“Were you there?”
“Yes. I had the first company. We were on his right. We took the house but it took some time.
They had three machine guns there. Two in the house, one in the stable. It was difficult to approach.
We had to get a tank up to put fire on the window before we could rush the last gun. I lost eight men. It
was too many.”
“And where was that?”
“Celadas.”
“I never heard of it.”
“No,” said Enrique. “The operation was not a success. No one will ever hear of it. That was
where Vicente and Ignacio were killed.”
“And you say such things are justified? That men like that should die in failures in a foreign
country?”
“There are no foreign countries, Maria, where people speak Spanish. Where you die does not
matter, if you die for liberty. Anyway, the thing to do is live and not to die.”
“But think of who have died—away from here—and in failures.”
“They did not go to die. They went to fight. The dying is an accident.”
“But the failures. My brother is dead in a failure. Chucho in a failure. Ignacio in a failure.”
“They are just a part. Some things we had to do were impossible. Many that looked impossible
we did. But sometimes the people on your flank would not attack. Sometimes there was not enough
artillery. Sometimes we were ordered to do things not in sufficient force—as at Celadas. Those make
the failures. But in the end, it was not a failure.”
She did not answer and he finished eating.
The wind was fresh now in the trees and it was cold on the porch. He put the dishes back in the
basket and wiped his mouth on the napkin. He wiped his hands carefully and then put his arm around
the girl. She was crying.
“Don’t cry, Maria,” he said. “What has happened has happened. We must think of what there is
to do. There is much to do.”
She said nothing and he could see her face in the light from the street lamp looking straight
ahead.
“We must check all romanticism. This place is an example of that romanticism. We must stop
terrorism. We must proceed so that we will never again fall into revolutionary adventurism.”
The girl still said nothing and he looked at her face that he had thought of all the months when he
had thought of anything except his work.
“You talk like a book,” she said. “Not like a human being.”
“I am sorry,” he said. “It is only lessons I have learned. It is things I know must be done. To me
it is more real than anything.”
“All that is real to me are the dead,” she said.
“We honor them. But they are not important.”
“You talk like a book again,” she said angrily. “Your heart is a book.”
“I am sorry, Maria. I thought you would understand.”
“All I understand is the dead,” she said.
He knew this was not true because she had not seen them dead as he had in the rain in the olive
groves of the Jarama, in the heat in the smashed houses of Quijorna, and in the snow at Teruel. But he
knew that she blamed him for being alive when Vicente was dead and suddenly—in the small and
unconditioned human part of him which was left, and which he did not realize was still there—he was
hurt deeply.
“There was a bird,” he said. “A mockingbird in a cage.”
“Yes.”
“I let it go.”
“Aren’t you kind!” she said scornfully. “Are soldiers all sentimental?”
“I am a good soldier.”
“I believe it. You talk like one. What kind of soldier was my brother?”
“Very good. Gayer than me. I was not gay. It is a lack.”
“But you practice self-criticism and you talk like a book.”
“It would be better if I were gayer,” he said. “I could never learn it.”
“And the gay ones are all dead.”
“No,” he said. “Basilio is gay.”
“Then he’ll die,” she said.
“Maria? Do not talk like that. You talk like a defeatist.”
“You talk like a book,” she told him. “Please do not touch me. You have a dry heart and I hate
you.”
Now he was hurt again, he who had thought that his heart was dry, and that nothing could hurt
ever again except the pain, and sitting on the bed he leaned forward.
“Pull up my sweater,” he said.
“I don’t want to.”
He pulled up the back and leaned over. “Maria, look there,” he said. “That is not from a book.”
“I cannot see,” she said. “I do not want to see.”
“Put your hand across the lower back.”
He felt her fingers touch that huge sunken place a baseball could have been pushed through, that
grotesque scar from the wound the surgeon had pushed his rubber-gloved fist through in cleaning,
which had run from one side of the small of his back through to the other. He felt her touch it and he
shrank quickly inside. Then she was holding him tight and kissing him, her lips an island in the sudden
white sea of pain that came in a shining, unbearable, rising, blinding wave and swept him clean. The
lips there, still there; then overwhelmed, and the pain gone as he sat, alone, wet with sweat and Maria
crying and saying, “Oh, Enrique. Forgive me. Please forgive me.”
“It is all right,” Enrique said. “There is nothing to forgive. But it was not out of any book.”
“But does it hurt always?”
“Only when I am touched or jarred.”
“And the spinal cord?”
“It was touched a very little. Also the kidneys, but they are all right. The shell fragment went in
one side and out the other. There are other wounds lower down and on my legs.”
“Enrique, please forgive me.”
“There is nothing to forgive. But it is not nice that I cannot make love and I am sorry that I am not
gay.”
“We can make love after it is well.”
“Yes.”
“And it will be well.”
“Yes.”
“And I will take care of you.”
“No. I will take care of you. I do not mind this thing at all. Only the pain of touching or jarring. It
does not bother me. Now we must work. We must leave this place now. Everything that is here must
be moved tonight. It must be stored in a new and unsuspected place and in one where it will not
deteriorate. It will be a long time before we will need it. There is much to be done before we will
ever reach that stage again. Many must be educated. These cartridges may no longer serve by then.
This climate ruins the primers. And we must go now. I am a fool to have stayed here this long and the
fool who put me here will answer to the committee.”
“I am to take you there tonight. They thought this house was safe for you to stay today.”
“This house is a folly.”
“We will go now.”
“We should have gone before.”
“Kiss me, Enrique.”
“We’ll do it very carefully,” he said.
Then, in the dark on the bed, holding himself carefully, his eyes closed, their lips against each
other, the happiness there with no pain, the being home suddenly there with no pain, the being alive
returning and no pain, the comfort of being loved and still no pain; so there was a hollowness of
loving, now no longer hollow, and the two sets of lips in the dark, pressing so that they were happily
and kindly, darkly and warmly at home and without pain in the darkness, there came the siren cutting,
suddenly, to rise like all the pain in the world. It was the real siren, not the one of the radio. It was not
one siren. It was two. They were coming both ways up the street.
He turned his head and then stood up. He thought that coming home had not lasted very long.
“Go out the door and across the lot,” he said. “Go. I can shoot from up here and make a
diversion.”
“No, you go,” she said. “Please, I will stay here to shoot and they will think you’re inside.”
“Come on” he said. “We’ll both go. There’s nothing to defend here. This stuff is useless. It’s
better to get away.”
“I want to stay,” she said. “I want to protect you.”
She reached for the pistol in the holster under his arm and he slapped her face. “Come on. Don’t
be a silly girl. Come on!”
They were going down the stairs now and he felt her close beside him. He swung the door open
and together they stepped out the door and were clear of the building. He turned and locked the door.
“Run, Maria,” he said. “Across the lot in that direction. Go!”
“I want to go with you.”
He slapped her again quickly. “Run. Then dive in the weeds and crawl. Forgive me, Maria. But
go. I go the other way. Go,” he said. “Damn you. Go.”
They started into the weeds at the same time. He ran twenty paces and then, as the police cars
stopped in front of the house, the sirens dying, he dropped flat and started to crawl.
The weed pollen was dusty in his face and as he wriggled steadily along, the sand-burrs stabbing
his hands and knees sharply and minutely, he heard them coming around the house. They had
surrounded it.
He crawled steadily, thinking hard, giving no importance to the pain.
“But why the sirens?” he thought. “Why no third car from the rear? Why no spotlight or a
searchlight on this field? Cubans,” he thought. “Can they be this stupid and theatrical? They must have
thought there was no one in the house. They must have come only to seize the stuff. But why the
sirens?”
Behind him he heard them breaking in the door. They were all around the house. He heard two
blasts on a whistle from close to the house and he wriggled steadily on.
“The fools,” he thought. “But they must have found the basket and the dishes by now. What
people! What a way to raid a house!”
He was almost to the edge of the lot now and he knew that he must rise and make a dash across
the road for the far houses. He had found a way of crawling that hurt little. He could adjust himself to
almost any movement. It was the brusque changes that hurt, and he dreaded rising to his feet.
In the weeds he rose on one knee, took the shock of the pain, held through it, and then brought it
on again as he drew the other foot alongside his knee in order to rise.
He started to run toward the house across the street, at the back of the next lot, when the clicking
on of the searchlight caught him so that he was full in the beam, looking toward it, the blackness a
sharp line on either side.
The searchlight was from the police car that had come silently, without siren, and posted itself at
one back corner of the lot.
As Enrique rose to his feet, thin, gaunt, sharply outlined in the beam, pulling at the big pistol in
the holster under his armpit, the submachine guns opened on him from the darkened car.
The feeling is that of being clubbed across the chest and he only felt the first one. The other
clubbing thuds that came were echoes.
He went forward onto his face in the weeds and as he fell, or perhaps it was between the time
the searchlight went on and the first bullet reached him, he had one thought. “They are not so stupid.
Perhaps something can be done with them.”
If he had had time for another thought it would have been to hope there was no car at the other
corner. But there was a car at the other corner and its searchlight was going over the field. Its wide
beam was playing over the weeds, where the girl, Maria, lay hidden. In the dark car the machine
gunners, their guns poised, followed the sweep of the beam with the fluted, efficient ugliness of the
Thompson muzzles.
In the shadow of the tree, behind the darkened car from which the searchlight played, there was a
Negro standing. He wore a flat-topped, narrow-brimmed straw hat and an alpaca coat. Under his shirt
he wore a string of blue voodoo beads. He was standing quietly watching the lights working.
The searchlights played on over the weedfield where the girl lay flat against the ground, her chin
in the earth. She had not moved since she heard the burst of firing. She could feel her heart beating
against the ground.
“Do you see her?” asked one of the men in the car.
“Let them beat through the weeds for the other side,” the lieutenant in the front seat said. “Hola,”
he called to the Negro under the tree. “Go to the house and tell them to beat toward us through the
weeds in extended order. Are there only the two?”
“Only two,” the Negro said in a quiet voice. “We have the other one.”
“Go.”
“Yes sir, Lieutenant,” the Negro said.
Holding his straw hat in both hands he started to run along the edge of the field toward the house
where, now, lights shone from all the windows.
In the field the girl lay, her hands clasped across the top of her head. “Help me to bear this,” she
said into the weeds, speaking to no one, for there was no one there. Then, suddenly, personally,
sobbing, “Help me, Vicente. Help me, Felipe. Help me, Chucho. Help me, Arturo. Help me now,
Enrique. Help me.”
At one time she would have prayed, but she had lost that and now she needed something.
“Help me not to talk if they take me,” she said, her mouth against the weeds. “Keep me from
talking, Enrique. Keep me from ever talking, Vicente.”
Behind her she could hear them going through the weeds like beaters in a rabbit drive. They
were spread wide and advancing like skirmishers, flashing their electric torches in the weeds.
“Oh, Enrique,” she said, “help me.”
She brought her hands down from her head and clenched them by her sides. “It is better so,” she
thought. “If I run they will shoot. It will be simpler.”
Slowly she got up and ran toward the car. The searchlight was full on her and she ran seeing
only it, into its white, blinding eye. She thought this was the best way to do it.
Behind her they were shouting. But there was no shooting. Someone tackled her heavily and she
went down. She heard him breathing as he held her.
Someone else took her under the arm and lifted her. Holding her by the two arms they walked her
toward the car. They were not rough with her, but they walked her steadily toward the car.
“No,” she said. “No. No.”
“It’s the sister of Vicente Irtube,” said the lieutenant. “She should be useful.”
“She’s been questioned before,” said another.
“Never seriously.”
“No,” she said. “No. No.” She cried aloud, “Help me, Vicente! Help me, help me, Enrique!”
“They’re dead,” said someone. “They won’t help you. Don’t be silly.”
“Yes,” she said. “They will help me. It is the dead that will help me. Oh, yes, yes, yes! It is our
dead that will help me!”
“Take a look at Enrique then,” said the lieutenant. “See if he will help you. He’s in the back of
that car.”
“He’s helping me now,” the girl, Maria, said. “Can’t you see he’s helping me now? Thank you,
Enrique. Oh, thank you!”
“Come on,” said the lieutenant. “She’s crazy. Leave four men to guard the stuff and we will send
a truck for it. We’ll take this crazy up to headquarters. She can talk up there.”
“No,” said Maria, taking hold of his sleeve. “Can’t you see everyone is helping me now?”
“No,” said the lieutenant. “You are crazy.”
“No one dies for nothing,” said Maria. “Everyone is helping me now.”
“Get them to help you in about an hour,” said the lieutenant.
“They will,” said Maria. “Please don’t worry. Many, many people are helping me now.”
She sat there holding herself very still against the back of the seat. She seemed now to have a
strange confidence. It was the same confidence another girl her age had felt a little more than five
hundred years before in the market place of a town called Rouen.
Maria did not think of this. Nor did anyone in the car think of it. The two girls named Jeanne and
Maria had nothing in common except this sudden strange confidence which came when they needed it.
But all of the policemen in the car felt uncomfortable about Maria now as she sat very straight with
her face shining in the arc light.
The cars started and in the back seat of the front car men were putting the machine guns back into
the heavy canvas cases, slipping the stocks out and putting them in their diagonal pockets, the barrels
with the handgrips in the big flapped pouch, the magazines in the narrow webbed pockets.
The Negro with the flat straw hat came out from the shadow of the house and hailed the first car.
He got up into the front seat, making two who rode there beside the driver, and the four cars turned
onto the main road that led toward the sea-drive into La Havana.
Sitting crowded on the front seat of the car, the Negro reached under his shirt and put his fingers
on the string of blue voodoo beads. He sat without speaking, his fingers holding the beads. He had
been a dock worker before he got a job as a stool pigeon for the Havana police and he would get fifty
dollars for this night’s work. Fifty dollars is a lot of money now in La Havana, but the Negro could no
longer think about the money. He turned his head a little, very slowly, as they came onto the lighted
driveway of the Malecon and, looking back, saw the girl’s face, shining proudly, and her head held
high.
The Negro was frightened and he put his fingers all the way around the string of blue voodoo
beads and held them tight. But they could not help his fear because he was up against an older magic
now.
The Good Lion
ONCE UPON A TIME THERE WAS A LION that lived in Africa
with all the other lions. The other lions were all bad lions and every day they ate zebras and
wildebeests and every kind of antelope. Sometimes the bad lions ate people too. They ate Swahilis,
Umbulus and Wandorobos and they especially liked to eat Hindu traders. All Hindu traders are very
fat and delicious to a lion.
But this lion, that we love because he was so good, had wings on his back. Because he had
wings on his back the other lions all made fun of him.
“Look at him with the wings on his back,” they would say and then they would all roar with
laughter.
“Look at what he eats,” they would say because the good lion only ate pasta and scampi because
he was so good.
The bad lions would roar with laughter and eat another Hindu trader and their wives would
drink his blood, going lap, lap, lap with their tongues like big cats. They only stopped to growl with
laughter or to roar with laughter at the good lion and to snarl at his wings. They were very bad and
wicked lions indeed.
But the good lion would sit and fold his wings back and ask politely if he might have a Negroni
or an Americano and he always drank that instead of the blood of the Hindu traders. One day he
refused to eat eight Masai cattle and only ate some tagliatelli and drank a glass of pomodoro.
This made the wicked lions very angry and one of the lionesses, who was the wickedest of them
all and could never get the blood of Hindu traders off her whiskers even when she rubbed her face in
the grass, said, “Who are you that you think you are so much better than we are? Where do you come
from, you pasta-eating lion? What are you doing here anyway?” She growled at him and they all
roared without laughter.
“My father lives in a city where he stands under the clock tower and looks down on a thousand
pigeons, all of whom are his subjects. When they fly they make a noise like a rushing river. There are
more palaces in my father’s city than in all of Africa and there are four great bronze horses that face
him and they all have one foot in the air because they fear him.
“In my father’s city men go on foot or in boats and no real horse would enter the city for fear of
my father.”
“Your father was a griffon,” the wicked lioness said, licking her whiskers.
“You are a liar,” one of the wicked lions said. “There is no such city.”
“Pass me a piece of Hindu trader,” another very wicked lion said. “This Masai cattle is too
newly killed.”
“You are a worthless liar and the son of a griffon,” the wickedest of all the lionesses said. “And
now I think I shall kill you and eat you, wings and all.”
This frightened the good lion very much because he could see her yellow eyes and her tail going
up and down and the blood caked on her whiskers and he smelled her breath which was very bad
because she never brushed her teeth ever. Also she had old pieces of Hindu trader under her claws.
“Don’t kill me,” the good lion said. “My father is a noble lion and always has been respected
and everything is true as I said.”
Just then the wicked lioness sprang at him. But he rose into the air on his wings and circled the
group of wicked lions once, with them all roaring and looking at him. He looked down and thought,
“What savages these lions are.”
He circled them once more to make them roar more loudly. Then he swooped low so he could
look at the eyes of the wicked lioness who rose on her hind legs to try and catch him. But she missed
him with her claws. “Adios,” he said, for he spoke beautiful Spanish, being a lion of culture. “Au
revoir,” he called to them in his exemplary French.
They all roared and growled in African lion dialect.
Then the good lion circled higher and higher and set his course for Venice. He alighted in the
Piazza and everyone was delighted to see him. He flew up for a moment and kissed his father on both
cheeks and saw the horses still had their feeet up and the Basilica looked more beautiful than a soap
bubble. The Campanile was in place and the pigeons were going to their nests for the evening.
“How was Africa?” his father said.
“Very savage, father,” the good lion replied.
“We have night lighting here now,” his father said.
“So I see,” the good lion answered like a dutiful son.
“It bothers my eyes a little,” his father confided to him. “Where are you going now, my son?”
“To Harry’s Bar,” the good lion said.
“Remember me to Cipriani and tell him I will be in some day soon to see about my bill,” said
his father.
“Yes, father,” said the good lion and he flew down lightly and walked to Harry’s Bar on his own
four paws.
In Cipriani’s nothing was changed. All of his friends were there. But he was a little changed
himself from being in Africa.
“A Negroni, Signor Barone?” asked Mr. Cipriani.
But the good lion had flown all the way from Africa and Africa had changed him.
“Do you have any Hindu trader sandwiches?” he asked Cipriani.
“No, but I can get some.”
“While you are sending for them, make me a very dry martini.” He added, “With Gordon’s gin.”
“Very good,” said Cipriani. “Very good indeed.”
Now the lion looked about him at the faces of all the nice people and he knew that he was at
home but that he had also traveled. He was very happy.
The Faithful Bull
ONE TIME THERE WAS A BULL AND HIS name was not Ferdinand
and he cared nothing for flowers. He loved to fight and he fought with all the other bulls of his own
age, or any age, and he was a champion.
His horns were as solid as wood and they were as sharply pointed as the quill of a porcupine.
They hurt him, at the base, when he fought and he did not care at all. His neck muscles lifted in a great
lump that is called in Spanish the morillo and this morillo lifted like a hill when he was ready to
fight. He was always ready to fight and his coat was black and shining and his eyes were clear.
Anything made him want to fight and he would fight with deadly seriousness exactly as some
people eat or read or go to church. Each time he fought he fought to kill and the other bulls were not
afraid of him because they came of good blood and were not afraid. But they had no wish to provoke
him. Nor did they wish to fight him.
He was not a bully nor was he wicked, but he liked to fight as men might like to sing or to be the
King or the President. He never thought at all. Fighting was his obligation and his duty and his joy.
He fought on the stony, high ground. He fought under the cork-oak trees and he fought in the good
pasture by the river. He walked fifteen miles each day from the river to the high, stony ground and he
would fight any bull that looked at him. Still he was never angry.
That is not really true, for he was angry inside himself. But he did not know why, because he
could not think. He was very noble and he loved to fight.
So what happened to him? The man who owned him, if anyone can own such an animal, knew
what a great bull he was and still he was worried because this bull cost him so much money by
fighting with other bulls. Each bull was worth over one thousand dollars and after they had fought the
great bull they were worth less than two hundred dollars and sometimes less than that.
So the man, who was a good man, decided that he would keep the blood of this bull in all of his
stock rather than send him to the ring to be killed. So he selected him for breeding.
But this bull was a strange bull. When they first turned him into the pasture with the breeding
cows, he saw one who was young and beautiful and slimmer and better muscled and shinier and more
lovely than all the others. So, since he could not fight, he fell in love with her and he paid no attention
to any of the others. He only wanted to be with her, and the others meant nothing to him at all.
The man who owned the bull ranch hoped that the bull would change, or learn, or be different
than he was. But the bull was the same and he loved whom he loved and no one else. He only wanted
to be with her, and the others meant nothing to him at all.
So the man sent him away with five other bulls to be killed in the ring, and at least the bull could
fight, even though he was faithful. He fought wonderfully and everyone admired him and the man who
killed him admired him the most. But the fighting jacket of the man who killed him and who is called
the matador was wet through by the end, and his mouth was very dry.
“Que toro más bravo,” the matador said as he handed his sword to his sword handler. He
handed it with the hilt up and the blade dripping with the blood from the heart of the brave bull who
no longer had any problems of any kind and was being dragged out of the ring by four horses.
“Yes. He was the one the Marqués of Villamayor had to get rid of because he was faithful,” the
sword handler, who knew everything, said.
“Perhaps we should all be faithful,” the matador said.
Get a Seeing-Eyed Dog
“AND WHAT DID WE DO THEN?” HE asked her. She told him.
“That part is very strange. I can’t remember that at all.”
“Can you remember the safari leaving?”
“I should. But I don’t. I remember the women going down the trail to the beach for the water with
the pots on their heads and I remember the flock of geese the toto drove back and forth to the water. I
remember how slowly they all went and they were always going down or coming up. There was a
very big tide too and the flats were yellow and the channel ran by the far island. The wind blew all
the time and there were no flies and no mosquitoes. There was a roof and a cement floor and the poles
that held the roof up, and the wind blew through them all the time. It was cool all day and lovely and
cool at night.”
“Do you remember when the big dhow came in and careened on the low tide?”
“Yes, I remember her and the crew coming ashore in her boats and coming up the path from the
beach, and the geese were afraid of them and so were the women.”
“That was the day we caught so many fish but had to come in because it was rough.”
“I remember that.”
“You’re remembering well today,” she said. “Don’t do it too much.”
“I’m sorry you didn’t get to fly to Zanzibar,” he said. “That upper beach from where we were
was a fine place to land. You could have landed and taken off from there quite easily.”
“We can always go to Zanzibar. Don’t try to remember too much today. Would you like me to
read to you? There’s always something in the old New Yorkers that we missed.”
“No, please don’t read,” he said. “Just talk. Talk about the good days.”
“Do you want to hear about what it’s like outside?”
“It’s raining,” he said. “I know that.”
“It’s raining a big rain,” she told him. “There won’t be any tourists out with this weather. The
wind is very wild and we can go down and sit by the fire.”
“We could anyway. I don’t care about them any more. I like to hear them talk.”
“Some of them are awful,” she said. “But some of them are quite nice. I think it’s really the
nicest ones that go out to Torcello.”
“That’s quite true,” he said. “I hadn’t thought of that. There’s really nothing for them to see
unless they are a bit too nice.”
“Can I make you a drink?” she asked. “You know how worthless a nurse I am. I wasn’t trained
for it and I haven’t any talent. But I can make drinks.”
“Let’s have a drink.”
“What do you want?”
“Anything,” he said.
“I’ll make a surprise. I’ll make it downstairs.”
He heard the door open and close and her feet on the stairs and he thought, I must get her to go on
a trip. I must figure out some way to do it. I have to think up something practical. I’ve got this now for
the rest of my life and I must figure out ways not to destroy her life and ruin her with it. She has been
so good and she was not built to be good. I mean this sort of good. I mean good every day and dull
good.
He heard her coming up the stairs and noticed the difference in her tread when she was carrying
two glasses and when she had walked down barehanded. He heard the rain on the windowpane and
he smelled the beech logs burning in the fireplace. As she came into the room he put his hand out for
the drink and closed his hand on it and felt her touch the glass with her own.
“It’s our old drink for out here,” she said. “Campari and Gordon’s with ice.”
“I’m certainly glad you’re not a girl who would say ‘on the rocks’”
“No,” she said. “I wouldn’t ever say that. We’ve been on the rocks.”
“On our own two feet when the chips were down and for keeps,” he remembered. “Do you
remember when we barred those phrases?”
“That was in the time of my lion. Wasn’t he a wonderful lion? I can’t wait till we see him.”
“I can’t either,” he said.
“I’m sorry.”
“Do you remember when we barred that phrase?”
“I nearly said it again.”
“You know,” he told her, “we’re awfully lucky to have come here. I remember it so well that it
is palpable. That’s a new word and we’ll bar it soon. But it really is wonderful. When I hear the rain
I can see it on the stones and on the canal and on the lagoon, and I know the way the trees bend in
every wind and how the church and the tower are in every sort of light. We couldn’t have come to a
better place for me. It’s really perfect. We’ve got the good radio and a fine tape recorder and I’m
going to write better than I ever could. If you take your time with the tape recorder you can get the
words right. I can work slow and I can see the words when I say them. If they’re wrong I hear them
wrong and I can do them over and work on them until I get them right. Honey, in lots of ways we
couldn’t have it better.”
“Oh, Philip—”
“Shit,” he said. “The dark is just the dark. This isn’t like the real dark. I can see very well inside
and now my head is better all the time and I can remember and I can make up well. You wait and see.
Didn’t I remember better today?”
“You remember better all the time. And you’re getting strong.”
“I am strong,” he said. “Now if you—”
“If me what?”
“If you’d go away for a while and get a rest and a change from this.”
“Don’t you want me?”
“Of course I want you, darling.”
“Then why do we have to talk about me going away? I know I’m not good at looking after you
but I can do things other people can’t do and we do love each other. You love me and you know it and
we know things nobody else knows.”
“We do wonderful things in the dark,” he said.
“And we did wonderful things in the daytime too.”
“You know I rather like the dark. In some ways it is an improvement.”
“Don’t lie too much,” she said. “You don’t have to be so bloody noble.”
“Listen to it rain,” he said. “How is the tide now?”
“It’s way out and the wind has driven the water even further out. You could almost walk to
Burano.”
“All except one place,” he said. “Are there many birds?”
“Mostly gulls and terns. They are down on the flats and when they get up the wind catches them.”
“Aren’t there any shore birds?”
“There are a few working on the part of the flats that only comes out when we have this wind
and this tide.”
“Do you think it will ever be spring?”
“I don’t know,” she said. “It certainly doesn’t act like it.”
“Have you drunk all your drink?”
“Just about. Why don’t you drink yours?”
“I was saving it.”
“Drink it up,” she said. “Wasn’t it awful when you couldn’t drink at all?”
“No, you see,” he said. “What I was thinking about when you went downstairs was that you
could go to Paris and then to London and you’d see people and could have some fun and then you’d
come back and it would have to be spring by then and you could tell me all about everything.”
“No,” she said.
“I think it would be intelligent to do,” he said. “You know this is a long sort of stupid business
and we have to learn to pace ourselves. And I don’t want to wear you out. You know—”
“I wish you wouldn’t say ‘you know’ so much.”
“You see? That’s one of the things. I could learn to talk in a non-irritating way. You might be
mad about me when you came back.”
“What would you do nights?”
“Nights are easy.”
“I’ll bet they are. I suppose you’ve learned how to sleep too.”
“I’m going to,” he told her and drank half the drink. “That’s part of The Plan. You know this is
how it works. If you go away and have some fun then I have a good conscience. Then for the first time
in my life with a good conscience I sleep automatically. I take a pillow which represents my good
conscience and I put my arms around it and off I go to sleep. If I wake up by any odd chance I just
think beautiful happy dirty thoughts. Or I make wonderful fine good resolutions. Or I remember things.
You know I want you to have fun—”
“Please don’t say ‘you know’”
“I’ll concentrate on not saying it. It’s barred but I forget and let the bars down. Anyway I don’t
want you just to be a seeing-eyed dog.”
“I’m not and you know it. Anyway it’s seeing-eye not seeing-eyed.”
“I knew that,” he told her. “Come and sit here, would you mind very much?”
She came and sat by him on the bed and they both heard the rain hard against the pane of the
window and he tried not to feel her head and her lovely face the way a blind man feels and there was
no other way that he could touch her face except that way. He held her close and kissed the top of her
head. I will have to try it another day, he thought. I must not be so stupid about it. She feels so lovely
and I love her so much and have done her so much damage and I must learn to take good care of her in
every way I can. If I think of her and of her only, everything will be all right.
“I won’t say ‘you know’ all the time any more,” he told her. “We can start with that.”
She shook her head and he could feel her tremble.
“You say it all you want,” she said and kissed him.
“Please don’t cry, my blessed,” he said.
“I don’t want you to sleep with any lousy pillow,” she said.
“I won’t. Not any lousy pillow.”
Stop it, he said to himself. Stop it right now.
“Look, tu,” he said. “We’ll go down now and have lunch in our old fine place by the fire and I’ll
tell you what a wonderful kitten you are and what lucky kittens we are.”
“We really are.”
“We’ll work everything out fine.”
“I just don’t want to be sent away.”
“Nobody is ever going to send you away.”
But walking down the stairs feeling each stair carefully and holding to the banister he thought, I
must get her away and get her away as soon as I can without hurting her. Because I am not doing too
well at this. That I can promise you. But what else can you do? Nothing, he thought. There’s nothing
you can do. But maybe, as you go along, you will get good at it.
A Man of the World
THE BLIND MAN KNEW THE SOUNDS OF all the different
machines in the Saloon. I don’t know how long it took him to learn the sounds of the machines but it
must have taken him quite a time because he only worked one saloon at a time. He worked two towns
though and he would start out of The Flats along after it was good and dark on his way up to Jessup.
He’d stop by the side of the road when he heard a car coming and their lights would pick him up and
either they would stop and give him a ride or they wouldn’t and would go on by on the icy road. It
would depend on how they were loaded and whether there were women in the car because the blind
man smelled plenty strong and especially in winter. But someone would always stop for him because
he was a blind man.
Everybody knew him and they called him Blindy which is a good name for a blind man in that
part of the country, and the name of the saloon that he threw his trade to was The Pilot. Right next to it
was another saloon, also with gambling and a dining room, that was called The Index. Both of these
were the names of mountains and they were both good saloons with old-days bars and the gambling
was about the same in one as in the other except you ate better in The Pilot probably, although you got
a better sizzling steak at The Index. Then The Index was open all night long and got the early morning
trade and from daylight until ten o’clock in the morning the drinks were on the house. They were the
only saloons in Jessup and they did not have to do that kind of thing. But that was the way they were.
Blindy probably preferred The Pilot because the machines were right along the left-hand wall as
you came in and faced the bar. This gave him better control over them than he would have had at The
Index where they were scattered on account it was a bigger place with more room. On this night it
was really cold outside and he came in with icicles on his mustache and small pus icicles out of both
eyes and he didn’t look really very good. Even his smell was froze but that wasn’t for very long and
he started to put out almost as soon as the door was shut. It was always hard for me to look at him but
I was looking at him carefully because I knew he always rode and I didn’t see how he would be
frozen up so bad. Finally I asked him.
“Where you walk from, Blindy?”
“Willie Sawyer put me out of his car down below the railway bridge. There weren’t no more
cars come and I walked in.”
“What did he put you afoot for?” somebody asked.
“Said I smelled too bad.”
Someone had pulled the handle on a machine and Blindy started listening to the whirr. It came up
nothing. “Any dudes playing?” he asked me.
“Can’t you hear?”
“Not yet.”
“No dudes, Blindy, and it’s a Wednesday.”
“I know what night it is. Don’t start telling me what night it is.”
Blindy went down the line of machines feeling in all of them to see if anything had been left in
the cups by mistake. Naturally there wasn’t anything, but that was the first part of his pitch. He came
back to the bar where we were and Al Chaney asked him to have a drink.
“No,” Blindy said. “I got to be careful on those roads.”
“What you mean those roads?” somebody asked him. “You only go on one road. Between here
and The Flats.”
“I been on lots of roads,” Blindy said. “And any time I may have to take off and go on more.”
Somebody hit on a machine but it wasn’t any heavy hit. Blindy moved on it just the same. It was
a quarter machine and the young fellow who was playing it gave him a quarter sort of reluctantly.
Blindy felt it before he put it in his pocket.
“Thank you,” he said. “You’ll never miss it.”
The young fellow said, “Nice to know that,” and put a quarter back in the machine and pulled
down again.
He hit again but this time pretty good and he scooped in the quarters and gave a quarter to
Blindy.”
“Thanks,” Blindy said. “You’re doing fine.”
“Tonight’s my night,” the young fellow who was playing said.
“Your night is my night,” Blindy said and the young fellow went on playing but he wasn’t doing
any good any more and Blindy was so strong standing by him and he looked so awful and finally the
fellow quit playing and came over to the bar. Blindy had run him out but he had no way of noticing it
because the fellow didn’t say anything, so Blindy just checked the machines again with his hand and
stood there waiting for someone else to come in and make a play.
There wasn’t any play at the wheel nor at the crap table and at the poker game there were just
gamblers sitting there and cutting each other up. It was a quiet evening on a week night in town and
there wasn’t any excitement. The place was not making a nickel except at the bar. But at the bar it was
pleasant and the place had been nice until Blindy had come in. Now everybody was figuring they
might as well go next door to The Index or else cut out and go home.
“What will yours be, Tom?” Frank the bartender asked me. “This is on the house.”
“I was figuring on shoving.”
“Have one first then.”
“The same with ditch,” I said. Frank asked the young fellow, who was wearing heavy Oregon
Cities and a black hat and was shaved clean and had a snow-burned face, what he would drink and
the young fellow took the same. The whisky was Old Forester.
I nodded to him and raised my drink and we both sipped at the drinks. Blindy was down at the
far end of the machines. I think he figured maybe no one would come in if they saw him at the door.
Not that he was self-conscious.
“How did that man lose his sight?” the young fellow asked me.
“In a fight,” Frank told him.
“I wouldn’t know,” I told him.
“Him fight?” the stranger said. He shook his head.
“Yeah,” Frank said. “He got that high voice out of the same fight. Tell him, Tom.”
“I never heard of it.”
“No. You wouldn’t of,” Frank said. “Of course not. You wasn’t here, I suppose. Mister, it was a
night about as cold as tonight. Maybe colder. It was a quick fight too. I didn’t see the start of it. Then
they come fighting out of the door of The Index. Blackie, him that’s Blindy now, and this other boy
Willie Sawyer, and they were slugging and kneeing and gouging and biting and I see one of Blackie’s
eyes hanging down on his cheek. They were fighting on the ice of the road with the snow all banked
up and the light from this door and The Index door, and Hollis Sands was right behind Willie Sawyer
who was gouging for the eye and Hollis kept hollering, ‘Bite it off! Bite it off just like it was a
grape!” Blackie was biting onto Willie Sawyer’s face and he had a good holt and it give way with a
jerk and then he had another good holt and they were down on the ice now and Willie Sawyer was
gouging him to make him let go and then Blackie gave a yell like you’ve never heard. Worse than
when they cut a boar.”
Blindy had come up opposite us and we smelled him and turned around.
“‘Bite it off just like it was a grape,’” he said in his high-pitched voice and looked at us, moving
his head up and down. “That was the left eye. He got the other one without no advice. Then he
stomped me when I couldn’t see. That was the bad part.” He patted himself.
“I could fight good then,” he said. “But he got the eye before I knew even what was happening.
He got it with a lucky gouge. Well,” Blindy said without any rancor, “that put a stop to my fighting
days.”
“Give Blackie a drink,” I said to Frank.
“Blindy’s the name, Tom. I earned that name. You seen me earn it. That’s the same fellow who
put me adrift down the road tonight. Fellow bit the eye. We ain’t never made friends.”
“What did you do to him?” the stranger asked.
“Oh, you’ll see him around,” Blindy said. “You’ll recognize him any time you see him. I’ll let it
come as a surprise.”
“You don’t want to see him,” I told the stranger.
“You know that’s one of the reasons I’d like to see sometimes,” Blindy said. “I’d like to just
have one good look at him.”
“You know what he looks like,” Frank told him. “You went up and put your hands on his face
once.”
“Did it again tonight too,” Blindy said happily. “That’s why he put me out of the car. He ain’t got
no sense of humor at all. I told him on a cold night like this he’d ought to bundle up so the whole
inside of his face wouldn’t catch cold. He didn’t even think that was funny. You know that Willie
Sawyer he’ll never be a man of the world.”
“Blackie, you have one on the house,” Frank said. “I can’t drive you home because I only live
just down the road. But you can sleep in the back of the place.”
“That’s mighty good of you, Frank. Only just don’t call me Blackie. I’m not Blackie any more.
Blindy’s my name.”
“Have a drink, Blindy.”
“Yes, sir,” Blindy said. His hand reached out and found the glass and he raised it accurately to
the three of us.
“That Willis Sawyer,” he said. “Probably alone home by himself. That Willie Sawyer he don’t
know how to have any fun at all.”
Summer People
HALFWAY DOWN THE GRAVEL ROAD FROM Hortons Bay, the
town, to the lake there was a spring. The water came up in a tile sunk beside the road, lipping over
the cracked edge of the tile and flowing away through the close growing mint into the swamp. In the
dark Nick put his arm down into the spring but could not hold it there because of the cold. He felt the
featherings of the sand spouting up from the spring cones at the bottom against his fingers. Nick
thought, I wish I could put all of myself in there. I bet that would fix me. He pulled his arm out and sat
down at the edge of the road. It was a hot night.
Down the road through the trees he could see the white of the Bean house on its piles over the
water. He did not want to go down to the dock. Everybody was down there swimming. He did not
want Kate with Odgar around. He could see the car on the road beside the warehouse. Odgar and
Kate were down there. Odgar with that fried-fish look in his eye every time he looked at Kate. Didn’t
Odgar know anything? Kate wouldn’t ever marry him. She wouldn’t ever marry anybody that didn’t
make her. And if they tried to make her she would curl up inside of herself and be hard and slip away.
He could make her do it all right. Instead of curling up hard and slipping away she would open out
smoothly, relaxing, untightening, easy to hold. Odgar thought it was love that did it. His eyes got
walleyed and red at the edges of the lids. She couldn’t bear to have him touch her. It was all in his
eyes. Then Odgar would want them to be just the same friends as ever. Play in the sand. Make mud
images. Take all-day trips in the boat together. Kate always in her bathing suit. Odgar looking at her.
Odgar was thirty-two and had been twice operated on for varicocele. He was ugly to look at and
everybody liked his face. Odgar could never get it and it meant everything in the world to him. Every
summer he was worse about it. It was pitiful. Odgar was awfully nice. He had been nicer to Nick than
anybody ever had. Now Nick could get it if he wanted it. Odgar would kill himself, Nick thought, if
he knew it. I wonder how he’d kill himself. He couldn’t think of Odgar dead. He probably wouldn’t
do it. Still people did. It wasn’t just love. Odgar thought just love would do it. Odgar loved her
enough, God knows. It was liking, and liking the body, and introducing the body, and persuading, and
taking chances, and never frightening, and assuming about the other person, and always taking never
asking, and gentleness and liking, and making liking and happiness, and joking and making people not
afraid. And making it all right afterwards. It wasn’t loving. Loving was frightening. He, Nicholas
Adams, could have what he wanted because of something in him. Maybe it did not last. Maybe he
would lose it. He wished he could give it to Odgar, or tell Odgar about it. You couldn’t ever tell
anybody about anything. Especially Odgar. No, not especially Odgar. Anybody, anywhere. That had
always been his first mistake, talking. He had talked himself out of too many things. There ought to be
something you could do for the Princeton, Yale and Harvard virgins, though. Why weren’t there any
virgins in state universities? Coeducation maybe. They met girls who were out to marry and the girls
helped them along and married them. What would become of fellows like Odgar and Harvey and
Mike and all the rest? He didn’t know. He hadn’t lived long enough. They were the best people in the
world. What became of them? How the hell could he know. How could he write like Hardy and
Hamsun when he only knew ten years of life. He couldn’t. Wait till he was fifty.
In the dark he kneeled down and took a drink from the spring. He felt all right. He knew he was
going to be a great writer. He knew things and they couldn’t touch him. Nobody could. Only he did not
know enough things. That would come all right. He knew. The water was cold and made his eyes
ache. He had swallowed too big a gulp. Like ice cream. That’s the way with drinking with your nose
underwater. He’d better go swimming. Thinking was no good. It started and went on so. He walked
down the road, past the car and the big warehouse on the left where apples and potatoes were loaded
onto the boats in the fall, past the white-painted Bean house where they danced by lantern light
sometimes on the hardwood floor, out on the dock to where they were swimming.
They were all swimming off the end of the dock. As Nick walked along the rough boards high
above the water he heard the double protest of the long springboard and a splash. The water lapped
below in the piles. That must be the Ghee, he thought. Kate came up out of the water like a seal and
pulled herself up the ladder.
“It’s Wemedge,” she shouted to the others. “Come on in, Wemedge. It’s wonderful.”
“Hi, Wemedge,” said Odgar. “Boy it’s great.”
“Where’s Wemedge?” It was the Ghee, swimming far out.
“Is this man Wemedge a nonswimmer?” Bill’s voice very deep and bass over the water.
Nick felt good. It was fun to have people yell at you like that. He scuffed off his canvas shoes,
pulled his shirt over his head and stepped out of his trousers. His bare feet felt the sandy planks of the
dock. He ran very quickly out the yielding plank of the springboard, his toes shoved against the end of
the board, he tightened and he was in the water, smoothly and deeply, with no consciousness of the
dive. He had breathed in deeply as he took off and now went on and on through the water, holding his
back arched, feet straight and trailing. Then he was on the surface, floating face down. He rolled over
and opened his eyes. He did not care anything about swimming, only to dive and be underwater.
“How is it, Wemedge?” The Ghee was just behind him.
“Warm as piss,” Nick said.
He took a deep breath, took hold of his ankles with his hands, his knees under his chin, and sank
slowly down into the water. It was warm at the top but he dropped quickly into cool, then cold. As he
neared the bottom it was quite cold. Nick floated down gently against the bottom. It was marly and his
toes hated it as he uncurled and shoved hard against it to come up to the air. It was strange coming up
from underwater into the dark. Nick rested in the water, barely paddling and comfortable. Odgar and
Kate were talking together up on the dock.
“Have you ever swum in a sea where it was phosphorescent, Carl?”
“No.” Odgar’s voice was unnatural talking to Kate.
We might rub ourselves all over with matches, Nick thought. He took a deep breath, drew his
knees up, clasped tight and sank, this time with his eyes open. He sank gently, first going off to one
side, then sinking head first. It was no good. He could not see underwater in the dark. He was right to
keep his eyes shut when he first dove in. It was funny about reactions like that. They weren’t always
right, though. He did not go all the way down but straightened out and swam along and up through the
cool, keeping just below the warm surface water. It was funny how much fun it was to swim
underwater and how little fun there was in plain swimming. It was fun to swim on the surface in the
ocean. That was the buoyancy. But there was the taste of the brine and the way it made you thirsty.
Fresh water was better. Just like this on a hot night. He came up for air just under the projecting edge
of the dock and climbed up the ladder.
“Oh, dive, Wemedge, will you?” Kate said. “Do a good dive.” They were sitting together on the
dock leaning back against one of the big piles.
“Do a noiseless one, Wemedge,” Odgar said.
“All right.”
Nick, dripping, walked out on the springboard, remembering how to do the dive. Odgar and Kate
watched him, black in the dark, standing at the end of the board, poise and dive as he had learned
from watching a sea otter. In the water as he turned to come up to the air Nick thought, Gosh, if I could
only have Kate down here. He came up in a rush to the surface, feeling water in his eyes and ears. He
must have started to take a breath.
“It was perfect. Absolutely perfect,” Kate shouted from the dock.
Nick came up the ladder.
“Where are the men?” he asked.
“They’re swimming way out in the bay,” Odgar said.
Nick lay down on the dock beside Kate and Odgar. He could hear the Ghee and Bill swimming
way out in the dark.
“You’re the most wonderful diver, Wemedge,” Kate said, touching his back with her foot. Nick
tightened under the contact.
“No,” he said.
“You’re a wonder, Wemedge,” Odgar said.
“Nope,” Nick said. He was thinking, thinking if it was possible to be with somebody
underwater, he could hold his breath three minutes, against the sand on the bottom, they could float up
together, take a breath and go down, it was easy to sink if you knew how. He had once drunk a bottle
of milk and peeled and eaten a banana underwater to show off, had to have weights, though, to hold
him down, if there was a ring at the bottom, something he could get his arm through, he could do it all
right. Gee, how it would be, you couldn’t ever get a girl though, a girl couldn’t go through with it,
she’d swallow water, it would drown Kate, Kate wasn’t really any good underwater, he wished there
was a girl like that, maybe he’d get a girl like that, probably never, there wasn’t anybody but him that
was that way underwater. Swimmers, hell, swimmers were slobs, nobody knew about the water but
him, there was a fellow up at Evanston that could hold his breath six minutes but he was crazy. He
wished he was a fish, no he didn’t. He laughed.
“What’s the joke, Wemedge?” Odgar said in his husky, near-to-Kate voice.
“I wished I was a fish,” Nick said.
“That’s a good joke,” said Odgar.
“Sure,” said Nick.
“Don’t be an ass, Wemedge,” said Kate.
“Would you like to be a fish, Butstein?” he said, lying with his head on the planks, facing away
from them.
“No,” said Kate. “Not tonight.”
Nick pressed his back hard against her foot.
“What animal would you like to be, Odgar?” Nick said.
“J. P. Morgan,” Odgar said.
“You’re nice, Odgar,” Kate said. Nick felt Odgar glow.
“I’d like to be Wemedge,” Kate said.
“You could always be Mrs. Wemedge,” Odgar said.
“There isn’t going to be any Mrs. Wemedge,” Nick said. He tightened his back muscles. Kate
had both her legs stretched out against his back as though she were resting them on a log in front of a
fire.
“Don’t be too sure,” Odgar said.
“I’m awful sure,” Nick said. “I’m going to marry a mermaid.”
“She’d be Mrs. Wemedge,” Kate said.
“No she wouldn’t,” Nick said. “I wouldn’t let her.”
“How would you stop her?”
“I’d stop her all right. Just let her try it.”
“Mermaids don’t marry,” Kate said.
“That’d be all right with me,” Nick said.
“The Mann Act would get you,” said Odgar.
“We’d stay outside the four-mile limit,” Nick said. “We’d get food from the rumrunners. You
could get a diving suit and come and visit us, Odgar. Bring Butstein if she wants to come. We’ll be at
home every Thursday afternoon.”
“What are we going to do tomorrow?” Odgar said, his voice becoming husky, near to Kate
again.
“Oh, hell, let’s not talk about tomorrow,” Nick said. “Let’s talk about my mermaid.”
“We’re through with your mermaid.”
“All right,” Nick said. “You and Odgar go and talk. I’m going to think about her.”
“You’re immoral, Wemedge. You’re disgustingly immoral.”
“No, I’m not. I’m honest.” Then, lying with his eyes shut, he said, “Don’t bother me. I’m thinking
about her.”
He lay there thinking of his mermaid while Kate’s insteps pressed against his back and she and
Odgar talked.
Odgar and Kate talked but he did not hear them. He lay, no longer thinking, quite happy.
Bill and the Ghee had come out of the water farther down the shore, walked down the beach up
to the car and then backed it out onto the dock. Nick stood up and put on his clothes. Bill and the Ghee
were in the front seat, tired from the long swim. Nick got in behind with Kate and Odgar. They leaned
back. Bill drove roaring up the hill and turned onto the main road. On the main highway Nick could
see the lights of other cars up ahead, going out of sight, then blinding as they mounted a hill, blinking
as they came near, then dimmed as Bill passed. The road was high along the shore of the lake. Big
cars out from Charlevoix, rich slobs riding behind their chauffeurs, came up and passed, hogging the
road and not dimming their lights. They passed like railway trains. Bill flashed the spotlights on cars
alongside the road in the trees, making the occupants change their positions. Nobody passed Bill from
behind, although a spotlight played on the back of their heads for some time until Bill drew away. Bill
slowed, then turned abruptly onto the sandy road that ran up through the orchard to the farmhouse. The
car, in low gear, moved steadily up through the orchard. Kate put her lips to Nick’s ear.
“In about an hour, Wemedge,” she said. Nick pressed his thigh hard against hers. The car circled
at the top of the hill above the orchard and stopped in front of the house.
“Aunty’s asleep. We’ve got to be quiet,” Kate said.
“Good night, men,” Bill whispered. “We’ll stop by in the morning.”
“Good night, Smith,” whispered the Ghee. “Good night, Butstein.”
“Good night, Ghee,” Kate said.
Odgar was staying at the house.
“Good night, men,” Nick said. “See you, Morgen.”
“Night, Wemedge,” Odgar said from the porch.
Nick and the Ghee walked down the road into the orchard. Nick reached up and took an apple
from one of the Duchess trees. It was still green but he sucked the acid juice from the bite and spat out
the pulp.
“You and the Bird took a long swim, Ghee,” he said.
“Not so long, Wemedge,” the Ghee answered.
They came out from the orchard past the mailbox onto the hard state highway. There was a cold
mist in the hollow where the road crossed the creek. Nick stopped on the bridge.
“Come on, Wemedge,” the Ghee said.
“All right,” Nick agreed.
They went on up the hill to where the road turned into the grove of trees around the church. There
were no lights in any of the houses they passed. Hortons Bay was asleep. No motor cars had passed
them.
“I don’t feel like turning in yet,” Nick said.
“Want me to walk with you?”
“No, Ghee. Don’t bother.”
“All right.”
“I’ll walk up as far as the cottage with you,” Nick said. They unhooked the screen door and went
into the kitchen. Nick opened the meat safe and looked around.
“Want some of this, Ghee?” he said.
“I want a piece of pie,” the Ghee said.
“So do I,” Nick said. He wrapped up some fried chicken and two pieces of cherry pie in oiled
paper from the top of the icebox.
“I’ll take this with me,” he said. The Ghee washed down his pie with a dipper full of water from
the bucket.
“If you want anything to read. Ghee, get it out of my room,” Nick said. The Ghee had been
looking at the lunch Nick had wrapped up.
“Don’t be a damn fool, Wemedge,” he said.
“That’s all right. Ghee.”
“All right. Only don’t be a damn fool,” the Ghee said. He opened the screen door and went out
across the grass to the cottage. Nick turned off the light and went out, hooking the screen door shut. He
had the lunch wrapped up in a newspaper and crossed the wet grass, climbed the fence and went up
the road through the town under the big elm trees, past the last cluster of R.F.D. mailboxes at the
crossroads and out onto the Charlevoix highway. After crossing the creek he cut across a field, skirted
the edge of the orchard, keeping to the edge of the clearing, and climbed the rail fence into the wood
lot. In the center of the wood lot four hemlock trees grew close together. The ground was soft with
pine needles and there was no dew. The wood lot had never been cut over and the forest floor was
dry and warm without underbrush. Nick put the package of lunch by the base of one of the hemlocks
and lay down to wait. He saw Kate coming through the trees in the dark but did not move. She did not
see him and stood a moment, holding the two blankets in her arms. In the dark it looked like some
enormous pregnancy. Nick was shocked. Then it was funny.
“Hello, Butstein,” he said. She dropped the blankets.
“Oh, Wemedge. You shouldn’t have frightened me like that. I was afraid you hadn’t come.”
“Dear Butstein,” Nick said. He held her close against him, feeling her body against his, all the
sweet body against his body. She pressed close against him.
“I love you so, Wemedge.”
“Dear, dear old Butstein,” Nick said.
They spread the blankets, Kate smoothing them flat.
“It was awfully dangerous to bring the blankets,” Kate said.
“I know,” Nick said. “Let’s undress.”
“Oh, Wemedge.”
“It’s more fun.” They undressed sitting on the blankets. Nick was a little embarrassed to sit there
like that.
“Do you like me with my clothes off, Wemedge?”
“Gee, let’s get under,” Nick said. They lay between the rough blankets. He was hot against her
cool body, hunting for it, then it was all right.
“Is it all right?”
Kate pressed all the way up for answer.
“Is it fun?”
“Oh, Wemedge. I’ve wanted it so. I’ve needed it so.”
They lay together in the blankets. Wemedge slid his head down, his nose touching along the line
of the neck, down between her breasts. It was like piano keys.
“You smell so cool,” he said.
He touched one of her small breasts with his lips gently. It came alive between his lips, his
tongue pressing against it. He felt the whole feeling coming back again and, sliding his hands down,
moved Kate over. He slid down and she fitted close in against him. She pressed tight in against the
curve of his abdomen. She felt wonderful there. He searched, a little awkwardly, then found it. He put
both hands over her breasts and held her to him. Nick kissed hard against her back. Kate’s head
dropped forward.
“Is it good this way?” he said.
“I love it. I love it. I love it. Oh, come, Wemedge. Please come. Come, come. Please, Wemedge.
Please, please, Wemedge.”
“There it is,” Nick said.
He was suddenly conscious of the blanket rough against his bare body.
“Was I bad, Wemedge?” Kate said.
“No, you were good,” Nick said. His mind was working very hard and clear. He saw everything
very sharp and clear. “I’m hungry,” he said.
“I wish we could sleep here all night.” Kate cuddled against him.
“It would be swell,” Nick said. “But we can’t. You’ve got to get back to the house.”
“I don’t want to go,” Kate said.
Nick stood up, a little wind blowing on his body. He pulled on his shirt and was glad to have it
on. He put on his trousers and shoes.
“You’ve got to get dressed, Stut,” he said. She lay there, the blankets pulled over her head.
“Just a minute,” she said. Nick got the lunch from over the hemlock. He opened it up.
“Come on, get dressed, Stut,” he said.
“I don’t want to,” Kate said. “I’m going to sleep here all night.” She sat up in the blankets.
“Hand me those things, Wemedge.”
Nick gave her the clothes.
“I’ve just thought of it,” Kate said. “If I sleep out here they’ll just think that I’m an idiot and came
out here with the blankets and it will be all right.”
“You won’t be comfortable,” Nick said.
“If I’m uncomfortable I’ll go in.”
“Let’s eat before I have to go,” Nick said.
“I’ll put something on,” Kate said.
They sat together and ate the fried chicken and each ate a piece of cherry pie.
Nick stood up, then kneeled down and kissed Kate.
He came through the wet grass to the cottage and upstairs to his room, walking carefully not to
creak. It was good to be in bed, sheets, stretching out full length, dipping his head in the pillow. Good
in bed, comfortable, happy, fishing tomorrow, he prayed as he always prayed when he remembered it,
for the family, himself, to be a great writer, Kate, the men, Odgar, for good fishing, poor old Odgar,
poor old Odgar, sleeping up there at the cottage, maybe not fishing, maybe not sleeping all night. Still
there wasn’t anything you could do, not a thing.
O
r
i
g
i
n
a
l
ly
p
u
b
l
i
s
h
e
d
i
n
T
he
N
i
c
k
A
d
a
ms
S
t
o
r
i
e
s
,
t
h
i
s
s
h
o
r
t
s
t
o
ry
w
a
s
l
eft
u
n
c
o
mp
l
e
t
e
d
by
He
m
i
n
gw
ay.
The Last Good Country
“NICKIE,” HIS SISTER SAID TO HIM. “LISten to me, Nickie.”
“I don’t want to hear it.”
He was watching the bottom of the spring where the sand rose in small spurts with the bubbling
water. There was a tin cup on a forked stick that was stuck in the gravel by the spring and Nick
Adams looked at it and at the water rising and then flowing clear in its gravel bed beside the road.
He could see both ways on the road and he looked up the hill and then down to the dock and the
lake, the wooded point across the bay and the open lake beyond where there were white caps running.
His back was against a big cedar tree and behind him there was a thick cedar swamp. His sister was
sitting on the moss beside him and she had her arm around his shoulders.
“The’re waiting for you to come home to supper,” his sister said. “There’s two of them. They
came in a buggy and they asked where you were.”
“Did anybody tell them?”
“Nobody knew where you were but me. Did you get many, Nickie?”
“I got twenty-six.”
“Are they good ones?”
“Just the size they want for the dinners.”
“Oh, Nickie, I wish you wouldn’t sell them.”
“She gives me a dollar a pound,” Nick Adams said.
His sister was tanned brown and she had dark brown eyes and dark brown hair with yellow
streaks in it from the sun. She and Nick loved each other and they did not love the others. They always
thought of everyone else in the family as the others.
“They know about everything, Nickie,” his sister said hopelessly. “They said they were going to
make an example of you and send you to the reform school.”
“They’ve only got proof on one thing,” Nick told her. “But I guess I have to go away for a
while.”
“Can I go?”
“No. I’m sorry, Littless. How much money have we got?”
“Fourteen dollars and sixty-five cents. I brought it.”
“Did they say anything else?”
“No. Only that they were going to stay till you came home.”
“Our mother will get tired of feeding them.”
“She gave them lunch already.”
“What were they doing?”
“Just sitting around on the screen porch. They asked our mother for your rifle but I’d hid it in the
woodshed when I saw them by the fence.”
“Were you expecting them?”
“Yes. Weren’t you?”
“I guess so. Goddam them.”
“Goddam them for me, too,” his sister said. “Aren’t I old enough to go now? I hid the rifle. I
brought the money.”
“I’d worry about you,” Nick Adams told her. “I don’t even know where I’m going.”
“Sure you do.”
“If there’s two of us they’d look harder. A boy and a girl show up.”
“I’d go like a boy,” she said. “I always wanted to be a boy anyway. They couldn’t tell anything
about me if my hair was cut.”
“No,” Nick Adams said. “That’s true.”
“Let’s think something out good,” she said. “Please, Nick, please. I could be lots of use and
you’d be lonely without me. Wouldn’t you be?”
“I’m lonely now thinking about going away from you.”
“See? And we may have to be away for years. Who can tell? Take me, Nickie. Please take me.”
She kissed him and held onto him with both her arms. Nick Adams looked at her and tried to think
straight. It was difficult. But there was no choice.
“I shouldn’t take you. But then I shouldn’t have done any of it,” he said. “I’ll take you. Maybe
only for a couple of days, though.”
“That’s all right,” she told him. “When you don’t want me I’ll go straight home. I’ll go home
anyway if I’m a bother or a nuisance or an expense.”
“Let’s think it out,” Nick Adams told her. He looked up and down the road and up at the sky
where the big high afternoon clouds were riding and at the white caps on the lake out beyond the
point.
“I’d go through the woods down to the inn beyond the point and sell her the trout,” he told his
sister. “She ordered them for dinners tonight. Right now they want more trout dinners than chicken
dinners. I don’t know why. The trout are in good shape. I gutted them and they’re wrapped in
cheesecloth and they’ll be cool and fresh. I’ll tell her I’m in some trouble with the game wardens and
that they’re looking for me and I have to get out of the country for a while. I’ll get her to give me a
small skillet and some salt and pepper and some bacon and some shortening and some com meal. I’ll
get her to give me a sack to put everything in and I’ll get some dried apricots and some prunes and
some tea and plenty of matches and a hatchet. But I can only get one blanket. She’ll help me because
buying trout is just as bad as selling them.”
“I can get a blanket,” his sister said. “I’ll wrap it around the rifle and I’ll bring your moccasins
and my moccasins and I’ll change to different overalls and a shirt and hide these so they’ll think I’m
wearing them and I’ll bring soap and a comb and a pair of scissors and something to sew with and
Lorna Doone and Swiss Family Robinson.”
“Bring all the .22’s you can find,” Nick Adams said. Then quickly, “Come on back. Get out of
sight.” He had seen a buggy coming down the road.
Behind the cedars they lay flat against the springy moss with their faces down and heard the soft
noise of the horses’ hooves in the sand and the small noise of the wheels. Neither of the men in the
buggy was talking but Nick Adams smelled them as they went past and he smelled the sweated horses.
He sweated himself until they were well past on their way to the dock because he thought they might
stop to water at the spring or to get a drink.
“Is that them, Littless?” he asked.
“Yeah,” she said.
“Crawl way back in,” Nick Adams said. He crawled back into the swamp, pulling his sack of
fish. The swamp was mossy and not muddy there. Then he stood up and hid the sack behind the trunk
of a cedar and motioned the girl to come further in. They went into the cedar swamp, moving as softly
as deer.
“I know the one,” Nick Adams said. “He’s a no good son of a bitch.”
“He said he’d been after you for four years.”
“I know.”
“The other one, the big one with the spit tobacco face and the blue suit, is the one from down
state.”
“Good,” Nick said. “Now we’ve had a look at them I better get going. Can you get home all
right?”
“Sure. I’ll cut up to the top of the hill and keep off the road. Where will I meet you tonight,
Nickie?”
“I don’t think you ought to come, Littless.”
“I’ve got to come. You don’t know how it is. I can leave a note for our mother and say I went
with you and you’ll take good care of me.”
“All right,” Nick Adams said. “I’ll be where the big hemlock is that was struck by lightning. The
one that’s down. Straight up from the cove. Do you know the one? On the short cut to the road.”
“That’s awfully close to the house.”
“I don’t want you to have to carry the stuff too far.”
“I’ll do what you say. But don’t take chances, Nickie.”
“I’d like to have the rifle and go down now to the edge of the timber and kill both of those
bastards while they’re on the dock and wire a piece of iron on them from the old mill and sink them in
the channel.”
“And then what would you do?” his sister asked. “Somebody sent them.”
“Nobody sent that first son of a bitch.”
“But you killed the moose and you sold the trout and you killed what they took from your boat.”
“That was all right to kill that.”
He did not like to mention what that was, because that was the proof they had.
“I know. But you’re not going to kill people and that’s why I’m going with you.”
“Let’s stop talking about it. But I’d like to kill those two sons of bitches.”
“I know,” she said. “So would I. But we’re not going to kill people, Nickie. Will you promise
me?”
“No. Now I don’t know whether it’s safe to take her the trout.”
“I’ll take them to her.”
“No. They’re too heavy. I’ll take them through the swamp and to the woods in back of the hotel.
You go straight to the hotel and see if she’s there and if everything’s all right. And if it is you’ll find
me there by the big basswood tree.”
“It’s a long way there through the swamp, Nicky.”
“It’s a long way back from reform school, too.”
“Can’t I come with you through the swamp? I’ll go in then and see her while you stay out and
come back out with you and take them in.”
“All right,” Nick said. “But I wish you’d do it the other way.”
“Why, Nickie?”
“Because you’ll see them maybe on the road and you can tell me where they’ve gone. I’ll see you
in the second-growth wood lot in back of the hotel where the big basswood is.”
Nick waited more than an hour in the second-growth timber and his sister had not come. When
she came she was excited and he knew she was tired.
“They’re at our house,” she said. “They’re sitting out on the screen porch and drinking whiskey
and ginger ale and they’ve unhitched and put their horses up. They say they’re going to wait till you
come back. It was our mother told them you’d gone fishing at the creek. I don’t think she meant to.
Anyway I hope not.”
“What about Mrs. Packard?”
“I saw her in the kitchen of the hotel and she asked me if I’d seen you and I said no. She said she
was waiting for you to bring her some fish for tonight. She was worried. You might as well take them
in.”
“Good,” he said. “They’re nice and fresh. I repacked them in ferns.”
“Can I come in with you?”
“Sure,” Nick said.
The hotel was a long wooden building with a porch that fronted on the lake. There were wide
wooden steps that led down to the pier that ran far out into the water and there were natural cedar
railings alongside the steps and natural cedar railings around the porch. There were chairs made of
natural cedar on the porch and in them sat middle-aged people wearing white clothes. There were
three pipes set on the lawn with spring water bubbling out of them, and little paths led to them. The
water tasted like rotten eggs because these were mineral springs and Nick and his sister used to drink
from them as a matter of discipline. Now coming toward the rear of the hotel, where the kitchen was,
they crossed a plank bridge over a small brook running into the lake beside the hotel, and slipped into
the back door of the kitchen.
“Wash them and put them in the ice box, Nickie,” Mrs. Packard said. “I’ll weigh them later.”
“Mrs. Packard,” Nick said. “Could I speak to you a minute?”
“Speak up,” she said. “Can’t you see I’m busy?”
“If I could have the money now.”
Mrs. Packard was a handsome woman in a gingham apron. She had a beautiful complexion and
she was very busy and her kitchen help were there as well.
“You don’t mean you want to sell trout. Don’t you know that’s against the law?”
“I know,” Nick said. “I brought you the fish for a present. I mean my time for the wood I split
and corded.”
“I’ll get it,” she said. “I have to go to the annex.”
Nick and his sister followed her outside. On the board sidewalk that led to the icehouse from the
kitchen she stopped and put her hands in her apron pocket and took out a pocketbook.
“You get out of here,” she said quickly and kindly. “And get out of here fast. How much do you
need?”
“I’ve got sixteen dollars,” Nick said.
“Take twenty,” she told him. “And keep that tyke out of trouble. Let her go home and keep an eye
on them until you’re clear.”
“When did you hear about them?”
She shook her head at him.
“Buying is as bad or worse than selling,” she said. “You stay away until things quiet down.
Nickie, you’re a good boy no matter what anybody says. You see Packard if things get bad. Come
here nights if you need anything. I sleep light. Just knock on the window.”
“You aren’t going to serve them tonight are you, Mrs. Packard? You’re not going to serve them
for the dinners?”
“No,” she said. “But I’m not going to waste them. Packard can eat half a dozen and I know other
people that can. Be careful, Nickie, and let it blow over. Keep out of sight.”
“Littless wants to go with me.”
“Don’t you dare take her,” Mrs. Packard said. “You come by tonight and I’ll have some stuff
made up for you.”
“Could you let me take a skillet?”
“I’ll have what you need. Packard knows what you need. I don’t give you any more money so
you’ll keep out of trouble.”
“I’d like to see Mr. Packard about getting a few things.”
“He’ll get you anything you need. But don’t you go near the store, Nick.”
“I’ll get Littless to take him a note.”
“Anytime you need anything,” Mrs. Packard said. “Don’t you worry. Packard will be studying
things out.”
“Good-bye, Aunt Halley.”
“Good-bye,” she said and kissed him. She smelt wonderful when she kissed him. It was the way
the kitchen smelled when they were baking. Mrs. Packard smelled like her kitchen and her kitchen
always smelled good.
“Don’t worry and don’t do anything bad.”
“I’ll be all right.”
“Of course,” she said. “And Packard will figure out something.”
They were in the big hemlocks on the hill behind the house now. It was evening and the sun was
down beyond the hills on the other side of the lake.
“I’ve found everything,” his sister said. “It’s going to make a pretty big pack, Nickie.”
“I know it. What are they doing?”
“They ate a big supper and now they’re sitting out on the porch and drinking. They’re telling
each other stories about how smart they are.”
“They aren’t very smart so far.”
“They’re going to starve you out,” his sister said. “A couple of nights in the woods and you’ll be
back. You hear a loon holler a couple of times when you got an empty stomach and you’ll be back.”
“What did our mother give them for supper?”
“Awful,” his sister said.
“Good.”
“I’ve located everything on the list. Our mother’s gone to bed with a sick headache. She wrote
our father.”
“Did you see the letter?”
“No. It’s in her room with the list of stuff to get from the store tomorrow. She’s going to have to
make a new list when she finds everything is gone in the morning.”
“How much are they drinking?”
“They’ve drunk about a bottle, I guess.”
“I wish we could put knockout drops in it.”
“I could put them in if you’ll tell me how. Do you put them in the bottle?”
“No. In the glass. But we haven’t got any.”
“Would there be any in the medicine cabinet?”
“No.”
“I could put paregoric in the bottle. They have another bottle. Or calomel. I know we’ve got
those.”
“No,” said Nick. “You try to get me about half the other bottle when they’re asleep. Put it in any
old medicine bottle.”
“I better go and watch them,” his sister said. “My, I wish we had knockout drops. I never even
heard of them.”
“They aren’t really drops,” Nick told her. “It’s chloral hydrate. Whores give it to lumberjacks in
their drinks when they’re going to jack roll them.”
“It sounds pretty bad,” his sister said. “But we probably ought to have some for in emergencies.”
“Let me kiss you,” her brother said. “Just for in an emergency. Let’s go down and watch them
drinking. I’d like to hear them talk sitting in our own house.”
“Will you promise not to get angry and do anything bad?”
“Sure.”
“Nor to the horses. It’s not the horses’ fault.”
“Not the horses either.”
“I wish we had knockout drops,” his sister said loyally.
“Well, we haven’t,” Nick told her. “I guess there aren’t any this side of Boyne City.”
They sat in the woodshed and they watched the two men sitting at the table on the screen porch.
The moon had not risen and it was dark, but the outlines of the men showed against the lightness that
the lake made behind them. They were not talking now but were both leaning forward on the table.
Then Nick heard the clink of ice against a bucket.
“The ginger ale’s gone,” one of the men said.
“I said it wouldn’t last,” the other said. “But you were the one said we had plenty.”
“Get some water. There’s a pail and a dipper in the kitchen.”
“I’ve drunk enough. I’m going to turn in.”
“Aren’t you going to stay up for that kid?”
“No. I’m going to get some sleep. You stay up.”
“Do you think he’ll come in tonight?”
“I don’t know. I’m going to get some sleep. You wake me when you get sleepy.”
“I can stay up all night,” the local warden said. “Many’s the night I’ve stayed up all night for
jack lighters and never shut an eye.”
“Me, too,” the down-state man said. “But now I’m going to get a little sleep.”
Nick and his sister watched him go in the door. Their mother had told the two men they could
sleep in the bedroom next to the living room. They saw when he struck a match. Then the window was
dark again. They watched the other warden sitting at the table until he put his head on his arms. Then
they heard him snoring.
“We’ll give him a little while to make sure he’s solid asleep. Then we’ll get the stuff,” Nick
said.
“You get over outside the fence,” his sister said. “It doesn’t matter if I’m moving around. But he
might wake up and see you.”
“All right,” Nick agreed. “I’ll get everything out of here. Most of it’s here.”
“Can you find everything without a light?”
“Sure. Where’s the rifle?”
“Flat on the back upper rafter. Don’t slip or make the wood fall down. Nick.”
“Don’t you worry.”
She came out to the fence at the far corner where Nick was making up his pack beyond the big
hemlock that had been struck by lightning the summer before and had fallen in a storm that autumn.
The moon was just rising now behind the far hills and enough moonlight came through the trees for
Nick to see clearly what he was packing. His sister put down the sack she was carrying and said,
“They’re sleeping like pigs, Nickie.”
“Good.”
“The down-state one was snoring just like the one outside. I think I got everything.”
“You good old Littless.”
“I wrote a note to our mother and told her I was going with you to keep you out of trouble and not
to tell anybody and that you’d take good care of me. I put it under her door. It’s locked.”
“Oh, shit,” Nick said. Then he said, “I’m sorry, Littless.”
“Now it’s not your fault and I can’t make it worse for you.”
“You’re awful.”
“Can’t we be happy now?”
“Sure.”
“I brought the whiskey,” she said hopefully. “I left some in the bottle. One of them can’t be sure
the other didn’t drink it. Anyway they have another bottle.”
“Did you bring a blanket for you?”
“Of course.”
“We better get going.”
“We’re all right if we’re going where I think. The only thing that makes the pack bigger is my
blanket. I’ll carry the rifle.”
“All right. What kind of shoes have you?”
“I’ve got my work-moccasins.”
“What did you bring to read?”
“Lorna Doone and Kidnapped and Wuthering Heights.”
“They’re all too old for you but Kidnapped.”
“Lorna Doone isn’t.”
“We’ll read it out loud,” Nick said. “That way it lasts longer. But, Littless, you’ve made things
sort of hard now and we better go. Those bastards can’t be as stupid as they act. Maybe it was just
because they were drinking.”
Nick had rolled the pack now and tightened the straps and he sat back and put his moccasins on.
He put his arm around his sister. “You sure you want to go?”
“I have to go, Nickie. Don’t be weak and indecisive now. I left the note.”
“All right,” Nick said. “Let’s go. You can take the rifle until you get tired of it.”
“I’m all ready to go,” his sister said. “Let me help you strap the pack.”
“You know you haven’t had any sleep at all and that we have to travel?”
“I know. I’m really like the snoring one at the table says he was.”
“Maybe he was that way once, too,” Nick said. “But what you have to do is keep your feet in
good shape. Do the moccasins chafe?”
“No. And my feet are tough from going barefoot all summer.”
“Mine are good, too,” said Nick. “Come on. Let’s go.”
They started off walking on the soft hemlock needles and the trees were high and there was no
brush between the tree trunks. They walked uphill and the moon came through the trees and showed
Nick with the very big pack and his sister carrying the .22 rifle. When they were at the top of the hill
they looked back and saw the lake in the moonlight. It was clear enough so they could see the dark
point, and beyond were the high hills of the far shore.
“We might as well say good-bye to it,” Nick Adams said.
“Good-bye, lake,” Littless said. “I love you, too.”
They went down the hill and across the long field and through the orchard and then through a rail
fence and into a field of stubble. Going through the stubble field they looked to the right and saw the
slaughterhouse and the big barn in the hollow and the old log farmhouse on the other high land that
overlooked the lake. The long road of Lombardy poplars that ran to the lake was in the moonlight.
“Does it hurt your feet, Littless?” Nick asked.
“No,” his sister said.
“I came this way on account of the dogs,” Nick said. “They’d shut up as soon as they knew it
was us. But somebody might hear them bark.”
“I know,” she said. “And as soon as they shut up afterwards they’d know it was us.”
Ahead they could see the dark of the rising line of hills beyond the road. They came to the end of
one cut field of grain and crossed the little sunken creek that ran down to the springhouse. Then they
climbed across the rise of another stubble field and there was another rail fence and the sandy road
with the second-growth timber solid beyond it.
“Wait till I climb over and I’ll help you,” Nick said. “I want to look at the road.”
From the top of the fence he saw the roll of the country and the dark timber by their own house
and the brightness of the lake in the moonlight Then he was looking at the road.
“They can’t track us the way we’ve come and I don’t think they would notice tracks in this deep
sand,” he said to his sister. “We can keep to the two sides of the road if it isn’t too scratchy.”
“Nickie, honestly I don’t think they’re intelligent enough to track anybody. Look how they just
waited for you to come back and then practically got drunk before supper and afterwards.”
“They came down to the dock,” Nick said. “That was where I was. If you hadn’t told me they
would have picked me up.”
“They didn’t have to be so intelligent to figure you would be on the big creek when our mother
let them know you might have gone fishing. After I left they must have found all the boats were there
and that would make them think you were fishing the creek. Everybody knows you usually fish below
the grist mill and the cider mill. They were just slow thinking it out.”
“All right,” Nick said. “But they were awfully close then.”
His sister handed him the rifle through the fence, butt toward him, and then crawled between the
rails. She stood beside him on the road and he put his hand on her head and stroked it.
“Are you awfully tired, Littless?”
“No. I’m fine. I’m too happy to be tired.”
“Until you’re too tired you walk in the sandy part of the road when; their horses made holes in
the sand. It’s so soft and dry tracks won’t show and I’ll walk on the side where it’s hard.”
“I can walk on the side, too.”
“No. I don’t want you to get scratched.”
They climbed, but with constant small descents, toward the height of land that separated the two
lakes. There was close, heavy, second-growth timber on both sides of the road and blackberry and
raspberry bushes grew from the edge of the road to the timber. Ahead they could see the top of each
hill as a notch in the timber. The moon was well on its way down now.
“How do you feel, Littless?” Nick asked his sister.
“I feel wonderful. Nickie, is it always this nice when you run away from home?”
“No. Usually it’s lonesome.”
“How lonesome have you ever been?”
“Bad black lonesome. Awful.”
“Do you think you’ll get lonesome with me?”
“No.”
“You don’t mind you’re with me instead of going to Trudy?”
“What do you talk about her for all the time?”
“I haven’t been. Maybe you were thinking about her and you thought I was talking.”
“You’re too smart,” Nick said. “I thought about her because you told me where she was and
when I knew where she was I wondered what she would be doing and all that.”
“I guess I shouldn’t have come.”
“I told you that you shouldn’t have come.”
“Oh, hell,” his sister said. “Are we going to be like the others and have fights? I’ll go back now.
You don’t have to have me.”
“Shut up,” Nick said.
“Please don’t say that, Nickie. I’ll go back or I’ll stay just as you want. I’ll go back whenever
you tell me to. But I won’t have fights. Haven’t we seen enough fights in families?”
“Yes,” said Nick.
“I know I forced you to take me. But I fixed it so you wouldn’t get in trouble about it. And I did
keep them from catching you.”
They had reached the height of land and from here they could see the lake again although from
here it looked narrow now and almost like a big river.
“We cut across country here,” Nick said. “Then we’ll hit that old logging road. Here’s where
you go back from if you want to go back.”
He took off his pack and put it back into the timber and his sister leaned the rifle on it.
“Sit down, Littless, and take a rest,” he said. “We’re both tired.”
Nick lay with his head on the pack and his sister lay by him with her head on his shoulder.
“I’m not going back, Nickie, unless you tell me to,” she said. “I just don’t want fights. Promise
me we won’t have fights?”
“Promise.”
“I won’t talk about Trudy.”
“The hell with Trudy.”
“I want to be useful and a good partner.”
“You are. You won’t mind if I get restless and mix it up with being lonesome?”
“No. We’ll take good care of each other and have fun. We can have a lovely time.”
“All right. We’ll start to have it now.”
“I’ve been having it all the time.”
“We just have one pretty hard stretch and then a really hard stretch and then we’ll be there. We
might as well wait until it gets light to start. You go to sleep, Littless. Are you warm enough?”
“Oh, yes, Nickie. I’ve got my sweater.”
She curled up beside him and was asleep. In a little while Nick was sleeping, too. He slept for
two hours until the morning light woke him.
Nick had circled around through the second-growth timber until they had come onto the old
logging road.
“We couldn’t leave tracks going into it from the main road,” he told his sister.
The old road was so overgrown that he had to stoop many times to avoid hitting branches.
“It’s like a tunnel,” his sister said.
“It opens up after a while.”
“Have I ever been here before?”
“No. This goes up way beyond where I ever took you hunting.”
“Does it come out on the secret place?”
“No, Littless. We have to go through some long bad slashings. Nobody gets in where we’re
going.”
They kept on along the road and then took another road that was even more overgrown. Then
they came out into a clearing. There was fireweed and brush in the clearing and the old cabins of the
logging camp. They were very old and some of the roofs had fallen in. But there was a spring by the
road and they both drank at it. The sun wasn’t up yet and they both felt hollow and empty in the early
morning after the night of walking.
“All this beyond was hemlock forest,” Nick said. “They only cut it for the bark and they never
used the logs.”
“But what happens to the road?”
“They must have cut up at the far end first and hauled and piled the bark by the road to snake it
out. Then finally they cut everything right to the road and piled the bark here and then pulled out.”
“Is the secret place beyond all this slashing?”
“Yes. We go through the slashing and then some more road and then another slashing and then we
come to virgin timber.”
“How did they leave it when they cut all this?”
“I don’t know. It belonged to somebody that wouldn’t sell, I guess. They stole a lot from the
edges and paid stumpage on it. But the good part’s still there and there isn’t any passable road into
it.”
“But why can’t people go down the creek? The creek has to come from somewhere?”
They were resting before they started the bad traveling through the slashing and Nick wanted to
explain.
“Look, Littless. The creek crosses the main road we were on and it goes through a farmer’s land.
The farmer has it fenced for a pasture and he runs people off that want to fish. So they stop at the
bridge on his land. On the section of the creek where they would hit if they cut across his pasture on
the other side from his house he runs a bull. The bull is mean and he really runs everybody off. He’s
the meanest bull I ever saw and he just stays there, mean all the time, and hunts for people. Then after
him the farmer’s land ends and there’s a section of cedar swamp with sink holes and you’d have to
know it to get through. And then, even if you know it, it’s bad. Below that is the secret place. We’re
going in over the hills and sort of in the back way. Then below the secret place there’s real swamp.
Bad swamp that you can’t get through. Now we better start the bad part.”
The bad part and the part that was worse were behind them now. Nick had climbed over many
logs that were higher than his head and others that were up to his waist. He would take the rifle and
lay it down on the top of the log and pull his sister up and then she would slide down on the far side
or he would lower himself down and take the rifle and help the girl down. They went over and around
piles of brush and it was hot in the slashing, and the pollen from the ragweed and the fireweed dusted
the girl’s hair and made her sneeze.
“Damn slashings,” she said to Nick. They were resting on top of a big log ringed where they sat
by the cutting of the barkpeelers. The ring was gray in the rotting gray log and all around were other
long gray trunks and gray brush and branches with the brilliant and worthless seeds growing.
“This is the last one,” Nick said.
“I hate them,” his sister said. “And the damn weeds are like flowers in a tree cemetery if nobody
took care of it.”
“You see why I didn’t want to try to make it in the dark.”
“We couldn’t.”
“No. And nobody’s going to chase us through here. Now we come into the good part.”
They came from the hot sun of the slashings into the shade of the great trees. The slashings had
run up to the top of a ridge and over and then the forest began. They were walking on the brown forest
floor now and it was springy and cool under their feet. There was no underbrush and the trunks of the
trees rose sixty feet high before there were any branches. It was cool in the shade of the trees and high
up in them Nick could hear the breeze that was rising. No sun came through as they walked and Nick
knew there would be no sun through the high top branches until nearly noon. His sister put her hand in
his and walked close to him.
“I’m not scared, Nickie. But it makes me feel very strange.”
“Me, too,” Nick said. “Always.” “I never was in woods like these.”
“This is all the virgin timber left around here.”
“Do we go through it very long?” “Quite a way.”
“I’d be afraid if I were alone.”
“It makes me feel strange. But I’m not afraid.”
“I said that first.”
“I know. Maybe we say it because we are afraid.”
“No. I’m not afraid because I’m with you. But I know I’d be afraid alone. Did you ever come
here with anyone else?”
“No. Only by myself.”
“And you weren’t afraid?”
“No. But I always feel strange. Like the way I ought to feel in church.”
“Nickie, where we’re going to live isn’t as solemn as this, is it?”
“No. Don’t you worry. There it’s cheerful. You just enjoy this, Littless. This is good for you.
This is the way forests were in the olden days. This is about the last good country there is left.
Nobody gets in here ever.”
“I love the olden days. But I wouldn’t want it all this solemn.”
“It wasn’t all solemn. But the hemlock forests were.”
“It’s wonderful walking. I thought behind our house was wonderful. But this is better. Nickie, do
you believe in God? You don’t have to answer if you don’t want to.”
“I don’t know.”
“All right. You don’t have to say it. But you don’t mind if I say my prayers at night?”
“No. I’ll remind you if you forget.”
“Thank you. Because this kind of woods makes me feel awfully religious.”
“That’s why they build cathedrals to be like this.”
“You’ve never seen a cathedral, have you?”
“No. But I’ve read about them and I can imagine them. This is the best one we have around
here.”
“Do you think we can go to Europe some time and see cathedrals?”
“Sure we will. But first I have to get out of this trouble and learn how to make some money.”
“Do you think you’ll ever make money writing?”
“If I get good enough.”
“Couldn’t you maybe make it if you wrote cheerfuller things? That isn’t my opinion. Our mother
said everything you write is morbid.”
“It’s too morbid for the St. Nicholas,” Nick said. “They didn’t say it. But they didn’t like it.”
“But the St. Nicholas is our favorite magazine.”
“I know,” said Nick. “But I’m too morbid for it already. And I’m not even grown-up.”
“When is a man grown-up? When he’s married?”
“No. Until you’re grown-up they send you to reform school. After you’re grown-up they send you
to the penitentiary.”
“I’m glad you’re not grown-up then.”
“They’re not going to send me anywhere,” Nick said. “And let’s not talk morbid even if I write
morbid.”
“I didn’t say it was morbid.”
“I know. Everybody else does, though.”
“Let’s be cheerful, Nickie,” his sister said. “These woods make us too solemn.”
“We’ll be out of them pretty soon,” Nick told her. “Then you’ll see where we’re going to live.
Are you hungry, Littless?”
“A little.”
“I’ll bet,” Nick said. “We’ll eat a couple of apples.”
They were coming down a long hill when they saw sunlight ahead through the tree trunks. Now,
at the edge of the timber, there was wintergreen growing and some partridgeberries and the forest
floor began to be alive with growing things. Through the tree trunks they saw an open meadow that
sloped to where white birches grew along the stream. Below the meadow and the line of the birches
there was the dark green of a cedar swamp and far beyond the swamp there were dark blue hills.
There was an arm of the lake between the swamp and the hills. But from here they could not see it.
They only felt from the distances that it was there.
“Here’s the spring,” Nick said to his sister. “And here’s the stones where I camped before.”
“It’s a beautiful, beautiful place, Nickie,” his sister said. “Can we see the lake, too?”
“There’s a place where we can see it. But it’s better to camp here. I’ll get some wood and we’ll
make breakfast.”
“The firestones are very old.”
“It’s a very old place,” Nick said. “The firestones are Indian.”
“How did you come to it straight through the woods with no trail and no blazes?”
“Didn’t you see the direction sticks on the three ridges?”
“No.”
“I’ll show them to you sometime.”
“Are they yours?”
“No. They’re from the old days.”
“Why didn’t you show them to me?”
“I don’t know,” Nick said. “I was showing off I guess.”
“Nickie, they’ll never find us here.”
“I hope not,” Nick said.
At about the time that Nick and his sister were entering the first of the slashings the warden who
was sleeping on the screen porch of the house that stood in the shade of the trees above the lake was
wakened by the sun that, rising above the slope of open land behind the house, shone full on his face.
During the night the warden had gotten up for a drink of water and when he had come back from
the kitchen he had lain down on the floor with a cushion from one of the chairs for a pillow. Now he
waked, realized where he was, and got to his feet. He had slept on his right side because he had a .38
Smith and Wesson revolver in a shoulder holster under his left armpit. Now, awake, he felt for the
gun, looked away from the sun, which hurt his eyes, and went into the kitchen where he dipped up a
drink of water from the pail beside the kitchen table. The hired girl was building a fire in the stove
and the warden said to her, “What about some breakfast?”
“No breakfast,” she said. She slept in a cabin out behind the house and had come into the kitchen
a half an hour before. The sight of the warden lying on the floor of the screen porch and the nearly
empty bottle of whiskey on the table had frightened and disgusted her. Then it had made her angry.
“What do you mean, no breakfast?” the warden said, still holding the dipper.
“Just that.”
“Why?”
“Nothing to eat.”
“What about coffee?”
“No coffee.”
“Tea?”
“No tea. No bacon. No corn meal. No salt. No pepper. No coffee. No Borden’s canned cream.
No Aunt Jemima buckwheat flour. No nothing.”
“What are you talking about? There was plenty to eat last night.”
“There isn’t now. Chipmunks must have carried it away.”
The warden from down state had gotten up when he heard them talking and had come into the
kitchen.
“How do you feel this morning?” the hired girl asked him.
The warden ignored the hired girl and said, “What is it, Evans?”
“That son of a bitch came in here last night and got himself a pack load of grub.”
“Don’t you swear in my kitchen,” the hired girl said.
“Come out here,” The down-state warden said. They both went out on the screen porch and shut
the kitchen door.
“What does that mean, Evans?” The down-state man pointed at the quart of Old Green River
which had less than a quarter left in it. “How skunk-drunk were you?”
“I drank the same as you. I sat up by the table—”
“Doing what?”
“Waiting for the goddam Adams boy if he showed.”
“And drinking.”
“Not drinking. Then I got up and went in the kitchen and got a drink of water about half past four
and I lay down here in front of the door to take it easier.”
“Why didn’t you lie down in front of the kitchen door?”
“I could see him better from here if he came.”
“So what happened?”
“He must have come in the kitchen, through a window maybe, and loaded that stuff.”
“Bullshit.”
“What were you doing?” the local warden asked.
“I was sleeping the same as you.”
“Okay. Let’s quit fighting about it. That doesn’t do any good.”
“Tell that hired girl to come out here.”
The hired girl came out and the down-state man said to her, “You tell Mrs. Adams we want to
speak to her.”
The hired girl did not say anything but went into the main part of the house, shutting the door after
her.
“You better pick up the full and the empty bottles,” the down-state man said. “There isn’t enough
of this to do any good. You want a drink of it?”
“No thanks. I’ve got to work today.”
“I’ll take one,” the down-state man said. “It hasn’t been shared right.”
“I didn’t drink any of it after you left,” the local warden said doggedly.
“Why do you keep on with that bullshit?”
“It isn’t bullshit.”
The down-state man put the bottle down. “All right,” he said to the hired girl, who had opened
and shut the door behind her. “What did she say?”
“She has a sick headache and she can’t see you. She says you have a warrant. She says for you to
search the place if you want to and then go.”
“What did she say about the boy?”
“She hasn’t seen the boy and she doesn’t know anything about him.”
“Where are the other kids?”
“They’re visiting at Charlevoix.”
“Who are they visiting?”
“I don’t know. She doesn’t know. They went to the dance and they were going to stay over
Sunday with friends.”
“Who was that kid that was around here yesterday?”
“I didn’t see any kid around here yesterday.”
“There was.”
“Maybe some friend of the children asking for them. Maybe some resorter’s kid. Was it a boy or
a girl?”
“A girl about eleven or twelve. Brown hair and brown eyes. Freckles. Very tanned. Wearing
overalls and a boy’s shirt. Barefooted.”
“Sounds like anybody,” the girl said. “Did you say eleven or twelve years old?”
“Oh, shit,” said the man from down state. “You can’t get anything out of these mossbacks.”
“If I’m a mossback what’s he?” The hired girl looked at the local warden. “What’s Mr. Evans?
His kids and me went to the same schoolhouse.”
“Who was the girl?” Evans asked her. “Come on, Suzy. I can find out anyway.”
“I wouldn’t know,” Suzy, the hired girl, said. “It seems like all kinds of people come by here
now. I just feel like I’m in a big city.”
“You don’t want to get in any trouble, do you, Suzy?” Evans said.
“No, sir.”
“I mean it.”
“You don’t want to get in any trouble either, do you?” Suzy asked him.
Out at the barn after they were hitched up the down-state man said, “We didn’t do so good, did
we?”
“He’s loose now,” Evans said. “He’s got grub and he must have his rifle. But he’s still in the
area. I can get him. Can you track?”
“No. Not really. Can you?”
“In snow,” the other warden laughed.
“But we don’t have to track. We have to think out where he’ll be.”
“He didn’t load up with all that stuff to go south. He’d just take a little something and head for
the railway.”
“I couldn’t tell what was missing from the woodshed. But he had a big pack load from the
kitchen. He’s heading in somewhere. I got to check on all his habits and his friends and where he used
to go. You block him off at Charlevoix and Petoskey and St. Ignace and Sheboygan. Where would you
go if you were him?”
“I’d go to the Upper Peninsula.”
“Me, too. He’s been up there, too. The ferry is the easiest place to pick him up. But there’s an
awful big country between here and Sheboygan and he knows that country, too.”
“We better go down and see Packard. We were going to check that today.”
“What’s to prevent him going down by East Jordan and Grand Traverse?”
“Nothing. But that isn’t his country. He’ll go some place that he knows.”
Suzy came out when they were opening the gate in the fence.
“Can I ride down to the store with you? I’ve got to get some groceries.”
“What makes you think we’re going to the store?”
“Yesterday you were talking about going to see Mr. Packard.”
“How are you going to get your groceries back?”
“I guess I can get a lift with somebody on the road or coming up the lake. This is Saturday.”
“All right. Climb up,” the local warden said.
“Thank you, Mr. Evans,” Suzy said.
At the general store and post office Evans hitched the team at the rack and he and the down-state
man stood and talked before they went in.
“I couldn’t say anything with that damned Suzy.”
“Sure.”
“Packard’s a fine man. There isn’t anybody better-liked in this country. You’d never get a
conviction on that trout business against him. Nobody’s going to scare him and we don’t want to
antagonize him.”
“Do you think he’ll cooperate?”
“Not if you act rough.”
“We’ll go see him.”
Inside the store Suzy had gone straight through past the glass showcases, the opened barrels, the
boxes, the shelves of canned goods, seeing nothing nor anyone until she came to the post office with
its lockboxes and its general delivery and stamp window. The window was down and she went
straight on to the back of the store. Mr. Packard was opening a packing box with a crowbar. He
looked at her and smiled.
“Mr. John,” the hired girl said, speaking very fast. “There’s two wardens coming in that’s after
Nickie. He cleared out last night and his kid sister’s gone with him. Don’t let on about that. His
mother knows it and it’s all right. Anyhow she isn’t going to say anything.”
“Did he take all your groceries?”
“Most of them.”
“You pick out what you need and make a list and I’ll check it over with you.”
“They’re coming in now.”
“You go out the back and come in the front again. I’ll go and talk to them.”
Suzy walked around the long frame building and climbed the front steps again. This time she
noticed everything as she came in. She knew the Indians who had brought in the baskets and she knew
the two Indian boys who were looking at the fishing tackle in the first showcases on the left. She knew
all the patent medicines in the next case and who usually bought them. She had clerked one summer in
the store and she knew what the penciled code letters and numbers meant that were on the cardboard
boxes that held shoes, winter overshoes, wool socks, mittens, caps and sweaters. She knew what the
baskets were worth that the Indians had brought in and that it was too late in the season for them to
bring a good price.
“Why did you bring them in so late, Mrs. Tabeshaw?” she asked.
“Too much fun Fourth of July,” the Indian woman laughed.
“How’s Billy?” Suzy asked.
“I don’t know, Suzy. I no see him four weeks now.”
“Why don’t you take them down to the hotel and try to sell them to the resorters?” Suzy said.
“Maybe,” Mrs. Tabeshaw said. “I took once.”
“You ought to take them every day.”
“Long walk,” Mrs. Tabeshaw said.
While Suzy was talking to the people she knew and making a list of what she needed for the
house the two wardens were in the back of the store with Mr. John Packard.
Mr. John had gray-blue eyes and dark hair and a dark mustache and he always looked as though
he had wandered into a general store by mistake. He had been away from northern Michigan once for
eighteen years when he was a young man and he looked more like a peace officer or an honest
gambler than a storekeeper. He had owned good saloons in his time and run them well. But when the
country had been lumbered off he had stayed and bought farming land. Finally when the county had
gone local option he had bought this store. He already owned the hotel. But he said he didn’t like a
hotel without a bar and so he almost never went near it. Mrs. Packard ran the hotel. She was more
ambitious than Mr. John and Mr. John said he didn’t want to waste time with people who had enough
money to take a vacation anywhere in the country they wanted and then came to a hotel without a bar
and spent their time sitting on the porch in rocking chairs. He called the resorters “change-of-lifers”
and he made fun of them to Mrs. Packard but she loved him and never minded when he teased her.
“I don’t mind if you call them change-of-lifers,” she told him one night in bed. “I had the damn
thing but I’m still all the woman you can handle, aren’t I?”
She liked the resorters because some of them brought culture and Mr. John said she loved culture
like a lumberjack loved Peerless, the great chewing tobacco. He really respected her love of culture
because she said she loved it just like he loved good bonded whiskey and she said, “Packard, you
don’t have to care about culture. I won’t bother you with it. But it makes me feel wonderful.”
Mr. John said she could have culture until hell wouldn’t hold it just so long as he never had to go
to a Chautauqua or a Self-Betterment Course. He had been to camp meetings and a revival but he had
never been to a Chautauqua. He said a camp meeting or a revival was bad enough but at least there
was some sexual intercourse afterwards by those who got really aroused although he never knew
anyone to pay their bills after a camp meeting or a revival. Mrs. Packard, he told Nick Adams, would
get worried about the salvation of his immortal soul after she had been to a big revival by somebody
like Gypsy Smith, that great evangelist, but finally it would turn out that he, Packard, looked like
Gypsy Smith and everything would be fine finally. But a Chautauqua was something strange. Culture
maybe was better than religion, Mr. John thought. But it was a cold proposition. Still they were crazy
for it. He could see it was more than a fad, though.
“It’s sure got a hold on them,” he had told Nick Adams. “It must be sort of like the Holy Rollers
only in the brain. You study it sometime and tell me what you think. You going to be a writer you
ought to get in on it early. Don’t let them get too far ahead of you.”
Mr. John liked Nick Adams because he said he had original sin. Nick did not understand this but
he was proud.
“You’re going to have things to repent, boy,” Mr. John had told Nick. “That’s one of the best
things there is. You can always decide whether to repent them or not. But the thing is to have them.”
“I don’t want to do anything bad,” Nick had said.
“I don’t want you to,” Mr. John had said. “But you’re alive and you’re going to do things. Don’t
you lie and don’t you steal. Everybody has to lie. But you pick out somebody you never lie to.”
“I’ll pick out you.”
“That’s right. Don’t you ever lie to me no matter what and I won’t lie to you.”
“I’ll try,” Nick had said.
“That isn’t it,” Mr. John said. “It has to be absolute.”
“All right,” Nick said. “I’ll never lie to you.”
“What became of your girl?”
“Somebody said she was working up at the Soo.”
“She was a beautiful girl and I always liked her,” Mr. John had said.
“So did I,” Nick said.
“Try and not feel too bad about it.”
“I can’t help it,” Nick said. “None of it was her fault. She’s just built that way. If I ran into her
again I guess I’d get mixed up with her again.”
“Maybe not.”
“Maybe too. I’d try not to.”
Mr. John was thinking about Nick when he went out to the back counter where the two men were
waiting for him. He looked them over as he stood there and he didn’t like either of them. He had
always disliked the local man Evans and had no respect for him but he sensed that the downstate man
was dangerous. He had not analyzed it yet but he saw the man had very flat eyes and a mouth that was
tighter than a simple tobacco chewer’s mouth needed to be. He had a real elk’s tooth too on his watch
chain. It was a really fine tusk from about a five-year-old bull. It was a beautiful tusk and Mr. John
looked at it again and at the over-large bulge the man’s shoulder holster made under his coat.
“Did you kill that bull with that cannon you’re carrying around under your arm?” Mr. John asked
the down-state man.
The down-state man looked at Mr. John unappreciatively.
“No,” he said. “I killed that bull out in the thoroughfare country in Wyoming with a Winchester
45-70.”
“You’re a big-gun man, eh?” Mr. John said. He looked under the counter. “Have big feet, too.
Do you need that big a cannon when you go out hunting kids?”
“What do you mean, kids,” the down-state man said. He was one ahead.
“I mean the kid you’re looking for.”
“You said kids,” the down-state man said.
Mr. John moved in. It was necessary. “What’s Evans carry when he goes after a boy who’s
licked his own boy twice? You must be heavily armed, Evans. That boy could lick you, too.”
“Why don’t you produce him and we could try it,” Evans said.
“You said kids, Mr. Jackson,” the down-state man said. “What made you say that?”
“Looking at you, you cock-sucker,” Mr. John said. “You splayfooted bastard.”
“Why don’t you come out from behind that counter if you want to talk like that?” the down-state
man said.
“You’re talking to the United States Postmaster,” Mr. John said. “You’re talking without
witnesses except for Turd-Face Evans. I suppose you know why they call him Turd-Face. You can
figure it out. You’re a detective.”
He was happy now. He had drawn the attack and he felt now as he used to feel in the old days
before he made a living from feeding and bedding resorters who rocked in rustic chairs on the front
porch of his hotel while they looked out over the lake.
“Listen, Splayfoot, I remember you very well now. Don’t you remember me, Splayzey?”
The down-state man looked at him. But he did not remember him.
“I remember you in Cheyenne the day Tom Horn was hanged,” Mr. John told him. “You were
one of the ones that framed him with promises from the association. Do you remember now? Who
owned the saloon in Medicine Bow when you worked for the people that gave it to Tom? Is that why
you ended up doing what you’re doing? Haven’t you got any memory?”
“When did you come back here?”
“Two years after they dropped Tom.”
“I’ll be goddamned.”
“Do you remember when I gave you that bull tusk when we were packing out from Greybull?”
“Sure. Listen, Jim, I got to get this kid.”
“My name’s John,” Mr. John said. “John Packard. Come on in back and have a drink. You want
to get to know this other character. His name is Crut-Face Evans. We used to call him Turd-Face. I
just changed it now out of kindness.”
“Mr. John,” said Mr. Evans. “Why don’t you be friendly and cooperative.”
“I just changed your name, didn’t I?” said Mr. John. “What kind of cooperation do you boys
want?”
In the back of the store Mr. John took a bottle off a low shelf in the corner and handed it to the
down-state man.
“Drink up, Splayzey,” he said. “You look like you need it.”
They each took a drink and then Mr. John asked, “What are you after this kid for?”
“Violation of the game laws,” the down-state man said.
“What particular violation?”
“He killed a buck deer the twelfth of last month.”
“Two men with guns out after a boy because he killed a deer the twelfth of last month,” Mr. John
said.
“There’ve been other violations.”
“But this is the one you’ve got proof of.”
“That’s about it.”
“What were the other violations?”
“Plenty.”
“But you haven’t got proof.”
“I didn’t say that,” Evans said. “But we’ve got proof on this.”
“And the date was the twelfth?”
“That’s right,” said Evans.
“Why don’t you ask some questions instead of answering them?” the down-state man said to his
partner. Mr. John laughed. “Let him alone, Splayzey,” he said. “I like to see that great brain work.”
“How well do you know the boy?” the down-state man asked.
“Pretty well.”
“Ever do any business with him?”
“He buys a little stuff here once in a while. Pays cash.”
“Do you have any idea where he’d head for?”
“He’s got folks in Oklahoma.”
“When did you see him last?” Evans asked.
“Come on, Evans,” the down-state man said. “You’re wasting our time. Thanks for the drink,
Jim.”
“John,” Mr. John said. “What’s your name, Splayzey?”
“Porter. Henry J. Porter.”
“Splayzey, you’re not going to do any shooting at that boy.”
“I’m going to bring him in.”
“You always were a murderous bastard.”
“Come on, Evans,” the down-state man said. “We’re wasting time in here.”
“You remember what I said about the shooting,” Mr. John said very quietly.
“I heard you,” the down-state man said.
The two men went out through the store and unhitched their light wagon and drove off. Mr. John
watched them go up the road. Evans was driving and the down-state man was talking to him.
“Henry J. Porter,” Mr. John thought. “The only name I can remember for him is Splayzey. He had
such big feet he had to have made-to-order boots. Splayfoot they called him. Then Splayzey. It was
his tracks by the spring where that Nester’s boy was shot that they hung Tom for. Splayzey. Splayzey
what? Maybe I never did know. Splayfoot Splayzey. Splayfoot Porter? No, it wasn’t Porter.”
“I’m sorry about those baskets, Mrs. Tabeshaw,” he said. “It’s too late in the season now and
they don’t carry over. But if you’d be patient with them down at the hotel you’d get rid of them.”
“You buy them, sell at the hotel,” Mrs. Tabeshaw suggested.
“No. They’d buy them better from you,” Mr. John told her. “You’re a fine looking woman.”
“Long time ago,” Mrs. Tabeshaw said.
“Suzy, I’d like to see you,” Mr. John said.
In the back of the store he said, “Tell me about it.”
“I told you already. They came for Nickie and they waited for him to come home. His youngest
sister let him know they were waiting for him. When they were sleeping drunk Nickie got his stuff and
pulled out. He’s got grub for two weeks easy and he’s got his rifle and young Littless went with him.”
“Why did she go?”
“I don’t know, Mr. John. I guess she wanted to look after him and keep him from doing anything
bad. You know him.”
“You live up by Evans’s. How much do you think he knows about the country Nick uses?”
“All he can. But I don’t know how much.”
“Where do you think they went?”
“I wouldn’t know, Mr. John. Nickie knows a lot of country.”
“That man with Evans is no good. He’s really bad.”
“He isn’t very smart.”
“He’s smarter than he acts. The booze has him down. But he’s smart and he’s bad, I used to
know him.”
“What do you want me to do.”
“Nothing, Suzy. Let me know about anything.”
“I’ll add up my stuff, Mr. John, and you can check it.”
“How are you going home?”
“I can get the boat up to Henry’s Dock and then get a rowboat from the cottage and row down
and get the stuff. Mr. John, what will they do with Nickie?”
“That’s what I’m worried about.”
“They were talking about getting him put in the reform school.”
“I wish he hadn’t killed that buck.”
“So does he. He told me he was reading in a book about how you could crease something with a
bullet and it wouldn’t do any harm. It would just stun it and Nickie wanted to try it. He said it was a
damn fool thing to do. But he wanted to try it. Then he hit the buck and broke its neck. He felt awful
about it. He felt awful about trying to crease it in the first place.”
“I know.”
“Then it must have been Evans found the meat where he had it hung up in the old springhouse.
Anyway somebody took it.”
“Who could have told Evans?”
“I think it was just that boy of his found it. He trails around after Nick all the time. You never see
him. He could have seen Nickie kill the buck. That boy’s no good, Mr. John. But he sure can trail
around after anybody. He’s liable to be in this room right now.”
“No,” said Mr. John. “But he could be listening outside.”
“I think he’s after Nick by now,” the girl said.
“Did you hear them say anything about him at the house?”
“They never mentioned him,” Suzy said.
“Evans must have left him home to do the chores. I don’t think we have to worry about him till
they get home to Evans’s.”
“I can row up the lake to home this afternoon and get one of our kids to let me know if Evans
hires anyone to do the chores. That will mean he’s turned that boy loose.”
“Both the men are too old to trail anybody.”
“But that boy’s terrible, Mr. John, and he knows too much about Nickie and where he would go.
He’d find them and then bring the men up to them.”
“Come in back of the post office,” Mr. John said.
Back of the filing slits and the lockboxes and the registry book and the flat stamp books in place
along with the cancellation stamps and their pads, with the General Delivery window down, so that
Suzy felt again the glory of office that had been hers when she had helped out in the store, Mr. John
said, “Where do you think they went, Suzy?”
“I wouldn’t know, true. Somewhere not too far or he wouldn’t take Littless. Somewhere that’s
really good or he wouldn’t take her. They know about the trout for trout dinners, too, Mr. John.”
“That boy?”
“Sure.”
“Maybe we better do something about the Evans boy.”
“I’d kill him. I’m pretty sure that’s why Littless went along. So Nickie wouldn’t kill him.”
“You fix it up so we keep track of them.”
“I will. But you have to think out something, Mr. John. Mrs. Adams, she’s just broke down. She
just gets a sick headache like always. Here. You better take this letter.”
“You drop it in the box,” Mr. John said. “That’s United States mail.” “I wanted to kill them both
last night when they were asleep.”
“No,” Mr. John told her. “Don’t talk that way and don’t think that way.”
“Didn’t you ever want to kill anybody, Mr. John?”
“Yes. But it’s wrong and it doesn’t work out.”
“My father killed a man.”
“It didn’t do him any good.” “He couldn’t help it.”
“You have to learn to help it,” Mr. John said. “You get along now, Suzy.”
“I’ll see you tonight or in the morning,” Suzy said. “I wish I still worked here, Mr. John.”
“So do I, Suzy. But Mrs. Packard doesn’t see it that way.”
“I know,” said Suzy. “That’s the way everything is.”
Nick and his sister were lying on a browse bed under a lean-to that they had built together on the
edge of the hemlock forest looking out over the slope of the hill to the cedar swamp and the blue hills
beyond.
“If it isn’t comfortable, Littless, we can feather in some more balsam on that hemlock. We’ll be
tired tonight and this will do. But we can fix it up really good tomorrow.”
“It feels lovely,” his sister said. “Lie loose and really feel it, Nickie.”
“It’s a pretty good camp,” Nick said. “And it doesn’t show. We’ll only use little fires.”
“Would a fire show across to the hills?”
“It might,” Nick said. “A fire shows a long way at night. But I’ll stake out a blanket behind it.
That way it won’t show.”
“Nickie, wouldn’t it be nice if there wasn’t anyone after us and we were just here for fun?”
“Don’t start thinking that way so soon,” Nick said. “We just started. Anyway if we were just
here for fun we wouldn’t be here.”
“I’m sorry, Nickie.”
“You don’t need to be,” Nick told her. “Look, Littless, I’m going down to get a few trout for
supper.”
“Can I come?”
“No. You stay here and rest. You had a tough day. You read a while or just be quiet.”
“It was tough in the slashings, wasn’t it? I thought it was really hard. Did I do all right?”
“You did wonderfully and you were wonderful making camp. But you take it easy now.”
“Have we got a name for this camp?”
“Let’s call it Camp Number One,” Nick said.
He went down the hill toward the creek and when he had come almost to the bank he stopped
and cut himself a willow stick about four feet long and trimmed it, leaving the bark on. He could see
the clear fast water of the stream. It was narrow and deep and the banks were mossy here before the
stream entered the swamp. The dark clear water flowed fast and its rushing made bulges on the
surface. Nick did not go close to it as he knew it flowed under the banks and he did not want to
frighten a fish by walking on the bank.
There must be quite a few up here in the open now, he thought. It’s pretty late in the summer.
He took a coil of silk line out of a tobacco pouch he carried in the left breast pocket of his shirt
and cut a length that was not quite as long as the willow stick and fastened it to the tip where he had
notched it lightly. Then he fastened on a hook that he took from the pouch; then holding the shank of the
hook he tested the pull of the line and the bend of the willow. He laid his rod down now and went
back to where the trunk of a small birch tree, dead for several years, lay on its side in the grove of
birches that bordered the cedars by the stream. He rolled the log over and found several earthworms
under it. They were not big. But they were red and lively and he put them in a flat round tin with holes
punched in the top that had once held Copenhagen snuff. He put some dirt over them and rolled the log
back. This was the third year he had found bait at this same place and he had always replaced the log
so that it was as he had found it.
Nobody knows how big this creek is, he thought. It picks up an awful volume of water in that bad
swamp up above. Now he looked up the creek and down it and up the hill to the hemlock forest where
the camp was. Then he walked to where he had left the pole with the line and the hook and baited the
hook carefully and spat on it for good luck. Holding the pole and the line with the baited hook in his
right hand he walked very carefully and gently toward the bank of the narrow, heavy-flowing stream.
It was so narrow here that his willow pole would have spanned it and as he came close to the
bank he heard the turbulent rush of the water. He stopped by the bank, out of sight of anything in the
stream, and took two lead shot, split down one side, out of the tobacco pouch and bent them on the
line about a foot above the hook, clinching them with his teeth.
He swung the hook on which the two worms curled out over the water and dropped it gently in
so that it sank, swirling in the fast water, and he lowered the tip of the willow pole to let the current
take the line and the baited hook under the bank. He felt the line straighten and a sudden heavy
firmness. He swung up on the pole and it bent almost double in his hand. He felt the throbbing, jerking
pull that did not yield as he pulled. Then it yielded, rising in the water with the line. There was a
heavy wildness of movement in the narrow, deep current, and the trout was torn out of the water and,
flopping in the air, sailed over Nick’s shoulder and onto the bank behind him. Nick saw him shine in
the sun and then he found him where he was tumbling in the ferns. He was strong and heavy in Nick’s
hands and he had a pleasant smell and Nick saw how dark his back was and how brilliant his spots
were colored and how bright the edges of his fins were. They were white on the edge with a black
line behind and then there was the lovely golden sunset color of his belly. Nick held him in his right
hand and he could just reach around him.
He’s pretty big for the skillet, he thought. But I’ve hurt him and I have to kill him.
He knocked the trout’s head sharply against the handle of his hunting knife and laid him against
the trunk of a birch tree.
“Damn,” he said. “He’s a perfect size for Mrs. Packard and her trout dinners. But he’s pretty big
for Littless and me.”
I better go upstream and find a shallow and try to get a couple of small ones, he thought. Damn,
didn’t he feel like something when I horsed him out though? They can talk all they want about playing
them but people that have never horsed them out don’t know what they can make you feel. What if it
only lasts that long? It’s the time when there’s no give at all and then they start to come and what they
do to you on the way up and into the air.
This is a strange creek, he thought. It’s funny when you have to hunt for small ones.
He found his pole where he had thrown it. The hook was bent and he straightened it. Then he
picked up the heavy fish and started up the stream.
There’s one shallow, pebbly part just after she comes out of the upper swamp, he thought. I can
get a couple of small ones there. Littless might not like this big one. If she gets homesick I’ll have to
take her back. I wonder what those old boys are doing now? I don’t think that goddam Evans kid
knows about this place. That son of a bitch. I don’t think anybody fished in here but Indians. You
should have been an Indian, he thought. It would have saved you a lot of trouble.
He made his way up the creek, keeping back from the stream but once stepping onto a piece of
bank where the stream flowed underground. A big trout broke out in a violence that made a slashing
wake in the water. He was a trout so big that it hardly seemed he could turn in the stream.
“When did you come up?” Nick said when the fish had gone under the bank again further
upstream. “Boy, what a trout.”
At the pebbly shallow stretch he caught two small trout. They were beautiful fish, too, firm and
hard and he gutted the three fish and tossed the guts into the stream, then washed the trout carefully in
the cold water and then wrapped them in a small faded sugar sack from his pocket.
It’s a good thing that girl likes fish, he thought. I wish we could have picked some berries. I
know where I can always get some, though. He started back up the hill slope toward their camp. The
sun was down behind the hill and the weather was good. He looked out across the swamp and up in
the sky, above where the arm of the lake would be, he saw a fish hawk flying.
He came up to the lean-to very quietly and his sister did not hear him. She was lying on her side,
reading. Seeing her, he spoke softly not to startle her. “What did you do, you monkey?”
She turned and looked at him and smiled and shook her head.
“I cut it off,” she said.
“How?”
“With a scissors. How did you think?”
“How did you see to do it?”
“I just held it out and cut it. It’s easy. Do I look like a boy?”
“Like a wild boy of Borneo.”
“I couldn’t cut it like a Sunday-school boy. Does it look too wild?”
“No.”
“It’s very exciting,” she said. “Now I’m your sister but I’m a boy, too. Do you think it will
change me into a boy?”
“No.”
“I wish it would.”
“You’re crazy, Littless.”
“Maybe I am. Do I look like an idiot boy?”
“A little.”
“You can make it neater. You can see to cut it with a comb.”
“I’ll have to make it a little better but not much. Are you hungry, idiot brother?”
“Can’t I just be an un-idiot brother?”
“I don’t want to trade you for a brother.”
“You have to now, Nickie, don’t you see? It was something we had to do. I should have asked
you but I knew it was something we had to do so I did it for a surprise.”
“I like it,” Nick said. “The hell with everything. I like it very much.”
“Thank you, Nickie, so much. I was laying trying to rest like you said. But all I could do was
imagine things to do for you. I was going to get you a chewing tobacco can full of knockout drops
from some big saloon in some place like Sheboygan.”
“Who did you get them from?”
Nick was sitting down now and his sister sat on his lap and held her arms around his neck and
rubbed her cropped head against his cheek.
“I got them from the Queen of the Whores,” she said. “And you know the name of the saloon?”
“No.”
“The Royal Ten Dollar Gold Piece Inn and Emporium.”
“What did you do there?”
“I was a whore’s assistant.”
“What’s a whore’s assistant do?”
“Oh, she carries the whore’s train when she walks and opens her carriage door and shows her to
the right room. It’s like a lady in waiting I guess.”
“What’s she say to the whore?”
“She’ll say anything that comes into her mind as long as it’s polite.”
“Like what, brother?”
“Like, ‘Well ma’am, it must be pretty tiring on a hot day like today to be just a bird in a gilded
cage.’ Things like that.”
“What’s the whore say?”
“She says, ‘Yes, indeedy. It sure is sweetness.’ Because this whore I was whore’s assistant to is
of humble origin.”
“What kind of origin are you?”
“I’m the sister or the brother of a morbid writer and I’m delicately brought up. This makes me
intensely desirable to the main whore and to all of her circle.”
“Did you get the knockout drops?”
“Of course. She said, ‘Hon, take these little old drops.’ ‘Thank you,’ I said! ‘Give my regards to
your morbid brother and ask him to stop by the Emporium anytime he is at Sheboygan.’”
“Get off my lap,” Nick said.
“That’s just the way they talk in the Emporium,” Littless said.
“I have to get supper. Aren’t you hungry?”
“I’ll get supper.”
“No,” Nick said. “You keep on talking.”
“Don’t you think we’re going to have fun, Nickie?”
“We’re having fun now.”
“Do you want me to tell you about the other thing I did for you?”
“You mean before you decided to do something practical and cut off your hair?”
“This was practical enough. Wait till you hear it. Can I kiss you while you’re making supper?”
“Wait a while and I’ll tell you. What was it you were going to do?”
“Well, I guess I was ruined morally last night when I stole the whiskey. Do you think you can be
ruined morally by just one thing like that?”
“No. Anyway the bottle was open.”
“Yes. But I took the empty pint bottle and the quart bottle with the whiskey in it out to the kitchen
and I poured the pint bottle full and some spilled on my hand and I licked it off and I thought that
probably ruined me morally.”
“How’d it taste?”
“Awfully strong and funny and a little sick-making.”
“That wouldn’t ruin you morally.”
“Well, I’m glad because if I was ruined morally how could I exercise a good influence on you?”
“I don’t know,” Nick said. “What was it you were going to do?”
He had his fire made and the skillet resting on it and he was laying strips of bacon in the skillet.
His sister was watching and she had her hands folded across her knees and he watched her unclasp
her hands and put one arm down and lean on it and put her legs out straight. She was practicing being
a boy.
“I’ve got to learn to put my hands right.”
“Keep them away from your head.” “I know. It would be easy if there was some boy my own age
to copy.”
“Copy me.”
“That would be natural, wouldn’t it? You won’t laugh, though?”
“Maybe.”
“Gee, I hope I won’t start to be a girl while we’re on the trip.”
“Don’t worry.”
“We have the same shoulders and the same kind of legs.”
“What was the other thing you were going to do?”
Nick was cooking the trout now. The bacon was curled brown on a fresh-cut chip of wood from
the piece of fallen timber they were using for the fire and they both smelled the trout cooking in the
bacon fat. Nick basted them and then turned them and basted them again. It was getting dark and he
had rigged a piece of canvas behind the little fire so that it would not be seen.
“What were you going to do?” he asked again. Littless leaned forward and spat toward the fire.
“How was that?”
“You missed the skillet anyway.”
“Oh, it’s pretty bad. I got it out of the Bible. I was going to take three spikes, one for each of
them, and drive them into the temples of those two and that boy while they slept.”
“What were you going to drive them in with?”
“A muffled hammer.”
“How do you muffle a hammer?”
“I’d muffle it all right.”
“That nail thing’s pretty rough to try.”
“Well, that girl did it in the Bible and since I’ve seen armed men drunk and asleep and
circulated among them at night and stolen their whiskey why shouldn’t I go the whole way, especially
if I learned it in the Bible?”
“They didn’t have a muffled hammer in the Bible.”
“I guess I mixed it up with muffled oars.”
“Maybe. And we don’t want to kill anybody. That’s why you came along.”
“I know. But crime comes easy for you and me, Nickie. We’re different from the others. Then I
thought if I was ruined morally I might as well be useful.”
“You’re crazy, Littless,” he said. “Listen, does tea keep you awake?”
“I don’t know. I never had it at night. Only peppermint tea.”
“I’ll make it very weak and put canned cream in it.”
“I don’t need it, Nickie, if we’re short.”
“It will just give the milk a little taste.”
They were eating now. Nick had cut them each two slices of rye bread and he soaked one slice
for each in the bacon fat in the skillet. They ate that and the trout that were crisp outside and cooked
well and very tender inside. Then they put the trout skeletons in the fire and ate the bacon made in a
sandwich with the other piece of bread, and then Littless drank the weak tea with the condensed milk
in it and Nick tapped two slivers of wood into the holes he had punched in the can.
“Did you have enough?”
“Plenty. The trout was wonderful and the bacon, too. Weren’t we lucky they had rye bread?”
“Eat an apple,” he said. “Maybe we’ll have something good tomorrow. Maybe I should have
made a bigger supper, Littless.”
“No. I had plenty.”
“You’re sure you’re not hungry?”
“No. I’m full. I’ve got some chocolate if you’d like some.”
“Where’d you get it?”
“From my savior.”
“Where?”
“My savior. Where I save everything.”
“Oh.”
“This is fresh. Some is the hard kind from the kitchen. We can start on that and save the other for
sometime special. Look, my savior’s got a drawstring like a tobacco pouch. We can use it for nuggets
and things like that. Do you think we’ll get out west, Nickie, on this trip?”
“I haven’t got it figured yet.”
“I’d like to get my savior packed full of nuggets worth sixteen dollars an ounce.”
Nick cleaned up the skillet and put the pack in at the head of the leanto. One blanket was spread
over the browse bed and he put the other one on it and tucked it under on Littless’s side. He cleaned
out the two-quart tin pail he’d made tea in and filled it with cold water from the spring. When he
came back from the spring his sister was in the bed asleep, her head on the pillow she had made by
rolling her blue jeans around her moccasins. He kissed her but she did not wake and he put on his old
Mackinaw coat and felt in the packsack until he found the pint bottle of whiskey.
He opened it and smelled it and it smelled very good. He dipped a half a cup of water out of the
small pail he had brought from the spring and poured a little of the whiskey in it. Then he sat and
sipped this very slowly, letting it stay under his tongue before he brought it slowly back over his
tongue and swallowed it.
He watched the small coals of the fire brighten with the light evening breeze and he tasted the
whiskey and cold water and looked at the coals and thought. Then he finished the cup, dipped up some
cold water and drank it and went to bed. The rifle was under his left leg and his head was on the good
hard pillow his moccasins and the rolled trousers made and he pulled his side of the blanket tight
around him and said his prayers and went to sleep.
In the night he was cold and he spread his Mackinaw coat over his sister and rolled his back
over closer to her so that there was more of his side of the blanket under him. He felt for the gun and
tucked it under his leg again. The air was cold and sharp to breathe and he smelled the cut hemlock
and balsam boughs. He had not realized how tired he was until the cold had waked him. Now he lay
comfortable again feeling the warmth of his sister’s body against his back and he thought, I must take
good care of her and keep her happy and get her back safely. He listened to her breathing and to the
quiet of the night and then he was asleep again.
It was just light enough to see the far hills beyond the swamp when he woke. He lay quietly and
stretched the stiffness from his body. Then he sat up and pulled on his khaki trousers and put on his
moccasins. He watched his sister sleeping with the collar of the warm Mackinaw coat under her chin
and her high cheekbones and brown freckled skin light rose under the brown, her chopped-off hair
showing the beautiful line of her head and emphasizing her straight nose and her close-set ears. He
wished he could draw her face and he watched the way her long lashes lay on her cheeks.
She looks like a small wild animal, he thought, and she sleeps like one. How would you say her
head looks, he thought. I guess the nearest is that it looks as though someone had cut her hair off on a
wooden block with an ax. It has a sort of a carved look. He loved his sister very much and she loved
him too much. But, he thought, I guess those things straighten out. At least I hope so.
There’s no sense waking anyone up, he thought. She must have been really tired if I’m as tired as
I am. If we are all right here we are doing just what we should do: staying out of sight until things
quiet down and that down-state man pulls out. I’ve got to feed her better, though. It’s a shame I
couldn’t have outfitted really good.
We’ve got a lot of things, though. The pack was heavy enough. But what we want to get today is
berries. I better get a partridge or a couple if I can. We can get good mushrooms, too. We’ll have to
be careful about the bacon but we won’t need it with the shortening. Maybe I fed her too light last
night. She’s used to lots of milk, too, and sweet things. Don’t worry about it. We’ll feed good. It’s a
good thing she likes trout. They were really good. Don’t worry about her. She’ll eat wonderfully. But,
Nick, boy, you certainly didn’t feed her too much yesterday. Better to let her sleep than to wake her up
now. There’s plenty for you to do.
He started to get some things out of the pack very carefully and his sister smiled in her sleep.
The brown skin came taut over her cheekbones when she smiled and the undercolor showed. She did
not wake and he started to prepare to make breakfast and get the fire ready. There was plenty of wood
cut and he built a very small fire and made tea while he waited to start breakfast. He drank his tea
straight and ate three dried apricots and he tried to read in Lorna Doone. But he had read it and it did
not have magic any more and he knew it was a loss on this trip.
Late in the afternoon, when they had made camp, he had put some prunes in a tin pail to soak and
he put them on the fire now to stew. In the pack he found the prepared buckwheat flour and he put it
out with an enameled saucepan and a tin cup to mix the flour with water to make a batter. He had the
tin of vegetable shortening and he cut a piece off the top of an empty flour sack and wrapped it around
a cut stick and tied it tight with a piece of fish line. Littless had brought four old flour sacks and he
was proud of her.
He mixed the batter and put the skillet on the fire, greasing it with the shortening which he spread
with the cloth on the stick. First it made the skillet shine darkly, then it sizzled and spat and he greased
again and poured the batter smoothly and watched it bubble and then start to firm around the edges.
He watched the rising and the forming of the texture and the gray color of the cake. He loosened it
from the pan with a fresh clean chip and flipped it and caught it, the beautiful browned side up, the
other sizzling. He could feel its weight but see it growing in buoyancy in the skillet.
“Good morning,” his sister said. “Did I sleep awfully late?”
“No, devil.”
She stood up with her shirt hanging down over her brown legs.
“You’ve done everything.”
“No. I just started the cakes.”
“Doesn’t that one smell wonderful? I’ll go to the spring and wash and come and help.”
“Don’t wash in the spring.”
“I’m not white man,” she said. She was gone behind the lean-to.
“Where did you leave the soap?” she asked.
“It’s by the spring. There’s an empty lard bucket. Bring the butter, will you. It’s in the spring.”
“I’ll be right back.”
There was a half a pound of butter and she brought it wrapped in the oiled paper in the empty
lard bucket.
They ate the buckwheat cakes with butter and Log Cabin syrup out of a tin Log Cabin can. The
top of the chimney unscrewed and the syrup poured from the chimney. They were both very hungry
and the cakes were delicious with the butter melting on them and running down into the cut places
with the syrup. They ate the prunes out of the tin cups and drank the juice. Then they drank tea from the
same cups.
“Prunes taste like a celebration,” Littless said. “Think of that. How did you sleep, Nickie?”
“Good.”
“Thank you for putting the Mackinaw on me. Wasn’t it a lovely night, though?”
“Yes. Did you sleep all night?”
“I’m still asleep. Nickie, can we stay here always?”
“I don’t think so. You’d grow up and have to get married.”
“I’m going to get married to you anyway. I want to be your common-law wife. I read about it in
the paper.”
“That’s where you read about the Unwritten Law.”
“Sure. I’m going to be your common-law wife under the Unwritten Law. Can’t I, Nickie?”
“No.”
“I will. I’ll surprise you. All you have to do is live a certain time as man and wife. I’ll get them
to count this time now. It’s just like homesteading.”
“I won’t let you file.”
“You can’t help yourself. That’s the Unwritten Law. I’ve thought it out lots of times. I’ll get
cards printed Mrs. Nick Adams, Cross Village, Michigan—common-law wife. I’ll hand these out to a
few people openly each year until the time’s up.”
“I don’t think it would work.”
“I’ve got another scheme. We’ll have a couple of children while I’m a minor. Then you have to
marry me under the Unwritten Law.”
“That’s not the Unwritten Law.”
“I get mixed up on it.”
“Anyway, nobody knows yet if it works.”
“It must,” she said. “Mr. Thaw is counting on it.”
“Mr. Thaw might make a mistake.”
“Why Nickie, Mr. Thaw practically invented the Unwritten Law.”
“I thought it was his lawyer.”
“Well, Mr. Thaw put in the action anyway.”
“I don’t like Mr. Thaw,” Nick Adams said.
“That’s good. There’s things about him I don’t like either. But he certainly made the paper more
interesting reading, didn’t he?”
“He gives the others something new to hate.”
“They hate Mr. Stanford White, too.”
“I think they’re jealous of both of them.”
“I believe that’s true, Nickie. Just like they’re jealous of us.”
“Think anybody is jealous of us now?”
“Not right now maybe. Our mother will think we’re fugitives from justice steeped in sin and
iniquity. It’s a good thing she doesn’t know I got you that whiskey.”
“I tried it last night. It’s very good.”
“Oh, I’m glad. That’s the first whiskey I ever stole anywhere. Isn’t it wonderful that it’s good? I
didn’t think anything about those people could be good.”
“I’ve got to think about them too much. Let’s not talk about them,” Nick said.
“All right. What are we going to do today?”
“What would you like to do?”
“I’d like to go to Mr. John’s store and get everything we need.”
“We can’t do that.”
“I know it. What do you plan to really do?”
“We ought to get some berries and I ought to get a partridge or some partridges. We’ve always
got trout. But I don’t want you to get tired of trout.”
“Were you ever tired of trout?”
“No. But they say people get tired of them.”
“I wouldn’t get tired of them,” Littless said. “You get tired of pike right away. But you never get
tired of trout nor of perch. I know, Nickie. True.”
“You don’t get tired of walleyed pike either,” Nick said. “Only of shovelnose. Boy, you sure get
tired of them.”
“I don’t like the pitchfork bones,” his sister said. “It’s a fish that surfeits you.”
“We’ll clean up here and I’ll find a place to cache the shells and we’ll make a trip for berries
and try to get some birds.”
“I’ll bring two lard pails and a couple of the sacks,” his sister said.
“Littless,” Nick said. “You remember about going to the bathroom, will you please?”
“Of course.”
“That’s important.”
“I know it. You remember, too.”
“I will.”
Nick went back into the timber and buried the carton of .22 long-rifles and the loose boxes of .22
shorts under the brown-needled floor at the base of a big hemlock. He put back the packed needles he
had cut with his knife and made a small cut as far up as he could reach on the heavy bark of the tree.
He took a bearing on the tree and then came out onto the hillside and walked down to the lean-to.
It was a lovely morning now. The sky was high and clear blue and no clouds had come yet. Nick
was happy with his sister and he thought, no matter how this thing comes out we might as well have a
good happy time. He had already learned there was only one day at a time and that it was always the
day you were in. It would be today until it was tonight and tomorrow would be today again. This was
the main thing he had learned so far.
Today was a good day and coming down to the camp with his rifle he was happy although their
trouble was like a fishhook caught in his pocket that pricked him occasionally as he walked. They left
the pack inside the lean-to. There were great odds against a bear bothering it in the daytime because
any bear would be down below feeding on berries around the swamp. But Nick buried the bottle of
whiskey up behind the spring. Littless was not back yet and Nick sat down on the log of the fallen tree
they were using for firewood and checked his rifle. They were going after partridges so he pulled out
the tube of the magazine and poured the long-rifle cartridges into his hand and then put them into a
chamois pouch and filled the magazine with .22 shorts. They made less noise and would not tear the
meat up if he could not get head shots.
He was all ready now and wanted to start. Where’s that girl anyway, he thought. Then he thought,
don’t get excited. You told her to take her time. Don’t get nervous. But he was nervous and it made
him angry at himself.
“Here I am,” his sister said. “I’m sorry that I took so long. I went too far away, I guess.”
“You’re fine,” Nick said. “Let’s go. You have the pails?”
“Uh huh, and covers, too.”
They started down across the hill to the creek. Nick looked carefully up the stream and along the
hillside. His sister watched him. She had the pails in one of the sacks and carried it slung over her
shoulder by the other sack.
“Aren’t you taking a pole, Nickie?” she asked him.
“No. I’ll cut one if we fish.”
He moved ahead of his sister, holding the rifle in one hand, keeping a little way away from the
stream. He was hunting now.
“It’s a strange creek,” his sister said.
“It’s the biggest small stream I’ve ever known,” Nick told her.
“It’s deep and scary for a little stream.”
“It keeps having new springs,” Nick said. “And it digs under the bank and it digs down. It’s
awful cold water, Littless. Feel it.”
“Gee,” she said. It was numbing cold.
“The sun warms it a little,” Nick said. “But not much. We’ll hunt along easy. There’s a berry
patch down below.”
They went along down the creek. Nick was studying the banks. He had seen a mink’s track and
shown it to his sister and they had seen tiny rubycrowned kinglets that were hunting insects and let the
boy and girl come close as they moved sharply and delicately in the cedars. They had seen cedar
waxwings so calm and gentle and distinguished moving in their lovely elegance with the magic wax
touches on their wing coverts and their tails, and Littless had said, “They’re the most beautiful,
Nickie. There couldn’t be more simply beautiful birds.”
“They’re built like your face,” he said.
“No, Nickie. Don’t make fun. Cedar waxwings make me so proud and happy that I cry.”
“When they wheel and light and then move so proud and friendly and gently,” Nick said.
They had gone on and suddenly Nick had raised the rifle and shot before his sister could see
what he was looking at. Then she heard the sound of a big bird tossing and beating its wings on the
ground. She saw Nick pumping the gun and shoot twice more and each time she heard another
pounding of wings in the willow brush. Then there was the whirring noise of wings as large brown
birds burst out of the willows and one bird flew only a little way and lit in the willows and with its
crested head on one side looked down, bending the collar of feathers on his neck where the other
birds were still thumping. The bird looking down from the red willow brush was beautiful, plump,
heavy and looked so stupid with his head turned down and as Nick raised his rifle slowly, his sister
whispered, “No, Nickie. Please no. We’ve got plenty.”
“All right,” Nick said. “You want to take him?”
“No, Nickie. No.”
Nick went forward into the willows and picked up the three grouse and batted their heads
against the butt of the rifle stock and laid them out on the moss. His sister felt them, warm and 7ullbreasted and beautifully feathered.
“Wait till we eat them,” Nick said. He was very happy.
“I’m sorry for them now,” his sister said. “They were enjoying the morning just like we were.”
She looked up at the grouse still in the tree.
“It does look a little silly still staring down,” she said.
“This time of year the Indians call them fool hens. After they’ve been hunted they get smart.
They’re not the real fool hens. Those never get smart. They’re willow grouse. These are ruffled
grouse.”
“I hope we’ll get smart,” his sister said. “Tell him to go away, Nickie.”
“You tell him.”
“Go away, partridge.”
The grouse did not move.
Nick raised the rifle and the grouse looked at him. Nick knew he could not shoot the bird without
making his sister sad and he made a noise blowing out so his tongue rattled and lips shook like a
grouse bursting from cover and the bird looked at him fascinated.
“We better not annoy him,” Nick said.
“I’m sorry, Nickie,” his sister said. “He is stupid.”
“Wait till we eat them,” Nick told her. “You’ll see why we hunt them.”
“Are they out of season, too?”
“Sure. But they are full grown and nobody but us would ever hunt them. I kill plenty of great
horned owls and a great homed owl will kill a partridge every day if he can. They hunt all the time
and they kill all the good birds.”
“He certainly could kill that one easy,” his sister said. “I don’t feel bad any more. Do you want a
bag to carry them in?”
“I’ll draw them and then pack them in the bag with some ferns. It isn’t so far to the berries now.”
They sat against one of the cedars and Nick opened the birds and took out their warm entrails
and feeling the inside of the birds hot on his right hand he found the edible pans of the giblets and
cleaned them and then washed them in the stream. When the birds were cleaned he smoothed their
feathers and wrapped them in ferns and put them in the flour sack. He tied the mouth of the flour sack
and two comers with a piece of fish line and slung it over his shoulder and then went back to the
stream and dropped the entrails in and tossed some bright pieces of lung in to see the trout rise in the
rapid heavy flow of the water.
“They’d make good bait but we don’t need bait now,” he said. “Our trout are all in the stream
and we’ll take them when we need them.”
“This stream would make us rich if it was near home,” his sister said.
“It would be fished out then. This is the last really wild stream there is except in another awful
country to get to beyond the foot of the lake. I never brought anybody here to fish.”
“Who ever fishes it?”
“Nobody I know.”
“Is it a virgin stream?”
“No. Indians fish it. But they’re gone now since they quit cutting hemlock bark and the camps
closed down.”
“Does the Evans boy know?”
“Not him,” Nick said. But then he thought about it and it made him feel sick. He could see the
Evans boy.
“What’re you thinking, Nickie?”
“I wasn’t thinking.”
“You were thinking. You tell me. We’re partners.”
“He might know,” Nick said. “Goddam it. He might know.”
“But you don’t know that he knows?”
“No. That’s the trouble. If I did I’d get out.”
“Maybe he’s back at camp now,” his sister said.
“Don’t talk that way. Do you want to bring him?”
“No,” she said. “Please, Nickie, I’m sorry I brought it up.”
“I’m not,” Nick said. “I’m grateful. I knew it anyway. Only I’d stopped thinking about it. I have
to think about things now the rest of my life.”
“You always thought about things.”
“Not like this.”
“Let’s go down and get the berries anyway,” Littless said. “There isn’t anything we can do now
to help, is there?”
“No,” Nick said. “We’ll pick the berries and get back to camp.”
But Nick was trying to accept it now and think his way all the way through it. He must not get in
a panic about it. Nothing had changed. Things were just as they were when he had decided to come
here and let things blow over. The Evans boy could have followed him here before. But it was very
unlikely. He could have followed him one time when he had gone in from the road through the
Hodges’ place, but it was doubtful. Nobody had been fishing the stream. He could be sure of that. But
the Evans boy did not care about fishing.
“All that bastard cares about is trailing me,” he said.
“I know it, Nickie.”
“This is three times he’s made trouble.”
“I know it, Nickie. But don’t you kill him.”
That’s why she came along, Nick thought. That’s why she’s here. I can’t do it while she’s along.
“I know I mustn’t kill him,” he said. “There’s nothing we can do now. Let’s not talk about it.”
“As long as you don’t kill him,” his sister said. “There’s nothing we can’t get out of and nothing
that won’t blow over.”
“Let’s get back to camp,” Nick said. “Without the berries?”
“We’ll get the berries another day.”
“Are you nervous, Nickie?”
“Yes. I’m sorry.”
“But what good will we be back at camp?” “We’ll know quicker.”
“Can’t we just go along the way we were going?”
“Not now. I’m not scared, Littless. And don’t you be scared. But something’s made me nervous.”
Nick had cut up away from the stream into the edge of the timber and they were walking in the
shade of the trees. They would come onto the camp now from above.
From the timber they approached the camp carefully. Nick went ahead with the rifle. The camp
had not been visited.
“You stay here,” Nick told his sister. “I’m going to have a look beyond.” He left the sack with
the birds and the berry pails with Littless and went well upstream. As soon as he was out of sight of
his sister he changed the .22 shorts in the rifle for the long-rifles. I won’t kill him, he thought, but
anyway it’s the right thing to do. He made a careful search of the country. He saw no sign of anyone
and he went down to the stream and then downstream and back up to the camp.
“I’m sorry I was nervous, Littless,” he said. “We might as well have a good lunch and then we
won’t have to worry about a fire showing at night.”
“I’m worried now, too,” she said.
“Don’t you be worried. It’s just like it was before.”
“But he drove us back from getting the berries without him even being here.”
“I know. But he’s not been here. Maybe he’s never even been to this creek ever. Maybe we’ll
never see him again.”
“He makes me scared, Nickie, worse when he’s not here than when he’s here.”
“I know. But there isn’t any use being scared.”
“What are we going to do?”
“Well, we better wait to cook until night.”
“Why did you change?”
“He won’t be around here at night. He can’t come through the swamp in the dark. We don’t have
to worry about him early in the mornings and late in the evening nor in the dark. We’ll have to be like
the deer and only be out then. We’ll lay up in the daytime.”
“Maybe he’ll never come.”
“Sure. Maybe.”
“But I can stay though, can’t I?”
“I ought to get you home.”
“No. Please, Nickie. Who’s going to keep you from killing him then?”
“Listen, Littless, don’t ever talk about killing and remember I never talked about killing. There
isn’t any killing nor ever going to be any.”
“True?”
“True.”
“I’m so glad.”
“Don’t even be that. Nobody ever talked about it.”
“ All right. I never thought about it nor spoke about it.”
“Me either.”
“Of course you didn’t.”
“I never even thought about it.”
No, he thought. You never even thought about it. Only all day and all night. But you mustn’t think
about it in front of her because she can feel it because she is your sister and you love each other.
“Are you hungry, Littless?”
“Not really.”
“Eat some of the hard chocolate and I’ll get some fresh water from the spring.”
“I don’t have to have anything.”
They looked across to where the big white clouds of the eleven o’clock breeze were coming up
over the blue hills beyond the swamp. The sky was a high clear blue and the clouds came up white
and detached themselves from behind the hills and moved high in the sky as the breeze freshened and
the shadows of the clouds moved over the swamp and across the hillside. The wind blew in the trees
now and was cool as they lay in the shade. The water from the spring was cold and fresh in the tin
pail and the chocolate was not quite bitter but was hard and crunched as they chewed it.
“It’s as good as the water in the spring where we were when we first saw them,” his sister said.
“It tastes even better after the chocolate.”
“We can cook if you’re hungry.”
“I’m not if you’re not.”
“I’m always hungry. I was a fool not to go on and get the berries.”
“No. You came back to find out.”
“Look, Littless. I know a good place back by the slashing we came through where we can get
berries. I’ll cache everything and we can go in there through the timber all the way and pick a couple
of pails full and then we’ll have them ahead for tomorrow. It isn’t a bad walk.”
“All right. But I’m fine.”
“Aren’t you hungry?”
“No. Not at all now after the chocolate. I’d love to just stay and read. We had a nice walk when
we were hunting.”
“All right,” Nick said. “Are you tired from yesterday?”
“Maybe a little.”
“We’ll take it easy. I’ll read Wuthering Heights.”
“Is it too old to read out loud to me?”
“No.”
“Will you read it?”
“Sure.”
An African Story
HE WAS WAITING FORTHE MOON TO RISE and he felt Kibo’s
hair rise under his hand as he stroked him to be quiet and they both watched and listened as the moon
came up and gave them shadows. His arm was around the dog’s neck now and he could feel him
shivering. All of the night sounds had stopped. They did not hear the elephant and David did not see
him until the dog turned his head and seemed to settle into David. Then the elephant’s shadow
covered them and he moved past making no noise at all and they smelled him in the light wind that
came down from the mountain. He smelled strong but old and sour and when he was past David saw
that the left tusk was so long it seemed to reach the ground.
They waited but no other elephants came by and then David and the dog started off running in the
moonlight. The dog kept close behind him and when David stopped the dog pressed his muzzle into
the back of his knee.
David had to see the bull again and they came up on him at the edge of the forest. He was
traveling toward the mountain and slowly moving into the steady night breeze. David came close
enough to see him cut off the moon again and to smell the sour oldness but he could not see the right
tusk. He was afraid to work closer with the dog and he took him back with the wind and pushed him
down against the base of a tree and tried to make him understand. He thought the dog would stay and
he did but when David moved up toward the bulk of the elephant again he felt the wet muzzle against
the hollow of his knee.
The two of them followed the elephant until he came to an opening in the trees. He stood there
moving his huge ears. His bulk was in the shadow but the moonlight would be on his head. David
reached behind him and closed the dog’s jaws gently with his hand and then moved softly and
unbreathing to his right along the edge of the night breeze, feeling it on his cheek, edging with it, never
letting it get between him and the bulk until he could see the elephant’s head and the great ears slowly
moving. The right tusk was as thick as his own thigh and it curved down almost to the ground.
He and Kibo moved back, the wind on his neck now, and they backtracked out of the forest and
into the open park country. The dog was ahead of him now and he stopped where David had left the
two hunting spears by the trail when they had followed the elephant. He swung them over his shoulder
in their thong and leather cup harness and, with his best spear that he had kept with him all the time in
his hand, they started on the trail for the shamba. The moon was high now and he wondered why there
was no drumming from the shamba. Something was strange if his father was there and there was no
drumming.
David had felt the tiredness as soon as they had picked up the trail again.
For a long time he had been fresher and in better shape than the two men and impatient with their
slow trailing and the regular halts his father made each hour on the hour. He could have moved ahead
much faster than Juma and his father but when he started to tire they were the same as ever and at noon
they took only the usual five-minute rest and he had seen that Juma was increasing the pace a little.
Perhaps he wasn’t. Perhaps it had only seemed faster but the elephant dung was fresher now although
it was not warm yet to the touch. Juma gave him the rifle to carry after they came upon the last pile of
dung but after an hour he looked at him and took it back.They had been climbing steadily across a
slope of the mountain but now the trail went down and from a gap in the forest he saw broken country
ahead. “Here’s where the tough part starts, Davey,” his father said.
It was then he knew that he should have been sent back to the shamba once he had put them on the
trail. Juma had known it for a long time. His father knew it now and there was nothing to be done. It
was another of his mistakes and there was nothing to do now except gamble.
David looked down at the big flattened circle of the print of the elephant’s foot and saw where
the bracken had been pressed down and where a broken stem of a weed was drying. Juma picked it up
and looked at the sun. Juma handed the broken weed to David’s father and his father rolled it in his
fingers. David noticed the white flowers that were drooped and dying. But they still had not dried in
the sun nor shed their petals.
“It’s going to be a bitch,” his father said. “Let’s get going.”
Late in the afternoon they were still tracking through the broken country. He had been sleepy now
for a long time and as he watched the two men he knew that sleepiness was his real enemy and he
followed their pace and tried to move through and out of the sleep that deadened him. The two men
relieved each other tracking on the hour and the one who was in second place looked back at him at
regular intervals to check if he was with them. When they made a dry camp at dark in the forest he
went to sleep as soon as he sat down and woke with Juma holding his moccasins and feeling his bare
feet for blisters. His father had spread his coat over him and was sitting by him with a piece of cold
cooked meat and two biscuits. He offered him a water bottle with cold tea.
“He’ll have to feed, Davey,” his father said. “Your feet are in good shape. They’re as sound as
Juma’s. Eat this slowly and drink some tea and go to sleep again. We haven’t any problems.”
“I’m sorry I was so sleepy.”
“You and Kibo hunted and traveled all last night. Why shouldn’t you be sleepy? You can have a
little more meat if you want it.”
“I’m not hungry.”
“Good. We’re good for three days. We’ll hit water again tomorrow. Plenty of creeks come off
the mountain.”
“Where’s he going?”
“Juma thinks he knows.”
“Isn’t it bad?”
“Not too bad, Davey.”
“I’m going back to sleep,” David had said. “I don’t need your coat.”
“Juma and I are all right,” his father said. “I always sleep warm you know.”
David was asleep even before his father said good night. Then he woke once with the moonlight
on his face and he thought of the elephant with his great ears moving as he stood in the forest, his head
hung down with the weight of the tusks. David thought then in the night that the hollow way he felt as
he remembered him was from waking hungry. But it was not and he found that out in the next three
days.
The next day was very bad because long before noon he knew that it was not just the need for
sleep that made the difference between a boy and men. For the first three hours he was fresher than
they were and he asked Juma for the .303 rifle to carry but Juma shook his head. He did not smile and
he had always been David’s best friend and had taught him to hunt. He offered it to me yesterday,
David thought, and I’m in better shape today than I was then. He was, too, but by ten o’clock he knew
the day would be as bad or worse than the day before.
It was as silly for him to think that he could trail with his father as to think he could fight with
him. He knew too that it was not just that they were men. They were professional hunters and he knew
now that was why Juma would not even waste a smile. They knew everything the elephant had done,
pointed out the signs of it to each other without speaking, and when the tracking became difficult his
father always yielded to Juma. When they stopped to fill the water bottles at a stream his father said,
“Just last the day out, Davey.” Then when they were past the broken country and climbing toward the
forest the tracks of the elephant turned off to the right onto an old elephant trail. He saw his father and
Juma talking and when he got up to them Juma was looking back over the way they had come and then
at a far distant stony island of hills in the dry country and seemed to be taking a bearing of this against
the peaks of three far blue hills on the horizon.
“Juma knows where he’s going now,” his father explained. “He thought he knew before but then
he dropped down into this stuff.” He looked back at the country they had come through all day.
“Where he’s headed now is pretty good going but we’ll have to climb.”
They climbed until it was dark and then made another dry camp. David killed two spur fowl
with his slingshot out of a small flock that had walked across the trail just before the sunset. The birds
had come into the old elephant trail to dust, walking neatly and plumply, and when the pebble broke
the back of one and the bird began to jerk and toss with its wings thumping, another bird ran forward
to peck at it and David pouched another pebble and pulled it back and sent it against the ribs of the
second bird. As he ran forward to put his hand on it the other birds whirred off. Juma had looked back
and smiled this time and David picked up the two birds, warm and plump and smoothly feathered, and
knocked their heads against the handle of his hunting knife.
Now where they were camped for the night his father said, “I’ve never seen that type of francolin
quite so high. You did very well to get a double on them.”
Juma cooked the birds spitted on a stick over the coals of a very small fire. His father drank a
whiskey and water from the cup top on his flask as they lay and watched Juma cook. Afterward Juma
gave them each a breast with the heart in it and ate the two necks and backs and the legs himself.
“It makes a great difference, Davey,” his father said. “We’re very well off on rations now.”
“How far are we behind him?” David asked.
“We’re quite close,” his father said. “It depends on whether he travels when the moon comes up.
It’s an hour later tonight and two hours later than when you found him.”
“Why does Juma think he knows where he’s going?”
“He wounded him and killed his askari not too far from here.”
“When?”
“Five years ago, he says. That may mean anytime. When you were still a toto he says.”
“Has he been alone since then?”
“He says so. He hasn’t seen him. Only heard of him.”
“How big does he say he is?”
“Close to two hundred. Bigger than anything I’ve ever seen. He says there’s only been one
greater elephant and he came from near here too.”
“I’d better get to sleep,” David said. “I hope I’ll be better tomorrow.”
“You were splendid today,” his father said. “I was very proud of you. So was Juma.”
In the night when he woke after the moon was up he was sure they were not proud of him except
perhaps for his dexterity in killing the two birds. He had found the elephant at night and followed him
to see that he had both of his tusks and then returned to find the two men and put them on the trail.
David knew they were proud of that. But once the deadly following started he was useless to them
and a danger to their success just as Kibo had been to him when he had gone up close to the elephant
in the night, and he knew they must each have hated themselves for not having sent him back when
there was time. The tusks of the elephant weighed two hundred pounds apiece. Ever since these tusks
had grown beyond their normal size the elephant had been hunted for them and now the three of them
would kill him for them.
David was sure that they would kill him now because he, David, had lasted through the day and
kept up after the pace had destroyed him by noon. So they probably were proud of him doing that. But
he had brought nothing useful to the hunt and they would have been far better off without him. Many
times during the day he had wished that he had never betrayed the elephant and in the afternoon he
remembered wishing that he had never seen him. Awake in the moonlight he knew that was not true.
The next morning they were following the spoor of the elephant on an old elephant trail that was
a hard-packed worn road through the forest. It looked as though elephants had traveled it ever since
the lava had cooled from the mountain and the trees had first grown tall and close.
Juma was very confident and they moved fast. Both his father and Juma seemed very sure of
themselves and the going on the elephant road was so easy that Juma gave him the .303 to carry as
they went on through the broken light of the forest. Then they lost the trail in smoking piles of fresh
dung and the flat round prints of a herd of elephants that had come onto the elephant road from the
heavy forest on the left of the trail. Juma had taken the .303 from David angrily. It was afternoon
before they worked up to the herd and around it, seeing the gray bulks through the trees and the
movement of the big ears and the searching trunks coiling and uncoiling, hearing the crash of branches
broken, the crash of trees pushed over, the rumbling in the bellies of the elephants and the slap and
thud of the dung falling.
They had found the trail of the old bull finally and when it turned off onto a smaller elephant
road Juma had looked at David’s father and grinned showing his filed teeth and his father had nodded
his head. They looked as though they had a dirty secret, just as they had looked when he had found
them that night at the shamba.
It was not very long before they came on the secret. It was off to the right in the forest and the
tracks of the old bull led to it. It was a skull as high as David’s chest and white from the sun and the
rain. There was a deep depression in the forehead and a ridge ran from between the bare white eye
sockets and flared out in empty broken holes where the tusks had been chopped away.
Juma pointed out where the great elephant they were trailing had stood while he looked down at
the skull and where his trunk had moved it a little way from the place it had rested on the ground and
where the points of his tusks had touched the ground beside it. He showed David the single hole in the
big depression in the white bone of the forehead and then the four holes close together in the bone
around the earhole. He grinned at David and at his father and took a .303 solid from his pocket and
fitted the nose into the hole in the bone of the forehead.
“Here is where Juma wounded the big bull,” his father said. “This was his askari. His friend,
really, because he was a big bull too. He charged and Juma knocked him down and finished him in the
ear.”
Juma was pointing out the scattered bones and how the big bull had walked among them. Juma
and David’s father were both very pleased with what they had found.
“How long do you suppose he and his friend had been together?” David asked his father.
“I haven’t the faintest idea,” his father said. “Ask Juma.”
“You ask him, please.”
His father and Juma spoke together and Juma had looked at David and laughed.
“Probably four or five times your life, he says,” David’s father told him. “He doesn’t know or
care really.”
I care, David thought. I saw him in the moonlight and he was alone but I had Kibo. Kibo has me
too. The bull wasn’t doing any harm and now we’ve tracked him to where he came to see his dead
friend and now we’re going to kill him. It’s my fault. I betrayed him.
Now Juma had worked out the trail and motioned to his father and they started on.
My father doesn’t need to kill elephants to live, David thought. Juma would not have found him if
I had not seen him. He had his chance at him and all he did was wound him and kill his friend. Kibo
and I found him and I never should have told them and I should have kept him secret and had him
always and let them stay drunk at the beer shamba. Juma was so drunk we could not wake him. I’m
going to keep everything a secret always. I’ll never tell them anything again. If they kill him Juma will
drink his share of the ivory or just buy himself another goddamn wife. Why didn’t you help the
elephant when you could? All you had to do was not go on the second day. No, that wouldn’t have
stopped them. Juma would have gone on. You never should have told them. Never, never tell them.
Try and remember that. Never tell anyone anything ever. Never tell anyone anything again.
His father waited for him to come up and said very gently, “He rested here. He’s not traveling as
he was. We’ll be up on him anytime now.”
“Fuck elephant hunting,” David had said very quietly.
“What’s that?” his father asked.
“Fuck elephant hunting,” David said softly.
“Be careful you don’t fuck it up,” his father had said to him and looked at him flatly.
That’s one thing, David had thought. He’s not stupid. He knows all about it now and he will
never trust me again. That’s good. I don’t want him to because I’ll never ever tell him or anybody
anything again, never anything again. Never ever never.
In the morning he was on the far slope of the mountain again. The elephant was no longer
traveling as he had been but was moving aimlessly now, feeding occasionally and David had known
they were getting close to him.
He tried to remember how he had felt. He had no love for the elephant yet. He must remember
that. He had only a sorrow that had come from his own tiredness that had brought an understanding of
age. Through being too young, he had learned how it must be to be too old.
He was lonesome for Kibo and thinking of how Juma killing the elephant’s friend had turned him
against Juma and made the elephant his brother. He knew then how much it meant to him to have seen
the elephant in the moonlight and to have followed him and come close to him in the clearing so that
he had seen the great tusks. But he did not know that nothing would ever be as good as that again.
Now he knew they would kill the elephant and there was nothing he could do about it. He had
betrayed the elephant when he had gone back to tell them at the shamba. They would kill me and they
would kill Kibo if we had ivory, he had thought, and known it was untrue.
Probably the elephant is going to find where he was born and they’ll kill him there. That’s all
they’d need to make it perfect. They’d like to have killed him where they killed his friend. That would
be a big joke. That would have pleased them. The goddamned friend killers.
They had moved to the edge of thick cover now and the elephant was close ahead. David could
smell him and they could all hear him pulling down branches and the snapping that they made. His
father put his hand on David’s shoulder to move him back and have him wait outside and then he took
a big pinch of ashes from the pouch in his pocket and tossed it in the air. The ash barely slanted
toward them as it fell and his father nodded at Juma and bent down to follow him into the thick cover.
David watched their backs and their asses go in and out of sight. He could not hear them move.
David had stood still and listened to the elephant feeding. He could smell him as strongly as he
had the night in the moonlight when he had worked up close to him and had seen his wonderful tusks.
Then as he stood there it was silent and he could not smell the elephant. Then there had been a high
squealing and smashing and a shot by the .303, then the heavy rocking double report of his father’s
.450, then the smashing and crashing had gone on going steadily away and he had gone into the heavy
growth and found Juma shaken and bleeding from his forehead all down over his face and his father
white and angry.
“He went for Juma and knocked him over,” his father had said. “Juma hit him in the head.”
“Where did you hit him?”
“Where I fucking well could,” his father had said. “Get on the blood spoor.”
There was plenty of blood. One stream as high as David’s head that had squirted bright on trunks
and leaves and vines and another much lower that was dark and foul with stomach content.
“Lung and gut shot,” his father said. “We’ll find him down or anchored—I hope the hell,” he
added.
They found him anchored, in such suffering and despair that he could no longer move. He had
crashed through the heavy cover where he had been feeding and crossed a path of open forest and
David and his father ran along the heavily splashed blood trail. Then the elephant had gone on into
thick forest and David had seen him ahead standing gray and huge against the trunk of a tree. David
could only see his stern and then his father moved ahead and he followed and they came alongside the
elephant as though he was a ship and David saw the blood coming from his flanks and running down
his sides and then his father raised his rifle and fired and the elephant turned his head with the great
tusks moving heavy and slow and looked at them and when his father fired the second barrel the
elephant seemed to sway like a felled tree and came smashing down toward them. But he was not
dead. He had been anchored and now he was down with his shoulder broken. He did not move but his
eye was alive and looked at David. He had very long eyelashes and his eye was the most alive thing
David had ever seen.
“Shoot him in the earhole with the three oh three,” his father said. “Go on.”
“You shoot him,” David had said.
Juma had come up limping and bloody, the skin of his forehead hanging down over his left eye,
the bone of his nose showing and one ear torn and had taken the rifle from David without speaking
and pushed the muzzle almost into the earhole and fired twice, jerking the bolt and driving it forward
angrily. The eye of the elephant had opened wide on the first shot and then started to glaze and blood
came out of the ear and ran in two bright streams down the wrinkled gray hide. It was different
colored blood and David had thought I must remember that and he had but it had never been of any use
to him. Now all the dignity and majesty and all the beauty were gone from the elephant and he was a
huge wrinkled pile.
“Well, we got him, Davey, thanks to you,” his father had said. “Now we’d better get a fire going
so I can put Juma back together again. Come here, you bloody Humpty Dumpty. Those tusks will
keep.”
Juma had come to him grinning, bringing the tail of the elephant that had no hairs on it at all.
They had made a dirty joke and then his father had begun to speak rapidly in Swahili. How far to
water? How far will you have to go to get people to get those tusks out of here? How are you, you
worthless old pig fucker? What have you broken?
With the answers known his father had said, “You and I will go back to get the packs where we
dropped them. Juma can get wood and have the fire ready. The medical kit is in my pack. We have to
get the packs before it’s dark. He won’t infect. It’s not like claw wounds. Let’s go.”
That evening as David had sat by the fire he had looked at Juma with his stitched-up face and his
broken ribs and wondered if the elephant had recognized him when he had tried to kill him. He hoped
he had. The elephant was his hero now as his father had been for a long time and he had thought, I
didn’t believe he could do it when he was so old and tired. He would have killed Juma, too. But he
didn’t look at me as though he wanted to kill me. He only looked sad the same way I felt. He visited
his old friend on the day he died.
David remembered how the elephant lost all dignity as soon as his eye had ceased to be alive
and how when his father and he had returned with the packs the elephant had already started to swell,
even in the cool evening. There was no more true elephant; only the gray wrinkled swelling dead
body and the huge mottled brown and yellow tusks that they had killed him for. The tusks were stained
with dried blood and he scraped some off with his thumbnail like a dried piece of sealing wax and
put it in the pocket of his shirt. That was all he took from the elephant except the beginning of the
knowledge of loneliness.
After the butchery his father tried to talk to him that night by the fire.
“He was a murderer you know, Davey,” he had said. “Juma says nobody knows how many
people he has killed.”
“They were all trying to kill him, weren’t they?”
“Naturally,” his father had said, “with that pair of tusks.”
“How could he be a murderer then?”
“Just as you like,” his father had said. “I’m sorry you got so mixed up about him.”
“I wish he’d killed Juma,” David said.
“I think that’s carrying it a little far,” his father said. “Juma’s your friend, you know.”
“Not any more.”
“No need to tell him so.”
“He knows it,” David had said.
“I think you misjudge him,” his father said and they had left it there.
Then when they were finally back safely with the tusks after all the things that had happened and
the tusks were propped against the wall of the stick and mud house, leaning there with their points
touching, the tusks so tall and thick that no one could believe them even when they touched them and
no one, not even his father, could reach to the top of the bend where they curved in for the points to
meet, there when Juma and his father and he were heroes and Kibo was a hero’s dog and the men who
had carried the tusks were heroes, already slightly drunk heroes and to be drunker, his father had said,
“Do you want to make peace, Davey?”
“All right,” he said because he knew this was the start of the never telling that he had decided
on.
“I’m so glad,” his father said. “It’s so much simpler and better.”
Then they sat on old men’s stools under the shade of the fig tree with the tusks against the wall of
the hut and drank beer from gourd cups that were brought by a young girl and her younger brother, the
servant of heroes, sitting in the dust by the heroic dog of a hero who held an old cockerel, newly
promoted to the standing of the heroes’ favorite rooster. They sat there and drank beer while the big
drum started and the ngoma began to build.
Part III
Previously Unpublished Fiction
“A Train Trip” represents the first four chapters of an unfinished and untitled Lardneresque
novel. These scenes form a fine short story in the vein of “The Battler” and “Fifty Grand.”
A Train Trip
MY FATHER TOUCHED ME AND I WAS awake. He stood by the bed in the dark. I felt his hand on me
and I was wide awake in my head and saw and felt things but all the rest of me was asleep.
“Jimmy,” he said, “are you awake?”
“Yes.”
“Get dressed then.”
“All right.”
He stood there and I wanted to move but I was really still asleep.
“Get dressed, Jimmy.”
“All right,” I said but I lay there. Then the sleep was gone and I moved out of bed.
“Good boy,” my father said. I stood on the rug and felt for my clothes at the foot of the bed.
“They’re on the chair,” my father said. “Put on your shoes and stockings too.” He went out of the
room. It was cold and complicated getting dressed; I had not worn shoes and stockings all summer
and it was not pleasant putting them on. My father came back in the room and sat on the bed.
“Do the shoes hurt?”
“They pinch.”
“If the shoe pinches put it on.”
“I’m putting it on.”
“We’ll get some other shoes,” he said. “It’s not even a principle, Jimmy. It’s a proverb.”
“I see.”
“Like two against one is nigger fun. That’s a proverb too.”
“I like that one better than about the shoe,” I said.
“It’s not so true,” he said. “That’s why you like it. The pleasanter proverbs aren’t so true.” It
was cold and I tied my other shoe and was finished dressing.
“Would you like button shoes?” my father asked.
“I don’t care.”
“You can have them if you like,” he said. “Everybody ought to have button shoes if they like.”
“I’m all ready.”
“Where are we going?”
“We’re going a long way.”
“Where to?”
“Canada.”
“We’ll go there too,” he said. We went out to the kitchen. All the shutters were closed and there
was a lamp on the table. In the middle of the room was a suitcase, a duffel bag, and two rucksacks.
“Sit down at the table,” my father said. He brought the frying pan and the coffee pot from the stove
and sat down beside me and we ate ham and eggs and drank coffee with condensed cream in it.
“Eat all you can.”
“I’m full.”
“Eat that other egg.” He lifted the egg that was left in the pan with the pancake turner and put it
on my plate. The edges were crisped from the bacon fat. I ate it and looked around the kitchen. If I
was going away I wanted to remember it and say good-bye. In the corner the stove was rusty and half
the lid was broken off the hot water reservoir. Above the stove there was a wooden-handled dish
mop stuck in the edge of one of the rafters. My father threw it at a bat one evening. He left it there to
remind him to get a new one and afterwards I think to remind him of the bat. I caught the bat in the
landing net and kept him in a box with screen over it for a while. He had tiny eyes and tiny teeth and
he kept himself folded in the box. We let him loose down on the shore of the lake in the dark and he
flew out over the lake, flying very lightly and with flutters and flew down close over the water and
then high and turned and flew over us and back into the trees in the dark. There were two kitchen
tables, one that we ate on and one we did dishes on. They were both covered with oilcloth. There
was a tin bucket for carrying lake water to fill the reservoir and a granite bucket for well water.
There was a roller towel on the pantry door and dish towels on a rack over the stove. The broom was
in the corner. The wood box was half full and all the pans were hanging against the wall.
I looked all around the kitchen to remember it and I was awfully fond of it.
“Well,” said my father. “Do you think you’ll remember it?”
“I think so.”
“And what will you remember?”
“All the fun we’ve had.”
“Not just filling the wood box and hauling water?”
“That’s not hard.”
“No,” he said. “That’s not hard. Aren’t you sorry to go away?”
“Not if we’re going to Canada.”
“We won’t stay there.”
“Won’t we stay there a while?”
“Not very long.”
“Where do we go then?”
“We’ll see.”
“I don’t care where we go,” I said.
“Try and keep that way,” my father said. He lit a cigarette and offered me the package. “You
don’t smoke?”
“No.”
“That’s good,” he said. “Now you go outdoors and climb up on the ladder and put the bucket on
the chimney and I’ll lock up.”
I went outside. It was still dark but along the edge of the hills it was lightening. The ladder was
leaning against the roof and I found the old berry pail beside the woodshed and climbed the ladder.
The leather soles of my shoes felt insecure and slippery on the rungs. I put the bucket over the top of
the stove pipe to keep out the rain and to keep squirrels and chipmunks from climbing in. From the
roof I looked down through the trees to the lake. Looking down on the other side was the woodshed
roof, the fence and the hills. It was lighter than when I started to climb the ladder and it was cold and
very early in the morning. I looked at the trees and the lake again to remember them and all around; at
the hills in back and the woods off on the other side of the house and down again at the woodshed
roof and I loved them all very much, the woodshed and the fence and the hills and the woods and I
wished we were just going on a fishing trip and not going away. I heard the door shut and my father
put all the bags out on the ground. Then he locked the door. I started down the ladder.
“Jimmy,” my father said.
“Yes.”
“How is it up there on the roof?”
“I’m coming down.”
“Go on up. I’m coming up a minute,” he said and climbed up very slowly and carefully. He
looked all around the way I had done. “I don’t want to go either,” he said.
“Why do we have to go?”
“I don’t know,” he said. “But we do.”
We climbed down the ladder and my father put it in the woodshed. We carried the things down
to the dock. The motor boat was tied beside the dock. There was dew on the oilcloth cover, the
engine, and the seats were wet with dew. I took off the cover and wiped the seats dry with a piece of
waste. My father lifted down the bags from the dock and put them in the stem of the boat. Then I untied
the bow line and the stern line and got back in the boat and held onto the dock. My father primed the
engine through a petcock, rocking the wheel twice to suck the gasoline into the cylinder, then he
cranked the flywheel over and the engine started. I held the boat to the dock with a twist of the line
around a spile. The propeller churned up the water and the boat pulled against the dock making the
water swirl through the spiles.
“Let her go, Jimmy,” my father said and I cast off the line and we started away from the dock. I
saw the cottage through the trees with the windows shuttered. We were going straight out from the
dock and the dock became shorter and the shoreline opened out.
“You take her,” my father said and I took the wheel and turned her out toward the point. I looked
back and saw the beach and the dock and the boat house and the clump of balm of Gilead trees and
then we were past the clearing and there was the cove with the mouth of the little stream coming into
the lake and the bank high with hemlock trees and then the wooded shoreline of the point and then I
had to watch for the sand bar that came way out beyond the point. There was deep water right up to
the edge of the bar and I went along the edge of the channel and then out around the end seeing the
channel bank slope off underwater and the pickerel weed growing underwater and sucked toward us
by the propeller and then we were past the point and when I looked back the dock and the boat house
were out of sight and there was only the point with three crows walking on the sand and an old log
half covered in the sand and ahead the open lake.
I heard the train and then saw it coming, first in a long curve looking very small and hurried and
cut into little connected sections; moving with the hills and the hills moving with the trees behind it. I
saw a puff of white from the engine and heard the whistle then another puff and heard the whistle
again. It was still early in the morning and the train was on the other side of a tamarack swamp. There
was running water on each side of the tracks, clear spring water with a brown swamp bottom and
there was a mist over the center of the swamp. The trees that had been killed in the forest fires were
grey and thin and dead in the mist but the mist was not foggy. It was cold and white and early morning.
The train was coming straight down the tracks now getting closer and closer and bigger and bigger. I
stepped back from the tracks and looked back at the lake with the two grocery stores and the boat
houses, the long docks going out into the water and close by the station the gravelled patch around the
artesian well where the water came straight up in the sunlight out of a brown water-film covered
pipe. The water was splashing in the fountain basin, in back was the lake with a breeze coming up,
there were woods along the shore and the boat we had come in was tied to the dock.
The train stopped, the conductor and the brakeman got down and my father said good-bye to Fred
Cuthbert who was going to take care of the boat in his boat house.
“When will you be back?”
“I don’t know, Fred,” my father said. “Give her a coat of paint in the spring.”
“Good-bye, Jimmy,” Fred said. “Take good care of yourself.”
“Good-bye, Fred.”
We shook hands with Fred and got on the train. The conductor got on in the car ahead and the
brakeman picked up the little box we had stepped up on and swung aboard the train as it started. Fred
stood there on the station platform and I watched the station, Fred standing there, then walking away,
the water splashing up out of the pipe in the sun and then ties and the swamp and the station very small
and the lake looking different and from a new angle and then we were out of sight and crossed the
Bear River and went through a cut and there were only the ties and the rails running back and
fireweed growing beside the track and nothing more to look at to remember. It was all new now
looking out from the platform and the woods had that new look of woods you do not know and if you
passed a lake it was the same way. It was just a lake and new and not like a lake you had lived on.
“You’ll get all cinders out here,” my father said.
“I guess we’d better go in,” I said. I felt funny with so much new country. I suppose it really
looked just the same as the country where we lived but it did not feel the same. I suppose every patch
of hardwood with the leaves turning looks alike but when you see a beech woods from the train it
does not make you happy; it only makes you want the woods where you live. But I did not know that
then. I thought it would all be like where we lived only more of it and that it would be just the same
and give you the same feeling, but it didn’t. We did not have anything to do with it. The hills were
worse than the woods. Perhaps all the hills in Michigan look the same but up in the car I looked out of
the window and I would see woods and swamps and we would cross a stream and it was very
interesting and then we would pass hills with a farmhouse and the woods behind them and they were
the same hills but they were different and everything was a little different. I suppose, of course, that
hills that a railroad runs by can not be the same. But it was not the way I had thought it was going to
be. But it was a fine day early in the fall. The air was fine with the window open and in a little while
I was hungry. We had been up since before it was light and now it was almost half past eight. My
father came back down the car to our seat.
“How do you feel, Jimmy?”
“Hungry.”
He gave me a bar of chocolate and an apple out of his pocket.
“Come on up to the smoker,” he said and I followed him through the car and into the next one
ahead. We sat down in a seat, my father inside next to the window. It was dirty in the smoker and the
black leather on the seats had been burned by cinders.
“Look at the seats opposite us,” my father said to me without looking toward them. Opposite us
two men sat side by side. The man on the inside was looking out the window and his right wrist was
handcuffed to the left wrist of the man who sat beside him. In the seat ahead of them were two other
men. I could only see their backs but they sat the same way. The two men who sat on the aisle were
talking.
“In a day coach,” the man opposite us said. The man who sat in front of him spoke without
turning around.
“Well why didn’t we take the night train?”
“Did you want to sleep with these?”
“Sure. Why not?”
“It’s more comfortable this way.”
“The hell it’s comfortable.”
The man who was looking out of the window looked at us and winked. He was a little man and
he wore a cap. There was a bandage around his head under the cap. The man he was handcuffed to
wore a cap also but his neck was thick, he was dressed in a blue suit and he wore a cap as though it
was only for travelling.
The two men on the next seat were about the same size and build but the one on the aisle had the
thicker neck.
“How about something to smoke, Jack?” the man who had winked said to my father over the
shoulder of the man he was handcuffed to. The thick-necked man turned and looked at my father and
me. The man who had winked smiled. My father took out a package of cigarettes.
“You want to give him a cigarette?” asked the guard. My father reached the package across the
aisle.
“I’ll give it to him,” said the guard. He took the package in his free hand, squeezed it, put it in his
handcuffed hand and holding it there took out a cigarette with his free hand and gave it to the man
beside him. The man next to the window smiled at us and the guard lit the cigarette for him.
“You’re awfully sweet to me,” he said to the guard.
The guard reached the package of cigarettes back across the aisle.
“Have one,” my father said.
“No thanks. I’m chewing.”
“Making a long trip?”
“Chicago.”
“So are we.”
“It’s a fine town,” the little man next to the window said. “I was there once.”
“I’ll say you were,” the guard said. “I’ll say you were.”
We moved up and sat in the seat directly opposite them. The guard in front looked around. The
man with him looked down at the floor.
“What’s the trouble,” asked my father.
“These gentlemen are wanted for murder.”
The man next to the window winked at me.
“Keep it clean,” he said. “We’re all gentlemen here.”
“Who was killed?” asked my father.
“An Italian,” said the guard.
“Who?” asked the little man very brightly.
“An Italian,” the guard repeated to my father.
“Who killed him?” asked the little man looking at the sergeant and opening his eyes wide.
“You’re pretty funny,” the guard said.
“No sir,” the little man said. “I just asked you, Sergeant, who killed this Italian.”
“He killed this Italian,” the prisoner on the front seat said looking toward the detective. “He
killed this Italian with his bow and arrow.”
“Cut it out,” said the detective.
“Sergeant,” the little man said. “I did not kill this Italian. I would not kill an Italian. I do not
know an Italian.”
“Write it down and use it against him,” the prisoner on the front seat said. “Everything he says
will be used against him. He did not kill this Italian.”
“Sergeant,” asked the little man, “who did kill this Italian?”
“You did,” said the detective.
“Sergeant,” said the little man. “That is a falsehood. I did not kill this Italian. I refuse to repeat
it. I did not kill this Italian.”
“Everything he says must be used against him,” said the other prisoner. “Sergeant, why did you
kill this Italian?”
“It was an error, Sergeant,” the little prisoner said. “It was a grave error. You should never have
killed this Italian.”
“Or that Italian,” the other prisoner said.
“Shut to hell up the both of you,” said the sergeant. “They’re dope heads,” he said to my father.
“They’re crazy as bed bugs.”
“Bed bugs?” said the little man, his voice rising. “There are no bed bugs on me, Sergeant.”
“He comes from a long line of English earls,” said the other prisoner. “Ask the senator there,” he
nodded at my father.
“Ask the little man there,” said the first prisoner. “He’s just George Washington’s age. He
cannot tell a lie.”
“Speak up, boy,” the big prisoner stared at me.
“Cut it out,” the guard said.
“Yes, Sergeant,” said the little prisoner. “Make him cut it out. He’s got no right to bring in the
little lad.”
“I was a boy myself once,” the big prisoner said.
“Shut your goddam mouth,” the guard said.
“That’s right, Sergeant,” began the little prisoner.
“Shut your goddam mouth.” The little prisoner winked at me.
“Maybe we better go back to the other car,” my father said to me. “See you later,” he said to the
two detectives.
“Sure. See you at lunch.” The other detective nodded. The little prisoner winked at us. He
watched us go down the aisle. The other prisoner was looking out of the window. We walked back
through the smoker to our seats in the other car.
“Well, Jimmy, what do you make of that?”
“I don’t know.”
“Neither do I,” said my father.
At lunch at Cadillac we were sitting at the counter before they came in and they sat apart at a
table. It was a good lunch. We ate chicken pot pie and I drank a glass of milk and ate a piece of
blueberry pie with ice cream. The lunch room was crowded. Looking out the open door you could see
the train. I sat on my stool at the lunch counter and watched the four of them eating together. The two
prisoners ate with their left hands and the detectives with their right hands. When the detectives
wanted to cut up their meat they used the fork in their left hand and that pulled the prisoner’s right
hand toward them. Both the hands that were fastened together were on the table. I watched the little
prisoner eating and he, without seeming to do it purposefully, made it very uncomfortable for the
sergeant. He would jerk without seeming to know it and he held his hand so the sergeant’s left hand
was always being pulled. The other two ate as comfortably as they could. They were not as
interesting to watch anyway.
“Why don’t you take them off while we eat?” the little man said to the sergeant. The sergeant did
not say anything. He was reaching for his coffee and as he picked it up the little man jerked and he
spilled it. Without looking toward the little man the sergeant jerked out with his arm and the steel
cuffs yanked the little man’s wrist and the sergeant’s wrist hit the little man in the face.
“Son of a bitch,” the little man said. His lip was cut and he sucked it.
“Who?” asked the sergeant.
“Not you,” said the little man. “Not you with me chained to you. Certainly not.”
The sergeant moved his wrist under the table and looked at the little man’s face.
“What do you say?”
“Not a thing,” said the little man. The sergeant looked at his face and then reached for his coffee
again with his handcuffed hand. The little man’s right hand was pulled out across the table as the
sergeant reached. The sergeant lifted the coffee cup and as he raised it to drink it it jerked out of his
hand and the coffee spilled all over everything. The sergeant brought the handcuffs up into the little
man’s face twice without looking at him. The little man’s face was bloody and he sucked his lip and
looked at the table.
“You got enough?”
“Yes,” said the little man. “I’ve got plenty.”
“You feel quieter now?”
“Very quiet,” said the little man. “How do you feel?”
“Wipe your face off,” said the sergeant. “Your mouth is bloody.”
We saw them get on the train two at a time and we got on too and went to our seats. The other
detective, not the one they called Sergeant but the one handcuffed to the big prisoner, had not taken
any notice of what happened at the table. He had watched it but he had not seemed to notice it. The
big prisoner had not said anything but had watched everything.
There were cinders in the plush of our seat in the train and my father brushed the seat with a
newspaper. The train started and I looked out the open window and tried to see Cadillac but you
could not see much, only the lake, and factories and a fine smooth road along near the tracks. There
were a lot of sawdust piles along the lake shore.
“Don’t put your head out, Jimmy,” my father said. I sat down. There was nothing much to see
anyway.
“That is the town Al Moegast came from,” my father said.
“Oh,” I said.
“Did you see what happened at the table?” my father asked.
“Yes.”
“Did you see everything?”
“I don’t know.”
“What do you think the little one made that trouble for?”
“I guess he wanted to make it uncomfortable so they would take the handcuffs off.”
“Did you see anything else?”
“I saw him get hit three times in the face.”
“Where did you watch when he hit him?”
“I watched his face. I watched the sergeant hit him.”
“Well,” my father said. “While the sergeant hit him in the face with the handcuff on his right hand
he picked up a steel-bladed knife off the table with his left hand and put it in his pocket.”
“I didn’t see.”
“No,” my father said. “Every man has two hands, Jimmy. At least to start with. You ought to
watch both of them if you’re going to see things.”
“What did the other two do?” I asked. My father laughed.
“I didn’t watch them,” he said.
We sat there in the train after lunch and I looked out of the window and watched the country. It
did not mean so much now because there was so much else going on and I had seen a lot of country
but I did not want to suggest that we go up into the smoker until my father said to. He was reading and
I guess my restlessness disturbed him.
“Don’t you ever read, Jimmy?” he asked me.
“Not much,” I said. “I don’t have time.”
“What are you doing now?”
“Waiting.”
“Do you want to go up there?”
“Yes.”
“Do you think we ought to tell the sergeant”
“No,” I said.
“It’s an ethical problem,” he said and shut the book.
“Do you want to tell him?” I asked.
“No,” my father said. “Besides a man is held to be innocent until the law has proved him guilty.
He may not have killed that Italian.”
“Are they dope fiends?”
“I don’t know whether they use dope or not,” my father said. “Many people use it. But using
cocaine or morphine or heroin doesn’t make people talk the way they talked.”
“What does?”
“I don’t know,” said my father. “What makes anyone talk the way they do?”
“Let’s go up there,” I said. My father got the suitcase down, opened it up and put the book in it
and something out of his pocket. He locked the suitcase and we went up to the smoker. Walking along
the aisle of the smoker I saw the two detectives and the two prisoners sitting quietly. We sat down
opposite them.
The little man’s cap was down over the bandage around his head and his lips were swollen. He
was awake and looking out of the window. The sergeant was sleepy, his eyes would shut and then
open, stay open a while and then shut. His face looked very heavy and sleepy. Ahead on the next seat
the other two were both sleepy. The prisoner leaned toward the window side of the seat and the
detective toward the aisle. They were not comfortable that way and as they got sleepier, they both
leaned toward each other.
The little man looked at the sergeant and then across at us. He did not seem to recognize us and
looked all down the car. He seemed to be looking at all the men in the smoker. There were not very
many passengers. Then he looked at the sergeant again. My father had taken another book out of his
pocket and was reading.
“Sergeant,” the little man said. The sergeant held his eyes open and looked at the prisoner.
“I got to go to the can,” the little man said.
“Not now,” the sergeant shut his eyes.
“Listen, Sergeant,” the little man said. “Didn’t you ever have to go to the can?”
“Not now,” the sergeant said. He did not want to leave the half asleep half awake state he was
in. He was breathing slowly and heavily but when he would open his eyes his breathing would stop.
The little man looked across at us but did not seem to recognize us.
“Sergeant,” he said. The sergeant did not answer. The little man ran his tongue over his lips.
“Listen Sergeant, I got to go to the can.”
“All right,” the sergeant said. He stood up and the little man stood up and they walked down the
aisle. I looked at my father. “Go on,” he said, “if you want to.” I walked after them down the aisle.
They were standing at the door.
“I want to go in alone,” the prisoner said.
“No you don’t.”
“Go on. Let me go in alone.”
“No.”
“Why not? You can keep the door locked.”
“I won’t take them off.”
“Go on, Sergeant. Let me go in alone.”
“We’ll take a look,” the sergeant said. They went inside and the sergeant shut the door. I was
sitting on the seat opposite the door to the toilet. I looked down the aisle at my father. Inside I could
hear them talking but not what they were saying. Someone turned the handle inside the door to open it
and then I heard something fall against it and hit twice against the door. Then it fell on the floor. Then
there was a noise as when you pick a rabbit up by the hind legs and slap its head against a stump to
kill it. I was looking at my father and motioning. There was that noise three times and then I saw
something come out from under the door. It was blood and it came out very slowly and smoothly. I ran
down the aisle to my father. “There’s blood coming out under the door.”
“Sit down there,” my father said. He stood up, went across the aisle and touched the detective on
the shoulder. The detective looked up.
“Your partner went up to the washroom,” my father said.
“Sure,” said the detective. “Why not?”
“My boy went up there and said he saw blood coming out from under the door.”
The detective jumped up and jerked the other prisoner over on the seat. The other prisoner
looked at my father.
“Come on,” the detective said. The prisoner sat there. “Come on,” the detective said and the
prisoner did not move. “Come on or I’ll blow your can off.”
“What’s it all about, your excellency?” the prisoner asked.
“Come on, you bastard,” the detective said.
“Aw, keep it clean,” the prisoner said.
They were going down the aisle, the detective ahead holding a gun in his right hand and the
prisoner handcuffed to him hanging back. The passengers were standing up to see. “Stay where you
are,” my father said. He took hold of me by the arm.
The detective saw the blood under the door. He looked around at the prisoner. The prisoner saw
him looking and stood still. “No,” he said. The detective holding his gun in his right hand jerked down
hard with his left hand and the prisoner slipped forward on his knees. “No,” he said. The detective
watching the door and the prisoner shifted the revolver so he held it by the muzzle and hit the prisoner
suddenly at the side of the head. The prisoner slipped down with his head and hands on the floor.
“No,” he said shaking his head on the floor. “No. No. No.”
The detective hit him again and then again and he was quiet. He lay on the floor on his face with
his head bent down on his chest. Watching the door, the detective laid the revolver down on the floor
and leaning over unlocked the handcuff from the wrist of the prisoner. Then he picked up the revolver
and stood up. Holding the revolver in his right hand he pulled the cord with his left to stop the train.
Then he reached for the handle of the door.
The train was starting to slow.
“Get away from that door,” we heard someone say inside the door.
“Open it up,” said the detective and stepped back.
“Al,” the voice said. “Al, are you all right?”
The detective stood just to one side of the door. The train was slowing down.
“Al,” said the voice again. “Answer me if you’re all right.”
There was no answer. The train stopped. The brakeman opened the door. “What the hell?” he
said. He looked at the man on the floor, the blood and the detective holding the revolver. The
conductor was coming down from the other end of the car.
“There’s a fellow in there that’s killed a man,” the detective said.
“The hell there is. He’s gone out the window,” said the brakeman.
“Watch that man,” said the detective. He opened the door to the platform. I went across the aisle
and looked out the window. Along the tracks there was a fence. Beyond the fence was the woods. I
looked up and down the tracks. The detective came running by; then ran back. There was no one in
sight. The detective came back in the car and they opened the door of the washroom. The door would
not swing open because the sergeant was lying across it on the floor. The window was open about
halfway. The sergeant was still breathing. They picked him up and carried him out into the car and
they picked up the prisoner and put him in a seat. The detective put the handcuff through the handle of
a big suitcase. Nobody seemed to know what to do or whether to look after the sergeant or try and
find the little man or what. Everybody had gotten out of the train and looked down the tracks and in
the edge of the woods. The brakeman had seen the little man run across the tracks and into the woods.
The detective went into the woods a couple of times and then came out. The prisoner had taken the
sergeant’s gun and nobody seemed to want to go very far into the woods after him. Finally they started
the train to get to a station where they could send for the state constabulary and send out a description
of the little man. My father helped them with the sergeant. He washed off the wound, it was between
the collarbone and the neck, and sent me to get paper and towels from the washroom and folded them
over and made a plug for it and tied it tight in with a sleeve from the sergeant’s shirt. They laid him
out as comfortably as they could and my father washed off his face. His head had been banged against
the floor of the washroom and he was still unconscious but my father said the wound was not serious.
At the station they took him off and the detective took the other prisoner off too. The other prisoner’s
face was white and he had a bruised bump on the side of his head. He looked silly when they took him
off and seemed anxious to move very fast to do whatever they told him. My father came back in the
car from helping them with the sergeant. They had put him in a motor truck that was at the station and
were going to drive him to a hospital. The detective was sending wires. We were standing on the
platform and the train started and I saw the prisoner standing there, leaning the back of his head
against the wall of the station. He was crying.
I felt pretty bad about everything and we went in the smoker. The brakeman had a bucket and a
bunch of waste and was mopping up and washing where the blood had been.
“How was he, Doc?” he said to my father.
“I’m not a doctor,” my father said. “But I think he’ll be all right.”
“Two big dicks,” said the brakeman. “And they couldn’t handle that one little shrimp.”
“Did you see him get out the window?”
“Sure,” said the brakeman. “Or I saw him just after he lit on the tracks.”
“Did you recognize him?”
“No. Not when I first saw him. How do you think he stabbed him, Doc?”
“He must have jumped up on him from behind,” my father said.
“Wonder where he got the knife?”
“I don’t know,” said my father.
“That other poor boob,” said the brakeman. “He never even tried to make a break.”
“No.”
“That detective gave him his though. Did you see it, Doc?”
“Yes.”
“That poor boob,” the brakeman said. It was damp and clean where he had washed. We went
back to our seats in the other car. My father sat and did not say anything and I wondered what he was
thinking.
“Well, Jimmy,” he said, after a while.
“Yes.”
“What do you think of it all now?”
“I don’t know.”
“Neither do I,” said my father. “Do you feel bad?”
“Yes.”
“So do I. Were you scared?”
“When I saw the blood,” I said. “And when he hit the prisoner.”
“That’s healthy.”
“Were you scared?”
“No,” my father said. “What was the blood like?” I thought a minute.
“It was thick and smooth.”
“Blood is thicker than water,” my father said. “That’s the first proverb you run up against when
you lead an active life.”
“It doesn’t mean that,” I said. “It means about family.”
“No,” said my father. “It means just that, but it always surprises you. I remember the first time I
found it out.”
“When was that?”
“I felt my shoes full of it. It was very warm and thick. It was just like water in your rubber boots
when we go duck hunting except it was warm and thicker and smoother.”
“When was that?”
“Oh, a long time ago,” said my father.
“The Porter” is a scene from the same unfinished and untitled novel as “A Train Trip.”
The Porter
WHEN WE WENT TO BED MY FATHER said I might as well sleep
in the lower berth because I would want to look out the window early in the morning. He said an
upper berth did not make any difference to him and he would come to bed after a while. I undressed
and put my clothes in the hammock and put on pajamas and got into bed. I turned off the light and
pulled up the window curtain but it was cold if I sat up to look out and lying down in bed I could not
see anything. My father took a suitcase out from under my berth, opened it on the bed, took out his
pajamas and tossed them up to the upper berth, then he took a book out and the bottle and filled his
flask.
“Turn on the light,” I said.
“No,” he said. “I don’t need it. Are you sleepy, Jim?”
“I guess so.”
“Get a good sleep,” he said and closed the suitcase and put it back under the berth.
“Did you put your shoes out?”
“No,” I said. They were in the hammock and I got up to get them but he found them and put them
out in the aisle. He shut the curtain.
“Aren’t you going to bed, sir?” the porter asked him.
“No,” my father said. “I’m going to read a while up in the washroom.”
“Yes, sir,” the porter said. It was fine lying between the sheets with the thick blanket pulled up
and it all dark and the country dark outside. There was a screen across the lower part of the window
that was open and the air came in cold. The green curtain was buttoned tight and the car swayed but
felt very solid and was going fast and once in a while you would hear the whistle. I went to sleep and
when I woke up I looked out and we were going very slowly and crossing a big river. There were
lights shining on the water and the iron framework of a bridge going by the window and my father was
getting into the upper berth.
“Are you awake, Jimmy?”
“Yes. Where are we?”
“We’re crossing into Canada now,” he said. “But in the morning we’ll be out of it.”
I looked out of the window to see Canada but all I could see were railway yards and freight
cars. We stopped and two men came by with torches and stopped and hit on the wheels with
hammers. I could not see anything but the men crouching over by the wheels and opposite us freight
cars and I crawled down in bed again.
“Where are we in Canada?” I asked.
“Windsor,” my father said. “Good night, Jim.”
When I woke up in the morning and looked out we were going through fine country that looked
like Michigan only with higher hills and the trees were all turning. I got dressed in all but my shoes
and reached under the curtain for them. They were shined and I put them on and unbuttoned the curtain
and went out in the aisle. The curtains were buttoned all down the aisle and everybody seemed to be
still asleep. I went down to the washroom and looked in. The nigger porter was asleep in one corner
of the leather cushioned seat. His cap was down over his eyes and his feet were up on one of the
chairs. His mouth was open, his head was tipped back and his hands were together in his lap. I went
on to the end of the car and looked out but it was drafty and cindery and there was no place to sit
down. I went back to the washroom and went in very carefully so as not to wake the porter and sat
down by the window. The washroom smelt like brass spittoons in the early morning. I was hungry and
I looked out of the window at the fall country and watched the porter asleep. It looked like good
shooting country. There was lots of brush on the hills and patches of woods and fine looking farms
and good roads. It was a different kind of looking country than Michigan. Going through it it all
seemed to be connected and in Michigan one part of the country hasn’t any connection with another.
There weren’t any swamps either and none of it looked burnt over. It all looked as though it belonged
to somebody but it was nice looking country and the beeches and the maples were turned and there
were lots of scrub oaks that had fine colored leaves too and when there was brush there was lots of
sumac that was bright red. It looked like good country for rabbits and I tried to see some game but it
went by too fast to concentrate looking and the only birds you could see were birds flying. I saw a
hawk hunting over a field and his mate too. I saw flickers flying in the edge of the woods and I figured
they were going south. I saw bluejays twice but the train was no good for seeing birds. It slid the
country all sideways if you looked straight at anything and you had to just let it go by, looking ahead a
little all the time. We passed a farm with a long meadow and I saw a flock of killdeer plover feeding.
Three of them flew up when the train went by and circled off over the woods but the rest kept on
feeding. We made a big curve so I could see the other cars curved ahead and the engine with the drive
wheels going very fast away up ahead and a river valley down below us and then I looked around and
the porter was awake and looking at me.
“What do you see?” he said.
“Not much.”
“You certainly do look at it.”
I did not say anything but I was glad he was awake. He kept his feet up on the chair but reached
up and put his cap straight.
“That your father that stayed up here reading?”
“Yes.”
“He certainly can drink liquor.”
“He’s a great drinker.”
“He certainly is a great drinker. That’s it, a great drinker.”
I did not say anything.
“I had a couple with him,” the porter said. “And I got plenty of effect but he sat there half the
night and never showed a thing.”
“He never shows anything,” I said.
“No sir. But if he keeps up that way he’s going to kill his whole insides.”
I did not say anything.
“You hungry, boy?”
“Yes,” I said. “I’m very hungry.”
“We got a diner on now. Come on back and we’ll get a little something.”
We went back through two other cars, all with the curtains closed all along the aisles, to the
diner and through the tables back to the kitchen.
“Hail fellow well met,” the porter said to the chef.
“Uncle George,” the chef said. There were four other niggers sitting at a table playing cards.
“How about some food for the young gentleman and myself?”
“No sir,” said the chef. “Not until I can get it ready.”
“Could you drink?” said George.
“No sir,” said the chef.
“Here it is,” said George. He took a pint bottle out of his side pocket. “Courtesy of the young
gentleman’s father.”
“He’s courteous,” said the chef. He wiped his lips.
“The young gentleman’s father is the world’s champion.”
“At what?”
“At drinking.”
“He’s mighty courteous,” said the chef. “How did you eat last night?”
“With that collection of yellow boys.”
“They all together still?”
“Between Chicago and Detroit. We call ’em the White Eskimos now.”
“Well,” said the chef. “Everything’s got its place.” He broke two eggs on the side of a frying
pan. “Ham and eggs for the son of the champion?”
“Thanks,” I said.
“How about some of that courtesy?”
“Yes sir.”
“May your father remain undefeated,” the chef said to me. He licked his lips. “Does the young
gentleman drink too?”
“No sir,” said George. “He’s in my charge.”
The chef put the ham and eggs on two plates.
“Seat yourselves, gentlemen.”
George and I sat down and he brought us two cups of coffee and sat down opposite us.
“You willing to part with another example of that courtesy?”
“For the best,” said George. “We got to get back to the car. How is the railroad business?”
“Rails are firm,” said the chef. “How’s Wall Street?”
“The bears are bulling again,” said George. “A lady bear ain’t safe today.”
“Bet on the Cubs,” said the chef. “The Giants are too big for the league.”
George laughed and the chef laughed.
“You’re a very courteous fellow,” George said. “Fancy meeting you here.”
“Run along,” said the chef. “Lackawannius is calling you.”
“I love that girl,” said George. “Who touches a hair—”
“Run along,” said the chef. “Or those yellow boys will get you.”
“It’s a pleasure, sir,” said George. “It’s a very real pleasure.”
“Run along.”
“Just one more courteous action.”
The chef wiped his lips. “God speed the parting guest,” he said.
“I’ll be in for breakfast,” George said.
“Take your unearned increment,” the chef said. George put the bottle in his pocket.
“Good-bye to a noble soul,” he said.
“Get the hell out of here,” said one of the niggers who was playing cards.
“Good-bye, gentlemen all,” George said.
“Good night, sir,” said the chef. We went out.
We went back up to our car and George looked at the number board. There was a number twelve
and a number five showing. George pulled a little thing down and the numbers disappeared.
“You better sit here and be comfortable,” he said.
I sat down in the washroom and waited and he went down the aisle. In a little while he came
back.
“They’re all happy now,” he said. “How do you like the railroad business, Jimmy?”
“How did you know my name?”
“That’s what your father calls you, ain’t it?”
“Sure.”
“Well,” he said.
“I like it fine,” I said. “Do you and the chef always talk that way?”
“No, James,” he said. “We only talk that way when we’re enthused.”
“Just when you have a drink,” I said.
“Not that alone. When we’re enthused from any cause. The chef and I are kindred spirits.”
“What are kindred spirits?”
“Gentlemen with the same outlook on life.”
I did not say anything and the bell buzzed. George went out, pulled the little thing in the box and
came back in the room.
“Did you ever see a man cut with a razor?”
“No.”
“Would you like to have it explained?”
“Yes.”
The bell buzzed again. “I’d better go see,” George went out.
He came back and sat down by me. “The use of the razor,” he said, “is an art not alone known to
the barbering profession.” He looked at me. “Don’t you make them big eyes,” he said. “I’m only
lecturing.”
“I’m not scared.”
“I should say you’re not,” said George. “You’re here with your greatest friend.”
“Sure,” I said. I figured he was pretty drunk.
“Your father got a lot of this?” He took out the bottle.
“I don’t know.”
“Your father is a type of noble Christian gentleman.” He took a drink.
I didn’t say anything.
“Returning to the razor,” George said. He reached in the inside pocket of his coat and brought
out a razor. He laid it closed on the palm of his left hand.
The palm was pink.
“Consider the razor,” George said. “It toils not, neither does it spin.”
He held it out on the palm of his hand. It had a black bone handle. He opened it up and held it in
his right hand with the blade out straight.
“You got a hair from your head?”
“How do you mean?”
“Pull one out. My own are very tenacious.”
I pulled out a hair and George reached for it. He held it in his left hand looking at it carefully
then flicked the razor and cut it in two. “Keenness of edge,” he said. Still looking at the little end of
hair that was left he turned the razor in his hand and flicked the blade back the other direction. The
blade cut the hair off close to his finger and thumb. “Simplicity of action,” George said. “Two
admirable qualities.”
The buzzer rang and he folded the razor and handed it to me.
“Guard the razor,” he said and went out. I looked at it and opened it and shut it. It was just an
ordinary razor. George came back and sat down beside me. He took a drink. There was no more in
the bottle. He looked at it and put it back in his pocket.
“The razor, please,” he said. I handed it to him. He put it on the palm of his left hand.
“You have observed,” he said, “keenness of edge and simplicity of action. Now a greater than
these two. Security of manipulation.”
He picked up the razor in his right hand, gave it a little flip and the blade came open and lay
back, edge out across his knuckles. He showed me his hand; the handle of the razor was in his fist, the
blade was open across the knuckles, held in place by his forefinger and his thumb. The blade was
solidly in place all across his fist, the edge out.
“You observe it?” George said. “Now for that great requisite skill in the use of.”
He stood up and patted out with his right hand, his fist closed, the blade open across the
knuckles. The razor blade shone in the sun coming through the window. George ducked and jabbed
three times with the blade. He stepped back and flicked it twice in the air. Then holding his head
down and his left arm around his neck he whipped his fist and the blade back and forth, back and
forth, ducking and dodging. He slashed one, two, three, four, five, six. He straightened up. His face
was sweaty and he folded the razor and put it in his pocket.
“Skill in the use of,” he said. “And in the left hand preferably a pillow.”
He sat down and wiped his face. He took off his cap and wiped the leather band inside. He went
over and took a drink of water.
“The razor’s a delusion,” he said. “The razor’s no defense. Anybody can cut you with a razor. If
you’re close enough to cut them they’re bound to cut you. If you could have a pillow in your left hand
you’d be all right. But where you going to get a pillow when you need a razor? Who you going to cut
in bed? The razor’s a delusion, Jimmy. It’s a nigger weapon. A regular nigger weapon. But now you
know how they use it. Bending a razor back over the hand is the only progress the nigger ever made.
Only nigger ever knew how to defend himself was Jack Johnson and they put him in Leavenworth.
And what would I do to Jack Johnson with a razor. It none of it makes any difference, Jimmy. All you
get in this life is a point of view. Fellows like me and the chef got a point of view. Even if he’s got a
wrong point of view he’s better off. A nigger gets delusions like old Jack or Marcus Garvey and they
put him in the pen. Look where my delusion about the razor would take me. Nothing’s got any value,
Jimmy. Liquor makes you feel like I’ll feel in an hour. You and me aren’t even friends.”
“Yes we are.”
“Good old Jimmy,” he said. “Look at the deal they gave this poor old Tiger Flowers. If he was
white he’d have made a million dollars.”
“Who was he?”
“He was a fighter. A damn good fighter.”
“What did they do to him?”
“They just took him down the road in one way or another all the time.”
“It’s a shame,” I said.
“Jimmy, there’s nothing to the whole business. You get syphed up from women or if you’re
married your wife’ll run around. In the railroad business you’re away from home nights. The kind of a
girl you want is the kind of a girl that’ll jig you because she can’t help it. You want her because she
can’t help it and you lose her because she can’t help it and a man’s only got so many orgasms to his
whole life and what difference does it make when you feel worse after liquor.”
“Don’t you feel all right?”
“No I don’t. I feel bad. If I didn’t feel bad I wouldn’t talk that way.”
“My father feels bad sometimes too in the morning.”
“He does?”
“Sure.”
“What does he do for it?”
“He exercises.”
“Well, I got twenty-four berths to make up. Maybe that’s the solution.”
It was a long day on the train after the rain started. The rain made the windows of the train wet
so you could not see outside clearly and then it made everything outside look the same anyway. We
went through many towns and cities but it was raining in all of them and when we crossed the Hudson
River at Albany it was raining hard. I stood out in the vestibule and George opened the door so I
could see out but there was only the wet iron of the bridge and the rain coming down into the river
and the train with water dripping. It smelled good outside though. It was a fall rain and the air coming
in through the open door smelled fresh and like wet wood and iron and it felt like fall up at the lake.
There were plenty of other people in the car but none of them looked very interesting. A nice looking
woman asked me to sit down next to her and I did but she turned out to have a boy of her own just my
age and was going to a place in New York to be superintendent of schools. I wished I could have
gone back with George to the kitchen of the dining car and heard him talk with the chef. But during the
regular daytime George talked just like anyone else, except even less, and very polite, but I noticed
him drinking lots of ice water.
It had stopped raining outside but there were big clouds over the mountains. We were going
along the river and the country was very beautiful and I had never seen anything like it before except
in the illustrations of a book at Mrs. Kenwood’s where we used to go for Sunday dinner up at the
lake. It was a big book and it was always on the parlor table and I would look at it while waiting for
dinner. The engravings were like this country now after the rain with the river and the mountains
going up from it and the grey stone. Sometimes there would be a train across on the other side of the
river. The leaves on the trees were turned by the fall and sometimes you saw the river through the
branches of the trees and it did not seem old and like the illustrations but instead it seemed like a
place to live in and where you could fish and eat your lunch and watch the train go by. But mostly it
was dark and unreal and sad and strange and classical like the engravings. That may have been
because it was just after a rain and the sun had not come out. When the wind blows the leaves off the
trees they are cheerful and good to walk through and the trees are the same, only they are without
leaves. But when the leaves fall from the rain they are dead and wet and flat to the ground and the
trees are changed and wet and unfriendly. It was very beautiful coming along the Hudson but it was
the son of thing I did not know about and it made me wish we were back at the lake. It gave me the
same feeling that the engravings in the book did and the feeling was confused with the room where I
always looked at the book and it being someone else’s house and before dinner and wet trees after the
rain and the time in the north when the fall is over and it is wet and cold and the birds are gone and
the woods are no more fun to walk in and it rains and you want to stay inside with a fire. I do not
suppose I thought of all those things because I have never thought much and never in words but it was
the feeling of all those things that the country along the Hudson River gave me. The rain can make all
places strange, even places where you live.
“Black Ass at the Cross Roads,” a completed short story, was written between the end of World
War II and 1961.
Black Ass at the Cross Roads
WE HAD REACHED THE CROSS ROADS before noon and had shot
a French civilian by mistake. He had run across the field on our right beyond the farmhouse when he
saw the first jeep come up. Claude had ordered him to halt and when he had kept on running across
the field Red shot him. It was the first man he had killed that day and he was very pleased.
We had all thought he was a German who had stolen civilian clothes, but he turned out to be
French. Anyway his papers were French and they said he was from Soissons.
“Sans doute c’était un Collabo,” Claude said.
“He ran, didn’t he?” Red asked. “Claude told him to halt in good French.”
“Put him in the game book as a Collabo,” I said. “Put his papers back on him.”
“What was he doing up here if he comes from Soissons?” Red asked. “Soissons’s way the hell
back.”
“He fled ahead of our troops because he was a collaborator,” Claude explained.
“He’s got a mean face.” Red looked down at him.
“You spoiled it a little,” I said. “Listen, Claude. Put the papers back and leave the money.”
“Someone else will take it.”
“You won’t take it,” I said. “There will be plenty of money coming through on Krauts.”
Then I told them where to put the two vehicles and where to set up shop and sent Onèsime across
the field to cross the two roads and get into the shuttered estaminet and find out what had gone
through on the escape-route road.
Quite a little had gone through, always on the road to the right. I knew plenty more had to come
through and I paced the distances back from the road to the two traps we had set up. We were using
Kraut weapons so the noise would not alarm them if anyone heard the noise coming up on the cross
roads. We set the traps well beyond the cross roads so that we would not louse up the cross roads and
make it look like a shambles. We wanted them to hit the cross roads fast and keep coming.
“It is a beautiful guet-apens,” Claude said and Red asked me what was that. I told him it was
only a trap as always. Red said he must remember the word. He now spoke his idea of French about
half the time and if given an order perhaps half the time he would answer in what he thought was
French. It was comic and I liked it.
It was a beautiful late summer day and there were very few more to come that summer. We lay
where we had set up and the two vehicles covered us from behind the manure pile. It was a big rich
manure pile and very solid and we lay in the grass behind the ditch and the grass smelled as all
summers smell and the two trees made a shade over each trap. Perhaps I had set up too close but you
cannot ever be too close if you have fire power and the stuff is going to come through fast. One
hundred yards is all right. Fifty yards is ideal. We were closer than that. Of course in that kind of
thing it always seems closer.
Some people would disagree with this setup. But we had to figure to get out and back and keep
the road as clean looking as possible. There was nothing much you could do about vehicles, but other
vehicles coming would normally assume they had been destroyed by aircraft. On this day, though,
there was no aircraft. But nobody coming would know there had not been aircraft through here.
Anybody making their run on an escape route sees things differently too.
“Mon Capitaine,” Red said to me. “If the point comes up they will not shoot the shit out of us
when they hear these Kraut weapons?”
“We have observation on the road where the point will come from the two vehicles. They’ll flag
them off. Don’t sweat.”
“I am not sweating,” Red said. “I have shot a proved collaborator. The only thing we have killed
today and we will kill many Krauts in this setup. Pas vrai, Onie?”
Onèsime said, “Merde” and just then we heard a car coming very fast. I saw it come down the
beech-tree bordered road. It was an overloaded grey-green camouflaged Volkswagen and it was
filled with steel-helmeted people looking as though they were racing to catch a train. There were two
aiming stones by the side of the road that I had taken from a wall by the farm, and as the Volkswagen
crossed the notch of the cross roads and came toward us on the good straight escape road that crossed
in front of us and led up a hill, I said to Red, “Kill the driver at the first stone.” To Onèsime I said,
“Traverse at body height.”
The Volkswagen driver had no control of his vehicle after Red shot. I could not see the
expression on his face because of the helmet. His hands relaxed. They did not crisp tight nor hold on
the wheel. The machine gun started firing before the driver’s hands relaxed and the car went into the
ditch spilling the occupants in slow motion. Some were on the road and the second outfit gave them a
small carefully hoarded burst. One man rolled over and another started to crawl and while I watched
Claude shot them both.
“I think I got that driver in the head,” Red said.
“Don’t be too fancy.”
“She throws a little high at this range,” Red said. “I shot for the lowest part of him I could see.”
“Bertrand,” I called over to the second outfit. “You and your people get them off the road,
please. Bring me all the Feldbuchen and you hold the money for splitting. Get them off fast. Go on
and help, Red. Get them into the ditch.”
I watched the road to the west beyond the estaminet while the cleaning up was going on. I never
watched the cleaning up unless I had to take part in it myself. Watching the cleaning up is bad for you.
It is no worse for me than for anyone else. But I was in command.
“How many did you get, Onie?”
“All eight, I think. Hit, I mean.”
“At this range—”
“It’s not very sporting. But after all it’s their machine gun.”
“We have to get set now fast again.”
“I don’t think the vehicle is shot up badly.”
“We’ll check her afterwards.”
“Listen,” Red said. I listened, then blew the whistle twice and everybody faded back, Red
hauling the last Kraut by one leg with his head shuddering and the trap was set again. But nothing
came and I was worried.
We were set up for a simple job of assassination astride an escape route. We were not astride,
technically, because we did not have enough people to set up on both sides of the road and we were
not technically prepared to cope with armored vehicles. But each trap had two German
Panzerfausten. They were much more powerful and simpler than the general-issue American
bazooka, having a bigger warhead and you could throw away the launching tube; but lately, many that
we had found in the German retreat had been booby-trapped and others had been sabotaged. We used
only those as fresh as anything in that market could be fresh and we always asked a German prisoner
to fire off samples taken at random from the lot.
German prisoners who had been taken by irregulars were often as cooperative as head waiters
or minor diplomats. In general we regarded the Germans as perverted Boy Scouts. This is another
way of saying they were splendid soldiers. We were not splendid soldiers. We were specialists in a
dirty trade. In French we said, “un métier très sale.”
We knew, from repeated questionings, that all Germans coming through on this escape route
were making for Aachen and I knew that all we killed now we would not have to fight in Aachen nor
behind the West Wall. This was simple. I was pleased when anything was that simple.
The Germans we saw coming now were on bicycles. There were four of them and they were in a
hurry too but they were very tired. They were not cyclist troops. They were just Germans on stolen
bicycles. The leading rider saw the fresh blood on the road and then he turned his head and saw the
vehicle and he put his weight hard down on his right pedal with his right boot and we opened on him
and on the others. A man shot off a bicycle is always a sad thing to see, although not as sad as a horse
shot with a man riding him nor a milk cow gut-shot when she walks into a fire fight. But there is
something about a man shot off a bicycle at close range that is too intimate. These were four men and
four bicycles. It was very intimate and you could hear the thin tragic noise the bicycles made when
they went over onto the road and the heavy sound of men falling and the clatter of equipment.
“Get them off the road quick,” I said. “And hide the four vélos.”
As I turned to watch the road one of the doors of the estaminet opened and two civilians
wearing caps and working clothes came out each carrying two bottles. They sauntered across the
cross roads and turned to come up in the field behind the ambush. They wore sweaters and old coats,
corduroy trousers and country boots.
“Keep them covered, Red,” I said. They advanced steadily and then raised the bottles high above
their heads, one bottle in each hand as they came in.
“For Christ sake, get down,” I called, and they got down and came crawling through the grass
with the bottles tucked under their arms.
“Nous sommes des copains,” one called in a deep voice, rich with alcohol.
“Advance, rum-dumb copains, and be recognized,” Claude answered.
“We are advancing.”
“What do you want out here in the rain?” Onèsime called.
“We bring the little presents.”
“Why didn’t you give the little presents when I was over there?” Claude asked.
“Ah, things have changed, camarade.”
“For the better?”
“Rudement,” the first rummy camarade said. The other, lying flat and handing us one of the
bottles, asked in a hurt tone, “On dit pas bonjour aux nouveaux camarades?”
“Bonjour,” I said. “Tu veux battre?”
“If it’s necessary. But we came to ask if we might have the vélos.”
“After the fight,” I said. “You’ve made your military service?”
“Naturally.”
“Okay. You take a German rifle each and two packs of ammo and go up the road two hundred
yards on our right and kill any Germans that get by us.”
“Can’t we stay with you?”
“We’re specialists,” Claude said. “Do what the captain says.”
“Get up there and pick out a good place and don’t shoot back this way.”
“Put on these arm bands,” Claude said. He had a pocket full of arm bands. “You’re Franctireurs.” He did not add the rest of it.
“Afterwards we can have the vélos?”
“One apiece if you don’t have to fight. Two apiece if you fight.”
“What about the money?” Claude asked. “They’re using our guns.”
“Let them keep the money.”
“They don’t deserve it.”
“Bring any money back and you’ll get your share. Allez vite. Débine-toi.”
“Ceux, sont des poivrots pourris,” Claude said.
“They had rummies in Napoleon’s time too.”
“It’s probable.”
“It’s certain,” I said. “You can take it easy on that.”
We lay in the grass and it smelled of true summer and the flies, the ordinary flies and the big blue
flies started to come to the dead that were in the ditch and there were butterflies around the edges of
the blood on the black-surfaced road. There were yellow butterflies and white butterflies around the
blood and the streaks where the bodies had been hauled.
“I didn’t know butterflies ate blood,” Red said.
“I didn’t either.”
“Of course when we hunt it’s too cold for butterflies.”
“When we hunt in Wyoming the picket pin gophers and the prairie dogs are holed up already.
That’s the fifteenth of September.”
“I’m going to watch and see if they really eat it,” Red said.
“Want to take my glasses?”
He watched and after a while he said, “I’ll be damned if I can tell. But it sure interests them.”
Then he turned to Onèsime and said, “Piss pauvre Krauts, Onie. Pas de pistol, pas de binoculaire.
Fuck-all rien.”
“Assez de sous,” Onèsime said. “We’re doing all right on the money.”
“No fucking place to spend it.”
“Some day.”
“Je veux spend maintenant,” Red said.
Claude opened one of the two bottles with the cork screw on his Boy Scout German knife. He
smelled it and handed it to me.
“C’est du gnôle.”
The other outfit had been working on their share. They were our best friends but as soon as we
were split they seemed like the others and the vehicles seemed like the rear echelon. You split too
easy, I thought. You want to watch that. That’s one more thing you can watch.
I took a drink from the bottle. It was very strong raw spirits and all it had was fire. I handed it
back to Claude who gave it to Red. Tears came into his eyes when he swallowed it.
“What do they make it out of up here, Onie?”
“Potatoes, I think, and parings from horses’ hooves they get at the blacksmith shop.”
I translated to Red. “I taste everything but the potatoes,” he said.
“They age it in rusty nail kegs with a few old nails to give it zest.”
“I better take another to take the taste out of my mouth,” Red said. “Mon Capitaine, should we
die together?”
“Bonjour, toute le monde,” I said. This was an old joke we had about an Algerian who was
about to be guillotined on the pavement outside the Santé who replied with that phrase when asked if
he had any last words to say.
“To the butterflies,” Onèsime drank.
“To the nail kegs,” Claude raised the bottle.
“Listen,” Red said and handed the bottle to me. We all heard the noise of a tracked vehicle.
“The fucking jackpot,” Red said. “Along ongfong de la patree, le fucking jackpot ou le more.”
He sang softly, the nail keg juice no good to him now. I took another good drink of the juice as we lay
and checked everything and looked up the road to our left. Then it came in sight. It was a Kraut halftrack and it was crowded to standing room only.
When you set a trap on an escape route you have four or, if you can afford them, five Teller
mines, armed, on the far side of the road. They lie like round checker counters wider than the biggest
soup plates and toad squatted in their thick deadliness. They are in a semi-circle, covered with cut
grass and connected by a heavy tarred line which may be procured at any ship chandler’s. One end of
this line is made fast to a kilometer marking, called a borne, or to a tenth of a kilometer stone, or any
other completely solid object, and the line runs loosely across the road and is coiled in the first or
second section of the trap.
The approaching overloaded vehicle was of the type where the driver looks out through slits and
its heavy machine guns now showed high in anti-aircraft position. We were all watching it closely as
it came nearer, so very overcrowded. It was full of combat S.S. and we could see the collars now and
faces were clear then clearer.
“Pull the cord,” I called to the second outfit and as the cord took up its slack and commenced to
tighten the mines moved out of their semi-circle and across the road looking, I thought, like nothing
but green grass-covered Teller mines.
Now the driver would see them and stop or he would go on and hit them. You should not attack
an armored vehicle while it was moving, but if he braked I could hit him with the big-headed German
bazooka.
The half-track came on very fast and now we could see the faces quite clearly. They were all
looking down the road where the point would come from. Claude and Onie were white and Red had a
twitch in the muscle of his cheek. I felt hollow as always. Then someone in the half-track saw the
blood and the Volkswagen in the ditch and the bodies. They were shouting in German and the driver
and the officer with him must have seen the mines across the road and they came to a tearing swerving
halt and had started to back when the bazooka hit. It hit while both outfits were firing from the two
traps. The people in the half-track had mines themselves and were hurrying to set up their own road
block to cover what had gone through because when the Kraut bazooka hit and the vehicle went up we
all dropped our heads and everything rained down as from a fountain. It rained metal and other things.
I checked on Claude and Onie and Red and they were all firing. I was firing too with a Smeizer on the
slits and my back was wet and I had stuff all over my neck, but I had seen what fountained up. I could
not understand why the vehicle had not been blown wide open or overturned. But it just blew straight
up. The fifties from the vehicle were firing and there was so much noise you could not hear. No one
showed from the half-track and I thought it was over and was going to wave the fifties off, when
someone inside threw a stick grenade that exploded just beyond the edge of the road.
“They’re killing their dead,” Claude said. “Can I go up and put a couple into her?”
“I can hit her again.”
“No. Once was enough. My whole back’s tattooed.”
“Okay. Go on.”
He crawled forward, snaking in the grass under the fire of the fifties and pulled the pin from a
grenade and let the lever snap loose and held the grenade smoking grey and then lobbed it underhand
up over the side of the half-track. It exploded with a jumping roar and you could hear the fragments
whang against the armor.
“Come on out,” Claude said in German. A German machine-gun pistol started shooting from the
right-hand slit. Red hit the slit twice. The pistol fired again. It was obvious it was not being aimed.
“Come on out,” Claude called. The pistol shot again, making a noise like children rattling a stick
along a picket fence. I shot back making the same silly noise.
“Come on back, Claude,” I said. “You fire on one slit. Red. Onie, you fire on the other.”
When Claude came back fast I said, “Fuck that Kraut. We’ll use up another one. We can get
more. The point will be up anyway.”
“This is their rear guard,” Onie said. “This vehicle.”
“Go ahead and shoot it,” I said to Claude. He shot it and there was no front compartment and
then they went in after what would be left of the money and the paybooks. I had a drink and waved to
the vehicles. The men on the fifties were shaking their hands over their heads like fighters. Then I sat
with my back against the tree to think and to look down the road.
They brought what paybooks there were and I put them in a canvas bag with the others. Not one
of them was dry. There was a great deal of money, also wet, and Onie and Claude and the other outfit
cut off a lot of S.S. patches and they had what pistols were serviceable and some that weren’t and put
it all in the canvas sack with the red stripes around it.
I never touched the money. That was their business and I thought it was bad luck to touch it
anyway. But there was plenty of prize money. Bertrand gave me an Iron Cross, first class, and I put it
in the pocket of my shirt. We kept some for a while and then we gave them all away. I never liked to
keep anything. It’s bad luck in the end. I had stuff for a while that I wished I could have sent back
afterwards or to their families.
The outfit looked as though they had been showered by chunks and particles from an explosion in
an abattoir and the other people did not look too clean when they came out from the body of the halftrack. I did not know how badly I must have looked myself until I noticed how many flies there were
around my back and neck and shoulders.
The half-track lay across the road and any vehicle passing would have to slow down. Everyone
was rich now and we had lost no one and the place was ruined. We would have to fight on another
day and I was sure this was the rear guard and all we would get now would be strays and
unfortunates.
“Disarm the mines and pick up everything and we will go back to the farmhouse and clean up.
We can interdict the road from there like in the book.”
They came in heavily loaded and everyone was very cheerful. We left the vehicles where they
were and washed up at the pump in the farmyard and Red put iodine on the metal cuts and scratches
and sifted Sulfa on Onie and Claude and me and then Claude took care of Red.
“Haven’t they got anything to drink in that farmhouse?” I asked René.
“I don’t know. We’ve been too busy.”
“Get in and see.”
He found some bottles of red wine that was drinkable and I sat around and checked the weapons
and made jokes. We had very severe discipline but no formality except when we were back at
Division or when we wanted to show off.
“Encore un coup manqué,” I said. That was a very old joke and it was a phrase that a crook we
had with us for a while always uttered when I would let something worthless go by to wait for
something good.
“It’s terrible,” said Claude.
“It’s intolerable,” said Michel.
“Me, I can go no further,” Onèsime said.
“Moi, je suis la France,” Red said.
“You fight?” Claude asked him.
“Pas moi.” Red answered. “I command.”
“You fight?” Claude asked me.
“Jamais.”
“Why is your shirt covered with blood?”
“I was attending the birth of a calf.”
“Are you a midwife or a veterinary?”
‘I give only the name, rank and serial number.”
We drank some more wine and watched the road and waited for the point to come up.
“Où est la fucking point?” Red asked.
“I am not in their confidence.”
“I’m glad it didn’t come up while we had the little accrochage,” Onie said. “Tell me, mon
Capitaine, how did you feel when you let the thing go?”
“Very hollow.”
“What did you think about?”
“I hoped to Christ it would not trickle out.”
“We were certainly lucky they were loaded with stuff.”
“Or that they didn’t back up and deploy.”
“Don’t ruin my afternoon,” Marcel said.
“Two Krauts on bicycles,” Red said. “Approaching from the west.”
“Plucky chaps,” I said.
“Encore un coup manqué,” said Onie.
“Anybody want them?”
Nobody wanted them. They were pedaling steadily, slumped forward and their boots were too
big for the pedals.
“I’ll try one with the M-1,” I said. Auguste handed it to me and I waited until the first German on
the bicycle was past the half-track and clear of the trees and then had the sight on him, swung with him
and missed.
“Pas bon,” said Red and I tried it again swinging further ahead. The German fell in the same
disconcerting heartbreaking way and lay in the road with the vélo upside down and a wheel still
spinning. The other cyclist sprinted on and soon the copains were firing. We heard the hard ta-bung
of their shots which had no effect on the cyclist who kept on pedaling until he was out of sight.
“Copains no bloody bon,” Red said.
Then we saw the copains falling back to retire onto the main body. The French of the outfit were
ashamed and sore.
“On peut les fusiller?” Claude asked.
“No. We don’t shoot rummies.”
“Encore un coup manqué,” said Onie and everybody felt better but not too good.
The first copain who had a bottle in his shirt which showed when he stopped and presented arms
said, “Mon Capitaine, on a fait un véritable massacre.”
“Shut up,” said Onie. “And hand me your pieces.”
“But we were the right flank,” the copain said in his rich voice.
“You’re shit,” Claude said. “You venerable alcoholic. Shut up and fuck off.”
“Mais on a battu.”
“Fought, shit,” Marcel said. “Foute moi le camp.”
“On peut fusiller les copains?” Red asked. He had remembered it like a parrot.
“You shut up too,” I said. “Claude, I promised them two vélos.”
“It’s true,” Claude said.
“You and I will go down and give them the worst two and remove the Kraut and the vélo. You
others keep the road cut.”
“It was not like this in the old days,” one of the copains said.
“Nothing’s ever going to be like it was in the old days. You were probably drunk in the old days
anyway.”
We went first to the German in the road. He was not dead but was shot through both lungs. We
took him as gently as we could and laid him down as comfortable as we could and I took off his tunic
and shirt and we sifted the wounds with Sulfa and Claude put a field dressing on him. He had a nice
face and he did not look more than seventeen. He tried to talk but he couldn’t. He was trying to take it
the way he’d always heard you should.
Claude got a couple of tunics from the dead and made a pillow for him. Then he stroked his head
and held his hand and felt his pulse. The boy was watching him all the time but he could not talk. The
boy never looked away from him and Claude bent over and kissed him on the forehead.
“Carry that bicycle off the road,” I said to the copains.
“Cette putain guerre,” Claude said. “This dirty whore of a war.”
The boy did not know that it was me who had done it to him and so he had no special fear of me
and I felt his pulse too and I knew why Claude had done what he had done. I should have kissed him
myself if I was any good. It was just one of those things that you omit to do and that stay with you.
“I’d like to stay with him for a little while,” Claude said.
“Thank you very much,” I said. I went over to where we had the four bicycles behind the trees
and the copains were standing there like crows.
“Take this one and that one and foute moi le camp.” I took off their brassards and put them in my
pocket.
“But we fought. That’s worth two.”
“Fuck off,” I said. “Did you hear me? Fuck off.”
They went away disappointed.
A boy about fourteen came out from the estaminet and asked for the new bicycle.
“They took mine early this morning.”
“All right. Take it.”
“What about the other two?”
“Run along and keep off the road until the column gets up here.”
“But you are the column.”
“No,” I said. “Unfortunately we are not the column.”
The boy mounted the bicycle which was undamaged and rode down to the estaminet. I walked
back under the hot summer sky to the farmyard to wait for the point. I didn’t know how I could feel
any worse. But you can all right. I can promise you that.
“Will we go into the big town tonight?” Red asked me.
“Sure. They’re taking it now, coming in from the west. Can’t you hear it?”
“Sure. You could hear it since noon. Is it a good town?”
“You’ll see it as soon as the column gets up and we fit in and go down that road past the
estaminet.” I showed him on the map. “You can see it in about a mile. See the curve before you drop
down?”
“Are we going to fight any more?”
“Not today.”
“You got another shirt?”
“It’s worse than this.”
“It can’t be worse than this one. I’ll wash this one out. If you have to put it on wet it won’t hurt
on a hot day like this. You feeling bad?”
“Yeah. Very.”
“What’s holding Claude up?”
“He’s staying with the kid I shot until he dies.”
“Was it a kid?”
“Yeah.”
“Oh shit,” Red said.
After a while Claude came back wheeling the two vélos. He handed me the boy’s Feldbuch.
“Let me wash your shirt good too, Claude. I got Onie’s and mine washed and they’re nearly dry.”
“Thanks very much. Red,” Claude said. “Is there any of the wine left?”
“We found some more and some sausage.”
“Good,” Claude said. He had the black ass bad too.
“We’re going in the big town after the column overruns us. You can see it only a little more than
a mile from here,” Red told him.
“I’ve seen it before,” Claude said. “It’s a good town.”
“We aren’t going to fight any more today.”
“We’ll fight tomorrow.”
“Maybe we won’t have to.”
“Maybe.”
“Cheer up.”
“Shut up. I’m cheered up.”
“Good,” Red said. “Take this bottle and the sausage and I’ll wash the shirt in no time.”
“Thank you very much,” Claude said. We were splitting it even between us and neither of us
liked our share.
“Landscape with Figures,” a story of the Spanish Civil War, was written around 1938, and was
one of the short stories Hemingway suggested be included in a new collection he proposed in a
letter to editor Maxwell Perkins on February 7, 1939.
Landscape with Figures
IT WAS VERY STRANGE IN THAT HOUSE . The elevator, of
course, no longer ran. The steel column it slid up and down on was bent and there were several
marble stairs in the six flights which were broken so that you had to walk carefully on the edges as
you climbed so that you would not fall through. There were doors which opened onto rooms where
there were no longer any rooms and you could swing a perfectly sound-looking door open and step
across the door sill into space: that floor and the next three floors below having been blasted out of
the front of the apartment house by direct hits by high explosive shells. Yet the two top floors had four
rooms on the front of the house which were intact and there was still running water in the back rooms
on all of the floors. We called this house the Old Homestead.
The front line had, at the very worst moment, been directly below this apartment house along the
upper edge of the little plateau that the boulevard circled and the trench and the weather-rotted
sandbags were still there. They were so close you could throw a broken tile or a piece of mortar from
the smashed apartment house down into them as you stood on one of the balconies. But now the line
had been pushed down from the lip of the plateau, across the river and up into the pine-studded slope
of the hill that rose behind the old royal hunting lodge that was called the Caso del Campo. It was
there that the fighting was going on, now, and we used the Old Homestead both as an observation post
and as an advantage point to film from.
In those days it was very dangerous and always cold and we were always hungry and we joked a
great deal.
Each time a shell bursts in a building it makes a great cloud of brick and plaster dust and when
this settles it coats the surface of a mirror so that it is as powdered as the windows which have been
calcimined over in a new building. There was a tall unbroken mirror in one of the rooms of that house
giving off the stairs as you climbed and on its dusty surface I printed, with my finger, in large letters
DEATH TO JOHNNY and we then sent Johnny, the camera-man, into that room on some pretext.
When he opened the door, during a shelling, and saw that ghostly announcement staring at him from
the glass he went into a white, deadly, Dutch rage and it was quite a time before we were friends
again.
Then the next day when we were loading the equipment into a car in front of the hotel I got into
the car and cranked up the glass of the side window as it was bitterly cold. As the glass rose I saw,
printed on it with large red letters in what must have been a borrowed lipstick, ED IS A LICE. We
used the car for several days with that mysterious, to the Spaniards, slogan. They must have taken it
for the initials or slogan of some Holland-American revolutionary organization perhaps resembling
the F.A.I. or the C.N.T.
Then there was the day when the great British authority on let us forget just what came to town.
He had a huge, German-type steel helmet which he wore on all expeditions in the direction of the
front. This was an item of clothing which none of the rest of us affected. It was the general theory that
since there were not many steel helmets these should be reserved for the shock troops and his wearing
of this helmet formed in us an instant prejudice against the Great Authority.
We had met in the room of an American woman journalist who had a splendid electric heater.
The Authority took an instant fancy to this very pleasant room and named it the Club. His proposal
was that everyone should bring their own liquor there and be able to enjoy it in the warmth and
pleasant atmosphere. As the American girl was exceedingly hardworking and had been trying,
perhaps not too successfully, to keep her room from becoming in any sense the Club, this definite
baptism and classification came as rather a blow to her.
We were working there in the Old Homestead the next day, shielding the camera lens as
carefully as possible against the glare of the afternoon sun with a screen of broken matting, when the
Authority arrived accompanied by the American girl. He had heard us discussing the location at the
Club and had come to pay a visit. I was using a pair of field glasses, eight power, small Zeisses that
you could cover with your two hands so that they gave no reflection, and was observing from the
shadow in the angle of the broken balcony. The attack was about to start and we were waiting for the
planes to come over and commence the bombardment which substituted for adequate artillery
preparation due to the Government’s then shortage of heavy artillery.
We had worked in the house, concealing ourselves as carefully as rats do because the success of
our work and the possibility of continued observation depended altogether on not drawing any fire on
the seemingly deserted building. Now into the room came the Great Authority, and drawing up one of
the empty chairs, seated himself in the exact center of the open balcony, steel helmet, over-sized
binoculars and all. The camera was at an angle on one side of the balcony window as carefully
camouflaged as a machine gun. I was in the angle of shadow on the other, invisible to anyone on the
hillside, and always careful never to move across the sunny open space. The Authority was seated in
plain sight in the middle of the sunny patch looking, in his steel hat, like the head of all the general
staffs in the world, his glasses blinking in the sun like a helio.
“Look,” I said to him. “We have to work here. From where you’re sitting your glasses make a
blink that everybody on that hill can see.”
“Ay dount think theys aneh dainjah een a house,” the Authority said with calm and condescending
dignity.
“If you ever hunted mountain sheep,” I said, “you know they can see you as far as you can see
them. Do you see how clearly you see the men with your glasses? They have glasses too.”
“Ay dount think theys aneh dainjah een a house,” the Authority repeated. “Wheah are the tanks?”
“There,” I said. “Under the trees.”
The two cameramen were making grimaces and shaking their clenched fists over their heads in
fury.
“I go to take the big camera into the back,” Johnny said.
“Keep well back, daughter,” I said to the American girl. Then, to the Authority, “They take you
for somebody’s staff, you know. They see that tin hat and those glasses and they think we’re running
the battle. You’re asking for it, you know.”
He repeated his refrain.
It was at that minute that the first one hit us. It came with a noise like a bursted steam pipe
combined with a ripping of canvas and with the burst and the roar and rattle of broken plaster and the
dust smoke over us I had the girl out of the room and into the back of the apartment. As I dove through
the door something with a steel hat on passed me going for the stairs. You may think a rabbit moves
fast when it first jumps and starts zig-zagging away, but the Authority moved through that smoke-filled
hall, down those tricky stairs, out the door, and down the street faster than any rabbit. One of the
cameramen said he had no speed on the lens of his Leica which would stop him in motion. This of
course is inaccurate but it gives the effect.
Anyway they shelled the house fast for about a minute. They came on such a flat trajectory you
hardly had time to hold a breath between the rush and the jolt and roar of the burst. Then after the last
one we waited a couple of minutes to see if it had stopped, had a drink of water from the tap in the
kitchen sink, and found a new room to set up the camera. The attack was just starting.
The American girl was very bitter against the Authority. “ He brought me here,” she said. “He
said it was quite safe. And he went away and did not even say good-bye.”
“He cahnt be a gentleman,” I said. “Look, daughter. Watch. Now. There it goes.”
Below us some men stood up, half crouching, and ran forward toward a stone house in a patch of
trees. The house was disappearing in the sudden fountainings of dust clouds from the shells that were
registering on it. The wind blew the dust clear after each shell so that the house kept showing plainly
through the dust as a ship comes out of a fog and ahead of the men a tank lurched fast like a roundtopped, gun-snouted beetle and went out of sight in the trees. As you watched, the men who were
running forward threw themselves flat. Then another tank went forward on the left and into the trees
and you could see the flash of its firing and in the smoke that blew from the house one of the men who
was on the gorund stood up and ran wildly back toward the trench that they had left when they
attacked. Another got up and ran back, holding his rifle in one hand, his other hand on his head. Then
they were running back from all along the line. Some fell as they ran. Others lay on the ground without
ever having got up. They were scattered all over the hillside.
“What’s happened?” the girl asked.
“The attack has failed,” I said.
“Why?”
“It wasn’t pushed home.”
“Why? Wasn’t it just as dangerous for them to run back as to go forward?”
“Not quite.”
The girl held the field glasses to her eyes. Then she put them down.
“I can’t see any more,” she said. The tears were running down her cheeks and her face was
working. I had never seen her cry before and we had seen many things you could cry about if you
were going to cry. In a war everybody of all ranks including generals cries at some time or another.
This is true, no matter what people tell you, but it is to be avoided, and is avoided, and I had not seen
this girl doing it before.
“And that’s an attack?”
“That’s an attack,” I said. “Now you’ve seen one.”
“And what will happen?”
“They may send them again if there’s enough people left to lead them. I doubt if they will. You
can count the losses out there if you like.”
“Are those men all dead?”
“No. Some are too badly wounded to move. They will bring them in in the dark.”
“What will the tanks do now?”
“They’ll go home if they’re lucky.”
But one of them was already unlucky. In the pine woods a black dirty column of smoke began to
rise and was then blown sideways by the wind. Soon it was a rolling black cloud and in the greasy
black smoke you could see the red flames. There was an explosion and a billowing of white smoke
and then the black smoke rolled higher; but from a wider base.
“That’s a tank,” I said. “Burning.”
We stood and watched. Through the glasses you could see two men get out of an angle of the
trench and start up a slant of the hill carrying a stretcher. They seemed to move slowly and
ploddingly. As you watched the man in front sank onto his knees and then sat down. The man behind
had dropped to the ground. He crawled forward. Then with his arm under the first man’s shoulder he
started to crawl, dragging him toward the trench. Then he stopped moving and you saw that he was
lying flat on his face. They both lay there not moving now.
They had stopped shelling the house and it was quiet now. The big farmhouse and walled court
showed clear and yellow against the green hillside that was scarred white with the dirt where the
strong points had been fortified and the communication trenches dug. There was smoke from small
fires rising now over the hillside where men were cooking. And up the slope toward the big
farmhouse lay the casualties of the attack like many scattered bundles on the green slope. The tank
was burning black and greasy in the trees.
“It’s horrible,” the girl said. “It’s the first time I’ve ever seen it. It’s really horrible.”
“It always has been.”
“Don’t you hate it?”
“I hate it and I always have hated it. But when you have to do it you ought to know how. That
was a frontal attack. They are just murder.”
“Are there other ways to attack?”
“Oh sure. Lots of them. But you have to have knowledge and discipline and trained squad and
section leaders. And most of all you ought to have surprise.”
“It makes now too dark to work,” Johnny said putting the cap over his telephoto lens. “Hello you
old lice. Now we go home to the hotel. Today we work pretty good.”
“Yes,” said the other one. “Today we have got something very good. It is too dom bad the attack
is no good. Is better not to think about it. Sometime we film a successful attack. Only always with a
successful attack it rains or snows.”
“I don’t want to see any more ever,” the girl said. “I’ve seen it now. Nothing would ever make
me see it for curiosity or to make money writing about it. Those are men as we are. Look at them there
on that hillside.”
“You are not men,” said Johnny. “You are a womans. Don’t make a confusion.”
“Comes now the steel hat man,” said the other looking out of the window. “Comes now with
much dignity. I wish I had bomb to throw to make suddenly a surprise.”
We were packing up the cameras and equipment when the steel-hatted Authority came in.
“Hullo,” he said. “Did you make some good pictures? I have a car in one of the back streets to
take you home, Elizabeth.”
“I’m going home with Edwin Henry,” the girl said.
“Did the wind die down?” I asked him conversationally.
He let that go by and said to the girl, “You won’t come?”
“No,” she said. “We are all going home together.”
“I’ll see you at the Club tonight,” he said to me very pleasantly.
“You don’t belong to the Club any more,” I told him, speaking as nearly English as I could.
We all started down the stairs together, being very careful about the holes in the marble, and
walking over and around the new damage. It seemed a very long stairway. I picked up a brass nosecap flattened and plaster marked at the end and handed it to the girl called Elizabeth.
“I don’t want it,” she said and at the doorway we all stopped and let the steel-hatted man go on
ahead alone. He walked with great dignity across the part of the street where you were sometimes
fired on and continued on, with dignity, in the shelter of the wall opposite. Then, one at a time, we
sprinted across to the lee of the wall. It is the third or fourth man to cross an open space who draws
the fire, you learn after you have been around a while, and we were always pleased to be across that
particular place.
So we walked up the street now, protected by the wall, four abreast, carrying the cameras and
stepping over the new iron fragments, the freshly broken bricks, and the blocks of stone, and watching
the dignity of the walk of the steel-hatted man ahead who no longer belonged to the Club.
“I hate to write a dispatch,” I said. “It’s not going to be an easy one to write. This offensive is
gone.”
“What’s the matter with you, boy?” asked Johnny.
“You must write what can be said,” the other one said gently. “Certainly something can be said
about a day so full of events.”
“When will they get the wounded back?” the girl asked. She wore no hat and walked with a long
loose stride and her hair, which was a dusty yellow in the fading light, hung over the collar of her
short, fur-collared jacket. It swung as she turned her head. Her face was white and she looked ill.
“I told you as soon as it gets dark.”
“God make it get dark quick,” she said. “So that’s war. That’s what I’ve come here to see and
write about. Were those two men killed who went out with the stretcher?”
“Yes,” I said. “Positively.”
“They moved so slowly,” the girl said pitifully.
“Sometime’s it’s very hard to make the legs move,” I said. “It’s like walking in deep sand or in a
dream.”
Ahead of us the man in the steel hat was still walking up the street. There was a line of shattered
houses on his left and the brick wall of the barracks on his right. His car was parked at the end of the
street where ours was also standing in the lee of a house.
“Let’s take him back to the Club,” the girl said. “I don’t want anyone to be hurt tonight. Not their
feelings nor anything. Heh!” she called. “Wait for us. We’re coming.”
He stopped and looked back, the great heavy helmet looking ridiculous as he turned his head,
like the huge horns on some harmless beast. He waited and we came up.
“Can I help you with any of that?” he asked.
“No. The car’s just there ahead.”
“We’re all going to the Club,” the girl said. She smiled at him. “Would you come and bring a
bottle of something?”
“That would be so nice,” he said. “What should I bring?”
“Anything,” the girl said. “Bring anything you like. I have to do some work first. Make it seven
thirtyish.”
“Will you ride home with me?” he asked her. “I’m afraid the other car is crowded with all that
bit.”
“Yes,” she said. “I’d like to. Thank you.”
They got in one car and we loaded all the stuff into the other.
“What’s the matter, boy?” Johnny said. “Your girl go home with somebody else?”
“The attack upset her. She feels very badly.”
“A woman who doesn’t upset by an attack is no woman,” said Johnny.
“It was a very unsuccessful attack,” said the other. “Fortunately she did not see it from too close.
We must never let her see one from close regardless of the danger. It is too strong a thing. From
where she saw it is only a picture. Like old-fashioned battle scene.”
“She has a kind heart,” said Johnny. “Different than you, you old lice.”
“I have a kind heart,” I said. “And it’s louse. Not lice. Lice is the plural.”
“I like lice better,” said Johnny. “It sounds more determined.”
But he put up his hand and rubbed out the words written in lipstick on the window.
“We make a new joke tomorrow,” he said. “It’s all right now about the writing on the mirror.”
“Good,” I said. “I’m glad.”
“You old lice,” said Johnny and slapped me on the back.
“Louse is the word.”
“No. Lice. I like much better. Is many times more determined.”
“Go to hell.”
“Good,” said Johnny, smiling happily. “Now we are all good friends again. In a war we must all
be careful not to hurt each other’s feelings.”
“I Guess Everything Reminds You of Something” is a completed short story set in Cuba, where
Hemingway made his home at the Finca Vigía from 1939 to 1959.
I Guess Everything Reminds
You of Something
“IT’S A VERY GOOD STORY ,” THE BOY’S father said. “Do you
know how good it is?”
“I didn’t want her to send it to you, Papa.”
“What else have you written?”
“That’s the only story. Truly I didn’t want her to send it to you. But when it won the prize—”
“She wants me to help you. But if you can write that well you don’t need anyone to help you. All
you need is to write. How long did it take you to write that story?”
“Not very long.”
“Where did you learn about that type of gull?”
“In the Bahamas I guess.”
“You never went to the Dog Rocks nor to Elbow Key. There weren’t any gulls nor terns nested
at Cat Key nor Bimini. At Key West you would only have seen least terns nesting.”
“Killem Peters. Sure. They nest on the coral rocks.”
“Right on the flats,” his father said. “Where would you have known gulls like the one in the
story?”
“Maybe you told me about them, Papa.”
“It’s a very fine story. It reminds me of a story I read a long time ago.”
“I guess everything reminds you of something,” the boy said.
That summer the boy read books that his father found for him in the library and when he would
come over to the main house for lunch, if he had not been playing baseball or had not been down at
the club shooting, he would often say he had been writing.
“Show it to me when you want to or ask me about any trouble,” his father said. “Write about
something that you know.”
“I am,” the boy said.
“I don’t want to look over your shoulder or breathe down your neck,” his father said. “If you
want, though, I can set you some simple problems about things we both know. It would be good
training.”
“I think I’m going all right.”
“Don’t show it to me until you want to then. How did you like ‘Far Away and Long Ago’?”
“I liked it very much.”
“The sort of problems I meant were: we could go into the market together or to the cockfight and
then each of us write down what we saw. What it really was that you saw that stayed with you. Things
like the handler opening the rooster’s bill and blowing in his throat when the referee would let them
pick up and handle them before pitting again. The small things. To see what we each saw.”
The boy nodded and then looked down at his plate.
“Or we can go into the café and shake a few rounds of poker dice and you write what it was in
the conversation that you heard. Not try to write everything. Only what you heard that meant anything.”
“I’m afraid that I’m not ready for that yet, Papa. I think I’d better go on the way I did in the
story.”
“Do that then. I don’t want to interfere or influence you. Those were just exercises. I’d have been
glad to do them with you. They’re like five-finger exercises. Those weren’t especially good. We can
make better ones.”
“Probably it’s better for me to go on the way it was in the story.”
“Sure,” his father said.
I could not write that well when I was his age, his father thought. I never knew anyone else that
could either. But I never knew anyone else that could shoot better at ten than this boy could; not just
show-off shooting, but shooting in competition with grown men and professionals. He shot the same
way in the field when he was twelve. He shot as though he had built-in radar. He never took a shot out
of range nor let a driven bird come too close and he shot with beautiful style and an absolute timing
and precision on high pheasants and in pass shooting at ducks.
At live pigeons, in competition, when he walked out on the cement, spun the wheel and walked
to the metal plaque that marked the black stripe of his yardage, the pros were silent and watching. He
was the only shooter that the crowd became dead silent for. Some of the pros smiled as though at a
secret when he put his gun to his shoulder and looked back to see where the heel of the stock rested
against his shoulder. Then his cheek went down against the comb, his left hand was far forward, his
weight was forward on his left foot. The muzzle of the gun rose and lowered, then swept to left, to
right, and back to center. The heel of his right foot lifted gently as all of him leaned behind the two
loads in the chambers.
“Ready,” he said in that low, hoarse voice that did not belong to a small boy.
“Ready,” answered the trapper.
“Pull,” said the hoarse voice and from whichever of the five traps the grey racing pigeon came
out, and at whatever angle his wings drove him in full, low flight above the green grass toward the
white, low fence, the load of the first barrel swung into him and the load from the second barrel drove
through the first. As the bird collapsed in flight, his head falling forward, only the great shots saw the
impact of the second load driving through onto the bird already dead in the air.
The boy would break his gun and walk back in off the cement toward the pavilion, no expression
on his face, his eyes down, never giving any recognition to applause and saying, “Thanks,” in the
strange hoarse voice if some pro said, “Good bird, Stevie.”
He would put his gun in the rack and wait to watch his father shoot and then the two of them
would walk off together to the outdoor bar.
“Can I drink a Coca-Cola, Papa?”
“Better not drink more than half a one.”
“All right. I’m sorry I was so slow. I shouldn’t have let the bird get hard.”
“He was a strong, low driver, Stevie.”
“Nobody’d ever have known it if I hadn’t been slow.”
“You’re doing all right.”
“I’ll get my speed back. Don’t worry, Papa. Just this little bit of Coke won’t slow me.”
His next bird died in the air as the spring arm of the sunken trap swung him up from the opening
in the hidden trench into driving flight. Everyone could see the second barrel hit him in the air before
he hit the ground. He had not gone a yard from the trap.
As the boy came in one of the local shooters said. “Well, you got an easy one, Stevie.”
The boy nodded and put up his gun. He looked at the scoreboard. There were four other shooters
before his father. He went to find him.
“You’ve got your speed back,” his father said.
“I heard the trap,” the boy said. “I don’t want to throw you off, Papa. You can hear all of them I
know. But now the number two trap is about twice as loud as any of the others. They ought to grease
it. Nobody’s noticed it I don’t think.”
“I always swing on the noise of the trap.”
“Sure. But if it’s extra loud it’s to your left. Left is loud.”
His father did not draw a bird from the number two trap for the next three rounds. When he did
he did not hear the trap and killed the bird with his second barrel far out so that it just hit the fence to
fall inside.
“Geez, Papa, I’m sorry,” the boy said. “They greased it. I should have kept my damned mouth
shut.”
It was the night after the last big international shoot that they had ever shot in together that they
had been talking and the boy had said, “I don’t understand how anyone ever misses a pigeon.”
“Don’t ever say that to anybody else,” his father said.
“No. I mean it really. There’s no reason ever to miss one. The one I lost on I hit twice but it fell
dead outside.”
“That’s how you lose.”
“I understand that. That’s how I lost. But I don’t see how any real shooter can miss one.”
“Maybe you will in twenty years,” his father said.
“I didn’t mean to be rude, Papa.”
“That’s all right,” his father said. “Only don’t say it to other people.”
He was thinking of that when he wondered about the story and about the boy’s writing. With all
his unbelievable talent the boy had not become the shooter he was on live birds by himself nor
without being taught and disciplined. He had forgotten now all about the training. He had forgotten
how when he started to miss live birds his father would take his shirt off him and show him the bruise
on his arm where he had placed the gun incorrectly. He had cured him of that by having him always
look back at his shoulder to be sure he had mounted the gun before he called for a bird.
He had forgotten the discipline of weight on your forward foot, keep your head down and swing.
How do you know your weight is on your forward foot? By raising your right heel. Head down, swing
and speed. Now it doesn’t matter what your score is. I want you to take them as soon as they leave the
trap. Never look at any part of the bird but the bill. Swing with their bills. If you can’t see the bill
swing where it would be. What I want from you now is speed.
The boy was a wonderful natural shot but he had worked with him to make him a perfect shot
and each year when he would take him and start on his speed he would start killing a six or eight out
of ten. Then move to nine out of ten; hang there, and then move up to a twenty out of twenty only to be
beaten by the luck that separated perfect shooters in the end.
He never showed his father the second story. It was not finished to his satisfaction at the end of
vacation. He said he wanted to get it absolutely right before he showed it. As soon as he got it right he
was going to send it to his father. He had had a very good vacation, he said, one of the best and he
was glad he had such good reading too and he thanked his father for not pushing him too hard on the
writing because after all a vacation is a vacation and this had been a fine one, maybe one of the very
best, and they certainly had had some wonderful times they certainly had.
It was seven years later that his father read the prize-winning story again. It was in a book that he
found in checking through some books in the boy’s old room. As soon as he saw it he knew where the
story had come from. He remembered the long-ago feeling of familiarity. He turned through the pages
and there it was, unchanged and with the same title, in a book of very good short stories by an Irish
writer. The boy had copied it exactly from the book and used the original title.
In the last five of the seven years between the summer of the prize-winning story and the day his
father ran onto the book the boy had done everything hateful and stupid that he could, his father
thought. But it was because he was sick his father had told himself. His vileness came on from a
sickness. He was all right until then. But that had all started a year or more after that last summer.
Now he knew that boy had never been any good. He had thought so often looking back on things.
And it was sad to know that shooting did not mean a thing.
“Great News from the Mainland” is another
completed short story set in Cuba.
Great News from the
Mainland
FOR THREE DAYS IT BLEW OUT OF THE south bending the fronds
of the royal palms until they were parted in a line forward and away from the grey trunks that bent
with the heavy wind. As the wind increased the dark green stems of the fronds blew wildly as the
wind killed them. The branches of the mango trees shook and snapped in the wind and its heat burned
the mango flowers until they were brown and dusty and their stems dried. The grass dried and there
was no more moisture in the soil and it was dust in the wind.
The wind blew day and night for five days and when it stopped half the palm fronds hung dead
against the trunks, the green mangos lay on the ground and on the trees and the blossoms were dead
and the stems dry. The mango crop was gone along with all the other things that went that year.
The call he had put in on the telephone came through from the mainland and the man said, “Yes,
Dr. Simpson,” and then heard the cracker voice say, “Mr. Wheeler? Well sir that boy of yours
certainly surprised us all today. He really did. We were giving him the usual sodium pentothal before
the shock treatment and I’ve always noticed that boy has an unusual resistance to sodium pentothal.
Never took drugs did he?”
“Not as far as I know.”
“No? Well naturally one never knows. But he certainly put on a performance today. Threw five
of us around just as though we were children. Five grown men I tell you. Had to postpone the
treatment. Of course he has a morbid fear of electric shock that’s completely unjustified and that’s
why I use the sodium pentothal but there was no question of administering it today. Now I regard it as
an excellent sign. He hasn’t revolted against anything Mr. Wheeler. This is the most favorable sign
I’ve seen. That boy’s really making progress Mr. Wheeler. I was proud of him. Why I said to him,
‘Stephen I didn’t know you had it in you.’ You can be proud and satisfied at the way he’s getting
along. He wrote me one of the most interesting and significant letters right after the incident. I’m
sending it over to you. You didn’t get the other letters? That’s right. That’s right there was a little
delay in getting them off. My secretary has been literally swamped, you know how it is Mr. Wheeler
and I’m a busy man. Well he used the vilest language of course when he was resisting the treatment
but he apologized to me in the most gentlemanly way. You should see that boy now Mr. Wheeler.
He’s taking care of his appearance now. He’s just the typical fashion plate of a young college
gentleman.”
“What about the treatment?”
“Oh he’ll get the treatment. I’ll just have to double up on the quantity of the sodium pentothal
first. His resistance to that is simply amazing. You understand these are extra treatments that he
requested himself of course. There might be something masochistic in that. He even suggested that
himself in his letter. But I don’t think so. I think that boy’s beginning to get a grasp of reality. I’m
sending you the letter. You can be very encouraged about that boy Mr. Wheeler.”
“How’s the weather over there?”
“What’s that? Oh the weather. Well it’s just a bit off from what I’d describe as typical for this
time of year. No it’s not entirely typical. There has been some unreasonable weather to be frank. You
call up anytime Mr. Wheeler. I wouldn’t be upset or worried about the progress that boy’s making for
a moment. I’ll send you his letter. You could almost describe it as a brilliant letter. Yes Mr. Wheeler.
No Mr. Wheeler I’d say everything’s going finely Mr. Wheeler. There’s nothing to worry about.
You’d like to talk to him? I’ll see that your call goes through at the hospital. Tomorrow is better
perhaps. He’s naturally a little exhausted after the treatment. Tomorrow would be better. You say he
didn’t have the treatment? That’s quite correct Mr. Wheeler. I had no idea that boy was capable of
anything like that strength. That’s correct. The treatment is for tomorrow. I’ll just increase the sodium
pentothal. These additional treatments he requested himself, remember. Give him a call day after
tomorrow. That’s a free day for him and he will have had a rest. That’s right Mr. Wheeler that’s right.
You have no cause for anxiety. I would say his progress could not be more satisfactory. Today’s
Tuesday. You call him on Thursday. Any time Thursday.”
The wind was back in the south on Thursday. There was not much it could do now to trees
except blow the dead brown palm branches and bum the few mango blossoms whose stems had not
died. But it yellowed the leaves of the alamo trees and blew dust and stripped leaves over the
swimming pool. It blew dust through the screens into the house and sifted it into the books and over
the pictures. The milk cows lay with their rumps against the wind and the cuds they chewed were
gritty. The winds always come in Lent, Mr. Wheeler remembered. That was the local name for them.
All bad winds had local names and bad writers always became literary about them. He had resisted
this as he had resisted writing that the palm branches blew forward making a line against the trunk as
the hair of young women parts and blows forward when they stand with their backs to a storm. He had
resisted writing of the scent of the mango blooms when they had walked together on the night before
the wind started and the noise of the bees in them outside his window. There were no bees now and
he refused to use the foreign word for this wind. There had been too much bad literature made about
the foreign names for winds and he knew too many of those names. Mr. Wheeler was writing in
longhand because he did not wish to uncover the typewriter in the Lenten wind.
The houseboy who had been a contemporary and a friend of his son when they were both
growing up came in and said, “The call to Stevie is ready.”
“Hi Papa,” Stephen said in a hoarse voice. “I’m fine Papa really fine. This is the time. I’ve
really got this thing beat now. You have no idea. I’ve really got a grasp of reality now. Dr. Simpson?
Oh he’s fine. I really have confidence in him. He’s a good man Papa. I really have faith in him. He’s
more down to earth than the majority of those people. He’s giving me a few extra treatments. How’s
everybody? Good. How’s the weather. Good that’s fine. No difficulty about treatments. No. Not at
all. Everything’s fine really. Glad everything’s so good with you. This time I’ve really got the answer.
Well we mustn’t waste money on the telephone. Give my love to everyone. Good-bye Papa. See you
soon.”
“Stevie sent you his best,” I said to the houseboy.
He smiled happily, remembering the old days.
“That’s nice of him. How is he?”
“Fine,” I said. “He says everything is fine.”
“The Strange Country” comprises four chapters of an uncompleted novel that Hemingway worked
on at intervals in 1946-1947 and 1950-1951. These scenes represent preliminary material for an
early version of Islands in the Stream, which was published posthumously in 1970. Hemingway
apparently discarded these chapters when he changed the direction of the novel as he worked on
it. Readers will note the reuse of names subsequently given to other characters in the final version
of Islands in the Stream. None of these rearrangements diminishes the unity and integrity of “The
Strange Country.”
The Strange Country
MIAMI WAS HOT AND MUGGY AND THE land wind that blew
from the Everglades brought mosquitoes even in the morning.
“We’ll get out as soon as we can,” Roger said. “I’ll have to get some money. Do you know
anything about cars?”
“Not very much.”
“You might look and see what there is advertised in the classified in the paper and I’ll get some
money here to Western Union.”
“Can you get it just like that?”
“If I get the call through in time so my lawyer can get it off.”
They were up on the thirteenth floor of a hotel on Biscayne Boulevard and the bellboy had just
gone down for the papers and some other purchases. There were two rooms and they overlooked the
bay, the park and the traffic passing on the Boulevard. They were registered under their own names.
“You take the corner one,” Roger had said. “It will have a little breeze in it maybe. I’ll get on the
telephone in the other room.”
“What can I do to help?”
“You run through the classifieds on motorcars for sale in one paper and I’ll take the other.”
“What sort of a car?”
“A convertible with good rubber. The best one we can get.”
“How much money do you think we’ll have?”
“I’m going to try for five thousand.”
“That’s wonderful. Do you think you can get it?”
“I don’t know. I’ll get going on him now,” Roger said and went into the other room. He shut the
door and then opened it. “Do you still love me?”
“I though that was all settled,” she said. “Please kiss me now before the boy comes back.”
“Good.”
He held her solidly against him and kissed her hard.
“That’s better,” she said. “Why did we have to have separate rooms?”
“I thought I might have to be identified to get the money.”
“Oh.”
“If we have any luck we won’t have to stay in these.”
“Can we really do it all that fast?”
“If we have any luck.”
“Then can we be Mr. and Mrs. Gilch?”
“Mr. and Mrs. Stephen Gilch.”
“Mr. and Mrs. Stephen Brat-Gilch.”
“I’d better make the call.”
“Don’t stay away an awfully long time though.”
They had lunch at a seafood restaurant owned by Greeks. It was an air-conditioned oasis against
the heavy heat of the town and the food had certainly originally come out of the ocean but it was to
Eddy’s cooking of the same things as old re-used grease is to fresh browned butter. But there was a
good bottle of really cold, dry, resiny tasting Greek white wine and for dessert they had cherry pie.
“Let’s go to Greece and the islands,” she said.
“Haven’t you ever been there?”
“One summer. I loved it.”
“We’ll go there.”
By two o’clock the money was at the Western Union. It was thirty-five hundred instead of five
thousand and by three-thirty they had bought a used Buick convertible with only six thousand miles on
it. It had two good spares, set-in well fenders, a radio, a big spotlight, plenty of luggage space in the
rear and it was sand colored.
By five-thirty they had made various other purchases, checked out of the hotel and the doorman
was stowing their bags into the back of the car. It was still deadly hot.
Roger, who was sweating heavily in his heavy uniform, as suitable to the subtropics in summer
as shorts would be to Labrador in winter, tipped the doorman and got into the car and they drove
along Biscayne Boulevard and turned west to get onto the road to Coral Gables and the Tamiami
Trail.
“How do you feel?” he asked the girl.
“Wonderful. Do you think it’s true?”
“I know it’s true because it’s so damned hot and we didn’t get the five thousand.”
“Do you think we paid too much for the car?”
“No. Just right.”
“Did you get the insurance?”
“Yes. And joined the A.A.A.”
“Aren’t we fast?”
“We’re terrific.”
“Have you got the rest of the money?”
“Sure. Pinned in my shirt.”
“That’s our bank.”
“It’s all we’ve got.”
“How do you think it will last?”
“It won’t have to last. I’ll make some more.”
“It will have to last for a while.”
“It will.”
“Roger.”
“Yes, daughter.”
“Do you love me?”
“I don’t know.”
“Say it.”
“I don’t know. But I’m going to damn well find out.”
“I love you. Hard. Hard. Hard.”
“You keep that up. That will be a big help to me.”
“Why don’t you say you love me?”
“Let’s wait.”
She had been holding her hand on his thigh while he drove and now she took it away.
“All right,” she said. “We’ll wait.”
They were driving west now on the broad Coral Gables road through the flat heat-stricken
outskirts of Miami, past stores, filling stations and markets with cars with people going home from the
city passing them steadily. Now they passed Coral Gables to their left with the buildings that looked
out of the Basso Veneto rising from the Florida prairie and ahead the road stretched straight and heatwelted across what had once been the Everglades. Roger drove faster now and the movement of the
car through the heavy air made the air cool as it came in through the scoop in the dash and the slanted
glass of the ventilators.
“She’s a lovely car,” the girl said. “Weren’t we lucky to get her?”
“Very.”
“We’re pretty lucky don’t you think?”
“So far.”
“You’ve gotten awfully cautious on me.”
“Not really.”
“But we can be jolly can’t we?”
“I’m jolly.”
“You don’t sound awfully jolly.”
“Well maybe then I’m not.”
“Couldn’t you be though? You see I really am.”
“I will be,” Roger said. “I promise.”
Looking ahead at the road he had driven so many times in his life, seeing it stretch ahead,
knowing it was the same road with the ditches on either side and the forest and the swamps, knowing
that only the car was different, that only who was with him was different, Roger felt the old
hollowness coming inside of him and knew he must stop it.
“I love you, daughter,” he said. He did not think it was true. But it sounded all right as he said it.
“I love you very much and I’m going to try to be very good to you.”
“And you’re going to be jolly.”
“And I’m going to be jolly.”
“That’s wonderful,” she said. “Have we started already?”
“We’re on the road.”
“When will we see the birds?”
“They’re much further in this time of year.”
“Roger.”
“Yes, Bratchen.”
“You don’t have to be jolly if you don’t feel like it. We’ll be jolly enough. You feel however
you feel and I’ll be jolly for us both. I can’t help it today.”
He saw on ahead where the road turned to the right and ran northwest through the forest swamp
instead of west. That was good. That was really much better. Pretty soon they would come to the big
osprey’s nest in the dead cypress tree. They had just passed the place where he had killed the
rattlesnake that winter driving through here with David’s mother before Andrew was born. That was
the year they both bought Seminole shirts at the trading post at Everglades and wore them in the car.
He had given the big rattlesnake to some Indians that had come in to trade and they were pleased with
the snake because he had a fine hide and twelve rattles and Roger remembered how heavy and thick
he was when he lifted him with his huge, flattened head hanging and how the Indian smiled when he
took him. That was the year they shot the wild turkey as he crossed the road that early morning coming
out of the mist that was just thinning with the first sun, the cypresses showing black in the silver mist
and the turkey brown-bronze and lovely as he stepped onto the road, stepping high-headed, then
crouching to run, then flopping on the road.
“I’m fine,” he told the girl. “We get into some nice country now.”
“Where do you think we’ll get to tonight?”
“We’ll find some place. Once we get to the gulf side this breeze will be a sea breeze instead of a
land breeze and it will be cool.”
“That will be lovely,” the girl said. “I hated to think of staying the first night in that hotel.”
“We were awfully lucky to get away. I didn’t think we could do it that quickly.”
“I wonder how Tom is.”
“Lonely,” Roger said.
“Isn’t he a wonderful guy?”
“He’s my best friend and my conscience and my father and my brother and my banker. He’s like
a saint. Only jolly.”
“I never knew anybody as fine,” she said. “It breaks your heart the way he loves you and the
boys.”
“I wish he could have them all summer.”
“Won’t you miss them terribly?”
“I miss them all the time.”
They had put the wild turkey in the back of the seat and he had been so heavy, warm and
beautiful with the shining bronze plumage, so different from the blues and blacks of a domestic turkey,
and David’s mother was so excited she could hardly speak. And then she had said, “No. Let me hold
him. I want to see him again. We can put him away later.” And he had put a newspaper on her lap and
she had tucked the bird’s bloodied head under his wing, folding the wing carefully over it, and sat
there stroking and smoothing his breast feathers while he, Roger, drove. Finally she said, “He’s cold
now” and had wrapped him in the paper and put him in the back of the seat again and said, “Thank
you for letting me keep him when I wanted him so much.” Roger had kissed her while he drove and
she had said, “Oh Roger we’re so happy and we always will be won’t we?” That was just around this
next slanting turn the road makes up ahead. The sun was down to the top of the treetops now. But they
had not seen the birds.
“You won’t miss them so much you won’t be able to love me will you?”
“No. Truly.”
“I understand it making you sad. But you were going to be away from them anyway weren’t
you?”
“Sure. Please don’t worry, daughter.”
“I like it when you say daughter. Say it again.”
“It comes at the end of a sentence,” he said. “Daughter.”
“Maybe it’s because I’m younger,” she said. “I love the kids. I love them all three, hard, and I
think they’re wonderful. I didn’t know there were kids like that. But Andy’s too young for me to marry
and I love you. So I forget about them and just am as happy as I can be to be with you.”
“You’re good.”
“I’m not really. I’m awfully difficult. But I do know when I love someone and I’ve loved you
ever since I can remember. So I’m going to try to be good.”
“You’re being wonderful.”
“Oh I can be much better than this.”
“Don’t try.”
“I’m not going to for a while. Roger I’m so happy. We’ll be happy won’t we?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“And we can be happy for always can’t we? I know it sounds silly me being Mother’s daughter
and you with everyone. But I believe in it and it’s possible. I know it’s possible. I’ve loved you all
my life and if that’s possible it’s possible to be happy isn’t it? Say it is anyway.”
“I think it is.”
He’d always said it was. Not in this car though. In other cars in other countries. But he had said
it enough in this country too and he had believed it. It would have been possible too. Everything was
possible once. It was possible on this road on that stretch that now lay ahead where the canal ran
clear and flowing by the right-hand side of the road where the Indian poled his dugout. There was no
Indian there now. That was before. When it was possible. Before the birds were gone. That was the
other year before the turkey. That year before the big rattlesnake was the year they saw the Indian
poling the dugout and the buck in the bow of the dugout with his white throat and chest, his slender
legs with the delicate shaped hoofs, shaped like a broken heart, drawn up and his head with the
beautiful miniature horns looking toward the Indian. They had stopped the car and spoken to the
Indian but he did not understand English and grinned and the small buck lay there dead with his eyes
open looking straight at the Indian. It was possible then and for five years after. But what was
possible now? Nothing was possible now unless he himself was and he must say the things if there
was ever to be a chance of them being true. Even if it were wrong to say them he must say them. They
never could be true unless he said them. He had to say them and then perhaps he could feel them and
then perhaps he could believe them. And then perhaps they would be true. Perhaps is an ugly word, he
thought, but it is even worse on the end of your cigar.
“Have you got cigarettes?” he asked the girl. “I don’t know whether that lighter works.”
“I haven’t tried it. I haven’t smoked. I’ve felt so unnervous.”
“You don’t just smoke when you’re nervous do you?”
“I think so. Mostly.”
“Try the lighter.”
“All right.”
“Who was the guy you married?”
“Oh let’s not talk about him.”
“No. I just meant who was he?”
“No one you know.”
“Don’t you really want to tell me about him?”
“No, Roger. No.”
“All right.”
“I’m sorry,” she said. “He was English.”
“Was?”
“Is. But I like was better. Besides you said was.”
“Was is a good word,” he said. “It’s a hell of a lot better word than perhaps.”
“All right. I don’t understand it at all but I believe you. Roger?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“Do you feel any better?”
“Much. I’m fine.”
“All right. I’ll tell you about him. He turned out to be gay. That was it. He hadn’t said anything
about it and he didn’t act that way at all. Not at all. Truly. You probably think I’m stupid. But he
didn’t in any way. He was absolutely beautiful. You know how they can be. And then I found out
about it. Right away of course. The same night actually. Now is it all right not to talk about it?”
“Poor Helena.”
“Don’t call me Helena. Call me daughter.”
“My poor daughter. My darling.”
“That’s a nice word too. You mustn’t mix it with daughter though. It’s no good that way. Mummy
knew him. I thought she might have said something. She just said she’d never noticed and when I said,
‘You might have noticed,’ she said, ‘I though you knew what you were doing and I had no call to
interfere.’ I said, ‘Couldn’t you just have said something or couldn’t somebody just have said
something?’ and she said, ‘Darling, everyone thought you knew what you were doing. Everyone.
Everyone knows you don’t care anything about it yourself and I had every right to think you knew the
facts of life in this right little tight little island.’”
She was sitting stiff and straight beside him now and she had no tone in her voice at all. She
didn’t mimic. She simply used the exact words or as exactly as she remembered them. Roger thought
they sounded quite exact.
“Mummy was a great comfort,” she said. “She said a lot of things to me that day.”
“Look,” Roger said. “We’ll throw it all away. All of it. We’ll throw it all away now right here
beside the road. Any of it you want to get rid of you can always tell me. But we’ve thrown it all away
now and we’ve really thrown it away.”
“I want it to be like that,” she said. “That’s how I started out. And you know I said at the start
we’d give it a miss.”
“I know. I’m sorry. But I’m glad really because now we have thrown it away.”
“It’s nice of you. But you don’t have to make incantations or exorcisions or any of that. I can
swim without water wings. And he was damned beautiful.”
“Spit it out. If that’s the way you want it.”
“Don’t be like that. You’re so damned superior you don’t have to be superior. Roger?”
“Yes, Bratchen.”
“I love you very much and we don’t have to do this any more do we?”
“No. Truly.”
“I’m so glad. Now will we be jolly?”
“Sure we will. Look,” he said. “There are the birds. The first of them.”
They showed white in the cypress hammock that rose like an island of trees out of the swamp on
their left the sun shining on them in the dark foliage and as the sun lowered more came flying across
the sky, flying white and slow, their long legs stretched behind them.
“They’re coming in for the night. They’ve been feeding out in the marsh. Watch the way they
brake with their wings and the long legs slant forward to land.”
“Will we see the ibises too?”
“There they are.”
He had stopped the car and across the darkening swamp they could see the wood ibis crossing
the sky with their pulsing flight to wheel and light in another island of trees.
“They used to roost much closer.”
“Maybe we will see them in the morning,” she said. “Do you want me to make a drink while
we’ve stopped?”
“We can make it while we drive. The mosquitoes will get to us here.”
As he started the car there were a few mosquitoes in it, the big black Everglades type, but the
rush of the wind took them out when he opened the door and slapped them out with his hand and the
girl found two enameled cups in the packages they had brought and the carton that held a bottle of
White Horse. She wiped the cups out with a paper napkin, poured in Scotch, the bottle still in the
carton, put in lumps of ice from the thermos jug and poured soda into them.
“Here’s to us,” she said and gave him the cold enameled cup and he held it drinking slowly and
driving on, holding the wheel with his left hand, driving along into the road that was dusky now. He
put on the lights a little later and soon they cut far ahead into the dark and the two of them drank the
whisky and it was what they needed and made them feel much better. There is always a chance, Roger
thought, when a drink can still do what it is supposed to do. This drink had done exactly what it
should do.
“It tastes sort of slimy and slippery in a cup.”
“Enameled,” Roger said.
“That was pretty easy,” she said. “Doesn’t it taste wonderfully?”
“It’s the first drink we’ve had all day. Except that resin wine at lunch. It’s our good friend,” he
said. “The old giant killer.”
“That’s a nice name for it. Did you always call it that?”
“Since the war. That’s when we first used it for that.”
“This forest would be a bad place for giants.”
“I think they’ve been killed off a long time,” he said. “They probably hunted them out with those
big swamp buggies with the huge tires.”
“That must be very elaborate. It’s easier with an enameled cup.”
“Tin cups make it taste even better,” he said. “Not for giant killing. Just for how good it can be.
But you ought to have ice cold spring water and the cup chilled in the spring and you look down in the
spring and there are little plumes of sand that rise on the bottom where it’s bubbling.”
“Will we have that?”
“Sure. We’ll have everything. You can make a wonderful one with wild strawberries. If you
have a lemon you cut half of it and squeeze it into the cup and leave the rind in the cup. Then you
crush the wild strawberries into the cup and wash the sawdust off a piece of ice from the icehouse
and put it in and then fill the cup with Scotch and then stir it till it’s all mixed and cold.”
“Don’t you put in any water?”
“No. The ice melts enough and there’s enough juice in the strawberries and from the lemon.”
“Do you think there will still be wild strawberries?”
“I’m sure there will be.”
“Do you think there will be enough to make a shortcake?”
“I’m pretty sure there will be.”
“We better not talk about it. I’m getting awfully hungry.”
“We’ll drive about another drink more,” he said. “And then we ought to be there.”
They drove on in the night now with the swamp dark and high on both sides of the road and the
good headlights lighting far ahead. The drinks drove the past away the way the headlights cut through
the dark and Roger said.
“Daughter, I’ll take another if you want to make it.”
When she had made it she said, “Why don’t you let me hold it and give it to you when you want
it?”
“It doesn’t bother me driving.”
“It doesn’t bother me to hold it either. Doesn’t it make you feel good?”
“Better than anything.”
“Not than anything. But awfully good.”
Ahead now were the lights of a village where the trees were cleared away and Roger turned
onto a road that ran to the left and drove past a drugstore, a general store, a restaurant and along a
deserted paved street that ran to the sea. He turned right and drove on another paved street past vacant
lots and scattered houses until they saw the lights of a filling station and a neon sign advertising
cabins. The main highway ran past there joining the sea road and the cabins were toward the sea.
They stopped the car at the filling station and Roger asked the middle-aged man who came out looking
blue-skinned in the light of the sign to check the oil and water and fill the tank.
“How are the cabins?” Roger asked.
“O.K., Cap,” the man said. “Nice cabins. Clean cabins.”
“Got clean sheets?” Roger asked.
“Just as clean as you want them. You folks fixing to stay all night?”
“If we stay.”
“All night’s three dollars.”
“How’s for the lady to have a look at one?”
“Fine and dandy. She won’t ever see no finer mattresses. Sheets plumb clean. Shower. Perfect
cross ventilation. Modern plumbing.”
“I’ll go in,” the girl said.
“Here take a key. You folks from Miami?”
“That’s right.”
“Prefer the West Coast myself,” the man said. “Your oil’s O.K. and so’s your water.”
The girl came back to the car.
“The one I saw is a splendid cabin. It’s cool too.”
“Breeze right off the Gulf of Mexico,” the man said. “Going to blow all night. All tomorrow.
Probably part of Thursday. Did you try that mattress?”
“Everything looked marvelous.”
“My old woman keeps them so goddam clean it’s a crime. She wears herself to death on them. I
sent her up to the show tonight. Laundry’s the biggest item. But she does it. There it is. I just got nine
into her.” He went to hang up the hose.
“He’s a little confusing,” Helena whispered. “But it’s quite nice and clean.”
“Well you going to take her?” the man asked.
“Sure,” Roger said. “We’ll take her.”
“Write in the book then.”
Roger wrote Mr. and Mrs. Robert Hutchins 9072 Surfside Drive Miami Beach and handed the
book back.
“Any kin to the educator?” the man asked, making a note of the license number in the book.
“No. I’m sorry.”
“Nothing to be sorry about,” the man said. “I never thought much of him. Just read about him in
the papers. Like me to help you with anything?”
“No. I’ll just run her in and we’ll put our things in.”
“That’s three and nine gallons makes five-fifty with the state tax.”
“Where can we get something to eat?” Roger asked.
“Two different places in town. Just about the same.”
“You prefer either one?”
“People speak pretty highly of the Green Lantern.”
“I think I’ve heard of it,” the girl said. “Somewhere.”
“You might. Widow woman runs it.”
“I believe that’s the place,” the girl said.
“Sure you don’t want me to help you?”
“No. We’re fine,” Roger said.
“Just one thing I’d like to say,” the man said. “Mrs. Hutchins certainly is a fine looking woman.”
“Thank you,” Helena said. “I think that’s lovely of you. But I’m afraid it’s just that beautiful
light.”
“No,” he said. “I mean it true. From the heart.”
“I think we’d better go in,” Helena said to Roger. “I don’t want you to lose me so early in the
trip.”
Inside the cabin there was a double bed, a table covered with oilcloth, two chairs and a light
bulb that hung down from the ceiling. There was a shower, a toilet and a washbowl with a mirror.
Clean towels hung on a rack by the washbowl and there was a pole at one end of the room with some
hangers.
Roger brought in the bags and Helena put the ice jug, the two cups, and the cardboard canon with
the Scotch in it on the table with the paper bag full of White Rock bottles.
“Don’t look gloomy,” she said. “The bed is clean. The sheets anyway.”
Roger put his arm around her and kissed her.
“Put the light out please.”
Roger reached up to the light bulb and turned the switch. In the dark he kissed her, brushing his
lips against hers, feeling them both fill without opening, feeling her trembling as he held her. Holding
her tight against him, her head back now, he heard the sea on the beach and felt the wind cool through
the window. He felt the silk of her hair over his arm and their bodies hard and taut and he dropped his
hand on her breasts to feel them rise, quick-budding under his fingers.
“Oh Roger,” she said. “Please. Oh please.”
“Don’t talk.”
“Is that him? Oh he’s lovely.”
“Don’t talk.”
“He’ll be good to me. Won’t he. And I’ll try to be good to him. But isn’t he awfully big?”
“No.”
“Oh I love you so and I love him so. Do you think we should try now so we’ll know? I can’t
stand it very much longer. Not knowing. I haven’t been able to stand it all afternoon.”
“We can try.”
“Oh let’s. Let’s try. Let’s try now.”
“Kiss me once more.”
In the dark he went into the strange country and it was very strange indeed, hard to enter,
suddenly perilously difficult, then blindingly, happily, safely, encompassed; free of all doubts, all
perils and all dreads, held unholdingly, to hold, to hold increasingly, unholdingly still to hold, taking
away all things before, and all to come, bringing the beginning of bright happiness in darkness, closer,
closer, closer now closer and ever closer, to go on past all belief, longer, finer, further, finer higher
and higher to drive toward happiness suddenly, scaldingly achieved.
“Oh darling,” he said. “Oh darling.”
“Yes.”
“Thank you my dear blessed.”
“I’m dead,” she said. “Don’t thank me. I’m dead.”
“Do you want—”
“No please. I’m dead.”
“Let’s—”
“No. Please believe me. I don’t know how to say it another way.”
Then later she said, “Roger.”
“Yes, daughter.”
“Are you sure?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“And you’re not disappointed because of anything?”
“No, daughter.”
“Do you think you’ll get to love me?”
“I love you,” he lied. I love what we did he meant.
“Say it again.”
“I love you,” he lied again.
“Say it once more.”
“I love you,” he lied.
“That’s three times,” she said, in the dark. “I’ll try to make it come true.”
The wind blew cool on them and the noise the palm leaves made was almost like rain and after a
while the girl said, “It will be lovely tonight but do you know what I am now?”
“Hungry.”
“Aren’t you a wonderful guesser?”
“I’m hungry too.”
They ate at the Green Lantern and the widow woman squirted Flit under the table and brought
them fresh mullet roe browned crisp and fried with good bacon. They drank cold Regal beer and ate a
steak each with mashed potatoes. The steak was thin from grass-fed beef and not very good but they
were hungry and the girl kicked her shoes off under the table and put both her bare feet on Roger’s.
She was beautiful and he loved to look at her and her feet felt very good on his.
“Does it do it to you?” she asked.
“Of course.”
“Can I feel?”
“If the widow woman isn’t looking.”
“It does it to me too,” she said. “Aren’t our bodies nice to each other?”
They ate pineapple pie for dessert and each had another cold bottle of Regal fresh from deep in
the melting ice water of the cooler.
“I have Flit on my feet,” she said. “They’ll be nicer when they don’t have Flit on them.”
“They’re lovely with Flit. Push really hard with them.”
“I don’t want to push you out of the widow woman’s chair.”
“All right. That’s enough.”
“You never felt any better did you?”
“No,” Roger said truly.
“We don’t have to go to the movies do we?”
“Not unless you want to very much.”
“Let’s go back to our house and then start out terribly early in the morning.”
“That’s fine.”
They paid the widow woman and took a couple of bottles of the cold Regal in a paper sack and
drove back to the cabins and put the car in the space between cabins.
“The car knows about us already,” she said as they came in the cabin.
“It’s nice that way.”
“I was sort of shy with him at the start but now I feel like he’s our partner.”
“He’s a good car.”
“Do you think the man was shocked?”
“No. Jealous.”
“Isn’t he awfully old to be jealous?”
“Maybe. Maybe he’s just pleased.”
“Let’s not think about him.”
“I haven’t thought about him.”
“The car will protect us. He’s our good friend already. Did you see how friendly he was coming
back from the widow woman’s?”
“I saw the difference.”
“Let’s not even put the light on.”
“Good,” Roger said. “I’ll take a shower or do you want one first?”
“No. You.”
Then waiting in the bed he heard her in the bath splashing and then drying herself and then she
came into the bed very fast and long and cool and wonderful feeling.
“My lovely,” he said. “My true lovely.”
“Are you glad to have me?”
“Yes, my darling.”
“And it’s really all right?”
“It’s wonderful.”
“We can do it all over the country and all over the world.”
“We’re here now.”
“All right. We’re here. Here. Where we are. Here. Oh the good, fine, lovely here in the dark.
What a fine lovely wonderful here. So lovely in the dark. In the lovely dark. Please hear me here. Oh
very gently here very gently please carefully Please Please very carefully Thank you carefully oh in
the lovely dark.”
It was a strange country again but at the end he was not lonely and later, waking, it was still
strange and no one spoke at all but it was their country now, not his nor hers, but theirs, truly, and they
both knew it.
In the dark with the wind blowing cool through the cabin she said, “Now you’re happy and you
love me.”
“Now I’m happy and I love you.”
“You don’t have to repeat it. It’s true now.”
“I know it. I was awfully slow wasn’t I.”
“You were a little slow.”
“I’m awfully glad that I love you.”
“See?” she said. “It isn’t hard.”
“I really love you.”
“I thought maybe you would. I mean I hoped you would.”
“I do.” He held her very close and tight. “I really love you. Do you hear me?”
It was true, too, a thing which surprised him greatly, especially when he found that it was still
true in the morning.
They didn’t leave the next morning. Helena was still sleeping when Roger woke and he watched
her sleeping, her hair spread over the pillow, swept up from her neck and swung to one side, her
lovely brown face, the eyes and the lips closed looking even more beautiful than when she was
awake. He noticed her eyelids were pale in the tanned face and how the long lashes lay, the
sweetness of her lips, quiet now like a child’s asleep, and how her breasts showed under the sheet
she had pulled up over her in the night. He thought he shouldn’t wake her and he was afraid if he
kissed her it might, so he dressed and walked down into the village, feeling hollow and hungry and
happy, smelling the early morning smells and hearing and seeing the birds and feeling and smelling
the breeze that still blew in from the Gulf of Mexico, down to the other restaurant a block beyond the
Green Lantern. It was really a lunch counter and he sat on a stool and ordered coffee with milk and a
fried ham and egg sandwich on rye bread. There was a midnight edition of the Miami Herald on the
counter that some trucker had left and he read about the military rebellion in Spain while he ate the
sandwich and drank the coffee. He felt the egg spurt in the rye bread as his teeth went through the
bread, the slice of dill pickle, the egg and the ham, and he smelled them all and the good early
morning coffee smell as he lifted the cup.
“They’re having plenty of trouble over there aren’t they,” the man behind the counter said to him.
He was an elderly man with his face tanned to the line of the sweatband of his hat and freckled dead
white above that. Roger saw he had a thin, mean cracker mouth and he wore steel-rimmed glasses.
“Plenty,” Roger agreed.
“All those European countries are the same,” the man said. “Trouble after trouble.”
“I’ll take another cup of coffee,” Roger said. He would let this one cool while he read the paper.
“When they get to the bottom of it they’ll find the Pope there.” The man drew the coffee and put
the pot of milk by it.
Roger looked up interestedly as he poured the milk into the cup.
“Three men at the bottom of everything,” the man told him. “The Pope, Herben Hoover, and
Franklin Delano Roosevelt.”
Roger relaxed. The man went on to explain the interlocking interests of these three and Roger
listened happily. America was a wonderful place he thought. Imagine buying a copy of Bouvard et
Pécuchet when you could get this free with your breakfast. You are getting something else with the
newspaper, he thought. But in the meantime there is this.
“What about the Jews?” he asked finally. “Where do they come in?”
“The Jews are a thing of the past,” the man behind the counter told him. “Henry Ford put them
out of business when he published The Protocols of the Elders of Zion.”
“Do you think they’re through?”
“Not a doubt of it, fella,” the man said. “You’ve seen the last of them.”
“That surprises me,” Roger said.
“Let me tell you something else,” the man leaned forward. “Some day old Henry will get the
Pope the same way. He’ll get him just like he got Wall Street.”
“Did he get Wall Street?”
“Oh boy,” the man said. “They’re through.”
“Henry must be going good.”
“Henry? You really said something then. Henry’s the man of the ages.”
“What about Hitler?”
“Hitler’s a man of his word.”
“What about the Russians?”
“You’ve asked the right man that question. Let the Russian bear stay in his own backyard.”
“Well that pretty well fixes things up,” Roger got up.
“Things look good,” the man behind the counter said. “I’m an optimist. Once old Henry tackles
the Pope you’ll see all three of them crumble.”
“What papers do you read?”
“Any of them,” the man said. “But I don’t get my political views there. I think things out for
myself.”
“What do I owe you?”
“Forty-five cents.”
“It was a first class breakfast.”
“Come again,” the man said and picked up the paper from where Roger had laid it on the
counter. He’s going to figure some more things out for himself, Roger thought.
Roger walked back to the tourist camp, buying a later edition of the Miami Herald at the
drugstore. He also bought some razor blades, a tube of mentholated shaving cream, some Dentyne
chewing gum, a bottle of Listerine and an alarm clock.
When he arrived at the cabin and opened the door quietly and put his package on the table beside
the thermos jug, the enameled cups, the brown paper bag full of White Rock bottles, and the two
bottles of Regal beer they had forgotten to drink, Helena was still asleep. He sat in the chair and read
the paper and watched her sleep. The sun was high enough so that it did not shine on her face and the
breeze came in the other window, blowing across her as she slept without stirring.
Roger read the paper trying to figure out from the various bulletins what had happened, really,
and how it was going. She might as well sleep, he thought. We better get whatever there is each day
now and as much and as well as we can because it’s started now. It came quicker than I thought it
would. I do not have to go yet and we can have a while. Either it will be over right away and the
Government will put it down or there will be plenty of time. If I had not had these two months with
the kids I would have been over there for it. I’d rather have been with the kids, he thought. It’s too late
to go now. It would probably be over before I would get there. Anyway there is going to be plenty of
it from now on. There is going to be plenty of it for us all the rest of our lives. Plenty of it. Too
damned much of it. I’ve had a wonderful time this summer with Tom and the kids and now I’ve got
this girl and I’ll see how long my conscience holds out and when I have to go I’ll go to it and not
worry about it until then. This is the start all right. Once it starts there isn’t going to be any end to it. I
don’t see any end until we destroy them, there and here and everywhere. I don’t see any end to it ever,
he thought. Not for us anyway. But maybe they will win this first one in a hurry, he thought, and I
won’t have to go to this one.
The thing had come that he had expected and known would come and that he had waited all one
fall for in Madrid and he was already making excuses not to go to it. Spending the time he had with
the children had been a valid excuse and he knew nothing had been planned in Spain until later. But
now it had come and what was he doing? He was convincing himself there was no need for him to go.
It is liable all to be over before I can get there, he thought. There is going to be plenty of time.
There were other things that held him back too that he did not understand yet. They were the
weaknesses that developed alongside his strengths like the crevices in a glacier under its covering of
snow, or, if that is too pompous a comparison, like streaks of fat between muscles. These weaknesses
were a part of the strengths unless they grew to dominate them; but they were mostly hidden and he
did not understand them, nor know their uses. He did know, though, that this thing had come that he
must go to and aid in every way he could, and yet he found varied reasons why he did not have to go.
They were all varyingly honest and they were all weak except one; he would have to make some
money to support his children and their mothers and he would have to do some decent writing to make
that money or he would not be able to live with himself. I know six good stories, he thought, and I’m
going to write them. That will get them done and I have to do them to make up for that whoring on the
Coast. If I can really do four out of the six that will pretty well balance me with myself and make up
for that job of whoring; whoring hell, it wasn’t even whoring it was like being asked to produce a
sample of semen in a test tube that could be used for artificial insemination. You had an office to
produce it in and a secretary to help you. Don’t forget. The hell with these sexual symbols. What he
meant was that he had taken money for writing something that was not the absolute best he could
write. Absolute best hell. It was crap. Goose-crap. Now he had to atone for that and recover his
respect by writing as well as he could and better than he ever had. That sounded simple, he thought.
Try and do it some time.
But anyway if I do four as good as I can do and as straight as God could do them on one of his
good days (Hi there Deity. Wish me luck Boy. Glad to hear you’re doing so good yourself.) then I’ll
be straight with myself and if that six-ply bastard Nicholson can sell two out of the four that will stake
the kids while we are gone. We? Sure. We. Don’t you remember about we? Like the little pig we we
we all the way home. Only away from home. Home. That’s a laugh. There isn’t any home. Sure there
is. This is home. All this. This cabin. This car. Those once fresh sheets. The Green Lantern and the
widow woman and Regal beer. The drugstore and the breeze off the gulf. That crazy at the lunch
counter and a ham and egg sandwich on rye. Make it two to go. One with a slice of raw onion. Fill her
up and check the water and the oil please. Would you mind checking the tires please? The hiss of
compressed air, administered courteously and free was home which was all oil-stained cement
everywhere, all rubber worn on pavements, comfort facilities, and Cokes in red vending machines.
The center line of highways was the boundary line of home.
You get to think like one of those Vast-Spaces-of-America writers, he said to himself. Better
watch it. Better get a load of this. Look at your girl sleeping and know this: Home is going to be
where people do not have enough to eat. Home is going to be wherever men are oppressed. Home is
going to be wherever evil is strongest and can be fought. Home is going to be where you will go from
now on.
But I don’t have to go yet, he thought. He had some reasons to delay it. No you don’t have to go
yet, his conscience said. And I can write the stories, he said. Yes, you must write the stories and they
must be as good as you can write and better. All right. Conscience, he thought. We have that all
straightened out. I guess the way things are shaping up I had better let her sleep. You let her sleep, his
conscience said. And you try very hard to take good care of her and not only that. You take good care
of her. As good as I can, he told his conscience, and I’ll write at least four good ones. They better be
good, his conscience said. They will be, he said. They’ll be the very best.
So having promised and decided that did he then take a pencil and an old exercise book and,
sharpening the pencil, start one of the stories there on the table while the girl slept? He did not. He
poured an inch and a half of White Horse into one of the enameled cups, unscrewed the top of the ice
jug and putting his hand in the cool depth pulled out a chunk of ice and put it in the cup. He opened a
bottle of White Rock and poured some alongside of the ice and then swirled the lump of ice around
with his finger before he drank.
They’ve got Spanish Morocco, Sevilla, Pamplona, Burgos, Saragossa, he thought. We’ve got
Barcelona, Madrid, Valencia and the Basque country. Both frontiers are still open It doesn’t look so
bad. It looks good. I must get a good map though. I ought to be able to get a good map in New Orleans.
Mobile maybe.
He figured it as well as he could without a map. Saragossa is bad, he thought. That cuts the
railway to Barcelona. Saragossa was a good Anarchist town. Not like Barcelona or Lérida. But still
plenty there. They can’t have put up much of a fight. Maybe they haven’t made their fight yet. They’d
have to take Saragossa right away if they could. They would have to come up from Catalonia and take
it.
If they could keep the Madrid-Valencia-Barcelona railway and open up Madrid-SaragossaBarcelona and hold Irún it ought to be all right. With stuff coming in from France they ought to be able
to build up in the Basque country and beat Mola in the north. That would be the toughest fight. That
son of a bitch. He could not see the situation in the south except that the revolters would have to come
up the valley of the Tagus to attack Madrid and they would probably try it from the north too. Would
have to try it right away to try to force the passes of the Quadarramas the way Napoleon had done it.
I wish I had not been with the kids, he thought. I wish the hell I was there. No you don’t wish you
hadn’t been with the kids. You can’t go to everyone. Or you can’t be at them the minute they start.
You’re not a firehorse and you have as much obligation to the kids as to anything in the world. Until
the time comes when you have to fight to keep the world so it will be O.K. for them to live in, he
corrected. But that sounded pompous so he corrected it to when it is more necessary to fight than to be
with them. That was flat enough. That would come soon enough.
Figure this one out and what you have to do and then stick with that, he told himself. Figure it as
well as you can and then really do what you have to do. All right, he said. And he went on figuring.
Helena slept until eleven-thirty and he had finished his second drink.
“Why didn’t you wake me, darling?” she said when she opened her eyes and rolled toward him
and smiled.
“You looked so lovely sleeping.”
“But we’ve missed our early start and the early morning on the road.”
“We’ll have it tomorrow morning.”
“Give kiss.”
“Kiss.”
“Give hug a lug.’
“Big hugalug”
“Feels better,” she said. “Oh. Feels good.”
When she came out from the shower with her hair tucked under a rubber cap she said, “Darling,
you didn’t have to drink because you were lonesome did you?”
“No. Just because I felt like it.”
“Did you feel badly though?”
“No. I felt wonderful.”
“I’m so glad. I’m ashamed. I just slept and slept.”
“We can swim before lunch.”
“I don’t know,” she said. “I’m so hungry. Do you think we could have lunch and then take a nap
or read or something and then swim?”
“Wunderbar.”
“We shouldn’t start and drive this afternoon?”
“See how you feel, daughter.”
“Come here,” she said.
He did. She put her arms around him and he felt her standing, fresh and cool from the shower, not
dried yet, and he kissed her slowly and happily feeling the happy ache come in him where she had
pressed firm against him.
“How’s that?”
“That’s fine.”
“Good,” she said. “Let’s drive tomorrow.”
The beach was white sand, almost as fine as flour, and it ran for miles. They took a long walk
along it in the late afternoon, swimming out, lying in the clear water, floating and playing, and then
swimming in to walk further along the beach.
“It’s a lovelier beach than Bimini even,” the girl said.
“But the water’s not as fine. It doesn’t have that quality the Gulf Stream water has.”
“No I guess not. But after European beaches it’s unbelievable.”
The clean softness of the sand made walking a sensual pleasure that could be varied from the
dry, soft, powdery to the just moist and yielding to the firm cool sand of the line of the receding tide.
“I wish the boys were here to point out things and show me things and tell me about things.”
“I’ll point out things.”
“You don’t have to. You just walk ahead a little way and let me look at your back and your can.”
“You walk ahead.”
“No you.”
Then she came up to him and said, “Come on. Let’s run side by side.”
They jogged easily along the pleasant firm footing above the breaking waves. She ran well,
almost too well for a girl, and when Roger forced the pace just a little she kept up easily. He kept the
same pace and then lengthened it a little again. She kept even with him but said, “Hi. Don’t kill me,”
and he stopped and kissed her. She was hot from the running and she said, “No. Don’t.”
“It’s nice.”
“Must go in the water first,” she said. They dove into the surf that was sandy where it broke and
swam out to the clean green water. She stood up with just her head and shoulders out.
“Kiss now.”
Her lips were salty and her face was wet with the seawater and as he kissed her she turned her
head so that her sea wet hair swung against his shoulder.
“Awfully salty but awfully good,” she said. “Hold very hard.”
He did.
“Here comes a big one,” she said. “A really big one. Now lift high up and we’ll go over together
in the wave.”
The wave rolled them over and over holding tight onto each other his legs tight around hers.
“Better than drowning,” she said. “So much better. Let’s do it once more.”
They picked a huge wave this time and when it hung and curled to break Roger threw them
across the line of its breaking and when it crashed down it rolled them over and over like a piece of
driftwood onto the sand.
“Let’s get clean and lie on the sand,” she said and they swam and dove in the clean water and
then lay side by side on the cool, firm beach where the last inrush of the waves just touched their toes
and ankles.
“Roger, do you still love me?”
“Yes, daughter. Very much.”
“I love you. You were nice to play.”
“I had fun.”
“We do have fun don’t we.”
“It’s been lovely all day.”
“We only had a half a day because I was a bad girl and slept so late.”
“That was a good sound thing to do.”
“I didn’t do it to be good and sound. I did it because I couldn’t help it.”
He lay alongside of her, his right foot touching her left, his leg touching hers and he put his hand
on her head and neck.
“Old head’s awfully wet. You won’t catch a cold in the wind?”
“I don’t think so. If we lived by the ocean all the time I’d have to get my hair cut.”
“No.”
“It looks nice. You’d be surprised.”
“I love it the way it is.”
“It’s wonderful short for swimming.”
“Not for bed though.”
“I don’t know,” she said. “You’d still be able to tell I was a girl.”
“Do you think so?”
“I’m almost sure. I could always remind you.”
“Daughter?”
“What, darling?”
“Did you always like making love?”
“No.”
“Do you now?”
“What do you think?”
“I think that if I had a good look both ways down the beach and there was no one in sight we’d
be all right.”
“It’s an awfully lonely beach,” she said.
They walked back along the sea and the wind was still blowing and the rollers were breaking far
out on the low tide.
“It seems so awfully simple and as though there were no problems at all,” the girl said. “I found
you and then all we ever had to do was eat and sleep and make love. Of course it’s not like that at
all.”
“Let’s keep it like that for a while.”
“I think we have a right to for a little while. Maybe not a right to. But I think we can. But won’t
you be awfully bored with me?”
“No,” he said. He was not lonely after this last time as he had nearly always been no matter with
whom or where. He had not had the old death loneliness since the first time the night before. “You do
something awfully good to me.”
“I’m glad if I really do. Wouldn’t it be awful if we were the kind of people who grated on each
other’s nerves and had to have fights to love each other?”
“We’re not like that.”
“I’ll try not to be. But won’t you be bored just with me?”
“No.”
“But you’re thinking about something else now.”
“Yes. I was wondering if we could get a Miami Daily News.”
“That’s the afternoon paper?”
“I just wanted to read about the Spanish business.”
“The military revolt?”
“Yes.”
“Will you tell me about it?”
“Sure.”
He told her about it as well as he could within the limitations of his knowledge and his
information.
“Are you worried about it?”
“Yes. But I haven’t thought about it all afternoon.”
“We’ll see what there is in the paper,” she said. “And tomorrow you can follow it on the radio
in the car. Tomorrow we’ll really get an early start.”
“I bought an alarm clock.”
“Weren’t you intelligent? It’s wonderful to have such an intelligent husband. Roger?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“What do you think they will have to eat at the Green Lantern?”
The next day they started early in the morning before sunrise and by breakfast they had done a
hundred miles and were away from the sea and the bays with their wooden docks and fish packing
houses and up in the monotonous pine and scrub palmetto of the cattle country. They ate at a lunch
counter in a town in the middle of the Florida prairie. The lunch counter was on the shady side of the
square and looked out on a red bricked court house with its green lawn.
“I don’t know how I ever held out for that second fifty,” the girl said, looking at the menu.
“We should have stopped at Punta Gorda,” Roger said. “That would have been sensible.”
“We said we’d do a hundred though,” the girl said. “And we did it. What are you going to have,
darling?”
“I’m going to have ham and eggs and coffee and a big slice of raw onion,” Roger told the
waitress.
“How do you want the eggs?”
“Straight up.”
“The lady?”
“I’ll have corned beef hash, browned, with two poached eggs,” Helena said.
“Tea, coffee, or milk?”
“Milk please.”
“What kind of juice?”
“Grapefruit please.”
“Two grapefruits. Do you mind the onion?” Roger asked.
“I love onions,” she said. “Not as much as I love you though. And I never tried them for
breakfast.”
“They’re good,” Roger said. “They get in there with the coffee and keep you from being lonely
when you drive.”
“You’re not lonely are you?”
“No, daughter.”
“We made quite good time didn’t we?”
“Not really good. That’s not much of a stretch for time with the bridges and the towns.”
“Look at the cowpunchers,” she said. Two men on cow ponies, wearing western work clothes,
got down from their stock saddles and hitched their horses to the rail in front of the lunch room and
walked down the sidewalk on their high-heeled boots.
“They run a lot of cattle around here,” Roger said. “You have to watch for stock on all these
roads.”
“I didn’t know they raised many cattle in Florida.”
“An awful lot. Good cattle now too.”
“Don’t you want to get a paper?”
“I’d like to,” he said. “I’ll see if the cashier has one.”
“At the drugstore,” the cashier said. “St. Petersburg and Tampa papers at the drugstore.”
“Where is it?”
“At the corner. I doubt if you could miss it.”
“You want anything from the drugstore?” Roger asked the girl.
“Camels,” she said. “Remember we have to fill the ice jug.”
“I’ll ask them.”
Roger came back with the morning papers and a carton of cigarettes.
“It’s not going so good.” He handed her one of the papers.
“Is there anything we didn’t get on the radio?”
“Not much. But it doesn’t look so good.”
“Can they fill the ice jug?”
“I forgot to ask.”
The waitress came with the two breakfasts and they both drank their cold grapefruit juice and
started to eat. Roger kept on reading his paper so Helena propped hers against a water glass and read
too.
“Have you any chili sauce?” Roger asked the waitress. She Was a thin juke-joint looking blonde.
“You bet,” she said. “You people from Hollywood.”
“I’ve been there.”
“Ain’t she from there?”
“She’s going there.”
“Oh Jesus me,” the waitress said. “Would you write in my book?
“I’d love to,” Helena said. “But I’m not in pictures.”
“You will be, honey,” the waitress said. “Wait a minute,” she said, got a pen.”
She handed Helena the book. It was quite new and had a grey imitation leather cover.
“I only just got it,” she said. “I only had this job a week.”
Helena wrote Helena Hancock on the first page in the rather flamboyant untypical hand that had
emerged form the mixed ways of writing she had been taught at various schools.
“Jesus beat me what a name,” the waitress said. “Wouldn’t you write something with it?”
“What’s your name?” Helena asked.
“Marie.”
To Marie from her friend Helena wrote above the florid name in the slightly suspect script.
“Gee thanks,” Marie said. Then to Roger, “You don’t mind writing do you.”
“No,” Roger said. “I’d like to. What’s your last name, Marie?”
“Oh that don’t matter.”
He wrote Best always to Marie from Roger Hancock.
“You her father?” the waitress asked.
“Yes,” said Roger.
“Gee I’m glad she’s going out there with her father,” the waitress said. “Well I certainly wish
you people luck.”
“We need it,” Roger said.
“No,” the waitress said. “You don’t need it. But I wish it to you anyway. Say you must have got
married awfully young.”
“I was,” Roger said. I sure as hell was, he thought.
“I’ll bet her mother was beautiful.”
“She was the most beautiful girl you ever saw.”
“Where’s she now?”
“In London,” Helena said.
“You people certainly lead lives,” the waitress said. “Do you want another glass of milk?”
“No thanks,” Helena said. “Where are you from, Marie?”
“Fort Meade,” the waitress said. “It’s right up the road.”
“Do you like it here?”
“This is a bigger town. It’s a step up I guess.”
“Do you have any fun?”
“I always have fun when there’s any time. Do you want anything more?” she asked Roger.
“No. We have to roll.”
They paid the check and shook hands.
“Thanks very much for the quarter,” the waitress said. “And for writing in my book. I guess I’ll
be reading about you in the papers. Good luck, Miss Hancock.”
“Good luck,” Helena said. “I hope you have a good summer.”
“It’ll be all right,” the waitress said. “You be careful won’t you.”
“You be careful too,” Helena said.
“O.K.,” Marie said. “Only it’s kind of late for me.”
She bit her lip and turned and went into the kitchen.
“She was a nice girl,” Helena said to Roger as they got into the car. “I should have told her it
was sort of late for me too. But I guess that only would have worried her.”
“We must fill the ice jug,” Roger said.
“I’ll take it in,” Helena offered. “I haven’t done anything for us all day.”
“Let me get it.”
“No. You read the paper and I’ll get it. Have we enough Scotch?”
“There’s that whole other bottle in the carton that isn’t opened.”
“That’s splendid.”
Roger read the paper. I might as well, he thought. I’m going to drive all day.
“It only cost a quarter,” the girl said when she came back with the jug. “But it’s chipped awfully
fine. Too fine I’m afraid.”
“We can get some more this evening.”
When they were out of the town and had settled down to the long black highway north through the
prairie and the pines, into the hills of the lake country, the road striped black over the long, varied
peninsula, heavy with the mounting summer heat now that they were away from the sea breeze; but
with them making their own breeze driving at a steady seventy on the straight long stretches and
feeling the country being put behind them, the girl said, “It’s fun to drive fast isn’t it? It’s like making
your own youth.”
“How do you mean?”
“I don’t know,” she said. “Sort of foreshortening and telescoping the world the way youth does.”
“I never thought much about youth.”
“I know it,” she said. “But I did. You didn’t think about it because you never lost it. If you never
thought about it you couldn’t lose it.”
“Go on,” he said. “That doesn’t follow.”
“It doesn’t make good sense,” she said. “I’ll get it straightened out though and then it will. You
don’t mind me talking when it doesn’t make completely good sense do you?”
“No, daughter.”
“You see if I made really completely good sense I wouldn’t be here.” She stopped. “Yes I
would. It’s super good sense. Not common sense.”
“Like surrealism?”
“Nothing like surrealism. I hate surrealism.”
“I don’t,” he said. “I liked it when it started. It kept on such a long time after it was over was the
trouble.”
“But things are never really successful until they are over.”
“Say that again.”
“I mean they aren’t successful in America until they are over. And they have to have been over
for years and years before they are successful in London.”
“Where did you learn all this, daughter?”
“I thought it out,” she said. “I’ve had a lot of time to think while I was waiting around for you.”
“You didn’t wait so very much.”
“Oh yes I did. You’ll never know.”
There was a choice to be made soon of two main highways with very little difference in their
mileage and he did not know whether to take the one that he knew was a good road through pleasant
country but that he had driven many times with Andy and David’s mother or the newly finished
highway that might go through duller country.
That’s no choice, he thought. We’ll take the new one. The hell with maybe starting something
again like I had the other night coming across the Tamiami Trail.
They caught the news broadcast on the radio, switching it off through the soap operas of the
forenoon and on at each hour.
“It isn’t like fiddling while Rome burns,” Roger said. “It’s driving west northwest at seventy
miles an hour away from a fire that’s burning up what you care about to the east and hearing about it
while you drive away from it.”
“If we keep on driving long enough we’ll get to it.”
“We hit a lot of water first.”
“Roger. Do you have to go? If you have to go you should.”
“No dammit. I don’t have to go. Not yet. I figured that through yesterday morning while you were
asleep.”
“Didn’t I sleep though? It was shameful.”
“I’m awfully glad you did. Do you think you got enough last night? It was awfully early when I
woke you.”
“I had a wonderful sleep. Roger?”
“What, daughter?”
“We were mean to lie to that waitress.”
“She asked questions,” Roger said. “It was simpler that way.”
“Could you have been my father?”
“If I’d begot you at fourteen.”
“I’m glad you’re not,” she said. “God it would be complicated. It’s complicated enough I
suppose until I simplify it. Do you think I’ll bore you because I’m twenty-two and sleep all night long
and am hungry all the time?”
“And are the most beautiful girl I’ve ever seen and wonderful and strange as hell in bed and
always fun to talk to.”
“All right. Stop. Why am I strange in bed?”
“You are.”
“I said why?”
“I’m not an anatomist,” he said. “I’m just the guy that loves you.”
“Don’t you like to talk about it?”
“No. Do you?”
“No. I’m shy about it and very frightened. Always frightened.”
“My old Bratchen. We were lucky weren’t we?”
“Let’s not even talk about how lucky. Do you think Andy and Dave and Tom would mind?”
“No.”
“We ought to write to Tom.”
“We will.”
“What do you suppose he’s doing now?”
Roger looked through the wheel at the clock on the dashboard
“He will have finished painting and be having a drink.”
“Why don’t we have one?”
“Fine.”
She made the drinks in the cups putting in handfuls of the finely chipped ice, the whisky and
White Rock. The new highway was wide now and ran far and clear ahead through the forest of pines
that were tapped and scored for turpentine.
“It doesn’t look like the Landes does it,” Roger said and lifting the cup felt the drink icy in his
mouth. It was very good but the chipped ice melted fast.
“No. In the Landes there is yellow gorse in between the pines.”
“And they don’t work the trees for turpentine with chain gangs either,” Roger said. “This is all
convict labor country through here.”
“Tell me how they work it.”
“It’s pretty damned awful,” he said. “The state contracts them out to the turpentine and lumber
camps. They used to catch everyone off the trains during the worst of the Depression. All the people
riding the trains looking for work. Going east or west or south. They’d stop the trains right outside of
Tallahassee and round up the men and march them off to jail and then sentence them to chain gangs
and contract them out to the turpentine and lumber outfits. This is a wicked stretch of country. It’s old
and wicked with lots of law and no justice.”
“Pine country can be so friendly too.”
“This isn’t friendly. This is a bastard. There are lots of lawless people in it but the work is done
by the prisoners. It’s a slave country. The law’s only for outsiders.”
“I’m glad we’re going through it fast.”
“Yes. But we really ought to know it. How it’s run. How it works. Who are the crooks and the
tyrants and how to get rid of them.”
“I’d love to do that.”
“You ought to buck Florida politics some time and see what happens.”
“Is it really bad?”
“You couldn’t believe it.”
“Do you know much about it?”
“A little,” he said. “I bucked it for a while with some good people but we didn’t get anywhere.
We got the Bejesus beat out of us. On conversation.”
“Wouldn’t you like to be in politics?”
“No. I want to be a writer.”
“That’s what I want you to be.”
The road was unrolling now through some scattered hardwood and then across cypress swamps
and hammock country and then ahead there was an iron bridge across a clear, dark-watered stream,
beautiful and clear moving, with live oaks along its bank and a sign at the bridge that said it was the
Senwannee (sic) River.
They were on it and over it and up the bank beyond and the road had turned north.
“It was like a river in a dream,” Helena said. “Wasn’t it wonderful so clear and so dark?
Couldn’t we go down it in a canoe some time?”
“I’ve crossed it up above and it’s beautiful wherever you cross it.”
“Can’t we make a trip on it sometime?”
“Sure. There’s a place way up above where I’ve seen it as clear as a trout stream.”
“Wouldn’t there be snakes?”
“I’m pretty sure there’d be a lot.”
“I’m afraid of them. Really afraid of them. But we could be careful couldn’t we?”
“Sure. We ought to do it in the winter time.”
“There are such wonderful places for us to go,” she said. “I’ll always remember this river now
and we saw it only like the lens clicking in a camera. We should have stopped.”
“Do you want to go back?”
“Not until we come to it going the other way. I want to go on and on and on.”
“We’re either going to have to stop to get something to eat or else get sandwiches and eat them
while we drive.”
“Let’s have another drink,” she said. “And then get some sandwiches. What kind do you think
they’ll have?”
“They ought to have hamburgers and maybe barbecue.”
The second drink was like the first, icy cold but quick melting in the wind and Helena held the
cup out of the rush of the air and handed it to him when he drank.
“Daughter, are you drinking more than you usually do?”
“Of course. You didn’t think I drank a couple of cups of whisky and water every noon by myself
before lunch did you?”
“I don’t want you to drink more than you should.”
“I won’t. But it’s fun. If I don’t want one I won’t take one. I never knew about driving across the
country and having our drinks on the way.”
“We could have fun stopping and poking around. Going down to the coast and seeing the old
places. But I want us to get out west.”
“So do I. I’ve never seen it. We can always come back.”
“It’s such a long way. But this is so much more fun than flying.”
“This is flying. Roger, will it be wonderful out west?”
“It always is to me.”
“Isn’t it lucky I’ve never been out so we’ll have it together?”
“We’ve got a lot of country to get through first.”
“It’s going to be fun though. Do you think we’ll come to the sandwich town pretty soon?”
“We’ll take the next town.”
The next town was a lumbering town with one long street of frame and brick buildings along the
highway. The mills were by the railroad and lumber was piled high along the tracks and there was the
smell of cypress and pine sawdust in the heat. While Roger filled the gas and had the water, oil and
air checked Helena ordered hamburger sandwiches and barbecued pork sandwiches with hot sauce on
them in a lunch counter and brought them to the car in a brown paper bag. She had beer in another
paper sack.
Back on the highway again, and out of the heat of the town, they ate the sandwiches and drank
cold beer that the girl opened.
“I couldn’t get any of our marriage beer,” she said. “This was the only kind there was.”
“It’s good and cold. Wonderful after the barbecue.”
“The man said it was about like Regal. He said I’d never be able to tell it from Regal.”
“It’s better than Regal.”
“It had a funny name. It wasn’t a German name either. But the labels soaked off.”
“It’ll be on the caps.”
“I threw the caps away.”
“Wait till we get out west. They have better beer the further out you get.”
“I don’t think they could have any better sandwich buns or any better barbecue. Aren’t these
good?”
“They’re awfully good. This isn’t a part of the country where you eat very good either.”
“Roger, will you mind terribly if I go to sleep for a little while after lunch? I won’t if you’re
sleepy.”
“I’d love it if you went to sleep. I’m not sleepy at all really. I’d tell you if I was.”
“There’s another bottle of beer for you. Dammit I forgot to look at the cap.”
“That’s good. I like to drink it unknown.”
“But we could have remembered it for another time.”
“We’ll get another new one.”
“Roger, would you really not mind if I went to sleep?”
“No, beauty.”
“I can stay awake if you want.”
“Please sleep and you’ll wake up lonely and we can talk.”
“Good night, my dear Roger. Thank you very much for the trip and the two drinks and the
sandwiches and the unknown beer and the way down upon the Swanee River and for where we are
going.”
“You go to sleep, my baby.”
“I will. You wake me up if you want me.”
She slept curled up in the deep seat and Roger drove, watching the wide road ahead for stock,
making fast time through the pine country, trying to keep around seventy to try to see how much he
could get over sixty miles onto the speedometer in each hour. He had never been on this stretch of
highway but he knew this part of the state and he was driving it now only to put it behind him. You
shouldn’t have to waste country but on a long trip you have to.
The monotony tires you, he thought. That and the fact there are no vistas. This would be a fine
country on foot in cool weather but it is monotonous to drive through now.
I have not been driving long enough to settle into it yet. But I should have more resiliency than I
have. I’m not sleepy. My eyes are bored I guess as well as tired. I am not bored, he thought. It is just
my eyes and the fact that it is a long time since I have been sitting still so long. It is another game and
I’ll have to relearn it. About day after tomorrow we will start to make real distance and not be tired
by it. I haven’t sat still this long for a long time.
He reached forward and turned on the radio and tuned it. Helenadid not wake so he left it on and
let it blur in with his thinking and his driving.
It is awfully nice having her in the car asleep, he thought. She is good company even when she is
asleep. You are a strange and lucky bastard, he thought. You are having much better luck than you
deserve. You just thought you had learned something about being alone and you really worked at it
and you did learn something. You got right to the edge of something. Then you backslid and ran with
those worthless people, not quite as worthless as the other batch, but worthless enough and to spare.
Probably they were even more worthless. You certainly were worthless with them. Then you got
through that and got in fine shape with Tom and the kids and you knew you couldn’t be happier and
that there was nothing coming up except to be lonely again and then along comes this girl and you go
right into happiness as though it were a country you were the biggest landowner in. Happiness is prewar Hungary and you are Count Károlyi. Maybe not the biggest landowner but raised the most
pheasant anyway. I wonder if she will like to shoot pheasant. Maybe she will. I can still shoot them.
They don’t bother me. I never asked her if she could shoot. Her mother shot quite well in that
wonderful dope-head trance she had. She wasn’t a wicked woman at the start. She was a very nice
woman, pleasant and kind and successful in bed and I think she meant all the things she said to all the
people. I really think she meant them. That is probably what made it so dangerous. It always sounded
as though she meant them anyway. I suppose, though, it finally becomes a social defect to be unable to
believe any marriage has not really been consummated until the husband has committed suicide.
Things all ended so violently that started so pleasantly. But I suppose that is always the way with
drugs. Though I suppose among those spiders who eat their mates some of the mate eaters are
remarkably attractive. My dear she has never, really never, looked better. Dear Henry was just a
bonne bouche. Henry was nice too. You know how much we all liked him.
None of those spiders take drugs either, he thought. Of course that’s what I should remember
about this child, exactly as you should remember the stalling speed of a plane, that her mother was her
mother.
That’s all very simple, he thought. But you know your own mother was a bitch. But you also
know you are a bastard in quite different ways from her ways. So why should her stalling speed be
the same as her mother’s? Yours isn’t.
No one had ever said it was. Hers I mean. What you said was that you should remember her
mother as you would remember and so forth.
That’s dirty too, he thought. For nothing, for no reason, when you need it most you have this girl,
freely and of her own will, lovely, loving and full of illusions about you, and with her asleep beside
you on the seat you start destroying her and denying her without any formalities of cocks crowing,
twice nor thrice nor even on the radio.
You are a bastard, he thought and looked down at the girl asleep on the seat by him.
I suppose you start to destroy it for fear you will lose it, or that it will take too great a hold on
you, or in case it shouldn’t be true, but it is not very good to do. I would like to see you have
something besides your kids you did not destroy sometime. This girl’s mother was and is a bitch and
your mother was a bitch. That ought to bring you closer to her and make you understand her. That
doesn’t mean she has to be a bitch any more than you have to be a heel. She thinks you are a much
better guy than you are and maybe that will make you a better guy than you are. You’ve been good for
a long time now and maybe you can be good. As far as I know you haven’t done anything cruel since
that night on the dock with that citizen with the wife and the dog. You haven’t been drunk. You haven’t
been wicked. It’s a shame you’re not still in the church because you could make such a good
confession.
She sees you the way you are now and you are a good guy as of the last few weeks and she
probably thinks that is the way you have been all the time and that people just maligned you.
You really can start it all over now. You really can. Please don’t be silly, another part of him
said. You really can, he said to himself. You can be just as good a guy as she thinks you are and as
you are at this moment. There is such a thing as starting it all over and you’ve been given a chance to
and you can do it and you will do it. Will you make all the promises again? Yes. If necessary I will
make all the promises and I will keep them. Not all the promises? Knowing you have broken them?
He could not say anything to that. You mustn’t be a crook before you start . No. I mustn’t. Say what
you can truly do each day and then do it. Each day. Do it a day at a time and keep each day’s
promises to her and to yourself. That way I can start it all new, he thought, and still be straight.
You’re getting to be an awful moralist, he thought. If you don’t watch out you will bore her.
When weren’t you always a moralist? At different times. Don’t fool yourself. Well, at different
places then. Don’t fool yourself.
All right, Conscience, he said. Only don’t be so solemn and didactic. Get a load of this,
Conscience old friend, I know how useful and important you are and how you could have kept me out
of all the trouble I have been in but couldn’t you have a little lighter touch about it? I know that
conscience speaks in italics but sometimes you seem to speak in very boldfaced Gothic script. I
would take it just as well from you, Conscience, if you did not try to scare me; just as I would
consider the Ten Commandments just as seriously if they were not presented as graven on stone
tablets. You know. Conscience, it has been a long time since we were frightened by the thunder. Now
with the lightning: There you have something. But the thunder doesn’t impress us so much any more.
I’m trying to help you, you son of a bitch, his conscience said.
The girl was still sleeping and they were coming up the hill into Tallahassee. She will probably
wake when we stop at the first light, he thought. But she did not and he drove through the old town and
turned off to the left on U.S. 319 straight south and into the beautiful wooded country that ran down
toward the Gulf Coast.
There’s one thing about you, daughter, he thought. Not only can you outsleep anybody I’ve ever
known and have the best appetite I’ve ever seen linked with a build like yours but you have an
absolutely heaven-given ability to not have to go to the bathroom.
Their room was on the fourteenth floor and it was not very cool. But with the fans on and the
windows open it was better and when the bellboy had gone out Helena said, “Don’t be disappointed,
darling. Please. It’s lovely.”
“I thought I could get you an air-conditioned one.”
“They’re awful to sleep in really. Like being in a vault. This will be fine.”
“We could have tried the other two. But they know me there.”
“They’ll know us both here now. What’s our name?”
“Mr. and Mrs. Robert Harris.”
“That’s a splendid name. We must try to live up to it. Do you want to bathe first?”
“No. You.”
“All right. I’m going to really bathe though.”
“Go ahead. Go to sleep in the tub if you want.”
“I may. I didn’t sleep all day did I?”
“You were wonderful. There was some pretty dull going too.”
“It wasn’t bad. Lots of it was lovely. But New Orleans isn’t really the way I thought it would be.
Did you always know it was so flat and dull? I don’t know what I expected. Marseilles I suppose.
And to see the river.”
“It’s only to eat and drink in. The part right around here doesn’t look so bad at night. It’s really
sort of nice.”
“Let’s not go out until it’s dark. It’s all right around here. Some of it is lovely.”
“We’ll have that and then, in the morning, we’ll be on our way.”
“That only leaves time for one meal.”
“That’s all right. We’ll come back in cold weather when we can really eat. Darling,” she said.
“This is the first sort of letdown we’ve had. So let’s not let it let us down. We’ll have long baths and
some drinks and a meal twice as expensive as we can afford and we’ll go to bed and make wonderful
love.”
“The hell with New Orleans in the movies,” Roger said. “We’ll have New Orleans in bed.”
“Eat first. Didn’t you order some White Rock and ice?”
“Yes. Do you want a drink?”
“No. I was just worried about you.”
“It will be along,” Roger said. There was a knock at the door. “Here it is. You get started on the
tub.”
“It’s going to be wonderful,” she said. “There will just be my nose out of water and the tips of
my breasts maybe and my toes and I’m going to have it just as cold as it will run.”
The bellboy brought the pitcher of ice, the bottled water and the papers, took his tip and went
out.
Roger made a drink and settled down to read. He was tired and it felt good to lie back on the bed
with two pillows folded under his neck and read the evening and the morning papers. Things were not
so good in Spain but it had not really taken shape yet. He read all the Spanish news carefully in the
three papers and then read the other cable news and then the local news.
“Are you all right, darling?” Helena called from the bathroom.
“I’m wonderful.”
“Have you undressed?”
“Yes.”
“Do you have anything on?”
“No.”
“Are you very brown?”
“Still.”
“Do you know where we swam this morning was the loveliest beach I’ve ever seen.”
“I wonder how it can get so white and so floury.”
“Darling are you very, very brown?”
“Why?”
“I was just thinking about you.”
“Being in cold water’s supposed to be good for that.’
“I’m brown under the water. You’d like it.”
“I like it.”
“You keep on reading,” she said. “You are reading aren’t you?”
“Yes.”
“Is Spain all right?”
“No.”
“I’m so sorry. Is it very bad?”
“No. Not yet. Really.”
“Roger?”
“Yes.”
“Do you love me?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“You go back and read now. I’ll think about that here underwater.”
Roger lay back and listened to the noises that came up from the street below and read the papers
and drank his drink. This was almost the best hour of the day. It was the hour he had always gone to
the café alone when he had lived in Paris, to read the evening papers and have his aperitif. This town
was nothing like Paris nor was it like Orleans either. Orleans wasn’t much of a town either. It was
pleasant enough though. Probably a better town to live in than this one. He didn’t know the environs
of this town though and he knew he was stupid about it.
He had always liked New Orleans, the little that he knew of it, but it was a letdown to anyone
who expected very much. And this certainly was not the month to hit it in.
The best time he had ever hit it was with Andy one time in the winter and another time driving
through with David. The time going north with Andy they had not come through New Orleans. They
had bypassed it to the north to save time and driven north of Lake Pontchartrain and across through
Hammond to Baton Rouge on a new road that was being built so they made many detours and then
they had gone north through Mississippi in the southern edge of the blizzard that was coming down
from the north. When they had hit New Orleans was coming south again. But it was still cold and they
had a wonderful time eating and drinking and the city had seemed gay and sharp with cold, instead of
moist and damp and Andy had roamed all the antique shops and bought a sword with his Christmas
money. He kept the sword in the luggage compartment behind the seat in the car and slept with it in his
bed at night.
When he and David had come through it had been in the winter and they had made their
headquarters in that restaurant he would have to try to find, the non-tourist one. He remembered it as
in a cellar and having teakwood tables and chairs or else they sat on benches. It was probably not like
that and was like a dream and he did not remember its name nor where it was located except he
thought it was in the opposite direction from Antoine’s, on an east and west, not a north and south
street, and he and David had stayed in there two days. He probably had it mixed up with some other
place. There was a place in Lyons and another near the Parc Monceau that always were merged in his
dreams. That was one of the things about being drunk when you were young. You made places in your
mind that afterwards you could never find and they were better than any places could ever be. He
knew he hadn’t been to this place with Andy though.
“I’m coming out,” she said.
“Feel how cool,” she said on the bed. “Feel how cool all the way down. No don’t go away. I
like you.”
“No. Let me take a shower.”
“If you want. But I’d rather not. You don’t wash the pickled onions do you before you put them in
the cocktail? You don’t wash the vermouth do you?”
“I wash the glass and the ice.”
“It’s different. You’re not the glass and the ice. Roger, please do that again. Isn’t again a nice
word?”
“Again and again,” he said.
So tly he felt the lovely curve from her hip bone up under her ribs and the apple slope of her
breasts.
“I it a good curve?”
He kissed her breasts and she said, “Be awfully careful when they’re so cold. Be very careful
and kind. Do you know about them aching?”
“Yes,” he said. “I know about aching.”
Then she said, “The other one is jealous.”
Later she said, “They didn’t plan things right for me to have two breasts and you only one way to
kiss. They made everything so far apart.”
His hand covered the other, the pressure between the fingers barely touching and then his lips
wandered up over all the lovely coolness and met hers. They met and brushed very lightly, sweeping
from side to side, losing nothing of the lovely outer screen and then he kissed her.
“Oh darling,” she said. “Oh please darling. My dearest kind lovely love. Oh please, please,
please my dear love.”
After quite a long time she said, “I’m so sorry if I was selfish about your bath. But when I came
out of mine I was selfish.”
“You weren’t selfish.”
“Roger, do you still love me?”
“Yes, daughter.”
“Do you change how you feel afterwards?”
“No,” he lied.
“I don’t at all. I just feel better afterwards. I mustn’t tell you.”
“You tell me.”
“No. I won’t tell you too much. But we do have a lovely time don’t we?”
“Yes,” he said very truthfully.
“After we bathe we can go out.”
“I’ll go now.”
“You know maybe we ought to stay tomorrow. I ought to have my nails done and my hair
washed. I can do it all myself but you might like it better done properly. That way we could sleep late
and then have part of one day in town and then leave the next morning.”
“That would be good.”
“I like New Orleans now. Don’t you?”
“New Orleans is wonderful. It’s changed a lot since we came here.”
“I’ll go in. I’ll only be a minute. Then you can bathe.”
“I only want a shower.”
Afterwards they went down in the elevator. There were Negro girls who ran the elevators and
they were pretty. The elevator was full with a party from the floor above so they went down fast.
Going down in the elevator made him feel hollower than ever inside. He felt Helena against him
where they were crowded.
“If you ever get so that you don’t feel anything when you see flying fish go out of water or when
an elevator drops you better turn in your suit,” he said to her.
“I feel it still,” she said. “Are those the only things you have to turn in your suit for?”
The door had opened and they were crossing the old-fashioned marble lobby crowded at this
hour with people waiting for other people, people waiting to go to dinner, people just waiting, and
Roger said, “Walk ahead and let me see you.”
“Where do I walk to?”
“Straight toward the door of the air-conditioned bar.”
He caught her at the door.
“You’re beautiful. You walk wonderfully and if I were here and saw you now for the first time
I’d be in love with you.”
“If I saw you across the room I’d be in love with you.”
“If I saw you for the first time everything would turn over inside of me and I’d ache right through
my chest.”
“That’s the way I feel all of the time.”
“You can’t feel that way all of the time.”
“Maybe not. But I can feel that way an awfully big part of the time.”
“Daughter, isn’t New Orleans a fine place?”
“Weren’t we lucky to come here?”
It felt very cold in the big high-ceilinged, pleasant, dark-wood panelled bar room and Helena,
sitting beside Roger at a table, said, “Look,” and showed him the tiny prickles of gooseflesh on her
brown arm. “You can do that to me too,” she said. “But this time it’s air conditioning.”
“It’s really cold. It feels wonderful.”
“What should we drink?”
“Should we get tight?”
“Let’s gel a little tight.”
“I’ll drink absinthe then.”
“Do you think I should?”
“Why don’t you try it. Didn’t you ever?”
“No. I was saving it to drink with you.”
“Don’t make up things.”
“It’s not made up. I truly did.”
“Daughter, don’t make up a lot of things.”
“It’s not made up. I didn’t save my maidenly state because I thought it would bore you and
besides I gave you up for a while. But I did save absinthe. Truly.”
“Do you have any real absinthe?” Roger asked the bar waiter.
“It’s not supposed to be,” the waiter said. “But I have some.”
“The real Couvet Pontarlier sixty-eighth-degree? Not the Tarragova?”
“Yes, sir,” the waiter said. “I can’t bring you the bottle. It will be in an ordinary Pernod bottle.”
“I can tell it,” Roger said.
“I believe you, sir,” the waiter said. “Do you want a frappe or drip?”
“Straight drip. You have the dripping saucers?”
“Naturally, sir.”
“Without sugar.”
“Won’t the lady want sugar, sir?”
“No. We’ll let her try it without.”
“Very good, sir.”
er the waiter was gone Roger took Helena’s hand under the table. “Hello my beauty.”
“This is wonderful. Us here and this good old poison coming and we’ll eat in some fine place.”
“And then go to bed”
“Do you like bed as much as all that?”
“I never did. But I do now.’
“Why did you never?”
“Let’s not talk about it.”
“We won’t.”
“I don’t ask you about everyone you’ve been in love with. We don’t have to talk about London
do we?”
“No. We can talk about you and how beautiful you are. You know you still move like a colt?”
“Roger, tell me, did I really walk so it pleased you?”
“You walk so that it breaks my heart.”
“All I do is keep my shoulders back and my head straight up and walk. I know there are tricks I
ought to know.”
“When you look the way you do, daughter, there aren’t any tricks. You’re so beautiful that I’d be
happy just to look at you.”
“Not permanently I hope.”
“Daytimes,” he said. “Look, daughter. The one thing about absinthe is that you have to drink it
awfully slowly. It won’t taste strong mixed with the water but you have to believe it is.”
“I believe. Credo Roger.”
“I hope you’ll never change it the way Lady Caroline did.”
“I’ll never change it except for cause. But you’re not like him at all.”
“I wouldn’t want to be.”
“You’re not. Someone tried to tell me you were at college. They meant it as a compliment I think
but I was terribly angry and made an awful row with the English professor. They made us read you
you know. I mean they made the others read it. I’d read it all. There isn’t very much, Roger. Don’t you
think you ought to work more?”
“I’m going to work now as soon as we get out west.”
“Maybe we shouldn’t stay tomorrow then. I’ll be so happy when you work.”
“Happier than now?”
“Yes,” she said. “Happier than now.”
“I’ll work hard. You’ll see.”
“Roger, do you think I’m bad for you? Do I make you drink or make love more than you should?”
“No, daughter.”
“I’m awfully glad if it’s true because I want to be good for you. I know it’s a weakness and
silliness but I make up stories to myself in the daytime and in one of them I save your life. Sometimes
it’s from drowning and sometimes from in from of a train and sometimes in a plane and sometimes in
the mountains. You can laugh if you want. And then there is one where I come into your life when you
are disgusted and disappointed with all women and you love me so much and I take such good care of
you that you get an epoch of writing wonderfully. That’s a wonderful one. I was making it up again
today in the car.”
“That’s one I’m pretty sure I’ve seen in the movies or read somewhere.”
“Oh I know. I’ve seen it there too. And I’m sure I’ve read it too. But don’t you think it happens?
Don’t you think I could be good for you? Not in a wishy-washy way or by giving you a little baby but
really good for you so you’d write better than you ever wrote and be happy at the same time?”
“They do it in pictures. Why shouldn’t we do it?”
The absinthe had come and from the saucers of cracked ice placed over the top of the glasses
water, that Roger added from a small pitcher, was dripping down into the clear yellowish liquor
turning it to an opalescent milkiness.
“Try that,” Roger said when it was the right cloudy color.
“It’s very strange,” the girl said. “And warming in the stomach. It tastes like medicine.”
“It is medicine. Pretty strong medicine.”
“I don’t really need medicine yet,” the girl said. “But this is awfully good. When will we be
tight?”
“Almost any time. I’m going to have three. You take what you want. But take them slow.”
“I’ll see how I do. I don’t know anything about it yet except that it’s like medicine. Roger?”
“Yes, daughter.”
He was feeling the warmth of the alchemist’s furnace starting at the pit of his stomach.
“Roger, don’t you think I really could be good for you the way I was in the story I made up?”
“I think we could be good to each other and for each other. But I don’t like it to be on a basis of
stories. I think the story business is bad.”
“But you see that’s the way I am. I’m a story-maker-upper and I’m romantic I know. But that’s
how I am. If I was practical I’d never have come to Bimini.”
I don’t know, Roger thought to himself. If that was what you wanted to do that was quite
practical. You didn’t just make up a story about it. And the other part of him thought: You must be
slipping you bastard if the absinthe can bring the heel in you out that quickly. But what he said was, “I
don’t know, daughter. I think the story business is dangerous. First you could make up stories about
something innocuous, like me, and then there could be all sorts of other stories. There might be bad
ones.”
“You’re not so innocuous.”
“Oh yes I am. Or the stories are anyway. Saving me is fairly innocuous. But first you might be
saving me and then next you might be saving the world. Then you might start saving yourself.”
“I’d like to save the world. I always wished I could. That’s awfully big to make a story about.
But I want to save you first.”
“I’m getting scared,” Roger said.
He drank some more of the absinthe and he felt better but he was worried.
“Have you always made up the stories?”
“Since I can remember. I’ve made them up about you for twelve years. I didn’t tell you all the
ones. There are hundreds of them.”
“Why don’t you write instead of making up the stories?”
“I do write. But it’s not as much fun as making up the stories and it’s much harder. Then they’re
not nearly as good. The ones I make up are wonderful.”
“But you’re always the heroine in the stories you write?”
“No. It’s not that simple.”
“Well let’s not worry about it now.” He took another sip of the absinthe and rolled it under his
tongue.
“I never worried about it at all,” the girl said. “What I wanted, always, was you and now I’m
with you. Now I want you to be a great writer.”
“Maybe we’d better not even stop for dinner,” he said. He was still very worried and the
absinthe warmth had moved up to his head now and he did not trust it there. He said to himself. What
did you think could happen that would not have consequences? What woman in the world did you
think could be as sound as a good secondhand Buick car? You’ve only known two sound women in
your life and you lost them both. What will she want after that? And the other part of his brain said,
Hail heel. The absinthe certainly brought you out early tonight.
So he said, “Daughter, for now, let’s just try to be good to each other and love each other” (he
got the word out though the absinthe made it a difficult word for him to articulate) “and as soon as we
get out where we are going I will work just as hard and as well as I can.”
“That’s lovely,” she said. “And you don’t mind my telling you I made up stories?”
“No,” he lied. “They were very nice stories.” Which was true.
“Can I have another?” she asked.
“Sure.” He wished now they had never taken it although it was the drink he loved best of almost
any in the world. But almost everything bad that had ever happened to him had happened when he was
drinking absinthe; those bad things which were his own fault. He could tell that she knew something
was wrong and he pulled hard against himself so that there would be nothing wrong.
“I didn’t say something I shouldn’t did I?”
“No, daughter. Here’s to you.”
“Here’s to us.”
The second one always tastes better than the first because certain taste buds are numbed against
the bitterness of the wormwood so that without becoming sweet, or even sweeter, it becomes less
bitter and there are parts of the tongue that enjoy it more.
“It is strange and wonderful. But all it does so far is just bring us to the edge of
misunderstanding,” the girl said.
“I know,” he said. “Let’s stick together through it.”
“Was it that you thought I was ambitious?”
“It’s all right about the stories.”
“No. It’s not all right with you. I couldn’t love you as much as I do and not know when you’re
upset.”
“I’m not upset,” he lied. “And I’m not going to be upset,” he resolved. “Let’s talk about
something else.”
“It will be wonderful when we’re out there and you can work.”
She is a little obtuse, he thought. Or maybe does it affect her that way? But he said, “It will be.
But you won’t be bored?”
“Of course not.”
“I work awfully hard when I work.”
“I’ll work too.”
“That will be fun,” he said. “Like Mr. and Mrs. Browning. I never saw the play.”
“Roger, do you have to make fun of it?”
“I don’t know.” Now pull yourself together, he said to himself. Now is the time to pull yourself
together. Be good now. “I make fun of everything,’ he said “I think it will be fine. And it’s much
better for you to be working when ’m writing.”
“Will you mind reading mine sometimes?”
“No. I’ll love to.”
‘Really?”
“No. Of course. I’ll be really happy to. Really.”
‘When you drink this it makes you feel as though you could do anything,” the girl said. “I’m
awfully glad I never drank it before. Do you mind if we talk about writing, Roger?”
“Hell no.”
“Why did you say ‘Hell no’?”
‘I don’t know,” he said. “Let’s talk about writing. Really I mean it. What about writing?”
“Now you’ve made me feel like a fool. You don’t have to take me in as an equal or a partner. I
only meant I’d like to talk about it if you’d like to.”
“Let’s talk about it. What about it?”
The girl began to cry, sitting straight up and looking at him. She did not sob nor turn her head
away. She just looked at him and tears came down her cheeks and her mouth grew fuller but it did not
twist nor break.
“Please, daughter,” he said. “Please. Let’s talk about it or anything else and I’ll be friendly.”
She bit her lip and then said, “I suppose I wanted to be partners even though I said I didn’t.”
I guess that was part of the dream and why the hell shouldn’t it be? Roger thought. What do you
have to hurt her for you bastard? Be good now fast before you hurt her.
“You see I’d like to have you not just like me in bed but like me in the head and like to talk about
things that interest us both.”
“We will,” he said. “We will now. Bratchen daughter, what about writing, my dear beauty?”
“What I wanted to tell you was that drinking this made me feel the way I feel when I am going to
write. That I could do anything and that I can write wonderfully. Then I write and it’s just dull. The
truer I try to make it the duller it is. And when it isn’t true it’s silly.”
“Give me a kiss.”
“Here?”
“Yes.”
He leaned over the table and kissed her. “You’re awfully beautiful when you cry.”
“I’m awfully sorry I cried,” she said. “You don’t really mind if we talk about it do you?”
“Of course not.”
“You see that was one of the parts of it I’d looked forward to.”
Yes, I guess it was, he thought. Well why shouldn’t it be? And we’ll do it. Maybe I will get to
like it.
“What was it about writing?” he said. “Besides how it seems it’s going to be wonderful and then
it turns out dull?”
“Wasn’t it that way with you when you started?”
“No. When I started I’d feel as though I could do anything and while I was doing it I would feel
like I was making the whole world and when I would read it I would think this is so good I couldn’t
have written it. I must have read it somewhere. Probably in the Saturday Evening Post.”
“Weren’t you ever discouraged?”
‘Not when I started. I thought I was writing the greatest stories ever written and that people just
didn’t have sense enough to know it.”
“Were you really that conceited?”
“Worse probably. Only I didn’t think I was conceited. I was just confident.”
“If those were your first stories, the ones I read, you had a right to be confident.”
“They weren’t,” he said. “All those first confident stories were lost. The ones you read were
when I wasn’t confident at all.”
“How were they lost, Roger?”
“It’s an awful story. I’ll tell it to you sometime
“Wouldn’t you tell it to me now?”
“I hate to because it’s happened to other people and to better writers than I am and that makes it
sound as though it were made up. There’s no reason for it ever happening and yet it’s happened many
times and it still hurts like a bastard. No it doesn’t really. It has a scar over it now. A good thick
scar.”
“Please tell me about it. If it’s a scar and not a scab it won’t hurt to will it?”
“No, daughter. Well I was very methodical in those days and I kept original manuscripts in one
cardboard folder and typed originals in another and carbons in another. I guess it wasn’t so cockeyed
methodical. I don’t know how else you’d do it. Oh the hell with this story.”
“No tell me.”
“Well I was working at the Lausanne Conference and it was the holidays coming up and
Andrew’s mother who was a lovely girl and very beautiful and kind—”
“I was never jealous of her,” the girl said. “I was jealous of David’s and Tom’s mother.”
“You shouldn’t be jealous of either of them. They were both wonderful.”
“I was jealous of Dave’s and Tom’s mother,” Helena said. “I’m not now.”
“That’s awfully white of you,” Roger said. “Maybe we ought to send her a cable.”
“Go on with the story, please, and don’t be bad.”
“All right. The aforesaid Andy’s mother thought she would bring down my stuff so I could have
it with me and be able to do some work while we had the holiday together. She was going to bring it
to me as a surprise. She hadn’t written anything about it and when I met her at Lausanne I didn’t know
anything about it. She was a day late and had wired about it. The only thing I knew was that she was
crying when I met her and she cried and cried and when I would ask her what was the matter she told
me it was too awful to tell me and then she would cry again. She cried as though her heart was
broken. Do I have to tell this story?”
“Please tell me.”
“All that morning she would not tell me and I thought of all the worst possible things that could
have happened and asked her if they had happened. But she just shook her head. The worst thing I
could think of was that she had tromper-ed me or fallen in love with someone else and when I asked
her that she said, ‘Oh how can you say that?’ and cried some more. I felt relieved then and then,
finally, she told me.
“She had packed all the manuscript folders in a suitcase and left the suitcase with her other bags
in her first class compartment in the Paris-Lausanne-Milan Express in the Gare de Lyon while she
went out on the quai to buy a London paper and a bottle of Evian water. You remember the Gare de
Lyon and how they would have sort of push tables with papers and magazines and mineral water and
small flasks of cognac and sandwiches with ham between sliced long pointed-end bread wrapped in
paper and other push carts with pillows and blankets that you rented? Well when she got back into the
compartment with her paper and her Evian water the suitcase was gone.
“She did everything there was to be done. You know the French police. The first thing she had to
do was show her carte d’identité and try to prove she was not an international crook herself and that
she did not suffer from hallucinations and that she was sure she actually had such a suitcase and were
the papers of political importance and besides, madame, surely there exist copies. She had that all
night and the next day when a detective came and searched the flat for the suitcase and found a shotgun
of mine and demanded to know if I had a permis de chasse I think there was some doubt in the minds
of the police whether she should be allowed to proceed to Lausanne and she said the detective had
followed her to the train and appeared in the compartment just before the train pulled out and said,
‘You are quite sure madame that all your baggage is intact now? That you have not lost anything else?
No other important papers?’
“So I said, ‘But it’s all right really. You can’t have brought the originals and the typed originals
and the carbons.’
“‘But I did,’ she said. ‘Roger, I know I did.’ It was true too. I found out it was true when I went
up to Paris to see. I remember walking up the stairs and opening the door to the flat, unlocking it and
pulling back on the brass handle of the sliding lock and the odor of Eau de Tavel in the kitchen and the
dust that had sifted in through the windows on the table in the dining room and going to the cupboard
where I kept the stuff in the dining room and it was all gone. I was sure it would be there; that some of
the manila folders would be there because I could see them there so clearly in my mind. But there was
nothing there at all, not even my paper clips in a cardboard box nor my pencils and erasers nor my
pencil sharpener that was shaped like a fish, nor my envelopes with the return address typed in the
upper left-hand corner, nor my international postage coupons that you enclosed for them to send the
manuscripts back with and that were kept in a small Persian lacquered box that had a pornographic
painting inside of it. They were all gone. They had all been packed in the suitcase. Even the red stick
of wax was gone that I had used to seal letters and packages. I stood there and looked at the painting
inside the Persian box and noticed the curious over-proportion of the parts represented that always
characterizes pornography and I remember thinking how much I disliked pornographic pictures and
painting and writing and how after this box had been given to me by a friend on his return from Persia
I had only looked at the painted interior once to please the friend and that after that I had only used the
box as a convenience to keep coupons and stamps in and had never seen the pictures. I felt almost as
though I could not breathe when I saw that there really were no folders with originals, nor folders
with typed copies, nor folders with carbons and then I locked the door of the cupboard and went into
the next room, which was the bedroom, and lay down on the bed and put a pillow between my legs
and my arms around another pillow and lay there very quietly. I had never put a pillow between my
legs before and I had never lain with my arms around a pillow but now I needed them very badly. I
knew everything I had ever written and everything that I had great confidence in was gone. I had
rewritten them so many times and gotten them just how I wanted them and I knew I could not write
them again because once I had them right I forgot them completely and each time I ever read them I
wondered at them and at how I had ever done them.
“So I lay there without moving with the pillows for friends and I was in despair. I had never had
despair before, true despair, nor have I ever had it since. My forehead lay against the Persian shawl
that covered the bed, which was only a mattress and springs set on the floor and the bed cover was
dusty too and I smelt the dust and lay there with my despair and the pillows were my only comfort.”
“What were they that were gone,” the girl asked.
“Eleven stories, a novel, and poems.”
“Poor poor Roger.”
“No. I wasn’t so poor because there were more inside. Not them. But to come. But I was in bad
shape. You see I hadn’t believed they could be gone. Not everything.”
“What did you do?”
“Nothing very practical. I lay there for a while.”
“Did you cry?”
“No. I was all dried up inside like the dust in the house. Weren’t you ever in despair?”
“Of course. In London. But I could cry.”
“I’m sorry, daughter. I got to thinking about this thing and I forgot. I’m awfully sorry.”
“What did you do?”
“Let’s see I got up and went down the stairs and spoke to the concierge and she asked me about
madame. She was worried because the police had been to the flat and had asked her questions but she
was still cordial. She asked me if we had found the valise that had been stolen and I said no and she
said it was dirty luck and a great misfortune and was it true that all my works were in it. I said yes
and she said but how was it there were no copies? I said the copies were there too. Then she said
Mais ça alors. Why were copies made to lose them with the originals? I said madame had packed
them by mistake. It was a great mistake, she said. A fatal mistake. But monsieur can remember them
surely. No, I said. But, she said, monsieur will have to remember them. Il faut le souvienne rappeler.
Oui, I said, mais ce n’est pas possible. Je ne m’en souviens plus. Mais il faut faire un ef ort, she
said. Je le ferais, I said. But it’s useless. Mais qu’est-ce que monsieur va faire? she asked.
Monsieur has worked here for three years. I have seen monsieur work at the café on the corner. I’ve
seen monsieur at work at the table in the dining room when I’ve brought things up. Je sais que
monsieur travaille comme un sourd. Qu’es-ce que il faut faire maintenant? Il faut recommencer, I
said. Then the concierge started to cry. I put my arm around her and she smelled of armpit sweat and
dust and old black clothes and her hair smelled rancid and she cried with her head on my chest. Were
there poems too? she asked. Yes, I said. What unhappiness, she said. But you can recall those surely.
Je tâcherai de la faire, I said. Do it, she said. Do it tonight.
“I will, I told her. Oh monsieur, she said, madame is beautiful and amiable and tous le qui’il y a
de gentil but what a grave error it was. Will you drink a glass of marc with me? Of course, I told her,
and, sniffing, she left my chest to find the bottle and the two small glasses. To the new works, she
said. To them, I said. Monsieur will be a member of the Académie Française. No, I said. The
Académie Americaine, she said. Would you prefer rum? I have some rum. No, I said. Marc is very
good. Good, she said. Another glass. Now, she said, go out and get yourself drunk and, since
Marcelle is not coming to do the flat, as soon as my husband comes in to hold down this dirty loge I
will go upstairs and clean the place up for you to sleep tonight. Do you want me to buy anything for
you? Do you want me to make breakfast? I asked her. Certainly, she said. Give me ten francs and I’ll
bring you the change. I’d make you dinner but you ought to eat out tonight. Even though it is more
expensive. Allez voir des amis et manger quelque part. If it wasn’t for my husband I’d come with
you.
“Come on and have a drink at the Café des Amateurs now, I said. We’ll have a hot grog. No I
can’t leave this cage until my husband comes, she said. Débine-toi maintenant. Leave me the key. It
will all be in order when you get back.
“She was a fine woman and I felt better already because I knew there was only one thing to do;
to start over. But I did not know if I could do it. Some of the stories had been about boxing, and some
about baseball and others about horse racing. They were the things I had known best and had been
closest to and several were about the first war. Writing them I had felt all the emotion I had to feel
about those things and I had put it all in and all the knowledge of them that I could express and I had
rewritten and rewritten until it was all in them and all gone out of me Because I had worked on
newspapers since I was very young I could never remember anything once I had written it down; as
each day you wiped your memory clear with writing as you might wipe a blackboard clear with a
sponge or a wet rag; and I still had that evil habit and now it had caught up with me.
“But the concierge, and the smell of the concierge, and her practicality and determination hit my
despair as a nail might hit it if it were driven in cleanly and soundly and I thought I must do something
about this; something practical; something that will be good for me even if it cannot help about the
stories. Already I was half glad the novel was gone because I could see already, as you begin to see
clearly over the water when a rainstorm lifts on the ocean as the wind carries it out to sea, that I could
write a better novel. But I missed the stories as though they were a combination of my house, and my
job, my only gun, my small savings and my wife; also my poems. But the despair was going and there
was only missing now as after a great loss. Missing is very bad too.”
“I know about missing,” the girl said.
“Poor daughter,” he said. “Missing is bad. But it doesn’t kill you. But despair would kill you in
just a little time.”
“Really kill you?”
“I think so,” he said.
“Can we have another?” she asked. “Will you tell me the rest? This is the sort of thing I always
wondered about.”
“We can have another,” Roger said. “And I’ll tell you the rest if it doesn’t bore you.”
“Roger, you mustn’t say that about boring me.”
“I bore the hell out of myself sometimes,” he said. “So it seemed normal I might bore you.”
“Please make the drink and then tell me what happened.”
THE OLD MAN AND THE SEA

He was an old man who fished alone in a skiff in the Gulf Stream and he had gone eighty-four days now without taking a fish. In the first forty days a boy had been with him. But after forty days without a fish the boy's parents had told him that the old man was now definitely and finally salao, which is the worst form of unlucky, and the boy had gone at their orders in another boat which caught three good fish the first week. It made the boy sad to see the old man come in each day with his skiff empty and he always went down to help him carry either the coiled lines or the gaff and harpoon and the sail that was furled around the mast. The sail was patched with flour sacks and, furled, it looked like the flag of permanent defeat.

The old man was thin and gaunt with deep wrinkles in the back of his neck. The brown blotches of the benevolent skin cancer the sun brings from its reflection on the tropic sea were on his cheeks. The blotches ran well down the sides of his face and his hands had the deep-creased scars from handling heavy fish on the cords. But none of these scars were fresh. They were as old as erosions in a fishless desert.

Everything about him was old except his eyes and they were the same color as the sea and were cheerful and undefeated.

"Santiago," the boy said to him as they climbed the bank from where the skiff was hauled up. "I could go with you again. We've made some money."

The old man had taught the boy to fish and the boy loved him.

"No," the old man said. "You're with a lucky boat. Stay with them."

"But remember how you went eighty-seven days without fish and then we caught big ones every day for three weeks."

"I remember," the old man said. "I know you did not leave me because you doubted."

"It was papa made me leave. I am a boy and I must obey him."

"I know," the old man said. "It is quite normal."

"He hasn't much faith."

"No," the old man said. "But we have. Haven't we?"

"Yes," the boy said. "Can I offer you a beer on the Terrace and then we'll take the stuff home."

"Why not?" the old man said. "Between fishermen."

They sat on the Terrace and many of the fishermen made fun of the old man and he was not angry. Others, of the older fishermen, looked at him and were sad. But they did not show it and they spoke politely about the current and the depths they had drifted their lines at and the steady good weather and of what they had seen. The successful fishermen of that day were already in and had butchered their marlin out and carried them laid full length across two planks, with two men staggering at the end of each plank, to the fish house where they waited for the ice truck to carry them to the market in Havana. Those who had caught sharks had taken them to the shark factory on the other side of the cove where they were hoisted on a block and tackle, their livers removed, their fins cut off and their hides skinned out and their flesh cut into strips for salting.

When the wind was in the east a smell came across the harbour from the shark factory; but today there was only the faint edge of the odour because the wind had backed into the north and then dropped off and it was pleasant and sunny on the Terrace.

"Santiago," the boy said.

"Yes," the old man said. He was holding his glass and thinking of many years ago.

"Can I go out to get sardines for you for tomorrow?"

"No. Go and play baseball. I can still row and Rogelio will throw the net."

"I would like to go. If I cannot fish with you, I would like to serve in some way."

"You bought me a beer," the old man said. "You are already a man."

"How old was I when you first took me in a boat?"

"Five and you nearly were killed when I brought the fish in too green and he nearly tore the boat to pieces. Can you remember?"

"I can remember the tail slapping and banging and the thwart breaking and the noise of the clubbing. I can remember you throwing me into the bow where the wet coiled lines were and feeling the whole boat shiver and the noise of you clubbing him like chopping a tree down and the sweet blood smell all over me."

"Can you really remember that or did I just tell it to you?"

"I remember everything from when we first went together."

The old man looked at him with his sun-burned, confident loving eyes.

"If you were my boy I'd take you out and gamble," he said. "But you are your father's and your mother's and you are in a lucky boat."

"May I get the sardines? I know where I can get four baits too."

"I have mine left from today. I put them in salt in the box."

"Let me get four fresh ones."

"One," the old man said. His hope and his confidence had never gone. But now they were freshening as when the breeze rises.

"Two," the boy said.

"Two," the old man agreed. "You didn't steal them?"

"I would," the boy said. "But I bought these."

"Thank you," the old man said. He was too simple to wonder when he had attained humility. But he knew he had attained it and he knew it was not disgraceful and it carried no loss of true pride.

"Tomorrow is going to be a good day with this current," he said.

"Where are you going?" the boy asked.

"Far out to come in when the wind shifts. I want to be out before it is light."

"I'll try to get him to work far out," the boy said. "Then if you hook something truly big we can come to your aid."

"He does not like to work too far out."

"No," the boy said. "But I will see something that he cannot see such as a bird working and get him to come out after dolphin."

"Are his eyes that bad?"

"He is almost blind."

"It is strange," the old man said. "He never went turtle-ing. That is what kills the eyes."

"But you went turtle-ing for years off the Mosquito Coast and your eyes are good."

"I am a strange old man."

"But are you strong enough now for a truly big fish?"

"I think so. And there are many tricks."

"Let us take the stuff home," the boy said. "So I can get the cast net and go after the sardines."

They picked up the gear from the boat. The old man carried the mast on his shoulder and the boy carried the wooden box with the coiled, hard-braided brown lines, the gaff and the harpoon with its shaft. The box with the baits was under the stern of the skiff along with the club that was used to subdue the big fish when they were brought alongside. No one would steal from the old man but it was better to take the sail and the heavy lines home as the dew was bad for them and, though he was quite sure no local people would steal from him, the old man thought that a gaff and a harpoon were needless temptations to leave in a boat.

They walked up the road together to the old man's shack and went in through its open door. The old man leaned the mast with its wrapped sail against the wall and the boy put the box and the other gear beside it. The mast was nearly as long as the one room of the shack. The shack was made of the tough bud-shields of the royal palm which are called guano and in it there was a bed, a table, one chair, and a place on the dirt floor to cook with charcoal. On the brown walls of the flattened, overlapping leaves of the sturdy fibered guano there was a picture in color of the Sacred Heart of Jesus and another of the Virgin of Cobre. These were relics of his wife. Once there had been a tinted photograph of his wife on the wall but he had taken it down because it made him too lonely to see it and it was on the shelf in the corner under his clean shirt.

"What do you have to eat?" the boy asked.

"A pot of yellow rice with fish. Do you want some?"

"No. I will eat at home. Do you want me to make the fire?"

"No. I will make it later on. Or I may eat the rice cold."

"May I take the cast net?"

"Of course."

There was no cast net and the boy remembered when they had sold it. But they went through this fiction every day. There was no pot of yellow rice and fish and the boy knew this too.

"Eighty-five is a lucky number," the old man said. "How would you like to see me bring one in that dressed out over a thousand pounds?"

"I'll get the cast net and go for sardines. Will you sit in the sun in the doorway?"

"Yes. I have yesterday's paper and I will read the baseball."

The boy did not know whether yesterday's paper was a fiction too. But the old man brought it out from under the bed.

"Perico gave it to me at the bodega," he explained.

"I'll be back when I have the sardines. I'll keep yours and mine together on ice and we can share them in the morning. When I come back you can tell me about the baseball."

"The Yankees cannot lose."

"But I fear the Indians of Cleveland."

"Have faith in the Yankees my son. Think of the great DiMaggio."

"I fear both the Tigers of Detroit and the Indians of Cleveland."

"Be careful or you will fear even the Reds of Cincinnati and the White Sox of Chicago."

"You study it and tell me when I come back."

"Do you think we should buy a terminal of the lottery with an eighty-five? Tomorrow is the eighty-fifth day."

"We can do that," the boy said. "But what about the eighty-seven of your great record?"

"It could not happen twice. Do you think you can find an eighty-five?"

"I can order one."

"One sheet. That's two dollars and a half. Who can we borrow that from?"

"That's easy. I can always borrow two dollars and a half."

"I think perhaps I can too. But I try not to borrow. First you borrow. Then you beg."

"Keep warm old man," the boy said. "Remember we are in September."

"The month when the great fish come," the old man said. "Anyone can be a fisherman in May."

"I go now for the sardines," the boy said.

When the boy came back the old man was asleep in the chair and the sun was down. The boy took the old army blanket off the bed and spread it over the back of the chair and over the old man's shoulders. They were strange shoulders, still powerful although very old, and the neck was still strong too and the creases did not show so much when the old man was asleep and his head fallen forward. His shirt had been patched so many times that it was like the sail and the patches were faded to many different shades by the sun. The old man's head was very old though and with his eyes closed there was no life in his face. The newspaper lay across his knees and the weight of his arm held it there in the evening breeze. He was barefooted.

The boy left him there and when he came back the old man was still asleep.

"Wake up old man," the boy said and put his hand on one of the old man's knees.

The old man opened his eyes and for a moment he was coming back from a long way away. Then he smiled.

"What have you got?" he asked.

"Supper," said the boy. "We're going to have supper."

"I'm not very hungry."

"Come on and eat. You can't fish and not eat."

"I have," the old man said getting up and taking the newspaper and folding it. Then he started to fold the blanket.

"Keep the blanket around you," the boy said. "You'll not fish without eating while I'm alive."

"Then live a long time and take care of yourself," the old man said. "What are we eating?"

"Black beans and rice, fried bananas, and some stew."

The boy had brought them in a two-decker metal container from the Terrace. The two sets of knives and forks and spoons were in his pocket with a paper napkin wrapped around each set.

"Who gave this to you?"

"Martin. The owner."

"I must thank him."

"I thanked him already," the boy said. "You don't need to thank him."

"I'll give him the belly meat of a big fish," the old man said. "Has he done this for us more than once?"

"I think so."

"I must give him something more than the belly meat then. He is very thoughtful for us."

"He sent two beers."

"I like the beer in cans best."

"I know. But this is in bottles, Hatuey beer, and I take back the bottles."

"That's very kind of you," the old man said. "Should we eat?"

"I've been asking you to," the boy told him gently. "I have not wished to open the container until you were ready."

"I'm ready now," the old man said. "I only needed time to wash."

Where did you wash? the boy thought. The village water supply was two streets down the road. I must have water here for him, the boy thought, and soap and a good towel. Why am I so thoughtless? I must get him another shirt and a jacket for the winter and some sort of shoes and another blanket.

"Your stew is excellent," the old man said.

"Tell me about the baseball," the boy asked him.

"In the American League it is the Yankees as I said," the old man said happily.

"They lost today," the boy told him.

"That means nothing. The great DiMaggio is himself again."

"They have other men on the team."

"Naturally. But he makes the difference. In the other league, between Brooklyn and Philadelphia I must take Brooklyn. But then I think of Dick Sisler and those great drives in the old park."

"There was nothing ever like them. He hits the longest ball I have ever seen."

"Do you remember when he used to come to the Terrace? I wanted to take him fishing but I was too timid to ask him. Then I asked you to ask him and you were too timid."

"I know. It was a great mistake. He might have gone with us. Then we would have that for all of our lives."

"I would like to take the great DiMaggio fishing," the old man said. "They say his father was a fisherman. Maybe he was as poor as we are and would understand."

"The great Sisler's father was never poor and he, the father, was playing in the big leagues when he was my age."

"When I was your age I was before the mast on a square rigged ship that ran to Africa and I have seen lions on the beaches in the evening."

"I know. You told me."

"Should we talk about Africa or about baseball?"

"Baseball I think," the boy said. "Tell me about the great John J. McGraw." He said Jota for J.

"He used to come to the Terrace sometimes too in the older days. But he was rough and harsh-spoken and difficult when he was drinking. His mind was on horses as well as baseball. At least he carried lists of horses at all times in his pocket and frequently spoke the names of horses on the telephone."

"He was a great manager," the boy said. "My father thinks he was the greatest."

"Because he came here the most times," the old man said. "If Durocher had continued to come here each year your father would think him the greatest manager."

"Who is the greatest manager, really, Luque or Mike Gonzalez?"

"I think they are equal."

"And the best fisherman is you."

"No. I know others better."

"Qué va," the boy said. "There are many good fishermen and some great ones. But there is only you."

"Thank you. You make me happy. I hope no fish will come along so great that he will prove us wrong."

"There is no such fish if you are still strong as you say."

"I may not be as strong as I think," the old man said. "But I know many tricks and I have resolution."

"You ought to go to bed now so that you will be fresh in the morning. I will take the things back to the Terrace."

"Good night then. I will wake you in the morning."

"You're my alarm clock," the boy said.

"Age is my alarm clock," the old man said. "Why do old men wake so early? Is it to have one longer day?"

"I don't know," the boy said. "All I know is that young boys sleep late and hard."

"I can remember it," the old man said. "I'll waken you in time."

"I do not like for him to waken me. It is as though I were inferior."

"I know."

"Sleep well, old man."

The boy went out. They had eaten with no light on the table and the old man took off his trousers and went to bed in the dark. He rolled his trousers up to make a pillow, putting the newspaper inside them. He rolled himself in the blanket and slept on the other old newspapers that covered the springs of the bed.

He was asleep in a short time and he dreamed of Africa when he was a boy and the long golden beaches and the white beaches, so white they hurt your eyes, and the high capes and the great brown mountains. He lived along that coast now every night and in his dreams he heard the surf roar and saw the native boats come riding through it. He smelled the tar and oakum of the deck as he slept and he smelled the smell of Africa that the land breeze brought at morning.

Usually when he smelled the land breeze he woke up and dressed to go and wake the boy. But tonight the smell of the land breeze came very early and he knew it was too early in his dream and went on dreaming to see the white peaks of the Islands rising from the sea and then he dreamed of the different harbours and roadsteads of the Canary Islands.

He no longer dreamed of storms, nor of women, nor of great occurrences, nor of great fish, nor fights, nor contests of strength, nor of his wife. He only dreamed of places now and of the lions on the beach. They played like young cats in the dusk and he loved them as he loved the boy. He never dreamed about the boy. He simply woke, looked out the open door at the moon and unrolled his trousers and put them on. He urinated outside the shack and then went up the road to wake the boy. He was shivering with the morning cold. But he knew he would shiver himself warm and that soon he would be rowing.

The door of the house where the boy lived was unlocked and he opened it and walked in quietly with his bare feet. The boy was asleep on a cot in the first room and the old man could see him clearly with the light that came in from the dying moon. He took hold of one foot gently and held it until the boy woke and turned and looked at him. The old man nodded and the boy took his trousers from the chair by the bed and, sitting on the bed, pulled them on.

The old man went out the door and the boy came after him. He was sleepy and the old man put his arm across his shoulders and said, "I am sorry."

"Qué va," the boy said. "It is what a man must do."

They walked down the road to the old man's shack and all along the road, in the dark, barefoot men were moving, carrying the masts of their boats.

When they reached the old man's shack the boy took the rolls of line in the basket and the harpoon and gaff and the old man carried the mast with the furled sail on his shoulder.

"Do you want coffee?" the boy asked.

"We'll put the gear in the boat and then get some."

They had coffee from condensed milk cans at an early morning place that served fishermen.

"How did you sleep old man?" the boy asked. He was waking up now although it was still hard for him to leave his sleep.

"Very well, Manolin," the old man said. "I feel confident today."

"So do I," the boy said. "Now I must get your sardines and mine and your fresh baits. He brings our gear himself. He never wants anyone to carry anything."

"We're different," the old man said. "I let you carry things when you were five years old."

"I know it," the boy said. "I'll be right back. Have another coffee. We have credit here."

He walked off, bare-footed on the coral rocks, to the ice house where the baits were stored.

The old man drank his coffee slowly. It was all he would have all day and he knew that he should take it. For a long time now eating had bored him and he never carried a lunch. He had a bottle of water in the bow of the skiff and that was all he needed for the day.

The boy was back now with the sardines and the two baits wrapped in a newspaper and they went down the trail to the skiff, feeling the pebbled sand under their feet, and lifted the skiff and slid her into the water.

"Good luck old man."

"Good luck," the old man said. He fitted the rope lashings of the oars onto the thole pins and, leaning forward against the thrust of the blades in the water, he began to row out of the harbour in the dark. There were other boats from the other beaches going out to sea and the old man heard the dip and push of their oars even though he could not see them now the moon was below the hills.

Sometimes someone would speak in a boat. But most of the boats were silent except for the dip of the oars. They spread apart after they were out of the mouth of the harbour and each one headed for the part of the ocean where he hoped to find fish. The old man knew he was going far out and he left the smell of the land behind and rowed out into the clean early morning smell of the ocean. He saw the phosphorescence of the Gulf weed in the water as he rowed over the part of the ocean that the fishermen called the great well because there was a sudden deep of seven hundred fathoms where all sorts of fish congregated because of the swirl the current made against the steep walls of the floor of the ocean. Here there were concentrations of shrimp and bait fish and sometimes schools of squid in the deepest holes and these rose close to the surface at night where all the wandering fish fed on them.

In the dark the old man could feel the morning coming and as he rowed he heard the trembling sound as flying fish left the water and the hissing that their stiff set wings made as they soared away in the darkness. He was very fond of flying fish as they were his principal friends on the ocean. He was sorry for the birds, especially the small delicate dark terns that were always flying and looking and almost never finding, and he thought, "The birds have a harder life than we do except for the robber birds and the heavy strong ones. Why did they make birds so delicate and fine as those sea swallows when the ocean can be so cruel? She is kind and very beautiful. But she can be so cruel and it comes so suddenly and such birds that fly, dipping and hunting, with their small sad voices are made too delicately for the sea."

He always thought of the sea as la mar which is what people call her in Spanish when they love her. Sometimes those who love her say bad things of her but they are always said as though she were a woman. Some of the younger fishermen, those who used buoys as floats for their lines and had motorboats, bought when the shark livers had brought much money, spoke of her as el mar which is masculine. They spoke of her as a contestant or a place or even an enemy. But the old man always thought of her as feminine and as something that gave or withheld great favours, and if she did wild or wicked things it was because she could not help them. The moon affects her as it does a woman, he thought.

He was rowing steadily and it was no effort for him since he kept well within his speed and the surface of the ocean was flat except for the occasional swirls of the current. He was letting the current do a third of the work and as it started to be light he saw he was already further out than he had hoped to be at this hour.

I worked the deep wells for a week and did nothing, he thought. Today I'll work out where the schools of bonita and albacore are and maybe there will be a big one with them.

Before it was really light he had his baits out and was drifting with the current. One bait was down forty fathoms. The second was at seventy-five and the third and fourth were down in the blue water at one hundred and one hundred and twenty-five fathoms. Each bait hung head down with the shank of the hook inside the bait fish, tied and sewed solid and all the projecting part of the hook, the curve and the point, was covered with fresh sardines. Each sardine was hooked through both eyes so that they made a half-garland on the projecting steel. There was no part of the hook that a great fish could feel which was not sweet smelling and good tasting.

The boy had given him two fresh small tunas, or albacores, which hung on the two deepest lines like plummets and, on the others, he had a big blue runner and a yellow jack that had been used before; but they were in good condition still and had the excellent sardines to give them scent and attractiveness. Each line, as thick around as a big pencil, was looped onto a green-sapped stick so that any pull or touch on the bait would make the stick dip and each line had two forty-fathom coils which could be made fast to the other spare coils so that, if it were necessary, a fish could take out over three hundred fathoms of line.

Now the man watched the dip of the three sticks over the side of the skiff and rowed gently to keep the lines straight up and down and at their proper depths. It was quite light and any moment now the sun would rise.

The sun rose thinly from the sea and the old man could see the other boats, low on the water and well in toward the shore, spread out across the current. Then the sun was brighter and the glare came on the water and then, as it rose clear, the flat sea sent it back at his eyes so that it hurt sharply and he rowed without looking into it. He looked down into the water and watched the lines that went straight down into the dark of the water. He kept them straighter than anyone did, so that at each level in the darkness of the stream there would be a bait waiting exactly where he wished it to be for any fish that swam there. Others let them drift with the current and sometimes they were at sixty fathoms when the fishermen thought they were at a hundred.

But, he thought, I keep them with precision. Only I have no luck any more. But who knows? Maybe today. Every day is a new day. It is better to be lucky. But I would rather be exact. Then when luck comes you are ready.

The sun was two hours higher now and it did not hurt his eyes so much to look into the east. There were only three boats in sight now and they showed very low and far inshore.

All my life the early sun has hurt my eyes, he thought. Yet they are still good. In the evening I can look straight into it without getting the blackness. It has more force in the evening too. But in the morning it is painful.

Just then he saw a man-of-war bird with his long black wings circling in the sky ahead of him. He made a quick drop, slanting down on his back-swept wings, and then circled again.

"He's got something," the old man said aloud. "He's not just looking."

He rowed slowly and steadily toward where the bird was circling. He did not hurry and he kept his lines straight up and down. But he crowded the current a little so that he was still fishing correctly though faster than he would have fished if he was not trying to use the bird.

The bird went higher in the air and circled again, his wings motionless. Then he dove suddenly and the old man saw flying fish spurt out of the water and sail desperately over the surface.

"Dolphin," the old man said aloud. "Big dolphin."

He shipped his oars and brought a small line from under the bow. It had a wire leader and a medium-sized hook and he baited it with one of the sardines. He let it go over the side and then made it fast to a ring bolt in the stern. Then he baited another line and left it coiled in the shade of the bow. He went back to rowing and to watching the long-winged black bird who was working, now, low over the water.

As he watched the bird dipped again slanting his wings for the dive and then swinging them wildly and ineffectually as he followed the flying fish. The old man could see the slight bulge in the water that the big dolphin raised as they followed the escaping fish. The dolphin were cutting through the water below the flight of the fish and would be in the water, driving at speed, when the fish dropped. It is a big school of dolphin, he thought. They are wide spread and the flying fish have little chance. The bird has no chance. The flying fish are too big for him and they go too fast.

He watched the flying fish burst out again and again and the ineffectual movements of the bird. That school has gotten away from me, he thought. They are moving out too fast and too far. But perhaps I will pick up a stray and perhaps my big fish is around them. My big fish must be somewhere.

The clouds over the land now rose like mountains and the coast was only a long green line with the gray blue hills behind it. The water was a dark blue now, so dark that it was almost purple. As he looked down into it he saw the red sifting of the plankton in the dark water and the strange light the sun made now. He watched his lines to see them go straight down out of sight into the water and he was happy to see so much plankton because it meant fish. The strange light the sun made in the water, now that the sun was higher, meant good weather and so did the shape of the clouds over the land. But the bird was almost out of sight now and nothing showed on the surface of the water but some patches of yellow, sun-bleached Sargasso weed and the purple, formalized, iridescent, gelatinous bladder of a Portuguese man-of-war floating close beside the boat. It turned on its side and then righted itself. It floated cheerfully as a bubble with its long deadly purple filaments trailing a yard behind it in the water.

"Agua mala," the man said. "You whore."

From where he swung lightly against his oars he looked down into the water and saw the tiny fish that were coloured like the trailing filaments and swam between them and under the small shade the bubble made as it drifted. They were immune to its poison. But men were not and when some of the filaments would catch on a line and rest there slimy and purple while the old man was working a fish, he would have welts and sores on his arms and hands of the sort that poison ivy or poison oak can give. But these poisonings from the agua mala came quickly and struck like a whiplash.

The iridescent bubbles were beautiful. But they were the falsest thing in the sea and the old man loved to see the big sea turtles eating them. The turtles saw them, approached them from the front, then shut their eyes so they were completely carapaced and ate them filaments and all. The old man loved to see the turtles eat them and he loved to walk on them on the beach after a storm and hear them pop when he stepped on them with the horny soles of his feet.

He loved green turtles and hawks-bills with their elegance and speed and their great value and he had a friendly contempt for the huge, stupid loggerheads, yellow in their armour-plating, strange in their love-making, and happily eating the Portuguese men-of-war with their eyes shut.

He had no mysticism about turtles although he had gone in turtle boats for many years. He was sorry for them all, even the great trunk backs that were as long as the skiff and weighed a ton. Most people are heartless about turtles because a turtle's heart will beat for hours after he has been cut up and butchered. But the old man thought, I have such a heart too and my feet and hands are like theirs. He ate the white eggs to give himself strength. He ate them all through May to be strong in September and October for the truly big fish.

He also drank a cup of shark liver oil each day from the big drum in the shack where many of the fishermen kept their gear. It was there for all fishermen who wanted it. Most fishermen hated the taste. But it was no worse than getting up at the hours that they rose and it was very good against all colds and grippes and it was good for the eyes.

Now the old man looked up and saw that the bird was circling again.

"He's found fish," he said aloud. No flying fish broke the surface and there was no scattering of bait fish. But as the old man watched, a small tuna rose in the air, turned and dropped head first into the water. The tuna shone silver in the sun and after he had dropped back into the water another and another rose and they were jumping in all directions, churning the water and leaping in long jumps after the bait. They were circling it and driving it.

If they don't travel too fast I will get into them, the old man thought, and he watched the school working the water white and the bird now dropping and dipping into the bait fish that were forced to the surface in their panic.

"The bird is a great help," the old man said. Just then the stern line came taut under his foot, where he had kept a loop of the line, and he dropped his oars and felt the weight of the small tuna's shivering pull as he held the line firm and commenced to haul it in. The shivering increased as he pulled in and he could see the blue back of the fish in the water and the gold of his sides before he swung him over the side and into the boat. He lay in the stern in the sun, compact and bullet shaped, his big, unintelligent eyes staring as he thumped his life out against the planking of the boat with the quick shivering strokes of his neat, fast-moving tail. The old man hit him on the head for kindness and kicked him, his body still shuddering, under the shade of the stern.

"Albacore," he said aloud. "He'll make a beautiful bait. He'll weigh ten pounds."

He did not remember when he had first started to talk aloud when he was by himself. He had sung when he was by himself in the old days and he had sung at night sometimes when he was alone steering on his watch in the smacks or in the turtle boats. He had probably started to talk aloud, when alone, when the boy had left. But he did not remember. When he and the boy fished together they usually spoke only when it was necessary. They talked at night or when they were storm-bound by bad weather. It was considered a virtue not to talk unnecessarily at sea and the old man had always considered it so and respected it. But now he said his thoughts aloud many times since there was no one that they could annoy.

"If the others heard me talking out loud they would think that I am crazy," he said aloud. "But since I am not crazy, I do not care. And the rich have radios to talk to them in their boats and to bring them the baseball."

Now is no time to think of baseball, he thought. Now is the time to think of only one thing. That which I was born for. There might be a big one around that school, he thought. I picked up only a straggler from the albacore that were feeding. But they are working far out and fast. Everything that shows on the surface today travels very fast and to the north-east. Can that be the time of day? Or is it some sign of weather that I do not know?

He could not see the green of the shore now but only the tops of the blue hills that showed white as though they were snow-capped and the clouds that looked like high snow mountains above them. The sea was very dark and the light made prisms in the water. The myriad flecks of the plankton were annulled now by the high sun and it was only the great deep prisms in the blue water that the old man saw now with his lines going straight down into the water that was a mile deep.

The tuna, the fishermen called all the fish of that species tuna and only distinguished among them by their proper names when they came to sell them or to trade them for baits, were down again. The sun was hot now and the old man felt it on the back of his neck and felt the sweat trickle down his back as he rowed.

I could just drift, he thought, and sleep and put a bight of line around my toe to wake me. But today is eighty-five days and I should fish the day well.

Just then, watching his lines, he saw one of the projecting green sticks dip sharply.

"Yes," he said. "Yes," and shipped his oars without bumping the boat. He reached out for the line and held it softly between the thumb and forefinger of his right hand. He felt no strain nor weight and he held the line lightly. Then it came again. This time it was a tentative pull, not solid nor heavy, and he knew exactly what it was. One hundred fathoms down a marlin was eating the sardines that covered the point and the shank of the hook where the hand-forged hook projected from the head of the small tuna.

The old man held the line delicately, and softly, with his left hand, unleashed it from the stick. Now he could let it run through his fingers without the fish feeling any tension.

This far out, he must be huge in this month, he thought. Eat them, fish. Eat them. Please eat them. How fresh they are and you down there six hundred feet in that cold water in the dark. Make another turn in the dark and come back and eat them.

He felt the light delicate pulling and then a harder pull when a sardine's head must have been more difficult to break from the hook. Then there was nothing.

"Come on," the old man said aloud. "Make another turn. Just smell them. Aren't they lovely? Eat them good now and then there is the tuna. Hard and cold and lovely. Don't be shy, fish. Eat them."

He waited with the line between his thumb and his finger, watching it and the other lines at the same time for the fish might have swum up or down. Then came the same delicate pulling touch again.

"He'll take it," the old man said aloud. "God help him to take it."

He did not take it though. He was gone and the old man felt nothing.

"He can't have gone," he said. "Christ knows he can't have gone. He's making a turn. Maybe he has been hooked before and he remembers something of it."

Then he felt the gentle touch on the line and he was happy.

"It was only his turn," he said. "He'll take it."

He was happy feeling the gentle pulling and then he felt something hard and unbelievably heavy. It was the weight of the fish and he let the line slip down, down, down, unrolling off the first of the two reserve coils. As it went down, slipping lightly through the old man's fingers, he still could feel the great weight, though the pressure of his thumb and finger were almost imperceptible.

"What a fish," he said. "He has it sideways in his mouth now and he is moving off with it."

Then he will turn and swallow it, he thought. He did not say that because he knew that if you said a good thing it might not happen. He knew what a huge fish this was and he thought of him moving away in the darkness with the tuna held crosswise in his mouth. At that moment he felt him stop moving but the weight was still there. Then the weight increased and he gave more line. He tightened the pressure of his thumb and finger for a moment and the weight increased and was going straight down.

"He's taken it," he said. "Now I'll let him eat it well."

He let the line slip through his fingers while he reached down with his left hand and made fast the free end of the two reserve coils to the loop of the two reserve coils of the next line. Now he was ready. He had three forty-fathom coils of line in reserve now, as well as the coil he was using.

"Eat it a little more," he said. "Eat it well."

Eat it so that the point of the hook goes into your heart and kills you, he thought. Come up easy and let me put the harpoon into you. All right. Are you ready? Have you been long enough at table?

"Now!" he said aloud and struck hard with both hands, gained a yard of line and then struck again and again, swinging with each arm alternately on the cord with all the strength of his arms and the pivoted weight of his body.

Nothing happened. The fish just moved away slowly and the old man could not raise him an inch. His line was strong and made for heavy fish and he held it against his back until it was so taut that beads of water were jumping from it. Then it began to make a slow hissing sound in the water and he still held it, bracing himself against the thwart and leaning back against the pull. The boat began to move slowly off toward the North-West.

The fish moved steadily and they travelled slowly on the calm water. The other baits were still in the water but there was nothing to be done.

"I wish I had the boy," the old man said aloud. "I'm being towed by a fish and I'm the towing bitt. I could make the line fast. But then he could break it. I must hold him all I can and give him line when he must have it. Thank God he is travelling and not going down."

What I will do if he decides to go down, I don't know. What I'll do if he sounds and dies I don't know. But I'll do something. There are plenty of things I can do.

He held the line against his back and watched its slant in the water and the skiff moving steadily to the North-West.

This will kill him, the old man thought. He can't do this forever. But four hours later the fish was still swimming steadily out to sea, towing the skiff, and the old man was still braced solidly with the line across his back.

"It was noon when I hooked him," he said. "And I have never seen him."

He had pushed his straw hat hard down on his head before he hooked the fish and it was cutting his forehead. He was thirsty too and he got down on his knees and, being careful not to jerk on the line, moved as far into the bow as he could get and reached the water bottle with one hand. He opened it and drank a little. Then he rested against the bow. He rested sitting on the un-stepped mast and sail and tried not to think but only to endure.

Then he looked behind him and saw that no land was visible. That makes no difference, he thought. I can always come in on the glow from Havana. There are two more hours before the sun sets and maybe he will come up before that. If he doesn't maybe he will come up with the moon. If he does not do that maybe he will come up with the sunrise. I have no cramps and I feel strong. It is he that has the hook in his mouth. But what a fish to pull like that. He must have his mouth shut tight on the wire. I wish I could see him. I wish I could see him only once to know what I have against me.

The fish never changed his course nor his direction all that night as far as the man could tell from watching the stars. It was cold after the sun went down and the old man's sweat dried cold on his back and his arms and his old legs. During the day he had taken the sack that covered the bait box and spread it in the sun to dry. After the sun went down he tied it around his neck so that it hung down over his back and he cautiously worked it down under the line that was across his shoulders now. The sack cushioned the line and he had found a way of leaning forward against the bow so that he was almost comfortable. The position actually was only somewhat less intolerable; but he thought of it as almost comfortable.

I can do nothing with him and he can do nothing with me, he thought. Not as long as he keeps this up.

Once he stood up and urinated over the side of the skiff and looked at the stars and checked his course. The line showed like a phosphorescent streak in the water straight out from his shoulders. They were moving more slowly now and the glow of Havana was not so strong, so that he knew the current must be carrying them to the eastward. If I lose the glare of Havana we must be going more to the eastward, he thought. For if the fish's course held true I must see it for many more hours. I wonder how the baseball came out in the grand leagues today, he thought. It would be wonderful to do this with a radio. Then he thought, think of it always. Think of what you are doing. You must do nothing stupid.

Then he said aloud, "I wish I had the boy. To help me and to see this."

No one should be alone in their old age, he thought. But it is unavoidable. I must remember to eat the tuna before he spoils in order to keep strong. Remember, no matter how little you want to, that you must eat him in the morning. Remember, he said to himself.

During the night two porpoise came around the boat and he could hear them rolling and blowing. He could tell the difference between the blowing noise the male made and the sighing blow of the female.

"They are good," he said. "They play and make jokes and love one another. They are our brothers like the flying fish."

Then he began to pity the great fish that he had hooked. He is wonderful and strange and who knows how old he is, he thought. Never have I had such a strong fish nor one who acted so strangely. Perhaps he is too wise to jump. He could ruin me by jumping or by a wild rush. But perhaps he has been hooked many times before and he knows that this is how he should make his fight. He cannot know that it is only one man against him, nor that it is an old man. But what a great fish he is and what he will bring in the market if the flesh is good. He took the bait like a male and he pulls like a male and his fight has no panic in it. I wonder if he has any plans or if he is just as desperate as I am?

He remembered the time he had hooked one of a pair of marlin. The male fish always let the female fish feed first and the hooked fish, the female, made a wild, panic-stricken, despairing fight that soon exhausted her, and all the time the male had stayed with her, crossing the line and circling with her on the surface. He had stayed so close that the old man was afraid he would cut the line with his tail which was sharp as a scythe and almost of that size and shape. When the old man had gaffed her and clubbed her, holding the rapier bill with its sandpaper edge and clubbing her across the top of her head until her colour turned to a colour almost like the backing of mirrors, and then, with the boy's aid, hoisted her aboard, the male fish had stayed by the side of the boat. Then, while the old man was clearing the lines and preparing the harpoon, the male fish jumped high into the air beside the boat to see where the female was and then went down deep, his lavender wings, that were his pectoral fins, spread wide and all his wide lavender stripes showing. He was beautiful, the old man remembered, and he had stayed.

That was the saddest thing I ever saw with them, the old man thought. The boy was sad too and we begged her pardon and butchered her promptly.

"I wish the boy was here," he said aloud and settled himself against the rounded planks of the bow and felt the strength of the great fish through the line he held across his shoulders moving steadily toward whatever he had chosen.

When once, through my treachery, it had been necessary to him to make a choice, the old man thought.

His choice had been to stay in the deep dark water far out beyond all snares and traps and treacheries. My choice was to go there to find him beyond all people. Beyond all people in the world. Now we are joined together and have been since noon. And no one to help either one of us.

Perhaps I should not have been a fisherman, he thought. But that was the thing that I was born for. I must surely remember to eat the tuna after it gets light.

Some time before daylight something took one of the baits that were behind him. He heard the stick break and the line begin to rush out over the gunwale of the skiff. In the darkness he loosened his sheath knife and taking all the strain of the fish on his left shoulder he leaned back and cut the line against the wood of the gunwale. Then he cut the other line closest to him and in the dark made the loose ends of the reserve coils fast. He worked skillfully with the one hand and put his foot on the coils to hold them as he drew his knots tight. Now he had six reserve coils of line. There were two from each bait he had severed and the two from the bait the fish had taken and they were all connected.

After it is light, he thought, I will work back to the forty-fathom bait and cut it away too and link up the reserve coils. I will have lost two hundred fathoms of good Catalan cordel and the hooks and leaders. That can be replaced. But who replaces this fish if I hook some fish and it cuts him off? I don't know what that fish was that took the bait just now. It could have been a marlin or a broadbill or a shark. I never felt him. I had to get rid of him too fast.

Aloud he said, "I wish I had the boy."

But you haven't got the boy, he thought. You have only yourself and you had better work back to the last line now, in the dark or not in the dark, and cut it away and hook up the two reserve coils.

So he did it. It was difficult in the dark and once the fish made a surge that pulled him down on his face and made a cut below his eye. The blood ran down his cheek a little way. But it coagulated and dried before it reached his chin and he worked his way back to the bow and rested against the wood. He adjusted the sack and carefully worked the line so that it came across a new part of his shoulders and, holding it anchored with his shoulders, he carefully felt the pull of the fish and then felt with his hand the progress of the skiff through the water.

I wonder what he made that lurch for, he thought. The wire must have slipped on the great hill of his back. Certainly his back cannot feel as badly as mine does. But he cannot pull this skiff forever, no matter how great he is. Now everything is cleared away that might make trouble and I have a big reserve of line; all that a man can ask.

"Fish," he said softly, aloud, "I'll stay with you until I am dead."

He'll stay with me too, I suppose, the old man thought and he waited for it to be light. It was cold now in the time before daylight and he pushed against the wood to be warm. I can do it as long as he can, he thought. And in the first light the line extended out and down into the water. The boat moved steadily and when the first edge of the sun rose it was on the old man's right shoulder.

"He's headed north," the old man said. The current will have set us far to the eastward, he thought. I wish he would turn with the current. That would show that he was tiring.

When the sun had risen further the old man realized that the fish was not tiring. There was only one favorable sign. The slant of the line showed he was swimming at a lesser depth. That did not necessarily mean that he would jump. But he might.

"God let him jump," the old man said. "I have enough line to handle him."

Maybe if I can increase the tension just a little it will hurt him and he will jump, he thought. Now that it is daylight let him jump so that he'll fill the sacks along his backbone with air and then he cannot go deep to die.

He tried to increase the tension, but the line had been taut up to the very edge of the breaking point since he had hooked the fish and he felt the harshness as he leaned back to pull and knew he could put no more strain on it. I must not jerk it ever, he thought. Each jerk widens the cut the hook makes and then when he does jump he might throw it. Anyway I feel better with the sun and for once I do not have to look into it.

There was yellow weed on the line but the old man knew that only made an added drag and he was pleased. It was the yellow Gulf weed that had made so much phosphorescence in the night.

"Fish," he said, "I love you and respect you very much. But I will kill you dead before this day ends."

Let us hope so, he thought.

A small bird came toward the skiff from the north. He was a warbler and flying very low over the water. The old man could see that he was very tired.

The bird made the stern of the boat and rested there. Then he flew around the old man's head and rested on the line where he was more comfortable.

"How old are you?" the old man asked the bird. "Is this your first trip?"

The bird looked at him when he spoke. He was too tired even to examine the line and he teetered on it as his delicate feet gripped it fast.

"It's steady," the old man told him. "It's too steady. You shouldn't be that tired after a windless night. What are birds coming to?"

The hawks, he thought, that come out to sea to meet them. But he said nothing of this to the bird who could not understand him anyway and who would learn about the hawks soon enough.

"Take a good rest, small bird," he said. "Then go in and take your chance like any man or bird or fish."

It encouraged him to talk because his back had stiffened in the night and it hurt truly now.

"Stay at my house if you like, bird," he said. "I am sorry I cannot hoist the sail and take you in with the small breeze that is rising. But I am with a friend."

Just then the fish gave a sudden lurch that pulled the old man down onto the bow and would have pulled him overboard if he had not braced himself and given some line.

The bird had flown up when the line jerked and the old man had not even seen him go. He felt the line carefully with his right hand and noticed his hand was bleeding.

"Something hurt him then," he said aloud and pulled back on the line to see if he could turn the fish. But when he was touching the breaking point he held steady and settled back against the strain of the line.

"You're feeling it now, fish," he said. "And so, God knows, am I."

He looked around for the bird now because he would have liked him for company. The bird was gone.

You did not stay long, the man thought. But it is rougher where you are going until you make the shore. How did I let the fish cut me with that one quick pull he made? I must be getting very stupid. Or perhaps I was looking at the small bird and thinking of him. Now I will pay attention to my work and then I must eat the tuna so that I will not have a failure of strength.

"I wish the boy were here and that I had some salt," he said aloud.

Shifting the weight of the line to his left shoulder and kneeling carefully he washed his hand in the ocean and held it there, submerged, for more than a minute watching the blood trail away and the steady movement of the water against his hand as the boat moved.

"He has slowed much," he said.

The old man would have liked to keep his hand in the salt water longer but he was afraid of another sudden lurch by the fish and he stood up and braced himself and held his hand up against the sun. It was only a line burn that had cut his flesh. But it was in the working part of his hand. He knew he would need his hands before this was over and he did not like to be cut before it started.

"Now," he said, when his hand had dried, "I must eat the small tuna. I can reach him with the gaff and eat him here in comfort."

He knelt down and found the tuna under the stern with the gaff and drew it toward him keeping it clear of the coiled lines. Holding the line with his left shoulder again, and bracing on his left hand and arm, he took the tuna off the gaff hook and put the gaff back in place. He put one knee on the fish and cut strips of dark red meat longitudinally from the back of the head to the tail. They were wedge-shaped strips and he cut them from next to the back bone down to the edge of the belly. When he had cut six strips he spread them out on the wood of the bow, wiped his knife on his trousers, and lifted the carcass of the bonito by the tail and dropped it overboard.

"I don't think I can eat an entire one," he said and drew his knife across one of the strips. He could feel the steady hard pull of the line and his left hand was cramped. It drew up tight on the heavy cord and he looked at it in disgust.

"What kind of a hand is that," he said. "Cramp then if you want. Make yourself into a claw. It will do you no good."

Come on, he thought and looked down into the dark water at the slant of the line. Eat it now and it will strengthen the hand. It is not the hand's fault and you have been many hours with the fish. But you can stay with him forever. Eat the bonito now.

He picked up a piece and put it in his mouth and chewed it slowly. It was not unpleasant.

Chew it well, he thought, and get all the juices. It would not be bad to eat with a little lime or with lemon or with salt.

"How do you feel, hand?" he asked the cramped hand that was almost as stiff as rigor mortis. "I'll eat some more for you."

He ate the other part of the piece that he had cut in two. He chewed it carefully and then spat out the skin.

"How does it go, hand? Or is it too early to know?"

He took another full piece and chewed it.

"It is a strong full-blooded fish," he thought. "I was lucky to get him instead of dolphin. Dolphin is too sweet. This is hardly sweet at all and all the strength is still in it."

There is no sense in being anything but practical though, he thought. I wish I had some salt. And I do not know whether the sun will rot or dry what is left, so I had better eat it all although I am not hungry. The fish is calm and steady. I will eat it all and then I will be ready.

"Be patient, hand," he said. "I do this for you."

I wish I could feed the fish, he thought. He is my brother. But I must kill him and keep strong to do it. Slowly and conscientiously he ate all of the wedge-shaped strips of fish.

He straightened up, wiping his hand on his trousers.

"Now," he said. "You can let the cord go, hand, and I will handle him with the right arm alone until you stop that nonsense." He put his left foot on the heavy line that the left hand had held and lay back against the pull against his back.

"God help me to have the cramp go," he said. "Because I do not know what the fish is going to do."

But he seems calm, he thought, and following his plan. But what is his plan, he thought. And what is mine? Mine I must improvise to his because of his great size. If he will jump I can kill him. But he stays down forever. Then I will stay down with him forever.

He rubbed the cramped hand against his trousers and tried to gentle the fingers. But it would not open. Maybe it will open with the sun, he thought. Maybe it will open when the strong raw tuna is digested. If I have to have it, I will open it, cost whatever it costs. But I do not want to open it now by force. Let it open by itself and come back of its own accord. After all I abused it much in the night when it was necessary to free and unite the various lines.

He looked across the sea and knew how alone he was now. But he could see the prisms in the deep dark water and the line stretching ahead and the strange undulation of the calm. The clouds were building up now for the trade wind and he looked ahead and saw a flight of wild ducks etching themselves against the sky over the water, then blurring, then etching again and he knew no man was ever alone on the sea.

He thought of how some men feared being out of sight of land in a small boat and knew they were right in the months of sudden bad weather. But now they were in hurricane months and, when there are no hurricanes, the weather of hurricane months is the best of all the year.

If there is a hurricane you always see the signs of it in the sky for days ahead, if you are at sea. They do not see it ashore because they do not know what to look for, he thought. The land must make a difference too, in the shape of the clouds. But we have no hurricane coming now.

He looked at the sky and saw the white cumulus built like friendly piles of ice cream and high above were the thin feathers of the cirrus against the high September sky.

"Light brisa," he said. "Better weather for me than for you, fish."

His left hand was still cramped, but he was unknotting it slowly.

I hate a cramp, he thought. It is a treachery of one's own body. It is humiliating before others to have a diarrhoea from ptomaine poisoning or to vomit from it. But a cramp, he thought of it as a calambre, humiliates oneself especially when one is alone.

If the boy were here he could rub it for me and loosen it down from the forearm, he thought. But it will loosen up.

Then, with his right hand he felt the difference in the pull of the line before he saw the slant change in the water. Then, as he leaned against the line and slapped his left hand hard and fast against his thigh he saw the line slanting slowly upward.

"He's coming up," he said. "Come on hand. Please come on."

The line rose slowly and steadily and then the surface of the ocean bulged ahead of the boat and the fish came out. He came out unendingly and water poured from his sides. He was bright in the sun and his head and back were dark purple and in the sun the stripes on his sides showed wide and a light lavender. His sword was as long as a baseball bat and tapered like a rapier and he rose his full length from the water and then re-entered it, smoothly, like a diver and the old man saw the great scythe-blade of his tail go under and the line commenced to race out.

"He is two feet longer than the skiff," the old man said. The line was going out fast but steadily and the fish was not panicked. The old man was trying with both hands to keep the line just inside of breaking strength. He knew that if he could not slow the fish with a steady pressure the fish could take out all the line and break it.

He is a great fish and I must convince him, he thought. I must never let him learn his strength nor what he could do if he made his run. If I were him I would put in everything now and go until something broke. But, thank God, they are not as intelligent as we who kill them; although they are more noble and more able.

The old man had seen many great fish. He had seen many that weighed more than a thousand pounds and he had caught two of that size in his life, but never alone. Now alone, and out of sight of land, he was fast to the biggest fish that he had ever seen and bigger than he had ever heard of, and his left hand was still as tight as the gripped claws of an eagle.

It will uncramp though, he thought. Surely it will uncramp to help my right hand. There are three things that are brothers: the fish and my two hands. It must uncramp. It is unworthy of it to be cramped. The fish had slowed again and was going at his usual pace.

I wonder why he jumped, the old man thought. He jumped almost as though to show me how big he was. I know now, anyway, he thought. I wish I could show him what sort of man I am. But then he would see the cramped hand. Let him think I am more man than I am and I will be so. I wish I was the fish, he thought, with everything he has against only my will and my intelligence.

He settled comfortably against the wood and took his suffering as it came and the fish swam steadily and the boat moved slowly through the dark water. There was a small sea rising with the wind coming up from the east and at noon the old man's left hand was uncramped.

"Bad news for you, fish," he said and shifted the line over the sacks that covered his shoulders.

He was comfortable but suffering, although he did not admit the suffering at all.

"I am not religious," he said. "But I will say ten Our Fathers and ten Hail Marys that I should catch this fish, and I promise to make a pilgrimage to the Virgen de Cobre if I catch him. That is a promise."

He commenced to say his prayers mechanically. Sometimes he would be so tired that he could not remember the prayer and then he would say them fast so that they would come automatically. Hail Marys are easier to say than Our Fathers, he thought.

"Hail Mary full of Grace the Lord is with thee. Blessed art thou among women and blessed is the fruit of thy womb, Jesus. Holy Mary, Mother of God, pray for us sinners now and at the hour of our death. Amen." Then he added, "Blessed Virgin, pray for the death of this fish. Wonderful though he is."

With his prayers said, and feeling much better, but suffering exactly as much, and perhaps a little more, he leaned against the wood of the bow and began, mechanically, to work the fingers of his left hand.

The sun was hot now although the breeze was rising gently.

"I had better re-bait that little line out over the stern," he said. "If the fish decides to stay another night I will need to eat again and the water is low in the bottle. I don't think I can get anything but a dolphin here. But if I eat him fresh enough he won't be bad. I wish a flying fish would come on board tonight. But I have no light to attract them. A flying fish is excellent to eat raw and I would not have to cut him up. I must save all my strength now. Christ, I did not know he was so big."

"I'll kill him though," he said. "In all his greatness and his glory."

Although it is unjust, he thought. But I will show him what a man can do and what a man endures.

"I told the boy I was a strange old man," he said. "Now is when I must prove it."

The thousand times that he had proved it meant nothing. Now he was proving it again. Each time was a new time and he never thought about the past when he was doing it.

I wish he'd sleep and I could sleep and dream about the lions, he thought. Why are the lions the main thing that is left? Don't think, old man, he said to himself. Rest gently now against the wood and think of nothing. He is working. Work as little as you can.

It was getting into the afternoon and the boat still moved slowly and steadily. But there was an added drag now from the easterly breeze and the old man rode gently with the small sea and the hurt of the cord across his back came to him easily and smoothly.

Once in the afternoon the line started to rise again. But the fish only continued to swim at a slightly higher level. The sun was on the old man's left arm and shoulder and on his back. So he knew the fish had turned east of north.

Now that he had seen him once, he could picture the fish swimming in the water with his purple pectoral fins set wide as wings and the great erect tail slicing through the dark. I wonder how much he sees at that depth, the old man thought. His eye is huge and a horse, with much less eye, can see in the dark. Once I could see quite well in the dark. Not in the absolute dark. But almost as a cat sees.

The sun and his steady movement of his fingers had uncramped his left hand now completely and he began to shift more of the strain to it and he shrugged the muscles of his back to shift the hurt of the cord a little.

"If you're not tired, fish," he said aloud, "you must be very strange."

He felt very tired now and he knew the night would come soon and he tried to think of other things. He thought of the Big Leagues, to him they were the Gran Ligas, and he knew that the Yankees of New York were playing the Tigres of Detroit.

This is the second day now that I do not know the result of the juegos, he thought. But I must have confidence and I must be worthy of the great DiMaggio who does all things perfectly even with the pain of the bone spur in his heel. What is a bone spur? he asked himself. Un espuela de hueso. We do not have them. Can it be as painful as the spur of a fighting cock in one's heel? I do not think I could endure that or the loss of the eye and of both eyes and continue to fight as the fighting cocks do. Man is not much beside the great birds and beasts. Still I would rather be that beast down there in the darkness of the sea.

"Unless sharks come," he said aloud. "If sharks come, God pity him and me."

Do you believe the great DiMaggio would stay with a fish as long as I will stay with this one? he thought. I am sure he would and more since he is young and strong. Also his father was a fisherman. But would the bone spur hurt him too much?

"I do not know," he said aloud. "I never had a bone spur."

As the sun set he remembered, to give himself more confidence, the time in the tavern at Casablanca when he had played the hand game with the great negro from Cienfuegos who was the strongest man on the docks. They had gone one day and one night with their elbows on a chalk line on the table and their forearms straight up and their hands gripped tight. Each one was trying to force the other's hand down onto the table. There was much betting and people went in and out of the room under the kerosene lights and he had looked at the arm and hand of the negro and at the negro's face. They changed the referees every four hours after the first eight so that the referees could sleep. Blood came out from under the fingernails of both his and the negro's hands and they looked each other in the eye and at their hands and forearms and the bettors went in and out of the room and sat on high chairs against the wall and watched. The walls were painted bright blue and were of wood and the lamps threw their shadows against them. The negro's shadow was huge and it moved on the wall as the breeze moved the lamps.

The odds would change back and forth all night and they fed the negro rum and lighted cigarettes for him. Then the negro, after the rum, would try for a tremendous effort and once he had the old man, who was not an old man then but was Santiago El Campeon, nearly three inches off balance. But the old man had raised his hand up to dead even again. He was sure then that he had the negro, who was a fine man and a great athlete, beaten. And at daylight when the bettors were asking that it be called a draw and the referee was shaking his head, he had unleashed his effort and forced the hand of the negro down and down until it rested on the wood. The match had started on a Sunday morning and ended on a Monday morning. Many of the bettors had asked for a draw because they had to go to work on the docks loading sacks of sugar or at the Havana Coal Company. Otherwise everyone would have wanted it to go to a finish. But he had finished it anyway and before anyone had to go to work.

For a long time after that everyone had called him The Champion and there had been a return match in the spring. But not much money was bet and he had won it quite easily since he had broken the confidence of the negro from Cienfuegos in the first match. After that he had a few matches and then no more. He decided that he could beat anyone if he wanted to badly enough and he decided that it was bad for his right hand for fishing. He had tried a few practice matches with his left hand. But his left hand had always been a traitor and would not do what he called on it to do and he did not trust it.

The sun will bake it out well now, he thought. It should not cramp on me again unless it gets too cold in the night. I wonder what this night will bring.

An airplane passed over head on its course to Miami and he watched its shadow scaring up the schools of flying fish.

"With so much flying fish there should be dolphin," he said, and leaned back on the line to see if it was possible to gain any on his fish. But he could not and it stayed at the hardness and water-drop shivering that preceded breaking. The boat moved ahead slowly and he watched the airplane until he could no longer see it.

It must be very strange in an airplane, he thought. I wonder what the sea looks like from that height? They should be able to see the fish well if they do not fly too high. I would like to fly very slowly at two hundred fathoms high and see the fish from above. In the turtle boats I was in the cross-trees of the mast-head and even at that height I saw much. The dolphin look greener from there and you can see their stripes and their purple spots and you can see all of the school as they swim. Why is it that all the fast-moving fish of the dark current have purple backs and usually purple stripes or spots? The dolphin looks green of course because he is really golden. But when he comes to feed, truly hungry, purple stripes show on his sides as on a marlin. Can it be anger, or the greater speed he makes that brings them out?

Just before it was dark, as they passed a great island of Sargasso weed that heaved and swung in the light sea as though the ocean were making love with something under a yellow blanket, his small line was taken by a dolphin. He saw it first when it jumped in the air, true gold in the last of the sun and bending and flapping wildly in the air. It jumped again and again in the acrobatics of its fear and he worked his way back to the stern and crouching and holding the big line with his right hand and arm, he pulled the dolphin in with his left hand, stepping on the gained line each time with his bare left foot. When the fish was at the stern, plunging and cutting from side to side in desperation, the old man leaned over the stern and lifted the burnished gold fish with its purple spots over the stern. Its jaws were working convulsively in quick bites against the hook and it pounded the bottom of the skiff with its long flat body, its tail and its head until he clubbed it across the shining golden head until it shivered and was still.

The old man unhooked the fish, rebaited the line with another sardine and tossed it over. Then he worked his way slowly back to the bow. He washed his left hand and wiped it on his trousers. Then he shifted the heavy line from his right hand to his left and washed his right hand in the sea while he watched the sun go into the ocean and the slant of the big cord.

"He hasn't changed at all," he said. But watching the movement of the water against his hand he noted that it was perceptibly slower.

"I'll lash the two oars together across the stern and that will slow him in the night," he said. "He's good for the night and so am I."

It would be better to gut the dolphin a little later to save the blood in the meat, he thought. I can do that a little later and lash the oars to make a drag at the same time. I had better keep the fish quiet now and not disturb him too much at sunset. The setting of the sun is a difficult time for all fish.

He let his hand dry in the air then grasped the line with it and eased himself as much as he could and allowed himself to be pulled forward against the wood so that the boat took the strain as much, or more, than he did.

I'm learning how to do it, he thought. This part of it anyway. Then too, remember he hasn't eaten since he took the bait and he is huge and needs much food. I have eaten the whole bonito. Tomorrow I will eat the dolphin. He called it dorado. Perhaps I should eat some of it when I clean it. It will be harder to eat than the bonito. But, then, nothing is easy.

"How do you feel, fish?" he asked aloud. "I feel good and my left hand is better and I have food for a night and a day. Pull the boat, fish."

He did not truly feel good because the pain from the cord across his back had almost passed pain and gone into a dullness that he mistrusted. But I have had worse things than that, he thought. My hand is only cut a little and the cramp is gone from the other. My legs are all right. Also now I have gained on him in the question of sustenance.

It was dark now as it becomes dark quickly after the sun sets in September. He lay against the worn wood of the bow and rested all that he could. The first stars were out. He did not know the name of Rigel but he saw it and knew soon they would all be out and he would have all his distant friends.

"The fish is my friend too," he said aloud. "I have never seen or heard of such a fish. But I must kill him. I am glad we do not have to try to kill the stars."

Imagine if each day a man must try to kill the moon, he thought. The moon runs away. But imagine if a man each day should have to try to kill the sun? We were born lucky, he thought.

Then he was sorry for the great fish that had nothing to eat and his determination to kill him never relaxed in his sorrow for him. How many people will he feed, he thought. But are they worthy to eat him? No, of course not. There is no one worthy of eating him from the manner of his behaviour and his great dignity.

I do not understand these things, he thought. But it is good that we do not have to try to kill the sun or the moon or the stars. It is enough to live on the sea and kill our true brothers.

Now, he thought, I must think about the drag. It has its perils and its merits. I may lose so much line that I will lose him, if he makes his effort and the drag made by the oars is in place and the boat loses all her lightness. Her lightness prolongs both our suffering but it is my safety since he has great speed that he has never yet employed. No matter what passes I must gut the dolphin so he does not spoil and eat some of him to be strong.

Now I will rest an hour more and feel that he is solid and steady before I move back to the stern to do the work and make the decision. In the meantime I can see how he acts and if he shows any changes. The oars are a good trick; but it has reached the time to play for safety. He is much fish still and I saw that the hook was in the corner of his mouth and he has kept his mouth tight shut. The punishment of the hook is nothing. The punishment of hunger, and that he is against something that he does not comprehend, is everything. Rest now, old man, and let him work until your next duty comes.

He rested for what he believed to be two hours. The moon did not rise now until late and he had no way of judging the time. Nor was he really resting except comparatively. He was still bearing the pull of the fish across his shoulders but he placed his left hand on the gunwale of the bow and confided more and more of the resistance to the fish to the skiff itself.

How simple it would be if I could make the line fast, he thought. But with one small lurch he could break it. I must cushion the pull of the line with my body and at all times be ready to give line with both hands.

"But you have not slept yet, old man," he said aloud. "It is half a day and a night and now another day and you have not slept. You must devise a way so that you sleep a little if he is quiet and steady. If you do not sleep you might become unclear in the head."

I'm clear enough in the head, he thought. Too clear. I am as clear as the stars that are my brothers. Still I must sleep. They sleep and the moon and the sun sleep and even the ocean sleeps sometimes on certain days when there is no current and a flat calm.

But remember to sleep, he thought. Make yourself do it and devise some simple and sure way about the lines. Now go back and prepare the dolphin. It is too dangerous to rig the oars as a drag if you must sleep.

I could go without sleeping, he told himself. But it would be too dangerous.

He started to work his way back to the stern on his hands and knees, being careful not to jerk against the fish. He may be half asleep himself, he thought. But I do not want him to rest. He must pull until he dies.

Back in the stern he turned so that his left hand held the strain of the line across his shoulders and drew his knife from its sheath with his right hand. The stars were bright now and he saw the dolphin clearly and he pushed the blade of his knife into his head and drew him out from under the stern. He put one of his feet on the fish and slit him quickly from the vent up to the tip of his lower jaw. Then he put his knife down and gutted him with his right hand, scooping him clean and pulling the gills clear. He felt the maw heavy and slippery in his hands and he slit it open. There were two flying fish inside. They were fresh and hard and he laid them side by side and dropped the guts and the gills over the stern. They sank leaving a trail of phosphorescence in the water. The dolphin was cold and a leprous gray-white now in the starlight and the old man skinned one side of him while he held his right foot on the fish's head. Then he turned him over and skinned the other side and cut each side off from the head down to the tail.

He slid the carcass overboard and looked to see if there was any swirl in the water. But there was only the light of its slow descent. He turned then and placed the two flying fish inside the two fillets of fish and putting his knife back in its sheath, he worked his way slowly back to the bow. His back was bent with the weight of the line across it and he carried the fish in his right hand.

Back in the bow he laid the two fillets of fish out on the wood with the flying fish beside them. After that he settled the line across his shoulders in a new place and held it again with his left hand resting on the gunwale. Then he leaned over the side and washed the flying fish in the water, noting the speed of the water against his hand. His hand was phosphorescent from skinning the fish and he watched the flow of the water against it. The flow was less strong and as he rubbed the side of his hand against the planking of the skiff, particles of phosphorus floated off and drifted slowly astern.

"He is tiring or he is resting," the old man said. "Now let me get through the eating of this dolphin and get some rest and a little sleep."

Under the stars and with the night colder all the time he ate half of one of the dolphin fillets and one of the flying fish, gutted and with its head cut off.

"What an excellent fish dolphin is to eat cooked," he said. "And what a miserable fish raw. I will never go in a boat again without salt or limes."

If I had brains I would have splashed water on the bow all day and drying, it would have made salt, he thought. But then I did not hook the dolphin until almost sunset. Still it was a lack of preparation. But I have chewed it all well and I am not nauseated.

The sky was clouding over to the east and one after another the stars he knew were gone. It looked now as though he were moving into a great canyon of clouds and the wind had dropped.

"There will be bad weather in three or four days," he said. "But not tonight and not tomorrow. Rig now to get some sleep, old man, while the fish is calm and steady."

He held the line tight in his right hand and then pushed his thigh against his right hand as he leaned all his weight against the wood of the bow. Then he passed the line a little lower on his shoulders and braced his left hand on it.

My right hand can hold it as long as it is braced, he thought. If it relaxes in sleep my left hand will wake me as the line goes out. It is hard on the right hand. But he is used to punishment. Even if I sleep twenty minutes or a half an hour it is good. He lay forward cramping himself against the line with all of his body, putting all his weight onto his right hand, and he was asleep.

He did not dream of the lions but instead of a vast school of porpoises that stretched for eight or ten miles and it was in the time of their mating and they would leap high into the air and return into the same hole they had made in the water when they leaped.

Then he dreamed that he was in the village on his bed and there was a norther and he was very cold and his right arm was asleep because his head had rested on it instead of a pillow.

After that he began to dream of the long yellow beach and he saw the first of the lions come down onto it in the early dark and then the other lions came and he rested his chin on the wood of the bows where the ship lay anchored with the evening off-shore breeze and he waited to see if there would be more lions and he was happy.

The moon had been up for a long time but he slept on and the fish pulled on steadily and the boat moved into the tunnel of clouds.

He woke with the jerk of his right fist coming up against his face and the line burning out through his right hand. He had no feeling of his left hand but he braked all he could with his right and the line rushed out. Finally his left hand found the line and he leaned back against the line and now it burned his back and his left hand, and his left hand was taking all the strain and cutting badly. He looked back at the coils of line and they were feeding smoothly. Just then the fish jumped making a great bursting of the ocean and then a heavy fall. Then he jumped again and again and the boat was going fast although line was still racing out and the old man was raising the strain to breaking point and raising it to breaking point again and again. He had been pulled down tight onto the bow and his face was in the cut slice of dolphin and he could not move.

This is what we waited for, he thought. So now let us take it.

Make him pay for the line, he thought. Make him pay for it.

He could not see the fish's jumps but only heard the breaking of the ocean and the heavy splash as he fell. The speed of the line was cutting his hands badly but he had always known this would happen and he tried to keep the cutting across the calloused parts and not let the line slip into the palm nor cut the fingers.

If the boy was here he would wet the coils of line, he thought. Yes. If the boy were here. If the boy were here.

The line went out and out and out but it was slowing now and he was making the fish earn each inch of it. Now he got his head up from the wood and out of the slice of fish that his cheek had crushed. Then he was on his knees and then he rose slowly to his feet. He was ceding line but more slowly all the time. He worked back to where he could feel with his foot the coils of line that he could not see. There was plenty of line still and now the fish had to pull the friction of all that new line through the water.

Yes, he thought. And now he has jumped more than a dozen times and filled the sacks along his back with air and he cannot go down deep to die where I cannot bring him up. He will start circling soon and then I must work on him. I wonder what started him so suddenly? Could it have been hunger that made him desperate, or was he frightened by something in the night? Maybe he suddenly felt fear. But he was such a calm, strong fish and he seemed so fearless and so confident. It is strange.

"You better be fearless and confident yourself, old man," he said. "You're holding him again but you cannot get line. But soon he has to circle."

The old man held him with his left hand and his shoulders now and stooped down and scooped up water in his right hand to get the crushed dolphin flesh off of his face. He was afraid that it might nauseate him and he would vomit and lose his strength. When his face was cleaned he washed his right hand in the water over the side and then let it stay in the salt water while he watched the first light come before the sunrise. He's headed almost east, he thought. That means he is tired and going with the current. Soon he will have to circle. Then our true work begins.

After he judged that his right hand had been in the water long enough he took it out and looked at it. "It is not bad," he said. "And pain does not matter to a man."

He took hold of the line carefully so that it did not fit into any of the fresh line cuts and shifted his weight so that he could put his left hand into the sea on the other side of the skiff.

"You did not do so badly for something worthless," he said to his left hand. "But there was a moment when I could not find you."

Why was I not born with two good hands? he thought. Perhaps it was my fault in not training that one properly. But God knows he has had enough chances to learn. He did not do so badly in the night, though, and he has only cramped once. If he cramps again let the line cut him off.

When he thought that he knew that he was not being clear-headed and he thought he should chew some more of the dolphin. But I can't, he told himself. It is better to be light-headed than to lose your strength from nausea. And I know I cannot keep it if I eat it since my face was in it. I will keep it for an emergency until it goes bad. But it is too late to try for strength now through nourishment. You're stupid, he told himself. Eat the other flying fish.

It was there, cleaned and ready, and he picked it up with his left hand and ate it chewing the bones carefully and eating all of it down to the tail.

It has more nourishment than almost any fish, he thought. At least the kind of strength that I need. Now I have done what I can, he thought. Let him begin to circle and let the fight come.

The sun was rising for the third time since he had put to sea when the fish started to circle.

He could not see by the slant of the line that the fish was circling. It was too early for that. He just felt a faint slackening of the pressure of the line and he commenced to pull on it gently with his right hand. It tightened, as always, but just when he reached the point where it would break, line began to come in. He slipped his shoulders and head from under the line and began to pull in line steadily and gently. He used both of his hands in a swinging motion and tried to do the pulling as much as he could with his body and his legs. His old legs and shoulders pivoted with the swinging of the pulling.

"It is a very big circle," he said. "But he is circling."

Then the line would not come in any more and he held it until he saw the drops jumping from it in the sun. Then it started out and the old man knelt down and let it go grudgingly back into the dark water.

"He is making the far part of his circle now," he said. I must hold all I can, he thought. The strain will shorten his circle each time. Perhaps in an hour I will see him. Now I must convince him and then I must kill him.

But the fish kept on circling slowly and the old man was wet with sweat and tired deep into his bones two hours later. But the circles were much shorter now and from the way the line slanted he could tell the fish had risen steadily while he swam.

For an hour the old man had been seeing black spots before his eyes and the sweat salted his eyes and salted the cut over his eye and on his forehead. He was not afraid of the black spots. They were normal at the tension that he was pulling on the line. Twice, though, he had felt faint and dizzy and that had worried him.

"I could not fail myself and die on a fish like this," he said. "Now that I have him coming so beautifully, God help me endure. I'll say a hundred Our Fathers and a hundred Hail Marys. But I cannot say them now."

Consider them said, he thought. I'll say them later.

Just then he felt a sudden banging and jerking on the line he held with his two hands. It was sharp and hard-feeling and heavy.

He is hitting the wire leader with his spear, he thought. That was bound to come. He had to do that. It may make him jump though and I would rather he stayed circling now. The jumps were necessary for him to take air. But after that each one can widen the opening of the hook wound and he can throw the hook.

"Don't jump, fish," he said. "Don't jump."

The fish hit the wire several times more and each time he shook his head the old man gave up a little line.

I must hold his pain where it is, he thought. Mine does not matter. I can control mine. But his pain could drive him mad.

After a while the fish stopped beating at the wire and started circling slowly again. The old man was gaining line steadily now. But he felt faint again. He lifted some sea water with his left hand and put it on his head. Then he put more on and rubbed the back of his neck.

"I have no cramps," he said. "He'll be up soon and I can last. You have to last. Don't even speak of it."

He kneeled against the bow and, for a moment, slipped the line over his back again. I'll rest now while he goes out on the circle and then stand up and work on him when he comes in, he decided.

It was a great temptation to rest in the bow and let the fish make one circle by himself without recovering any line. But when the strain showed the fish had turned to come toward the boat, the old man rose to his feet and started the pivoting and the weaving pulling that brought in all the line he gained.

I'm tireder than I have ever been, he thought, and now the trade wind is rising. But that will be good to take him in with. I need that badly.

"I'll rest on the next turn as he goes out," he said. "I feel much better. Then in two or three turns more I will have him."

His straw hat was far on the back of his head and he sank down into the bow with the pull of the line as he felt the fish turn.

You work now, fish, he thought. I'll take you at the turn.

The sea had risen considerably. But it was a fair-weather breeze and he had to have it to get home.

"I'll just steer south and west," he said. "A man is never lost at sea and it is a long island."

It was on the third turn that he saw the fish first.

He saw him first as a dark shadow that took so long to pass under the boat that he could not believe its length.

"No," he said. "He can't be that big."

But he was that big and at the end of this circle he came to the surface only thirty yards away and the man saw his tail out of water. It was higher than a big scythe blade and a very pale lavender above the dark blue water. It raked back and as the fish swam just below the surface the old man could see his huge bulk and the purple stripes that banded him. His dorsal fin was down and his huge pectorals were spread wide.

On this circle the old man could see the fish's eye and the two gray sucking fish that swam around him. Sometimes they attached themselves to him. Sometimes they darted off. Sometimes they would swim easily in his shadow. They were each over three feet long and when they swam fast they lashed their whole bodies like eels.

The old man was sweating now but from something else besides the sun. On each calm placid turn the fish made he was gaining line and he was sure that in two turns more he would have a chance to get the harpoon in.

But I must get him close, close, close, he thought. I mustn't try for the head. I must get the heart.

"Be calm and strong, old man," he said.

On the next circle the fish's back was out but he was a little too far from the boat. On the next circle he was still too far away but he was higher out of water and the old man was sure that by gaining some more line he could have him alongside.

He had rigged his harpoon long before and its coil of light rope was in a round basket and the end was made fast to the bitt in the bow.

The fish was coming in on his circle now calm and beautiful looking and only his great tail moving. The old man pulled on him all that he could to bring him closer. For just a moment the fish turned a little on his side. Then he straightened himself and began another circle.

"I moved him," the old man said. "I moved him then."

He felt faint again now but he held on the great fish all the strain that he could. I moved him, he thought. Maybe this time I can get him over. Pull, hands, he thought. Hold up, legs. Last for me, head. Last for me. You never went. This time I'll pull him over.

But when he put all of his effort on, starting it well out before the fish came alongside and pulling with all his strength, the fish pulled part way over and then righted himself and swam away.

"Fish," the old man said. "Fish, you are going to have to die anyway. Do you have to kill me too?"

That way nothing is accomplished, he thought. His mouth was too dry to speak but he could not reach for the water now. I must get him alongside this time, he thought. I am not good for many more turns. Yes you are, he told himself. You're good for ever.

On the next turn, he nearly had him. But again the fish righted himself and swam slowly away.

You are killing me, fish, the old man thought. But you have a right to. Never have I seen a greater, or more beautiful, or a calmer or more noble thing than you, brother. Come on and kill me. I do not care who kills who.

Now you are getting confused in the head, he thought. You must keep your head clear. Keep your head clear and know how to suffer like a man. Or a fish, he thought.

"Clear up, head," he said in a voice he could hardly hear. "Clear up."

Twice more it was the same on the turns.

I do not know, the old man thought. He had been on the point of feeling himself go each time. I do not know. But I will try it once more.

He tried it once more and he felt himself going when he turned the fish. The fish righted himself and swam off again slowly with the great tail weaving in the air.

I'll try it again, the old man promised, although his hands were mushy now and he could only see well in flashes.

He tried it again and it was the same. So, he thought, and he felt himself going before he started; I will try it once again.

He took all his pain and what was left of his strength and his long gone pride and he put it against the fish's agony and the fish came over onto his side and swam gently on his side, his bill almost touching the planking of the skiff and started to pass the boat, long, deep, wide, silver and barred with purple and interminable in the water.

The old man dropped the line and put his foot on it and lifted the harpoon as high as he could and drove it down with all his strength, and more strength he had just summoned, into the fish's side just behind the great chest fin that rose high in the air to the altitude of the man's chest. He felt the iron go in and he leaned on it and drove it further and then pushed all his weight after it.

Then the fish came alive, with his death in him, and rose high out of the water showing all his great length and width and all his power and his beauty. He seemed to hang in the air above the old man in the skiff. Then he fell into the water with a crash that sent spray over the old man and over all of the skiff.

The old man felt faint and sick and he could not see well. But he cleared the harpoon line and let it run slowly through his raw hands and, when he could see, he saw the fish was on his back with his silver belly up. The shaft of the harpoon was projecting at an angle from the fish's shoulder and the sea was discolouring with the red of the blood from his heart. First it was dark as a shoal in the blue water that was more than a mile deep. Then it spread like a cloud. The fish was silvery and still and floated with the waves.

The old man looked carefully in the glimpse of vision that he had. Then he took two turns of the harpoon line around the bitt in the bow and laid his head on his hands.

"Keep my head clear," he said against the wood of the bow. "I am a tired old man. But I have killed this fish which is my brother and now I must do the slave work."

Now I must prepare the nooses and the rope to lash him alongside, he thought. Even if we were two and swamped her to load him and bailed her out, this skiff would never hold him. I must prepare everything, then bring him in and lash him well and step the mast and set sail for home.

He started to pull the fish in to have him alongside so that he could pass a line through his gills and out his mouth and make his head fast alongside the bow. I want to see him, he thought, and to touch and to feel him. He is my fortune, he thought. But that is not why I wish to feel him. I think I felt his heart, he thought. When I pushed on the harpoon shaft the second time. Bring him in now and make him fast and get the noose around his tail and another around his middle to bind him to the skiff.

"Get to work, old man," he said. He took a very small drink of the water. "There is very much slave work to be done now that the fight is over."

He looked up at the sky and then out to his fish. He looked at the sun carefully. It is not much more than noon, he thought. And the trade wind is rising. The lines all mean nothing now. The boy and I will splice them when we are home.

"Come on, fish," he said. But the fish did not come. Instead he lay there wallowing now in the seas and the old man pulled the skiff up onto him.

When he was even with him and had the fish's head against the bow he could not believe his size. But he untied the harpoon rope from the bitt, passed it through the fish's gills and out his jaws, made a turn around his sword then passed the rope through the other gill, made another turn around the bill and knotted the double rope and made it fast to the bitt in the bow. He cut the rope then and went astern to noose the tail. The fish had turned silver from his original purple and silver, and the stripes showed the same pale violet colour as his tail. They were wider than a man's hand with his fingers spread and the fish's eye looked as detached as the mirrors in a periscope or as a saint in a procession.

"It was the only way to kill him," the old man said. He was feeling better since the water and he knew he would not go away and his head was clear. He's over fifteen hundred pounds the way he is, he thought. Maybe much more. If he dresses out two-thirds of that at thirty cents a pound?

"I need a pencil for that," he said. "My head is not that clear. But I think the great DiMaggio would be proud of me today. I had no bone spurs. But the hands and the back hurt truly." I wonder what a bone spur is, he thought. Maybe we have them without knowing of it.

He made the fish fast to bow and stern and to the middle thwart. He was so big it was like lashing a much bigger skiff alongside. He cut a piece of line and tied the fish's lower jaw against his bill so his mouth would not open and they would sail as cleanly as possible. Then he stepped the mast and, with the stick that was his gaff and with his boom rigged, the patched sail drew, the boat began to move, and half lying in the stern he sailed south-west.

He did not need a compass to tell him where south-west was. He only needed the feel of the trade wind and the drawing of the sail. I better put a small line out with a spoon on it and try and get something to eat and drink for the moisture. But he could not find a spoon and his sardines were rotten. So he hooked a patch of yellow gulf weed with the gaff as they passed and shook it so that the small shrimps that were in it fell onto the planking of the skiff. There were more than a dozen of them and they jumped and kicked like sand fleas. The old man pinched their heads off with his thumb and forefinger and ate them chewing up the shells and the tails. They were very tiny but he knew they were nourishing and they tasted good.

The old man still had two drinks of water in the bottle and he used half of one after he had eaten the shrimps. The skiff was sailing well considering the handicaps and he steered with the tiller under his arm. He could see the fish and he had only to look at his hands and feel his back against the stern to know that this had truly happened and was not a dream. At one time when he was feeling so badly toward the end, he had thought perhaps it was a dream. Then when he had seen the fish come out of the water and hang motionless in the sky before he fell, he was sure there was some great strangeness and he could not believe it. Then he could not see well, although now he saw as well as ever.

Now he knew there was the fish and his hands and back were no dream. The hands cure quickly, he thought. I bled them clean and the salt water will heal them. The dark water of the true gulf is the greatest healer that there is. All I must do is keep the head clear. The hands have done their work and we sail well. With his mouth shut and his tail straight up and down we sail like brothers. Then his head started to become a little unclear and he thought, is he bringing me in or am I bringing him in? If I were towing him behind there would be no question. Nor if the fish were in the skiff, with all dignity gone, there would be no question either. But they were sailing together lashed side by side and the old man thought, let him bring me in if it pleases him. I am only better than him through trickery and he meant me no harm.

They sailed well and the old man soaked his hands in the salt water and tried to keep his head clear. There were high cumulus clouds and enough cirrus above them so that the old man knew the breeze would last all night. The old man looked at the fish constantly to make sure it was true. It was an hour before the first shark hit him.

The shark was not an accident. He had come up from deep down in the water as the dark cloud of blood had settled and dispersed in the mile deep sea. He had come up so fast and absolutely without caution that he broke the surface of the blue water and was in the sun. Then he fell back into the sea and picked up the scent and started swimming on the course the skiff and the fish had taken.

Sometimes he lost the scent. But he would pick it up again, or have just a trace of it, and he swam fast and hard on the course. He was a very big Mako shark built to swim as fast as the fastest fish in the sea and everything about him was beautiful except his jaws.

His back was as blue as a sword fish's and his belly was silver and his hide was smooth and handsome. He was built as a sword fish except for his huge jaws which were tight shut now as he swam fast, just under the surface with his high dorsal fin knifing through the water without wavering. Inside the closed double lip of his jaws all of his eight rows of teeth were slanted inwards. They were not the ordinary pyramid-shaped teeth of most sharks. They were shaped like a man's fingers when they are crisped like claws. They were nearly as long as the fingers of the old man and they had razor-sharp cutting edges on both sides. This was a fish built to feed on all the fishes in the sea, that were so fast and strong and well armed that they had no other enemy. Now he speeded up as he smelled the fresher scent and his blue dorsal fin cut the water.

When the old man saw him coming he knew that this was a shark that had no fear at all and would do exactly what he wished. He prepared the harpoon and made the rope fast while he watched the shark come on. The rope was short as it lacked what he had cut away to lash the fish.

The old man's head was clear and good now and he was full of resolution but he had little hope. It was too good to last, he thought. He took one look at the great fish as he watched the shark close in. It might as well have been a dream, he thought. I cannot keep him from hitting me but maybe I can get him. Dentuso, he thought. Bad luck to your mother.

The shark closed fast astern and when he hit the fish the old man saw his mouth open and his strange eyes and the clicking chop of the teeth as he drove forward in the meat just above the tail. The shark's head was out of water and his back was coming out and the old man could hear the noise of skin and flesh ripping on the big fish when he rammed the harpoon down onto the shark's head at a spot where the line between his eyes intersected with the line that ran straight back from his nose. There were no such lines. There was only the heavy sharp blue head and the big eyes and the clicking, thrusting all-swallowing jaws. But that was the location of the brain and the old man hit it. He hit it with his blood mushed hands driving a good harpoon with all his strength. He hit it without hope but with resolution and complete malignancy.

The shark swung over and the old man saw his eye was not alive and then he swung over once again, wrapping himself in two loops of the rope. The old man knew that he was dead but the shark would not accept it. Then, on his back, with his tail lashing and his jaws clicking, the shark plowed over the water as a speed-boat does. The water was white where his tail beat it and three-quarters of his body was clear above the water when the rope came taut, shivered, and then snapped. The shark lay quietly for a little while on the surface and the old man watched him. Then he went down very slowly.

"He took about forty pounds," the old man said aloud. He took my harpoon too and all the rope, he thought, and now my fish bleeds again and there will be others.

He did not like to look at the fish anymore since he had been mutilated. When the fish had been hit it was as though he himself were hit.

But I killed the shark that hit my fish, he thought. And he was the biggest dentuso that I have ever seen. And God knows that I have seen big ones.

It was too good to last, he thought. I wish it had been a dream now and that I had never hooked the fish and was alone in bed on the newspapers.

"But man is not made for defeat," he said. "A man can be destroyed but not defeated." I am sorry that I killed the fish though, he thought. Now the bad time is coming and I do not even have the harpoon. The dentuso is cruel and able and strong and intelligent. But I was more intelligent that he was. Perhaps not, he thought. Perhaps I was only better armed.

"Don't think, old man," he said aloud. "Sail on this course and take it when it comes."

But I must think, he thought. Because it is all I have left. That and baseball. I wonder how the great DiMaggio would have liked the way I hit him in the brain? It was no great thing, he thought. Any man could do it. But do you think my hands were as great a handicap as the bone spurs? I cannot know. I never had anything wrong with my heel except the time the sting ray stung it when I stepped on him when swimming and paralyzed the lower leg and made the unbearable pain.

"Think about something cheerful, old man," he said. "Every minute now you are closer to home. You sail lighter for the loss of forty pounds."

He knew quite well the pattern of what could happen when he reached the inner part of the current. But there was nothing to be done now.

"Yes there is," he said aloud. "I can lash my knife to the butt of one of the oars."

So he did that with the tiller under his arm and the sheet of the sail under his foot.

"Now," he said. "I am still an old man. But I am not unarmed."

The breeze was fresh now and he sailed on well. He watched only the forward part of the fish and some of his hope returned.

It is silly not to hope, he thought. Besides I believe it is a sin. Do not think about sin, he thought. There are enough problems now without sin. Also I have no understanding of it.

I have no understanding of it and I am not sure that I believe in it. Perhaps it was a sin to kill the fish. I suppose it was even though I did it to keep me alive and feed many people. But then everything is a sin. Do not think about sin. It is much too late for that and there are people who are paid to do it. Let them think about it. You were born to be a fisherman as the fish was born to be a fish. San Pedro was a fisherman as was the father of the great DiMaggio.

But he liked to think about all things that he was involved in and since there was nothing to read and he did not have a radio, he thought much and he kept on thinking about sin. You did not kill the fish only to keep alive and to sell for food, he thought. You killed him for pride and because you are a fisherman. You loved him when he was alive and you loved him after. It you love him, it is not a sin to kill him. Or is it more?

"You think too much, old man," he said aloud.

But you enjoyed killing the dentuso, he thought. He lives on the live fish as you do. He is not a scavenger nor just a moving appetite as some sharks are. He is beautiful and noble and knows no fear of anything.

"I killed him in self-defense," the old man said aloud. "And I killed him well."

Besides, he thought, everything kills everything else in some way. Fishing kills me exactly as it keeps me alive. The boy keeps me alive, he thought. I must not deceive myself too much.

He leaned over the side and pulled loose a piece of the meat of the fish where the shark had cut him. He chewed it and noted its quality and its good taste. It was firm and juicy, like meat, but it was not red. There was no stringiness in it and he knew that it would bring the highest price in the market. But there was no way to keep its scent out of the water and the old man knew that a very bad time was coming.

The breeze was steady. It had backed a little further into the north-east and he knew that meant that it would not fall off. The old man looked ahead of him but he could see no sails nor could he see the hull nor the smoke of any ship. There were only the flying fish that went up from his bow sailing away to either side and the yellow patches of gulf-weed. He could not even see a bird.

He had sailed for two hours, resting in the stern and sometimes chewing a bit of the meat from the marlin, trying to rest and to be strong, when he saw the first of the two sharks.

"Ay," he said aloud. There is no translation for this word and perhaps it is just a noise such as a man might make, involuntarily, feeling the nail go through his hands and into the wood.

"Galanos," he said aloud. He had seen the second fin now coming up behind the first and had identified them as shovel-nosed sharks by the brown, triangular fin and the sweeping movements of the tail. They had the scent and were excited and in the stupidity of their great hunger they were losing and finding the scent in their excitement. But they were closing all the time.

The old man made the sheet fast and jammed the tiller. Then he took up the oar with the knife lashed to it. He lifted it as lightly as he could because his hands rebelled at the pain. Then he opened and closed them on it lightly to loosen them. He closed them firmly so they would take the pain now and would not flinch and watched the sharks come. He could see their wide, flattened, shovel-pointed heads now and their white-tipped wide pectoral fins. They were hateful sharks, bad smelling, scavengers as well as killers, and when they were hungry they would bite at an oar or the rudder of a boat. It was these sharks that would cut the turtles' legs and flippers off when the turtles were asleep on the surface, and they would hit a man in the water, if they were hungry, even if the man had no smell of fish blood nor of fish slime on him.

"Ay," the old man said. "Galanos. Come on, Galanos."

They came. But they did not come as the Mako had come. One turned and went out of sight under the skiff and the old man could feel the skiff shake as he jerked and pulled on the fish. The other watched the old man with his slitted yellow eyes and then came in fast with his half circle of jaws wide to hit the fish where he had already been bitten. The line showed clearly on the top of his brown head and back where the brain joined the spinal cord and the old man drove the knife on the oar into the juncture, withdrew it, and drove it in again into the shark's yellow cat-like eyes. The shark let go of the fish and slid down, swallowing what he had taken as he died.

The skiff was still shaking with the destruction the other shark was doing to the fish and the old man let go the sheet so that the skiff would swing broadside and bring the shark out from under. When he saw the shark he leaned over the side and punched at him. He hit only meat and the hide was set hard and he barely got the knife in. The blow hurt not only his hands but his shoulder too. But the shark came up fast with his head out and the old man hit him squarely in the center of his flat-topped head as his nose came out of water and lay against the fish. The old man withdrew the blade and punched the shark exactly in the same spot again. He still hung to the fish with his jaws hooked and the old man stabbed him in his left eye. The shark still hung there.

"No?" the old man said and he drove the blade between the vertebrae and the brain. It was an easy shot now and he felt the cartilage sever. The old man reversed the oar and put the blade between the shark's jaws to open them. He twisted the blade and as the shark slid loose he said, "Go on, galano. Slide down a mile deep. Go see your friend, or maybe it's your mother."

The old man wiped the blade of his knife and laid down the oar. Then he found the sheet and the sail filled and he brought the skiff onto her course.

"They must have taken a quarter of him and of the best meat," he said aloud. "I wish it were a dream and that I had never hooked him. I'm sorry about it, fish. It makes everything wrong." He stopped and he did not want to look at the fish now. Drained of blood and awash he looked the colour of the silver backing of a mirror and his stripes still showed.

"I shouldn't have gone out so far, fish," he said. "Neither for you nor for me. I'm sorry, fish."

Now, he said to himself. Look to the lashing on the knife and see if it has been cut. Then get your hand in order because there still is more to come.

"I wish I had a stone for the knife," the old man said after he had checked the lashing on the oar butt. "I should have brought a stone." You should have brought many things, he thought. But you did not bring them, old man. Now is no time to think of what you do not have. Think of what you can do with what there is.

"You give me much good counsel," he said aloud. "I'm tired of it."

He held the tiller under his arm and soaked both his hands in the water as the skiff drove forward.

"God knows how much that last one took," he said. "But she's much lighter now." He did not want to think of the mutilated under-side of the fish. He knew that each of the jerking bumps of the shark had been meat torn away and that the fish now made a trail for all sharks as wide as a highway through the sea.

He was a fish to keep a man all winter, he thought. Don't think of that. Just rest and try to get your hands in shape to defend what is left of him. The blood smell from my hands means nothing now with all that scent in the water. Besides they do not bleed much. There is nothing cut that means anything. The bleeding may keep the left from cramping.

What can I think of now? he thought. Nothing. I must think of nothing and wait for the next ones. I wish it had really been a dream, he thought. But who knows? It might have turned out well.

The next shark that came was a single shovel-nose. He came like a pig to the trough if a pig had a mouth so wide that you could put your head in it. The old man let him hit the fish and then drove the knife on the oar down into his brain. But the shark jerked backwards as he rolled and the knife blade snapped.

The old man settled himself to steer. He did not even watch the big shark sinking slowly in the water, showing first life-size, then small, then tiny. That always fascinated the old man. But he did not even watch it now.

"I have the gaff now," he said. "But it will do no good. I have the two oars and the tiller and the short club."

Now they have beaten me, he thought. I am too old to club sharks to death. But I will try it as long as I have the oars and the short club and the tiller.

He put his hands in the water again to soak them. It was getting late in the afternoon and he saw nothing but the sea and the sky. There was more wind in the sky than there had been, and soon he hoped that he would see land.

"You're tired, old man," he said. "You're tired inside."

The sharks did not hit him again until just before sunset.

The old man saw the brown fins coming along the wide trail the fish must make in the water. They were not even quartering on the scent. They were headed straight for the skiff swimming side by side.

He jammed the tiller, made the sheet fast and reached under the stern for the club. It was an oar handle from a broken oar sawed off to about two and a half feet in length. He could only use it effectively with one hand because of the grip of the handle and he took good hold of it with his right hand, flexing his hand on it, as he watched the sharks come. They were both galanos.

I must let the first one get a good hold and hit him on the point of the nose or straight across the top of the head, he thought.

The two sharks closed together and as he saw the one nearest him open his jaws and sink them into the silver side of the fish, he raised the club high and brought it down heavy and slamming onto the top of the shark's broad head. He felt the rubbery solidity as the club came down. But he felt the rigidity of bone too and he struck the shark once more hard across the point of the nose as he slid down from the fish.

The other shark had been in and out and now came in again with his jaws wide. The old man could see pieces of the meat of the fish spilling white from the corner of his jaws as he bumped the fish and closed his jaws. He swung at him and hit only the head and the shark looked at him and wrenched the meat loose. The old man swung the club down on him again as he slipped away to swallow and hit only the heavy solid rubberiness.

"Come on, galano," the old man said. "Come in again."

The shark came in a rush and the old man hit him as he shut his jaws. He hit him solidly and from as high up as he could raise the club. This time he felt the bone at the base of the brain and he hit him again in the same place while the shark tore the meat loose sluggishly and slid down from the fish.

The old man watched for him to come again but neither shark showed. Then he saw one on the surface swimming in circles. He did not see the fin of the other.

I could not expect to kill them, he thought. I could have in my time. But I have hurt them both badly and neither one can feel very good. If I could have used a bat with two hands I could have killed the first one surely. Even now, he thought.

He did not want to look at the fish. He knew that half of him had been destroyed. The sun had gone down while he had been in the fight with the sharks.

"It will be dark soon," he said. "Then I should see the glow of Havana. If I am too far to the eastward I will see the lights of one of the new beaches."

I cannot be too far out now, he thought. I hope no one has been too worried. There is only the boy to worry, of course. But I am sure he would have confidence. Many of the older fishermen will worry. Many others too, he thought. I live in a good town.

He could not talk to the fish anymore because the fish had been ruined too badly. Then something came into his head.

"Half fish," he said. "Fish that you were. I am sorry that I went too far out. I ruined us both. But we have killed many sharks, you and I, and ruined many others. How many did you ever kill, old fish? You do not have that spear on your head for nothing."

He liked to think of the fish and what he could do to a shark if he were swimming free. I should have chopped the bill off to fight them with, he thought. But there was no hatchet and then there was no knife.

But if I had, and could have lashed it to an oar butt, what a weapon. Then we might have fought them together. What will you do now if they come in the night? What can you do?

"Fight them," he said. "I'll fight them until I die."

But in the dark now and no glow showing and no lights and only the wind and the steady pull of the sail he felt that perhaps he was already dead. He put his two hands together and felt the palms. They were not dead and he could bring the pain of life by simply opening and closing them. He leaned his back against the stern and knew he was not dead. His shoulders told him.

I have all those prayers I promised if I caught the fish, he thought. But I am too tired to say them now. I better get the sack and put it over my shoulders.

He lay in the stern and steered and watched for the glow to come in the sky. I have half of him, he thought. Maybe I'll have the luck to bring the forward half in. I should have some luck. No, he said. You violated your luck when you went too far outside.

"Don't be silly," he said aloud. "And keep awake and steer. You may have much luck yet."

"I'd like to buy some if there's any place they sell it," he said.

What could I buy it with? he asked himself. Could I buy it with a lost harpoon and a broken knife and two bad hands?

"You might," he said. "You tried to buy it with eighty-four days at sea. They nearly sold it to you too."

I must not think nonsense, he thought. Luck is a thing that comes in many forms and who can recognize her? I would take some though in any form and pay what they asked. I wish I could see the glow from the lights, he thought. I wish too many things. But that is the thing I wish for now. He tried to settle more comfortably to steer and from his pain he knew he was not dead.

He saw the reflected glare of the lights of the city at what must have been around ten o'clock at night. They were only perceptible at first as the light is in the sky before the moon rises. Then they were steady to see across the ocean which was rough now with the increasing breeze. He steered inside of the glow and he thought that now, soon, he must hit the edge of the stream.

Now it is over, he thought. They will probably hit me again. But what can a man do against them in the dark without a weapon?

He was stiff and sore now and his wounds and all of the strained parts of his body hurt with the cold of the night. I hope I do not have to fight again, he thought. I hope so much I do not have to fight again.

But by midnight he fought and this time he knew the fight was useless. They came in a pack and he could only see the lines in the water that their fins made and their phosphorescence as they threw themselves on the fish. He clubbed at heads and heard the jaws chop and the shaking of the skiff as they took hold below. He clubbed desperately at what he could only feel and hear and he felt something seize the club and it was gone.

He jerked the tiller free from the rudder and beat and chopped with it, holding it in both hands and driving it down again and again. But they were up to the bow now and driving in one after the other and together, tearing off the pieces of meat that showed glowing below the sea as they turned to come once more.

One came, finally, against the head itself and he knew that it was over. He swung the tiller across the shark's head where the jaws were caught in the heaviness of the fish's head which would not tear. He swung it once and twice and again. He heard the tiller break and he lunged at the shark with the splintered butt. He felt it go in and knowing it was sharp he drove it in again. The shark let go and rolled away. That was the last shark of the pack that came. There was nothing more for them to eat.

The old man could hardly breathe now and he felt a strange taste in his mouth. It was coppery and sweet and he was afraid of it for a moment. But there was not much of it.

He spat into the ocean and said, "Eat that, Galanos. And make a dream you've killed a man."

He knew he was beaten now finally and without remedy and he went back to the stern and found the jagged end of the tiller would fit in the slot of the rudder well enough for him to steer. He settled the sack around his shoulders and put the skiff on her course. He sailed lightly now and he had no thoughts nor any feelings of any kind. He was past everything now and he sailed the skiff to make his home port as well and as intelligently as he could. In the night sharks hit the carcass as someone might pick up crumbs from the table. The old man paid no attention to them and did not pay any attention to anything except steering. He only noticed how lightly and how well the skiff sailed now there was no great weight beside her.

She's good, he thought. She is sound and not harmed in any way except for the tiller. That is easily replaced.

He could feel he was inside the current now and he could see the lights of the beach colonies along the shore. He knew where he was now and it was nothing to get home.

The wind is our friend, anyway, he thought. Then he added, sometimes. And the great sea with our friends and our enemies. And bed, he thought. Bed is my friend. Just bed, he thought. Bed will be a great thing. It is easy when you are beaten, he thought. I never knew how easy it was. And what beat you, he thought.

"Nothing," he said aloud. "I went out too far."

When he sailed into the little harbour the lights of the Terrace were out and he knew everyone was in bed. The breeze had risen steadily and was blowing strongly now. It was quiet in the harbour though and he sailed up onto the little patch of shingle below the rocks. There was no one to help him so he pulled the boat up as far as he could. Then he stepped out and made her fast to a rock.

He unstepped the mast and furled the sail and tied it. Then he shouldered the mast and started to climb. It was then he knew the depth of his tiredness. He stopped for a moment and looked back and saw in the reflection from the street light the great tail of the fish standing up well behind the skiff's stern. He saw the white naked line of his backbone and the dark mass of the head with the projecting bill and all the nakedness between.

He started to climb again and at the top he fell and lay for some time with the mast across his shoulder. He tried to get up. But it was too difficult and he sat there with the mast on his shoulder and looked at the road. A cat passed on the far side going about its business and the old man watched it. Then he just watched the road.

Finally he put the mast down and stood up. He picked the mast up and put it on his shoulder and started up the road. He had to sit down five times before he reached his shack.

Inside the shack he leaned the mast against the wall. In the dark he found a water bottle and took a drink. Then he lay down on the bed. He pulled the blanket over his shoulders and then over his back and legs and he slept face down on the newspapers with his arms out straight and the palms of his hands up.

He was asleep when the boy looked in the door in the morning. It was blowing so hard that the drifting-boats would not be going out and the boy had slept late and then come to the old man's shack as he had come each morning. The boy saw that the old man was breathing and then he saw the old man's hands and he started to cry. He went out very quietly to go to bring some coffee and all the way down the road he was crying.

Many fishermen were around the skiff looking at what was lashed beside it and one was in the water, his trousers rolled up, measuring the skeleton with a length of line.

The boy did not go down. He had been there before and one of the fishermen was looking after the skiff for him.

"How is he?" one of the fishermen shouted.

"Sleeping," the boy called. He did not care that they saw him crying. "Let no one disturb him."

"He was eighteen feet from nose to tail," the fisherman who was measuring him called.

"I believe it," the boy said.

He went into the Terrace and asked for a can of coffee.

"Hot and with plenty of milk and sugar in it."

"Anything more?"

"No. Afterwards I will see what he can eat."

"What a fish it was," the proprietor said. "There has never been such a fish. Those were two fine fish you took yesterday too."

"Damn my fish," the boy said and he started to cry again.

"Do you want a drink of any kind?" the proprietor asked.

"No," the boy said. "Tell them not to bother Santiago. I'll be back."

"Tell him how sorry I am."

"Thanks," the boy said.

The boy carried the hot can of coffee up to the old man's shack and sat by him until he woke. Once it looked as though he were waking. But he had gone back into heavy sleep and the boy had gone across the road to borrow some wood to heat the coffee.

Finally the old man woke.

"Don't sit up," the boy said. "Drink this." He poured some of the coffee in a glass.

The old man took it and drank it.

"They beat me, Manolin," he said. "They truly beat me."

"He didn't beat you. Not the fish."

"No. Truly. It was afterwards."

"Pedrico is looking after the skiff and the gear. What do you want done with the head?"

"Let Pedrico chop it up to use in fish traps."

"And the spear?"

"You keep it if you want it."

"I want it," the boy said. "Now we must make our plans about the other things."

"Did they search for me?"

"Of course. With coast guard and with planes."

"The ocean is very big and a skiff is small and hard to see," the old man said. He noticed how pleasant it was to have someone to talk to instead of speaking only to himself and to the sea. "I missed you," he said. "What did you catch?"

"One the first day. One the second and two the third."

"Very good."

"Now we fish together again."

"No. I am not lucky. I am not lucky anymore."

"The hell with luck," the boy said. "I'll bring the luck with me."

"What will your family say?"

"I do not care. I caught two yesterday. But we will fish together now for I still have much to learn."

"We must get a good killing lance and always have it on board. You can make the blade from a spring leaf from an old Ford. We can grind it in Guanabacoa. It should be sharp and not tempered so it will break. My knife broke."

"I'll get another knife and have the spring ground. How many days of heavy brisa have we?"

"Maybe three. Maybe more."

"I will have everything in order," the boy said. "You get your hands well old man."

"I know how to care for them. In the night I spat something strange and felt something in my chest was broken."

"Get that well too," the boy said. "Lie down, old man, and I will bring you your clean shirt. And something to eat."

"Bring any of the papers of the time that I was gone," the old man said.

"You must get well fast for there is much that I can learn and you can teach me everything. How much did you suffer?"

"Plenty," the old man said.

"I'll bring the food and the papers," the boy said. "Rest well, old man. I will bring stuff from the drug-store for your hands."

"Don't forget to tell Pedrico the head is his."

"No. I will remember."

As the boy went out the door and down the worn coral rock road he was crying again.

That afternoon there was a party of tourists at the Terrace and looking down in the water among the empty beer cans and dead barracudas a woman saw a great long white spine with a huge tail at the end that lifted and swung with the tide while the east wind blew a heavy steady sea outside the entrance to the harbour.

"What's that?" she asked a waiter and pointed to the long backbone of the great fish that was now just garbage waiting to go out with the tide.

"Tiburon," the waiter said, "Eshark." He was meaning to explain what had happened.

"I didn't know sharks had such handsome, beautifully formed tails."

"I didn't either," her male companion said.

Up the road, in his shack, the old man was sleeping again. He was still sleeping on his face and the boy was sitting by him watching him. The old man was dreaming about the lions.
Robert Cohn was once middleweight boxing champion of Princeton. Do not think that I am very much impressed by that as a boxing title, but it meant a lot to Cohn. He cared nothing for boxing, in fact he disliked it, but he learned it painfully and thoroughly to counteract the feeling of inferiority and shyness he had felt on being treated as a Jew at Princeton. There was a certain inner comfort in knowing he could knock down anybody who was snooty to him, although, being very shy and a thoroughly nice boy, he never fought except in the gym. He was Spider Kelly's star pupil. Spider Kelly taught all his young gentlemen to box like featherweights, no matter whether they weighed one hundred and five or two hundred and five pounds. But it seemed to fit Cohn. He was really very fast. He was so good that Spider promptly overmatched him and got his nose permanently flattened. This increased Cohn's distaste for boxing, but it gave him a certain satisfaction of some strange sort, and it certainly improved his nose. In his last year at Princeton he read too much and took to wearing spectacles. I never met any one of his class who remembered him. They did not even remember that he was middleweight boxing champion.

I mistrust all frank and simple people, especially when their stories hold together, and I always had a suspicion that perhaps Robert Cohn had never been middleweight boxing champion, and that perhaps a horse had stepped on his face, or that maybe his mother had been frightened or seen something, or that he had, maybe, bumped into something as a young child, but I finally had somebody verify the story from Spider Kelly. Spider Kelly not only remembered Cohn. He had often wondered what had become of him.

Robert Cohn was a member, through his father, of one of the richest Jewish families in New York, and through his mother of one of the oldest. At the military school where he prepped for Princeton, and played a very good end on the football team, no one had made him race-conscious. No one had ever made him feel he was a Jew, and hence any different from anybody else, until he went to Princeton. He was a nice boy, a friendly boy, and very shy, and it made him bitter. He took it out in boxing, and he came out of Princeton with painful self-consciousness and the flattened nose, and was married by the first girl who was nice to him. He was married five years, had three children, lost most of the fifty thousand dollars his father left him, the balance of the estate having gone to his mother, hardened into a rather unattractive mould under domestic unhappiness with a rich wife; and just when he had made up his mind to leave his wife she left him and went off with a miniature-painter. As he had been thinking for months about leaving his wife and had not done it because it would be too cruel to deprive her of himself, her departure was a very healthful shock.

The divorce was arranged and Robert Cohn went out to the Coast. In California he fell among literary people and, as he still had a little of the fifty thousand left, in a short time he was backing a review of the Arts. The review commenced publication in Carmel, California, and finished in Provincetown, Massachusetts. By that time Cohn, who had been regarded purely as an angel, and whose name had appeared on the editorial page merely as a member of the advisory board, had become the sole editor. It was his money and he discovered he liked the authority of editing. He was sorry when the magazine became too expensive and he had to give it up.

By that time, though, he had other things to worry about. He had been taken in hand by a lady who hoped to rise with the magazine. She was very forceful, and Cohn never had a chance of not being taken in hand. Also he was sure that he loved her. When this lady saw that the magazine was not going to rise, she became a little disgusted with Cohn and decided that she might as well get what there was to get while there was still something available, so she urged that they go to Europe, where Cohn could write. They came to Europe, where the lady had been educated, and stayed three years. During these three years, the first spent in travel, the last two in Paris, Robert Cohn had two friends, Braddocks and myself. Braddocks was his literary friend. I was his tennis friend.

The lady who had him, her name was Frances, found toward the end of the second year that her looks were going, and her attitude toward Robert changed from one of careless possession and exploitation to the absolute determination that he should marry her. During this time Robert's mother had settled an allowance on him, about three hundred dollars a month. During two years and a half I do not believe that Robert Cohn looked at another woman. He was fairly happy, except that, like many people living in Europe, he would rather have been in America, and he had discovered writing. He wrote a novel, and it was not really such a bad novel as the critics later called it, although it was a very poor novel. He read many books, played bridge, played tennis, and boxed at a local gymnasium.

I first became aware of his lady's attitude toward him one night after the three of us had dined together. We had dined at l'Avenue's and afterward went to the Café de Versailles for coffee. We had several fines after the coffee, and I said I must be going. Cohn had been talking about the two of us going off somewhere on a weekend trip. He wanted to get out of town and get in a good walk. I suggested we fly to Strasbourg and walk up to Saint Odile, or somewhere or other in Alsace. "I know a girl in Strasbourg who can show us the town," I said.

Somebody kicked me under the table. I thought it was accidental and went on: "She's been there two years and knows everything there is to know about the town. She's a swell girl."

I was kicked again under the table and, looking, saw Frances, Robert's lady, her chin lifting and her face hardening.

"Hell," I said, "why go to Strasbourg? We could go up to Bruges, or to the Ardennes."

Cohn looked relieved. I was not kicked again. I said good-night and went out. Cohn said he wanted to buy a paper and would walk to the corner with me. "For God's sake," he said, "why did you say that about that girl in Strasbourg for? Didn't you see Frances?"

"No, why should I? If I know an American girl that lives in Strasbourg what the hell is it to Frances?"

"It doesn't make any difference. Any girl. I couldn't go, that would be all."

"Don't be silly."

"You don't know Frances. Any girl at all. Didn't you see the way she looked?"

"Oh, well," I said, "let's go to Senlis."

"Don't get sore."

"I'm not sore. Senlis is a good place and we can stay at the Grand Cerf and take a hike in the woods and come home."

"Good, that will be fine."

"Well, I'll see you to-morrow at the courts," I said.

"Good-night, Jake," he said, and started back to the café.

"You forgot to get your paper," I said.

"That's so." He walked with me up to the kiosque at the corner. "You are not sore, are you, Jake?" He turned with the paper in his hand.

"No, why should I be?"

"See you at tennis," he said. I watched him walk back to the café holding his paper. I rather liked him and evidently she led him quite a life.


CHAPTER 2

That winter Robert Cohn went over to America with his novel, and it was accepted by a fairly good publisher. His going made an awful row I heard, and I think that was where Frances lost him, because several women were nice to him in New York, and when he came back he was quite changed. He was more enthusiastic about America than ever, and he was not so simple, and he was not so nice. The publishers had praised his novel pretty highly and it rather went to his head. Then several women had put themselves out to be nice to him, and his horizons had all shifted. For four years his horizon had been absolutely limited to his wife. For three years, or almost three years, he had never seen beyond Frances. I am sure he had never been in love in his life.

He had married on the rebound from the rotten time he had in college, and Frances took him on the rebound from his discovery that he had not been everything to his first wife. He was not in love yet but he realized that he was an attractive quantity to women, and that the fact of a woman caring for him and wanting to live with him was not simply a divine miracle. This changed him so that he was not so pleasant to have around. Also, playing for higher stakes than he could afford in some rather steep bridge games with his New York connections, he had held cards and won several hundred dollars. It made him rather vain of his bridge game, and he talked several times of how a man could always make a living at bridge if he were ever forced to.

Then there was another thing. He had been reading W. H. Hudson. That sounds like an innocent occupation, but Cohn had read and reread "The Purple Land." "The Purple Land" is a very sinister book if read too late in life. It recounts splendid imaginary amorous adventures of a perfect English gentleman in an intensely romantic land, the scenery of which is very well described. For a man to take it at thirty-four as a guide-book to what life holds is about as safe as it would be for a man of the same age to enter Wall Street direct from a French convent, equipped with a complete set of the more practical Alger books. Cohn, I believe, took every word of "The Purple Land" as literally as though it had been an R. G. Dun report. You understand me, he made some reservations, but on the whole the book to him was sound. It was all that was needed to set him off. I did not realize the extent to which it had set him off until one day he came into my office.

"Hello, Robert," I said. "Did you come in to cheer me up?"

"Would you like to go to South America, Jake?" he asked.

"No."

"Why not?"

"I don't know. I never wanted to go. Too expensive. You can see all the South Americans you want in Paris anyway."

"They're not the real South Americans."

"They look awfully real to me."

I had a boat train to catch with a week's mail stories, and only half of them written.

"Do you know any dirt?" I asked.

"No."

"None of your exalted connections getting divorces?"

"No; listen, Jake. If I handled both our expenses, would you go to South America with me?"

"Why me?"

"You can talk Spanish. And it would be more fun with two of us."

"No," I said, "I like this town and I go to Spain in the summer-time."

"All my life I've wanted to go on a trip like that," Cohn said. He sat down. "I'll be too old before I can ever do it."

"Don't be a fool," I said. "You can go anywhere you want. You've got plenty of money."

"I know. But I can't get started."

"Cheer up," I said. "All countries look just like the moving pictures."

But I felt sorry for him. He had it badly.

"I can't stand it to think my life is going so fast and I'm not really living it."

"Nobody ever lives their life all the way up except bull-fighters."

"I'm not interested in bull-fighters. That's an abnormal life. I want to go back in the country in South America. We could have a great trip."

"Did you ever think about going to British East Africa to shoot?"

"No, I wouldn't like that."

"I'd go there with you."

"No; that doesn't interest me."

"That's because you never read a book about it. Go on and read a book all full of love affairs with the beautiful shiny black princesses."

"I want to go to South America."

He had a hard, Jewish, stubborn streak.

"Come on down-stairs and have a drink."

"Aren't you working?"

"No," I said. We went down the stairs to the café on the ground floor. I had discovered that was the best way to get rid of friends. Once you had a drink all you had to say was: "Well, I've got to get back and get off some cables," and it was done. It is very important to discover graceful exits like that in the newspaper business, where it is such an important part of the ethics that you should never seem to be working. Anyway, we went down-stairs to the bar and had a whiskey and soda. Cohn looked at the bottles in bins around the wall. "This is a good place," he said.

"There's a lot of liquor," I agreed.

"Listen, Jake," he leaned forward on the bar. "Don't you ever get the feeling that all your life is going by and you're not taking advantage of it? Do you realize you've lived nearly half the time you have to live already?"

"Yes, every once in a while."

"Do you know that in about thirty-five years more we'll be dead?"

"What the hell, Robert," I said. "What the hell."

"I'm serious."

"It's one thing I don't worry about," I said.

"You ought to."

"I've had plenty to worry about one time or other. I'm through worrying."

"Well, I want to go to South America."

"Listen, Robert, going to another country doesn't make any difference. I've tried all that. You can't get away from yourself by moving from one place to another. There's nothing to that."

"But you've never been to South America."

"South America hell! If you went there the way you feel now it would be exactly the same. This is a good town. Why don't you start living your life in Paris?"

"I'm sick of Paris, and I'm sick of the Quarter."

"Stay away from the Quarter. Cruise around by yourself and see what happens to you."

"Nothing happens to me. I walked alone all one night and nothing happened except a bicycle cop stopped me and asked to see my papers."

"Wasn't the town nice at night?"

"I don't care for Paris."

So there you were. I was sorry for him, but it was not a thing you could do anything about, because right away you ran up against the two stubbornnesses: South America could fix it and he did not like Paris. He got the first idea out of a book, and I suppose the second came out of a book too.

"Well," I said, "I've got to go up-stairs and get off some cables."

"Do you really have to go?"

"Yes, I've got to get these cables off."

"Do you mind if I come up and sit around the office?"

"No, come on up."

He sat in the outer room and read the papers, and the Editor and Publisher and I worked hard for two hours. Then I sorted out the carbons, stamped on a by-line, put the stuff in a couple of big manila envelopes and rang for a boy to take them to the Gare St. Lazare. I went out into the other room and there was Robert Cohn asleep in the big chair. He was asleep with his head on his arms. I did not like to wake him up, but I wanted to lock the office and shove off. I put my hand on his shoulder. He shook his head. "I can't do it," he said, and put his head deeper into his arms. "I can't do it. Nothing will make me do it."

"Robert," I said, and shook him by the shoulder. He looked up. He smiled and blinked.

"Did I talk out loud just then?"

"Something. But it wasn't clear."

"God, what a rotten dream!"

"Did the typewriter put you to sleep?"

"Guess so. I didn't sleep all last night."

"What was the matter?"

"Talking," he said.

I could picture it. I have a rotten habit of picturing the bedroom scenes of my friends. We went out to the Café Napolitain to have an apéritif and watch the evening crowd on the Boulevard.


CHAPTER 3

It was a warm spring night and I sat at a table on the terrace of the Napolitain after Robert had gone, watching it get dark and the electric signs come on, and the red and green stop-and-go traffic-signal, and the crowd going by, and the horse-cabs clippety-clopping along at the edge of the solid taxi traffic, and the poules going by, singly and in pairs, looking for the evening meal. I watched a good-looking girl walk past the table and watched her go up the street and lost sight of her, and watched another, and then saw the first one coming back again. She went by once more and I caught her eye, and she came over and sat down at the table. The waiter came up.

"Well, what will you drink?" I asked.

"Pernod."

"That's not good for little girls."

"Little girl yourself. Dites garçon, un pernod."

"A pernod for me, too."

"What's the matter?" she asked. "Going on a party?"

"Sure. Aren't you?"

"I don't know. You never know in this town."

"Don't you like Paris?"

"No."

"Why don't you go somewhere else?"

"Isn't anywhere else."

"You're happy, all right."

"Happy, hell!"

Pernod is greenish imitation absinthe. When you add water it turns milky. It tastes like licorice and it has a good uplift, but it drops you just as far. We sat and drank it, and the girl looked sullen.

"Well," I said, "are you going to buy me a dinner?"

She grinned and I saw why she made a point of not laughing. With her mouth closed she was a rather pretty girl. I paid for the saucers and we walked out to the street. I hailed a horse-cab and the driver pulled up at the curb. Settled back in the slow, smoothly rolling fiacre we moved up the Avenue de l'Opéra, passed the locked doors of the shops, their windows lighted, the Avenue broad and shiny and almost deserted. The cab passed the New York Herald bureau with the window full of clocks.

"What are all the clocks for?" she asked.

"They show the hour all over America."

"Don't kid me."

We turned off the Avenue up the Rue des Pyramides, through the traffic of the Rue de Rivoli, and through a dark gate into the Tuileries. She cuddled against me and I put my arm around her. She looked up to be kissed. She touched me with one hand and I put her hand away.

"Never mind."

"What's the matter? You sick?"

"Yes."

"Everybody's sick. I'm sick, too."

We came out of the Tuileries into the light and crossed the Seine and then turned up the Rue des Saints Pères.

"You oughtn't to drink pernod if you're sick."

"You neither."

"It doesn't make any difference with me. It doesn't make any difference with a woman."

"What are you called?"

"Georgette. How are you called?"

"Jacob."

"That's a Flemish name."

"American too."

"You're not Flamand?"

"No, American."

"Good, I detest Flamands."

By this time we were at the restaurant. I called to the cocher to stop. We got out and Georgette did not like the looks of the place. "This is no great thing of a restaurant."

"No," I said. "Maybe you would rather go to Foyot's. Why don't you keep the cab and go on?"

I had picked her up because of a vague sentimental idea that it would be nice to eat with some one. It was a long time since I had dined with a poule, and I had forgotten how dull it could be. We went into the restaurant, passed Madame Lavigne at the desk and into a little room. Georgette cheered up a little under the food.

"It isn't bad here," she said. "It isn't chic, but the food is all right."

"Better than you eat in Liège."

"Brussels, you mean."

We had another bottle of wine and Georgette made a joke. She smiled and showed all her bad teeth, and we touched glasses. "You're not a bad type," she said. "It's a shame you're sick. We get on well. What's the matter with you, anyway?"

"I got hurt in the war," I said.

"Oh, that dirty war."

We would probably have gone on and discussed the war and agreed that it was in reality a calamity for civilization, and perhaps would have been better avoided. I was bored enough. Just then from the other room some one called: "Barnes! I say, Barnes! Jacob Barnes!"

"It's a friend calling me," I explained, and went out.

There was Braddocks at a big table with a party: Cohn, Frances Clyne, Mrs. Braddocks, several people I did not know.

"You're coming to the dance, aren't you?" Braddocks asked.

"What dance?"

"Why, the dancings. Don't you know we've revived them?" Mrs. Braddocks put in.

"You must come, Jake. We're all going," Frances said from the end of the table. She was tall and had a smile.

"Of course, he's coming," Braddocks said. "Come in and have coffee with us, Barnes."

"Right."

"And bring your friend," said Mrs. Braddocks laughing. She was a Canadian and had all their easy social graces.

"Thanks, we'll be in," I said. I went back to the small room.

"Who are your friends?" Georgette asked.

"Writers and artists."

"There are lots of those on this side of the river."

"Too many."

"I think so. Still, some of them make money."

"Oh, yes."

We finished the meal and the wine. "Come on," I said. "We're going to have coffee with the others."

Georgette opened her bag, made a few passes at her face as she looked in the little mirror, re-defined her lips with the lipstick, and straightened her hat.

"Good," she said.

We went into the room full of people and Braddocks and the men at his table stood up.

"I wish to present my fiancée, Mademoiselle Georgette Leblanc," I said. Georgette smiled that wonderful smile, and we shook hands all round.

"Are you related to Georgette Leblanc, the singer?" Mrs. Braddocks asked.

"Connais pas," Georgette answered.

"But you have the same name," Mrs. Braddocks insisted cordially.

"No," said Georgette. "Not at all. My name is Hobin."

"But Mr. Barnes introduced you as Mademoiselle Georgette Leblanc. Surely he did," insisted Mrs. Braddocks, who in the excitement of talking French was liable to have no idea what she was saying.

"He's a fool," Georgette said.

"Oh, it was a joke, then," Mrs. Braddocks said.

"Yes," said Georgette. "To laugh at."

"Did you hear that, Henry?" Mrs. Braddocks called down the table to Braddocks. "Mr. Barnes introduced his fiancée as Mademoiselle Leblanc, and her name is actually Hobin."

"Of course, darling. Mademoiselle Hobin, I've known her for a very long time."

"Oh, Mademoiselle Hobin," Frances Clyne called, speaking French very rapidly and not seeming so proud and astonished as Mrs. Braddocks at its coming out really French. "Have you been in Paris long? Do you like it here? You love Paris, do you not?"

"Who's she?" Georgette turned to me. "Do I have to talk to her?"

She turned to Frances, sitting smiling, her hands folded, her head poised on her long neck, her lips pursed ready to start talking again.

"No, I don't like Paris. It's expensive and dirty."

"Really? I find it so extraordinarily clean. One of the cleanest cities in all Europe."

"I find it dirty."

"How strange! But perhaps you have not been here very long."

"I've been here long enough."

"But it does have nice people in it. One must grant that."

Georgette turned to me. "You have nice friends."

Frances was a little drunk and would have liked to have kept it up but the coffee came, and Lavigne with the liqueurs, and after that we all went out and started for Braddocks's dancing-club.

The dancing-club was a bal musette in the Rue de la Montagne Sainte Geneviève. Five nights a week the working people of the Pantheon quarter danced there. One night a week it was the dancing-club. On Monday nights it was closed. When we arrived it was quite empty, except for a policeman sitting near the door, the wife of the proprietor back of the zinc bar, and the proprietor himself. The daughter of the house came downstairs as we went in. There were long benches, and tables ran across the room, and at the far end a dancing-floor.

"I wish people would come earlier," Braddocks said. The daughter came up and wanted to know what we would drink. The proprietor got up on a high stool beside the dancing-floor and began to play the accordion. He had a string of bells around one of his ankles and beat time with his foot as he played. Every one danced. It was hot and we came off the floor perspiring.

"My God," Georgette said. "What a box to sweat in!"

"It's hot."

"Hot, my God!"

"Take off your hat."

"That's a good idea."

Some one asked Georgette to dance, and I went over to the bar. It was really very hot and the accordion music was pleasant in the hot night. I drank a beer, standing in the doorway and getting the cool breath of wind from the street. Two taxis were coming down the steep street. They both stopped in front of the Bal. A crowd of young men, some in jerseys and some in their shirt-sleeves, got out. I could see their hands and newly washed, wavy hair in the light from the door. The policeman standing by the door looked at me and smiled. They came in. As they went in, under the light I saw white hands, wavy hair, white faces, grimacing, gesturing, talking. With them was Brett. She looked very lovely and she was very much with them.

One of them saw Georgette and said: "I do declare. There is an actual harlot. I'm going to dance with her, Lett. You watch me."

The tall dark one, called Lett, said: "Don't you be rash."

The wavy blond one answered: "Don't you worry, dear." And with them was Brett.

I was very angry. Somehow they always made me angry. I know they are supposed to be amusing, and you should be tolerant, but I wanted to swing on one, any one, anything to shatter that superior, simpering composure. Instead, I walked down the street and had a beer at the bar at the next Bal. The beer was not good and I had a worse cognac to take the taste out of my mouth. When I came back to the Bal there was a crowd on the floor and Georgette was dancing with the tall blond youth, who danced big-hippily, carrying his head on one side, his eyes lifted as he danced. As soon as the music stopped another one of them asked her to dance. She had been taken up by them. I knew then that they would all dance with her. They are like that.

I sat down at a table. Cohn was sitting there. Frances was dancing. Mrs. Braddocks brought up somebody and introduced him as Robert Prentiss. He was from New York by way of Chicago, and was a rising new novelist. He had some sort of an English accent. I asked him to have a drink.

"Thanks so much," he said, "I've just had one."

"Have another."

"Thanks, I will then."

We got the daughter of the house over and each had a fine à l'eau.

"You're from Kansas City, they tell me," he said.

"Yes."

"Do you find Paris amusing?"

"Yes."

"Really?"

I was a little drunk. Not drunk in any positive sense but just enough to be careless.

"For God's sake," I said, "yes. Don't you?"

"Oh, how charmingly you get angry," he said. "I wish I had that faculty."

I got up and walked over toward the dancing-floor. Mrs. Braddocks followed me. "Don't be cross with Robert," she said. "He's still only a child, you know."

"I wasn't cross," I said. "I just thought perhaps I was going to throw up."

"Your fiancée is having a great success," Mrs. Braddocks looked out on the floor where Georgette was dancing in the arms of the tall, dark one, called Lett.

"Isn't she?" I said.

"Rather," said Mrs. Braddocks.

Cohn came up. "Come on, Jake," he said, "have a drink." We walked over to the bar. "What's the matter with you? You seem all worked up over something?"

"Nothing. This whole show makes me sick is all."

Brett came up to the bar.

"Hello, you chaps."

"Hello, Brett," I said. "Why aren't you tight?"

"Never going to get tight any more. I say, give a chap a brandy and soda."

She stood holding the glass and I saw Robert Cohn looking at her. He looked a great deal as his compatriot must have looked when he saw the promised land. Cohn, of course, was much younger. But he had that look of eager, deserving expectation.

Brett was damned good-looking. She wore a slipover jersey sweater and a tweed skirt, and her hair was brushed back like a boy's. She started all that. She was built with curves like the hull of a racing yacht, and you missed none of it with that wool jersey.

"It's a fine crowd you're with, Brett," I said.

"Aren't they lovely? And you, my dear. Where did you get it?"

"At the Napolitain."

"And have you had a lovely evening?"

"Oh, priceless," I said.

Brett laughed. "It's wrong of you, Jake. It's an insult to all of us. Look at Frances there, and Jo."

This for Cohn's benefit.

"It's in restraint of trade," Brett said. She laughed again.

"You're wonderfully sober," I said.

"Yes. Aren't I? And when one's with the crowd I'm with, one can drink in such safety, too."

The music started and Robert Cohn said: "Will you dance this with me, Lady Brett?"

Brett smiled at him. "I've promised to dance this with Jacob," she laughed. "You've a hell of a biblical name, Jake."

"How about the next?" asked Cohn.

"We're going," Brett said. "We've a date up at Montmartre." Dancing, I looked over Brett's shoulder and saw Cohn, standing at the bar, still watching her.

"You've made a new one there," I said to her.

"Don't talk about it. Poor chap. I never knew it till just now."

"Oh, well," I said. "I suppose you like to add them up."

"Don't talk like a fool."

"You do."

"Oh, well. What if I do?"

"Nothing," I said. We were dancing to the accordion and some one was playing the banjo. It was hot and I felt happy. We passed close to Georgette dancing with another one of them.

"What possessed you to bring her?"

"I don't know, I just brought her."

"You're getting damned romantic."

"No, bored."

"Now?"

"No, not now."

"Let's get out of here. She's well taken care of."

"Do you want to?"

"Would I ask you if I didn't want to?"

We left the floor and I took my coat off a hanger on the wall and put it on. Brett stood by the bar. Cohn was talking to her. I stopped at the bar and asked them for an envelope. The patronne found one. I took a fifty-franc note from my pocket, put it in the envelope, sealed it, and handed it to the patronne.

"If the girl I came with asks for me, will you give her this?" I said. "If she goes out with one of those gentlemen, will you save this for me?"

"C'est entendu, Monsieur," the patronne said. "You go now? So early?"

"Yes," I said.

We started out the door. Cohn was still talking to Brett. She said good night and took my arm. "Good night, Cohn," I said. Outside in the street we looked for a taxi.

"You're going to lose your fifty francs," Brett said.

"Oh, yes."

"No taxis."

"We could walk up to the Pantheon and get one."

"Come on and we'll get a drink in the pub next door and send for one."

"You wouldn't walk across the street."

"Not if I could help it."

We went into the next bar and I sent a waiter for a taxi.

"Well," I said, "we're out away from them."

We stood against the tall zinc bar and did not talk and looked at each other. The waiter came and said the taxi was outside. Brett pressed my hand hard. I gave the waiter a franc and we went out. "Where should I tell him?" I asked.

"Oh, tell him to drive around."

I told the driver to go to the Parc Montsouris, and got in, and slammed the door. Brett was leaning back in the corner, her eyes closed. I got in and sat beside her. The cab started with a jerk.

"Oh, darling, I've been so miserable," Brett said.


CHAPTER 4

The taxi went up the hill, passed the lighted square, then on into the dark, still climbing, then levelled out onto a dark street behind St. Etienne du Mont, went smoothly down the asphalt, passed the trees and the standing bus at the Place de la Contrescarpe, then turned onto the cobbles of the Rue Mouffetard. There were lighted bars and late open shops on each side of the street. We were sitting apart and we jolted close together going down the old street. Brett's hat was off. Her head was back. I saw her face in the lights from the open shops, then it was dark, then I saw her face clearly as we came out on the Avenue des Gobelins. The street was torn up and men were working on the car-tracks by the light of acetylene flares. Brett's face was white and the long line of her neck showed in the bright light of the flares. The street was dark again and I kissed her. Our lips were tight together and then she turned away and pressed against the corner of the seat, as far away as she could get. Her head was down.

"Don't touch me," she said. "Please don't touch me."

"What's the matter?"

"I can't stand it."

"Oh, Brett."

"You mustn't. You must know. I can't stand it, that's all. Oh, darling, please understand!"

"Don't you love me?"

"Love you? I simply turn all to jelly when you touch me."

"Isn't there anything we can do about it?"

She was sitting up now. My arm was around her and she was leaning back against me, and we were quite calm. She was looking into my eyes with that way she had of looking that made you wonder whether she really saw out of her own eyes. They would look on and on after every one else's eyes in the world would have stopped looking. She looked as though there were nothing on earth she would not look at like that, and really she was afraid of so many things.

"And there's not a damn thing we could do," I said.

"I don't know," she said. "I don't want to go through that hell again."

"We'd better keep away from each other."

"But, darling, I have to see you. It isn't all that you know."

"No, but it always gets to be."

"That's my fault. Don't we pay for all the things we do, though?"

She had been looking into my eyes all the time. Her eyes had different depths, sometimes they seemed perfectly flat. Now you could see all the way into them.

"When I think of the hell I've put chaps through. I'm paying for it all now."

"Don't talk like a fool," I said. "Besides, what happened to me is supposed to be funny. I never think about it."

"Oh, no. I'll lay you don't."

"Well, let's shut up about it."

"I laughed about it too, myself, once." She wasn't looking at me. "A friend of my brother's came home that way from Mons. It seemed like a hell of a joke. Chaps never know anything, do they?"

"No," I said. "Nobody ever knows anything."

I was pretty well through with the subject. At one time or another I had probably considered it from most of its various angles, including the one that certain injuries or imperfections are a subject of merriment while remaining quite serious for the person possessing them.

"It's funny," I said. "It's very funny. And it's a lot of fun, too, to be in love."

"Do you think so?" her eyes looked flat again.

"I don't mean fun that way. In a way it's an enjoyable feeling."

"No," she said. "I think it's hell on earth."

"It's good to see each other."

"No. I don't think it is."

"Don't you want to?"

"I have to."

We were sitting now like two strangers. On the right was the Parc Montsouris. The restaurant where they have the pool of live trout and where you can sit and look out over the park was closed and dark. The driver leaned his head around.

"Where do you want to go?" I asked. Brett turned her head away.

"Oh, go to the Select."

"Café Select," I told the driver. "Boulevard Montparnasse." We drove straight down, turning around the Lion de Belfort that guards the passing Montrouge trams. Brett looked straight ahead. On the Boulevard Raspail, with the lights of Montparnasse in sight, Brett said: "Would you mind very much if I asked you to do something?"

"Don't be silly."

"Kiss me just once more before we get there."

When the taxi stopped I got out and paid. Brett came out putting on her hat. She gave me her hand as she stepped down. Her hand was shaky. "I say, do I look too much of a mess?" She pulled her man's felt hat down and started in for the bar. Inside, against the bar and at tables, were most of the crowd who a been at the dance.

"Hello, you chaps," Brett said. "I'm going to have a drink."

"Oh, Brett! Brett!" the little Greek portrait-painter, who called himself a duke, and whom everybody called Zizi, pushed up to her. "I got something fine to tell you."

"Hello, Zizi," Brett said.

"I want you to meet a friend," Zizi said. A fat man came up.

"Count Mippipopolous, meet my friend Lady Ashley."

"How do you do?" said Brett.

"Well, does your Ladyship have a good time here in Paris?" asked Count Mippipopolous, who wore an elk's tooth on his watch-chain.

"Rather," said Brett.

"Paris is a fine town all right," said the count. "But I guess you have pretty big doings yourself over in London."

"Oh, yes," said Brett. "Enormous."

Braddocks called to me from a table. "Barnes," he said, "have a drink. That girl of yours got in a frightful row."

"What about?"

"Something the patronne's daughter said. A corking row. She was rather splendid, you know. Showed her yellow card and demanded the patronne's daughter's too. I say it was a row."

"What finally happened?"

"Oh, some one took her home. Not a bad-looking girl. Wonderful command of the idiom. Do stay and have a drink."

"No," I said. "I must shove off. Seen Cohn?"

"He went home with Frances," Mrs. Braddock put in.

"Poor chap, he looks awfully down," Braddocks said.

"I dare say he is," said Mrs. Braddocks.

"I have to shove off," I said. "Good night."

I said good night to Brett at the bar. The count was buying champagne. "Will you take a glass of wine with us, sir?" he asked.

"No. Thanks awfully. I have to go."

"Really going?" Brett asked.

"Yes," I said. "I've got a rotten headache."

"I'll see you to-morrow?"

"Come in at the office."

"Hardly."

"Well, where will I see you?"

"Anywhere around five o'clock."

"Make it the other side of town then."

"Good. I'll be at the Crillon at five."

"Try and be there," I said.

"Don't worry," Brett said. "I've never let you down, have I?"

"Heard from Mike?"

"Letter to-day."

"Good night, sir," said the count.

I went out onto the sidewalk and walked down toward the Boulevard St. Michel, passed the tables of the Rotonde, still crowded, looked across the street at the Dome, its tables running out to the edge of the pavement. Some one waved at me from a table, I did not see who it was and went on. I wanted to get home. The Boulevard Montparnasse was deserted. Lavigne's was closed tight, and they were stacking the tables outside the Closerie des Lilas. I passed Ney's statue standing among the new-leaved chestnut-trees in the arc-light. There was a faded purple wreath leaning against the base. I stopped and read the inscription: from the Bonapartist Groups, some date; I forget. He looked very fine, Marshal Ney in his top-boots, gesturing with his sword among the green new horse-chestnut leaves. My flat was just across the street, a little way down the Boulevard St. Michel.

There was a light in the concierge's room and I knocked on the door and she gave me my mail. I wished her good night and went up-stairs. There were two letters and some papers. I looked at them under the gas-light in the dining-room. The letters were from the States. One was a bank statement. It showed a balance of $2432.60. I got out my check-book and deducted four checks drawn since the first of the month, and discovered I had a balance of $1832.60. I wrote this on the back of the statement. The other letter was a wedding announcement. Mr. and Mrs. Aloysius Kirby announce the marriage of their daughter Katherine--I knew neither the girl nor the man she was marrying. They must be circularizing the town. It was a funny name. I felt sure I could remember anybody with a name like Aloysius. It was a good Catholic name. There was a crest on the announcement. Like Zizi the Greek duke. And that count. The count was funny. Brett had a title, too. Lady Ashley. To hell with Brett. To hell with you, Lady Ashley.

I lit the lamp beside the bed, turned off the gas, and opened the wide windows. The bed was far back from the windows, and I sat with the windows open and undressed by the bed. Outside a night train, running on the street-car tracks, went by carrying vegetables to the markets. They were noisy at night when you could not sleep. Undressing, I looked at myself in the mirror of the big armoire beside the bed. That was a typically French way to furnish a room. Practical, too, I suppose. Of all the ways to be wounded. I suppose it was funny. I put on my pajamas and got into bed. I had the two bull-fight papers, and I took their wrappers off. One was orange. The other yellow. They would both have the same news, so whichever I read first would spoil the other. Le Toril was the better paper, so I started to read it. I read it all the way through, including the Petite Correspondance and the Cornigrams. I blew out the lamp. Perhaps I would be able to sleep.

My head started to work. The old grievance. Well, it was a rotten way to be wounded and flying on a joke front like the Italian. In the Italian hospital we were going to form a society. It had a funny name in Italian. I wonder what became of the others, the Italians. That was in the Ospedale Maggiore in Milano, Padiglione Ponte. The next building was the Padiglione Zonda. There was a statue of Ponte, or maybe it was Zonda. That was where the liaison colonel came to visit me. That was funny. That was about the first funny thing. I was all bandaged up. But they had told him about it. Then he made that wonderful speech: "You, a foreigner, an Englishman" (any foreigner was an Englishman) "have given more than your life." What a speech! I would like to have it illuminated to hang in the office. He never laughed. He was putting himself in my place, I guess. "Che mala fortuna! Che mala fortuna!"

I never used to realize it, I guess. I try and play it along and just not make trouble for people. Probably I never would have had any trouble if I hadn't run into Brett when they shipped me to England. I suppose she only wanted what she couldn't have. Well, people were that way. To hell with people. The Catholic Church had an awfully good way of handling all that. Good advice, anyway. Not to think about it. Oh, it was swell advice. Try and take it sometime. Try and take it.

I lay awake thinking and my mind jumping around. Then I couldn't keep away from it, and I started to think about Brett and all the rest of it went away. I was thinking about Brett and my mind stopped jumping around and started to go in sort of smooth waves. Then all of a sudden I started to cry. Then after a while it was better and I lay in bed and listened to the heavy trams go by and way down the street, and then I went to sleep.

I woke up. There was a row going on outside. I listened and I thought I recognized a voice. I put on a dressing-gown and went to the door. The concierge was talking down-stairs. She was very angry. I heard my name and called down the stairs.

"Is that you, Monsieur Barnes?" the concierge called.

"Yes. It's me."

"There's a species of woman here who's waked the whole street up. What kind of a dirty business at this time of night! She says she must see you. I've told her you're asleep."

Then I heard Brett's voice. Half asleep I had been sure it was Georgette. I don't know why. She could not have known my address.

"Will you send her up, please?"

Brett came up the stairs. I saw she was quite drunk. "Silly thing to do," she said. "Make an awful row. I say, you weren't asleep, were you?"

"What did you think I was doing?"

"Don't know. What time is it?"

I looked at the clock. It was half-past four. "Had no idea what hour it was," Brett said. "I say, can a chap sit down? Don't be cross, darling. Just left the count. He brought me here."

"What's he like?" I was getting brandy and soda and glasses.

"Just a little," said Brett. "Don't try and make me drunk. The count? Oh, rather. He's quite one of us."

"Is he a count?"

"Here's how. I rather think so, you know. Deserves to be, anyhow. Knows hell's own amount about people. Don't know where he got it all. Owns a chain of sweetshops in the States."

She sipped at her glass.

"Think he called it a chain. Something like that. Linked them all up. Told me a little about it. Damned interesting. He's one of us, though. Oh, quite. No doubt. One can always tell."

She took another drink.

"How do I buck on about all this? You don't mind, do you? He's putting up for Zizi, you know."

"Is Zizi really a duke, too?"

"I shouldn't wonder. Greek, you know. Rotten painter. I rather liked the count."

"Where did you go with him?"

"Oh, everywhere. He just brought me here now. Offered me ten thousand dollars to go to Biarritz with him. How much is that in pounds?"

"Around two thousand."

"Lot of money. I told him I couldn't do it. He was awfully nice about it. Told him I knew too many people in Biarritz."

Brett laughed.

"I say, you are slow on the up-take," she said. I had only sipped my brandy and soda. I took a long drink.

"That's better. Very funny," Brett said. "Then he wanted me to go to Cannes with him. Told him I knew too many people in Cannes. Monte Carlo. Told him I knew too many people in Monte Carlo. Told him I knew too many people everywhere. Quite true, too. So I asked him to bring me here."

She looked at me, her hand on the table, her glass raised. "Don't look like that," she said. "Told him I was in love with you. True, too. Don't look like that. He was damn nice about it. Wants to drive us out to dinner to-morrow night. Like to go?"

"Why not?"

"I'd better go now."

"Why?"

"Just wanted to see you. Damned silly idea. Want to get dressed and come down? He's got the car just up the street."

"The count?"

"Himself. And a chauffeur in livery. Going to drive me around and have breakfast in the Bois. Hampers. Got it all at Zelli's. Dozen bottles of Mumms. Tempt you?"

"I have to work in the morning," I said. "I'm too far behind you now to catch up and be any fun."

"Don't be an ass."

"Can't do it."

"Right. Send him a tender message?"

"Anything. Absolutely."

"Good night, darling."

"Don't be sentimental."

"You make me ill."

We kissed good night and Brett shivered. "I'd better go," she said. "Good night, darling."

"You don't have to go."

"Yes."

We kissed again on the stairs and as I called for the cordon the concierge muttered something behind her door. I went back up-stairs and from the open window watched Brett walking up the street to the big limousine drawn up to the curb under the arc-light. She got in and it started off. I turned around. On the table was an empty glass and a glass half-full of brandy and soda. I took them both out to the kitchen and poured the half-full glass down the sink. I turned off the gas in the dining-room, kicked off my slippers sitting on the bed, and got into bed. This was Brett, that I had felt like crying about. Then I thought of her walking up the street and stepping into the car, as I had last seen her, and of course in a little while I felt like hell again. It is awfully easy to be hard-boiled about everything in the daytime, but at night it is another thing.


CHAPTER 5

In the morning I walked down the Boulevard to the rue Soufflot for coffee and brioche. It was a fine morning. The horse-chestnut trees in the Luxembourg gardens were in bloom. There was the pleasant early-morning feeling of a hot day. I read the papers with the coffee and then smoked a cigarette. The flower-women were coming up from the market and arranging their daily stock. Students went by going up to the law school, or down to the Sorbonne. The Boulevard was busy with trams and people going to work. I got on an S bus and rode down to the Madeleine, standing on the back platform. From the Madeleine I walked along the Boulevard des Capucines to the Opéra, and up to my office. I passed the man with the jumping frogs and the man with the boxer toys. I stepped aside to avoid walking into the thread with which his girl assistant manipulated the boxers. She was standing looking away, the thread in her folded hands. The man was urging two tourists to buy. Three more tourists had stopped and were watching. I walked on behind a man who was pushing a roller that printed the name CINZANO on the sidewalk in damp letters. All along people were going to work. It felt pleasant to be going to work. I walked across the avenue and turned in to my office.

Up-stairs in the office I read the French morning papers, smoked, and then sat at the typewriter and got off a good morning's work. At eleven o'clock I went over to the Quai d'Orsay in a taxi and went in and sat with about a dozen correspondents, while the foreign-office mouthpiece, a young Nouvelle Revue Française diplomat in horn-rimmed spectacles, talked and answered questions for half an hour. The President of the Council was in Lyons making a speech, or, rather he was on his way back. Several people asked questions to hear themselves talk and there were a couple of questions asked by news service men who wanted to know the answers. There was no news. I shared a taxi back from the Quai d'Orsay with Woolsey and Krum.

"What do you do nights, Jake?" asked Krum. "I never see you around."

"Oh, I'm over in the Quarter."

"I'm coming over some night. The Dingo. That's the great place, isn't it?"

"Yes. That, or this new dive, The Select."

"I've meant to get over," said Krum. "You know how it is, though, with a wife and kids."

"Playing any tennis?" Woolsey asked.

"Well, no," said Krum. "I can't say I've played any this year. I've tried to get away, but Sundays it's always rained, and the courts are so damned crowded."

"The Englishmen all have Saturday off," Woolsey said.

"Lucky beggars," said Krum. "Well, I'll tell you. Some day I'm not going to be working for an agency. Then I'll have plenty of time to get out in the country."

"That's the thing to do. Live out in the country and have a little car."

"I've been thinking some about getting a car next year."

I banged on the glass. The chauffeur stopped. "Here's my street," I said. "Come in and have a drink."

"Thanks, old man," Krum said. Woolsey shook his head. "I've got to file that line he got off this morning."

I put a two-franc piece in Krum's hand.

"You're crazy, Jake," he said. "This is on me."

"It's all on the office, anyway."

"Nope. I want to get it."

I waved good-by. Krum put his head out. "See you at the lunch on Wednesday."

"You bet."

I went to the office in the elevator. Robert Cohn was waiting for me. "Hello, Jake," he said. "Going out to lunch?"

"Yes. Let me see if there is anything new."

"Where will we eat?"

"Anywhere."

I was looking over my desk. "Where do you want to eat?"

"How about Wetzel's? They've got good hors d'oeuvres."

In the restaurant we ordered hors d'oeuvres and beer. The sommelier brought the beer, tall, beaded on the outside of the steins, and cold. There were a dozen different dishes of hors d'oeuvres.

"Have any fun last night?" I asked.

"No. I don't think so."

"How's the writing going?"

"Rotten. I can't get this second book going."

"That happens to everybody."

"Oh, I'm sure of that. It gets me worried, though."

"Thought any more about going to South America?"

"I mean that."

"Well, why don't you start off?"

"Frances."

"Well," I said, "take her with you."

"She wouldn't like it. That isn't the sort of thing she likes. She likes a lot of people around."

"Tell her to go to hell."

"I can't. I've got certain obligations to her."

He shoved the sliced cucumbers away and took a pickled herring.

"What do you know about Lady Brett Ashley, Jake?"

"Her name's Lady Ashley. Brett's her own name. She's a nice girl," I said. "She's getting a divorce and she's going to marry Mike Campbell. He's over in Scotland now. Why?"

"She's a remarkably attractive woman."

"Isn't she?"

"There's a certain quality about her, a certain fineness. She seems to be absolutely fine and straight."

"She's very nice."

"I don't know how to describe the quality," Cohn said. "I suppose it's breeding."

"You sound as though you liked her pretty well."

"I do. I shouldn't wonder if I were in love with her."

"She's a drunk," I said. "She's in love with Mike Campbell, and she's going to marry him. He's going to be rich as hell some day."

"I don't believe she'll ever marry him."

"Why not?"

"I don't know. I just don't believe it. Have you known her a long time?"

"Yes," I said. "She was a V. A. D. in a hospital I was in during the war."

"She must have been just a kid then."

"She's thirty-four now."

"When did she marry Ashley?"

"During the war. Her own true love had just kicked off with the dysentery."

"You talk sort of bitter."

"Sorry. I didn't mean to. I was just trying to give you the facts."

"I don't believe she would marry anybody she didn't love."

"Well," I said. "She's done it twice."

"I don't believe it."

"Well," I said, "don't ask me a lot of fool questions if you don't like the answers."

"I didn't ask you that."

"You asked me what I knew about Brett Ashley."

"I didn't ask you to insult her."

"Oh, go to hell."

He stood up from the table his face white, and stood there white and angry behind the little plates of hors d'oeuvres.

"Sit down," I said. "Don't be a fool."

"You've got to take that back."

"Oh, cut out the prep-school stuff."

"Take it back."

"Sure. Anything. I never heard of Brett Ashley. How's that?

"No. Not that. About me going to hell."

"Oh, don't go to hell," I said. "Stick around. We're just starting lunch."

Cohn smiled again and sat down. He seemed glad to sit down. What the hell would he have done if he hadn't sat down? "You say such damned insulting things, Jake."

"I'm sorry. I've got a nasty tongue. I never mean it when I say nasty things."

"I know it," Cohn said. "You're really about the best friend I have, Jake."

God help you, I thought. "Forget what I said," I said out loud. "I'm sorry."

"It's all right. It's fine. I was just sore for a minute."

"Good. Let's get something else to eat."

After we finished the lunch we walked up to the Café de la Paix and had coffee. I could feel Cohn wanted to bring up Brett again, but I held him off it. We talked about one thing and another, and I left him to come to the office.


CHAPTER 6

At five o'clock I was in the Hotel Crillon waiting for Brett. She was not there, so I sat down and wrote some letters. They were not very good letters but I hoped their being on Crillon stationery would help them. Brett did not turn up, so about quarter to six I went down to the bar and had a Jack Rose with George the barman. Brett had not been in the bar either, and so I looked for her up-stairs on my way out, and took a taxi to the Café Select. Crossing the Seine I saw a string of barges being towed empty down the current, riding high, the bargemen at the sweeps as they came toward the bridge. The river looked nice. It was always pleasant crossing bridges in Paris.

The taxi rounded the statue of the inventor of the semaphore engaged in doing same, and turned up the Boulevard Raspail, and I sat back to let that part of the ride pass. The Boulevard Raspail always made dull riding. It was like a certain stretch on the P. L. M. between Fontainebleau and Montereau that always made me feel bored and dead and dull until it was over. I suppose it is some association of ideas that makes those dead places in a journey. There are other streets in Paris as ugly as the Boulevard Raspail. It is a street I do not mind walking down at all. But I cannot stand to ride along it. Perhaps I had read something about it once. That was the way Robert Cohn was about all of Paris. I wondered where Cohn got that incapacity to enjoy Paris. Possibly from Mencken. Mencken hates Paris, I believe. So many young men get their likes and dislikes from Mencken.

The taxi stopped in front of the Rotonde. No matter what café in Montparnasse you ask a taxi-driver to bring you to from the right bank of the river, they always take you to the Rotonde. Ten years from now it will probably be the Dome. It was near enough, anyway. I walked past the sad tables of the Rotonde to the Select. There were a few people inside at the bar, and outside, alone, sat Harvey Stone. He had a pile of saucers in front of him, and he needed a shave.

"Sit down," said Harvey, "I've been looking for you."

"What's the matter?"

"Nothing. Just looking for you."

"Been out to the races?"

"No. Not since Sunday."

"What do you hear from the States?"

"Nothing. Absolutely nothing."

"What's the matter?"

"I don't know. I'm through with them. I'm absolutely through with them."

He leaned forward and looked me in the eye.

"Do you want to know something, Jake?"

"Yes."

"I haven't had anything to eat for five days."

I figured rapidly back in my mind. It was three days ago that Harvey had won two hundred francs from me shaking poker dice in the New York Bar.

"What's the matter?"

"No money. Money hasn't come," he paused. "I tell you it's strange, Jake. When I'm like this I just want to be alone. I want to stay in my own room. I'm like a cat."

I felt in my pocket.

"Would a hundred help you any, Harvey?"

"Yes."

"Come on. Let's go and eat."

"There's no hurry. Have a drink."

"Better eat."

"No. When I get like this I don't care whether I eat or not."

We had a drink. Harvey added my saucer to his own pile.

"Do you know Mencken, Harvey?"

"Yes. Why?"

"What's he like?"

"He's all right. He says some pretty funny things. Last time I had dinner with him we talked about Hoffenheimer. 'The trouble is,' he said, 'he's a garter snapper.' That's not bad."

"That's not bad."

"He's through now," Harvey went on. "He's written about all the things he knows, and now he's on all the things he doesn't know."

"I guess he's all right," I said. "I just can't read him."

"Oh, nobody reads him now," Harvey said, "except the people that used to read the Alexander Hamilton Institute."

"Well," I said. "That was a good thing, too."

"Sure," said Harvey. So we sat and thought deeply for a while.

"Have another port?"

"All right," said Harvey.

"There comes Cohn," I said. Robert Cohn was crossing the street.

"That moron," said Harvey. Cohn came up to our table.

"Hello, you bums," he said.

"Hello, Robert," Harvey said. "I was just telling Jake here that you're a moron."

"What do you mean?"

"Tell us right off. Don't think. What would you rather do if you could do anything you wanted?"

Cohn started to consider.

"Don't think. Bring it right out."

"I don't know," Cohn said. "What's it all about, anyway?"

"I mean what would you rather do. What comes into your head first. No matter how silly it is."

"I don't know," Cohn said. "I think I'd rather play football again with what I know about handling myself, now."

"I misjudged you," Harvey said. "You're not a moron. You're only a case of arrested development."

"You're awfully funny, Harvey," Cohn said. "Some day somebody will push your face in."

Harvey Stone laughed. "You think so. They won't, though. Because it wouldn't make any difference to me. I'm not a fighter."

"It would make a difference to you if anybody did it."

"No, it wouldn't. That's where you make your big mistake. Because you're not intelligent."

"Cut it out about me."

"Sure," said Harvey. "It doesn't make any difference to me. You don't mean anything to me."

"Come on, Harvey," I said. "Have another porto."

"No," he said. "I'm going up the street and eat. See you later, Jake."

He walked out and up the street. I watched him crossing the street through the taxis, small, heavy, slowly sure of himself in the traffic.

"He always gets me sore," Cohn said. "I can't stand him."

"I like him," I said. "I'm fond of him. You don't want to get sore at him."

"I know it," Cohn said. "He just gets on my nerves."

"Write this afternoon?"

"No. I couldn't get it going. It's harder to do than my first book. I'm having a hard time handling it."

The sort of healthy conceit that he had when he returned from America early in the spring was gone. Then he had been sure of his work, only with these personal longings for adventure. Now the sureness was gone. Somehow I feel I have not shown Robert Cohn clearly. The reason is that until he fell in love with Brett, I never heard him make one remark that would, in any way, detach him from other people. He was nice to watch on the tennis-court, he had a good body, and he kept it in shape; he handled his cards well at bridge, and he had a funny sort of undergraduate quality about him. If he were in a crowd nothing he said stood out. He wore what used to be called polo shirts at school, and may be called that still, but he was not professionally youthful. I do not believe he thought about his clothes much. Externally he had been formed at Princeton. Internally he had been moulded by the two women who had trained him. He had a nice, boyish sort of cheerfulness that had never been trained out of him, and I probably have not brought it out. He loved to win at tennis. He probably loved to win as much as Lenglen, for instance. On the other hand, he was not angry at being beaten. When he fell in love with Brett his tennis game went all to pieces. People beat him who had never had a chance with him. He was very nice about it.

Anyhow, we were sitting on the terrace of the Café Select, and Harvey Stone had just crossed the street.

"Come on up to the Lilas," I said.

"I have a date."

"What time?"

"Frances is coming here at seven-fifteen."

"There she is."

Frances Clyne was coming toward us from across the street. She was a very tall girl who walked with a great deal of movement. She waved and smiled. We watched her cross the street.

"Hello," she said, "I'm so glad you're here, Jake. I've been wanting to talk to you."

"Hello, Frances," said Cohn. He smiled.

"Why, hello, Robert. Are you here?" She went on, talking rapidly. "I've had the darndest time. This one"--shaking her head at Cohn--"didn't come home for lunch."

"I wasn't supposed to."

"Oh, I know. But you didn't say anything about it to the cook. Then I had a date myself, and Paula wasn't at her office. I went to the Ritz and waited for her, and she never came, and of course I didn't have enough money to lunch at the Ritz----"

"What did you do?"

"Oh, went out, of course." She spoke in a sort of imitation joyful manner. "I always keep my appointments. No one keeps theirs, nowadays. I ought to know better. How are you, Jake, anyway?"

"Fine."

"That was a fine girl you had at the dance, and then went off with that Brett one."

"Don't you like her?" Cohn asked.

"I think she's perfectly charming. Don't you?"

Cohn said nothing.

"Look, Jake. I want to talk with you. Would you come over with me to the Dome? You'll stay here, won't you, Robert? Come on, Jake."

We crossed the Boulevard Montparnasse and sat down at a table. A boy came up with the Paris Times, and I bought one and opened it.

"What's the matter, Frances?"

"Oh, nothing," she said, "except that he wants to leave me."

"How do you mean?"

"Oh, he told every one that we were going to be married, and I told my mother and every one, and now he doesn't want to do it."

"What's the matter?"

"He's decided he hasn't lived enough. I knew it would happen when he went to New York."

She looked up, very bright-eyed and trying to talk inconsequentially.

"I wouldn't marry him if he doesn't want to. Of course I wouldn't. I wouldn't marry him now for anything. But it does seem to me to be a little late now, after we've waited three years, and I've just gotten my divorce."

I said nothing.

"We were going to celebrate so, and instead we've just had scenes. It's so childish. We have dreadful scenes, and he cries and begs me to be reasonable, but he says he just can't do it."

"It's rotten luck."

"I should say it is rotten luck. I've wasted two years and a half on him now. And I don't know now if any man will ever want to marry me. Two years ago I could have married anybody I wanted, down at Cannes. All the old ones that wanted to marry somebody chic and settle down were crazy about me. Now I don't think I could get anybody."

"Sure, you could marry anybody."

"No, I don't believe it. And I'm fond of him, too. And I'd like to have children. I always thought we'd have children."

She looked at me very brightly. "I never liked children much, but I don't want to think I'll never have them. I always thought I'd have them and then like them."

"He's got children."

"Oh, yes. He's got children, and he's got money, and he's got a rich mother, and he's written a book, and nobody will publish my stuff; nobody at all. It isn't bad, either. And I haven't got any money at all. I could have had alimony, but I got the divorce the quickest way."

She looked at me again very brightly.

"It isn't right. It's my own fault and it's not, too. I ought to have known better. And when I tell him he just cries and says he can't marry. Why can't he marry? I'd be a good wife. I'm easy to get along with. I leave him alone. It doesn't do any good."

"It's a rotten shame."

"Yes, it is a rotten shame. But there's no use talking about it, is there? Come on, let's go back to the café."

"And of course there isn't anything I can do."

"No. Just don't let him know I talked to you. I know what he wants." Now for the first time she dropped her bright, terribly cheerful manner. "He wants to go back to New York alone, and be there when his book comes out so when a lot of little chickens like it. That's what he wants."

"Maybe they won't like it. I don't think he's that way. Really."

"You don't know him like I do, Jake. That's what he wants to do. I know it. I know it. That's why he doesn't want to marry. He wants to have a big triumph this fall all by himself."

"Want to go back to the café?"

"Yes. Come on."

We got up from the table--they had never brought us a drink--and started across the street toward the Select, where Cohn sat smiling at us from behind the marble-topped table.

"Well, what are you smiling at?" Frances asked him. "Feel pretty happy?"

"I was smiling at you and Jake with your secrets."

"Oh, what I've told Jake isn't any secret. Everybody will know it soon enough. I only wanted to give Jake a decent version."

"What was it? About your going to England?"

"Yes, about my going to England. Oh, Jake! I forgot to tell you. I'm going to England."

"Isn't that fine!"

"Yes, that's the way it's done in the very best families. Robert's sending me. He's going to give me two hundred pounds and then I'm going to visit friends. Won't it be lovely? The friends don't know about it, yet."

She turned to Cohn and smiled at him. He was not smiling now.

"You were only going to give me a hundred pounds, weren't you, Robert? But I made him give me two hundred. He's really very generous. Aren't you, Robert?"

I do not know how people could say such terrible things to Robert Cohn. There are people to whom you could not say insulting things. They give you a feeling that the world would be destroyed, would actually be destroyed before your eyes, if you said certain things. But here was Cohn taking it all. Here it was, all going on right before me, and I did not even feel an impulse to try and stop it. And this was friendly joking to what went on later.

"How can you say such things, Frances?" Cohn interrupted.

"Listen to him. I'm going to England. I'm going to visit friends. Ever visit friends that didn't want you? Oh, they'll have to take me, all right. 'How do you do, my dear? Such a long time since we've seen you. And how is your dear mother?' Yes, how is my dear mother? She put all her money into French war bonds. Yes, she did. Probably the only person in the world that did. 'And what about Robert?' or else very careful talking around Robert. 'You must be most careful not to mention him, my dear. Poor Frances has had a most unfortunate experience.' Won't it be fun, Robert? Don't you think it will be fun, Jake?"

She turned to me with that terribly bright smile. It was very satisfactory to her to have an audience for this.

"And where are you going to be, Robert? It's my own fault, all right. Perfectly my own fault. When I made you get rid of your little secretary on the magazine I ought to have known you'd get rid of me the same way. Jake doesn't know about that. Should I tell him?"

"Shut up, Frances, for God's sake."

"Yes, I'll tell him. Robert had a little secretary on the magazine. Just the sweetest little thing in the world, and he thought she was wonderful, and then I came along and he thought I was pretty wonderful, too. So I made him get rid of her, and he had brought her to Provincetown from Carmel when he moved the magazine, and he didn't even pay her fare back to the coast. All to please me. He thought I was pretty fine, then. Didn't you, Robert?

"You mustn't misunderstand, Jake, it was absolutely platonic with the secretary. Not even platonic. Nothing at all, really. It was just that she was so nice. And he did that just to please me. Well, I suppose that we that live by the sword shall perish by the sword. Isn't that literary, though? You want to remember that for your next book, Robert.

"You know Robert is going to get material for a new book. Aren't you, Robert? That's why he's leaving me. He's decided I don't film well. You see, he was so busy all the time that we were living together, writing on this book, that he doesn't remember anything about us. So now he's going out and get some new material. Well, I hope he gets something frightfully interesting.

"Listen, Robert, dear. Let me tell you something. You won't mind, will you? Don't have scenes with your young ladies. Try not to. Because you can't have scenes without crying, and then you pity yourself so much you can't remember what the other person's said. You'll never be able to remember any conversations that way. Just try and be calm. I know it's awfully hard. But remember, it's for literature. We all ought to make sacrifices for literature. Look at me. I'm going to England without a protest. All for literature. We must all help young writers. Don't you think so, Jake? But you're not a young writer. Are you, Robert? You're thirty-four. Still, I suppose that is young for a great writer. Look at Hardy. Look at Anatole France. He just died a little while ago. Robert doesn't think he's any good, though. Some of his French friends told him. He doesn't read French very well himself. He wasn't a good writer like you are, was he, Robert? Do you think he ever had to go and look for material? What do you suppose he said to his mistresses when he wouldn't marry them? I wonder if he cried, too? Oh, I've just thought of something." She put her gloved hand up to her lips. "I know the real reason why Robert won't marry me, Jake. It's just come to me. They've sent it to me in a vision in the Café Select. Isn't it mystic? Some day they'll put a tablet up. Like at Lourdes. Do you want to hear, Robert? I'll tell you. It's so simple. I wonder why I never thought about it. Why, you see, Robert's always wanted to have a mistress, and if he doesn't marry me, why, then he's had one. She was his mistress for over two years. See how it is? And if he marries me, like he's always promised he would, that would be the end of all the romance. Don't you think that's bright of me to figure that out? It's true, too. Look at him and see if it's not. Where are you going, Jake?"

"I've got to go in and see Harvey Stone a minute."

Cohn looked up as I went in. His face was white. Why did he sit there? Why did he keep on taking it like that?

As I stood against the bar looking out I could see them through the window. Frances was talking on to him, smiling brightly, looking into his face each time she asked: "Isn't it so, Robert?" Or maybe she did not ask that now. Perhaps she said something else. I told the barman I did not want anything to drink and went out through the side door. As I went out the door I looked back through the two thicknesses of glass and saw them sitting there. She was still talking to him. I went down a side street to the Boulevard Raspail. A taxi came along and I got in and gave the driver the address of my flat.


CHAPTER 7

As I started up the stairs the concierge knocked on the glass of the door of her lodge, and as I stopped she came out. She had some letters and a telegram.

"Here is the post. And there was a lady here to see you."

"Did she leave a card?"

"No. She was with a gentleman. It was the one who was here last night. In the end I find she is very nice."

"Was she with a friend of mine?"

"I don't know. He was never here before. He was very large. Very, very large. She was very nice. Very, very nice. Last night she was, perhaps, a little--" She put her head on one hand and rocked it up and down. "I'll speak perfectly frankly, Monsieur Barnes. Last night I found her not so gentille. Last night I formed another idea of her. But listen to what I tell you. She is très, très gentille. She is of very good family. It is a thing you can see."

"They did not leave any word?"

"Yes. They said they would be back in an hour."

"Send them up when they come."

"Yes, Monsieur Barnes. And that lady, that lady there is some one. An eccentric, perhaps, but quelqu'une, quelqu'une!"

The concierge, before she became a concierge, had owned a drink-selling concession at the Paris race-courses. Her life-work lay in the pelouse, but she kept an eye on the people of the pesage, and she took great pride in telling me which of my guests were well brought up, which were of good family, who were sportsmen, a French word pronounced with the accent on the men. The only trouble was that people who did not fall into any of those three categories were very liable to be told there was no one home, chez Barnes. One of my friends, an extremely underfed-looking painter, who was obviously to Madame Duzinell neither well brought up, of good family, nor a sportsman, wrote me a letter asking if I could get him a pass to get by the concierge so he could come up and see me occasionally in the evenings.

I went up to the flat wondering what Brett had done to the concierge. The wire was a cable from Bill Gorton, saying he was arriving on the France. I put the mail on the table, went back to the bedroom, undressed and had a shower. I was rubbing down when I heard the door-bell pull. I put on a bathrobe and slippers and went to the door. It was Brett. Back of her was the count. He was holding a great bunch of roses.

"Hello, darling," said Brett. "Aren't you going to let us in?"

"Come on. I was just bathing."

"Aren't you the fortunate man. Bathing."

"Only a shower. Sit down, Count Mippipopolous. What will you drink?"

"I don't know whether you like flowers, sir," the count said, "but I took the liberty of just bringing these roses."

"Here, give them to me." Brett took them. "Get me some water in this, Jake." I filled the big earthenware jug with water in the kitchen, and Brett put the roses in it, and placed them in the centre of the dining-room table.

"I say. We have had a day."

"You don't remember anything about a date with me at the Crillon?"

"No. Did we have one? I must have been blind."

"You were quite drunk, my dear," said the count.

"Wasn't I, though? And the count's been a brick, absolutely."

"You've got hell's own drag with the concierge now."

"I ought to have. Gave her two hundred francs."

"Don't be a damned fool."

"His," she said, and nodded at the count.

"I thought we ought to give her a little something for last night. It was very late."

"He's wonderful," Brett said. "He remembers everything that's happened."

"So do you, my dear."

"Fancy," said Brett. "Who'd want to? I say, Jake, do we get a drink?"

"You get it while I go in and dress. You know where it is."

"Rather."

While I dressed I heard Brett put down glasses and then a siphon, and then heard them talking. I dressed slowly, sitting on the bed. I felt tired and pretty rotten. Brett came in the room, a glass in her hand, and sat on the bed.

"What's the matter, darling? Do you feel rocky?"

She kissed me coolly on the forehead.

"Oh, Brett, I love you so much."

"Darling," she said. Then: "Do you want me to send him away?"

"No. He's nice."

"I'll send him away."

"No, don't."

"Yes, I'll send him away."

"You can't just like that."

"Can't I, though? You stay here. He's mad about me, I tell you."

She was gone out of the room. I lay face down on the bed. I was having a bad time. I heard them talking but I did not listen. Brett came in and sat on the bed.

"Poor old darling." She stroked my head.

"What did you say to him?" I was lying with my face away from her. I did not want to see her.

"Sent him for champagne. He loves to go for champagne."

Then later: "Do you feel better, darling? Is the head any better?"

"It's better."

"Lie quiet. He's gone to the other side of town."

"Couldn't we live together, Brett? Couldn't we just live together?"

"I don't think so. I'd just tromper you with everybody. You couldn't stand it."

"I stand it now."

"That would be different. It's my fault, Jake. It's the way I'm made."

"Couldn't we go off in the country for a while?"

"It wouldn't be any good. I'll go if you like. But I couldn't live quietly in the country. Not with my own true love."

"I know."

"Isn't it rotten? There isn't any use my telling you I love you."

"You know I love you."

"Let's not talk. Talking's all bilge. I'm going away from you, and then Michael's coming back."

"Why are you going away?"

"Better for you. Better for me."

"When are you going?"

"Soon as I can."

"Where?"

"San Sebastian."

"Can't we go together?"

"No. That would be a hell of an idea after we'd just talked it out."

"We never agreed."

"Oh, you know as well as I do. Don't be obstinate, darling."

"Oh, sure," I said. "I know you're right. I'm just low, and when I'm low I talk like a fool."

I sat up, leaned over, found my shoes beside the bed and put them on. I stood up.

"Don't look like that, darling."

"How do you want me to look?"

"Oh, don't be a fool. I'm going away to-morrow."

"To-morrow?"

"Yes. Didn't I say so? I am."

"Let's have a drink, then. The count will be back."

"Yes. He should be back. You know he's extraordinary about buying champagne. It means any amount to him."

We went into the dining-room. I took up the brandy bottle and poured Brett a drink and one for myself. There was a ring at the bell-pull. I went to the door and there was the count. Behind him was the chauffeur carrying a basket of champagne.

"Where should I have him put it, sir?" asked the count.

"In the kitchen," Brett said.

"Put it in there, Henry," the count motioned. "Now go down and get the ice." He stood looking after the basket inside the kitchen door. "I think you'll find that's very good wine," he said. "I know we don't get much of a chance to judge good wine in the States now, but I got this from a friend of mine that's in the business."

"Oh, you always have some one in the trade," Brett said.

"This fellow raises the grapes. He's got thousands of acres of them."

"What's his name?" asked Brett. "Veuve Cliquot?"

"No," said the count. "Mumms. He's a baron."

"Isn't it wonderful," said Brett. "We all have titles. Why haven't you a title, Jake?"

"I assure you, sir," the count put his hand on my arm. "It never does a man any good. Most of the time it costs you money."

"Oh, I don't know. It's damned useful sometimes," Brett said.

"I've never known it to do me any good."

"You haven't used it properly. I've had hell's own amount of credit on mine."

"Do sit down, count," I said. "Let me take that stick."

The count was looking at Brett across the table under the gas-light. She was smoking a cigarette and flicking the ashes on the rug. She saw me notice it. "I say, Jake, I don't want to ruin your rugs. Can't you give a chap an ash-tray?"

I found some ash-trays and spread them around. The chauffeur came up with a bucket full of salted ice. "Put two bottles in it, Henry," the count called.

"Anything else, sir?"

"No. Wait down in the car." He turned to Brett and to me. "We'll want to ride out to the Bois for dinner?"

"If you like," Brett said. "I couldn't eat a thing."

"I always like a good meal," said the count.

"Should I bring the wine in, sir?" asked the chauffeur.

"Yes. Bring it in, Henry," said the count. He took out a heavy pigskin cigar-case and offered it to me. "Like to try a real American cigar?"

"Thanks," I said. "I'll finish the cigarette."

He cut off the end of his cigar with a gold cutter he wore on one end of his watch-chain.

"I like a cigar to really draw," said the count "Half the cigars you smoke don't draw."

He lit the cigar, puffed at it, looking across the table at Brett. "And when you're divorced, Lady Ashley, then you won't have a title."

"No. What a pity."

"No," said the count. "You don't need a title. You got class all over you."

"Thanks. Awfully decent of you."

"I'm not joking you," the count blew a cloud of smoke. "You got the most class of anybody I ever seen. You got it. That's all."

"Nice of you," said Brett. "Mummy would be pleased. Couldn't you write it out, and I'll send it in a letter to her."

"I'd tell her, too," said the count. "I'm not joking you. I never joke people. Joke people and you make enemies. That's what I always say."

"You're right," Brett said. "You're terribly right. I always joke people and I haven't a friend in the world. Except Jake here."

"You don't joke him."

"That's it."

"Do you, now?" asked the count. "Do you joke him?"

Brett looked at me and wrinkled up the corners of her eyes.

"No," she said. "I wouldn't joke him."

"See," said the count. "You don't joke him."

"This is a hell of a dull talk," Brett said. "How about some of that champagne?"

The count reached down and twirled the bottles in the shiny bucket. "It isn't cold, yet. You're always drinking, my dear. Why don't you just talk?"

"I've talked too ruddy much. I've talked myself all out to Jake."

"I should like to hear you really talk, my dear. When you talk to me you never finish your sentences at all."

"Leave 'em for you to finish. Let any one finish them as they like."

"It is a very interesting system," the count reached down and gave the bottles a twirl. "Still I would like to hear you talk some time."

"Isn't he a fool?" Brett asked.

"Now," the count brought up a bottle. "I think this is cool."

I brought a towel and he wiped the bottle dry and held it up. "I like to drink champagne from magnums. The wine is better but it would have been too hard to cool." He held the bottle, looking at it. I put out the glasses.

"I say. You might open it," Brett suggested.

"Yes, my dear. Now I'll open it."

It was amazing champagne.

"I say that is wine," Brett held up her glass. "We ought to toast something. 'Here's to royalty.'"

"This wine is too good for toast-drinking, my dear. You don't want to mix emotions up with a wine like that. You lose the taste."

Brett's glass was empty.

"You ought to write a book on wines, count," I said.

"Mr. Barnes," answered the count, "all I want out of wines is to enjoy them."

"Let's enjoy a little more of this," Brett pushed her glass forward. The count poured very carefully. "There, my dear. Now you enjoy that slowly, and then you can get drunk."

"Drunk? Drunk?"

"My dear, you are charming when you are drunk."

"Listen to the man."

"Mr. Barnes," the count poured my glass full. "She is the only lady I have ever known who was as charming when she was drunk as when she was sober."

"You haven't been around much, have you?"

"Yes, my dear. I have been around very much. I have been around a very great deal."

"Drink your wine," said Brett. "We've all been around. I dare say Jake here has seen as much as you have."

"My dear, I am sure Mr. Barnes has seen a lot. Don't think I don't think so, sir. I have seen a lot, too."

"Of course you have, my dear," Brett said. "I was only ragging."

"I have been in seven wars and four revolutions," the count said.

"Soldiering?" Brett asked.

"Sometimes, my dear. And I have got arrow wounds. Have you ever seen arrow wounds?"

"Let's have a look at them."

The count stood up, unbuttoned his vest, and opened his shirt. He pulled up the undershirt onto his chest and stood, his chest black, and big stomach muscles bulging under the light.

"You see them?"

Below the line where his ribs stopped were two raised white welts. "See on the back where they come out." Above the small of the back were the same two scars, raised as thick as a finger.

"I say. Those are something."

"Clean through."

The count was tucking in his shirt.

"Where did you get those?" I asked.

"In Abyssinia. When I was twenty-one years old."

"What were you doing?" asked Brett. "Were you in the army?"

"I was on a business trip, my dear."

"I told you he was one of us. Didn't I?" Brett turned to me. "I love you, count. You're a darling."

"You make me very happy, my dear. But it isn't true."

"Don't be an ass."

"You see, Mr. Barnes, it is because I have lived very much that now I can enjoy everything so well. Don't you find it like that?"

"Yes. Absolutely."

"I know," said the count. "That is the secret. You must get to know the values."

"Doesn't anything ever happen to your values?" Brett asked.

"No. Not any more."

"Never fall in love?"

"Always," said the count. "I am always in love."

"What does that do to your values?"

"That, too, has got a place in my values."

"You haven't any values. You're dead, that's all."

"No, my dear. You're not right. I'm not dead at all."

We drank three bottles of the champagne and the count left the basket in my kitchen. We dined at a restaurant in the Bois. It was a good dinner. Food had an excellent place in the count's values. So did wine. The count was in fine form during the meal. So was Brett. It was a good party.

"Where would you like to go?" asked the count after dinner. We were the only people left in the restaurant. The two waiters were standing over against the door. They wanted to go home.

"We might go up on the hill," Brett said. "Haven't we had a splendid party?"

The count was beaming. He was very happy.

"You are very nice people," he said. He was smoking a cigar again. "Why don't you get married, you two?"

"We want to lead our own lives," I said.

"We have our careers," Brett said. "Come on. Let's get out of this."

"Have another brandy," the count said.

"Get it on the hill."

"No. Have it here where it is quiet."

"You and your quiet," said Brett. "What is it men feel about quiet?"

"We like it," said the count. "Like you like noise, my dear."

"All right," said Brett. "Let's have one."

"Sommelier!" the count called.

"Yes, sir."

"What is the oldest brandy you have?"

"Eighteen eleven, sir."

"Bring us a bottle."

"I say. Don't be ostentatious. Call him off, Jake."

"Listen, my dear. I get more value for my money in old brandy than in any other antiquities."

"Got many antiquities?"

"I got a houseful."

Finally we went up to Montmartre. Inside Zelli's it was crowded, smoky, and noisy. The music hit you as you went in. Brett and I danced. It was so crowded we could barely move. The nigger drummer waved at Brett. We were caught in the jam, dancing in one place in front of him.

"Hahre you?"

"Great."

"Thaats good."

He was all teeth and lips.

"He's a great friend of mine," Brett said. "Damn good drummer."

The music stopped and we started toward the table where the count sat. Then the music started again and we danced. I looked at the count. He was sitting at the table smoking a cigar. The music stopped again.

"Let's go over."

Brett started toward the table. The music started and again we danced, tight in the crowd.

"You are a rotten dancer, Jake. Michael's the best dancer I know."

"He's splendid."

"He's got his points."

"I like him," I said. "I'm damned fond of him."

"I'm going to marry him," Brett said. "Funny. I haven't thought about him for a week."

"Don't you write him?"

"Not I. Never write letters."

"I'll bet he writes to you."

"Rather. Damned good letters, too."

"When are you going to get married?"

"How do I know? As soon as we can get the divorce. Michael's trying to get his mother to put up for it."

"Could I help you?"

"Don't be an ass. Michael's people have loads of money."

The music stopped. We walked over to the table. The count stood up.

"Very nice," he said. "You looked very, very nice."

"Don't you dance, count?" I asked.

"No. I'm too old."

"Oh, come off it," Brett said.

"My dear, I would do it if I would enjoy it. I enjoy to watch you dance."

"Splendid," Brett said. "I'll dance again for you some time. I say. What about your little friend, Zizi?"

"Let me tell you. I support that boy, but I don't want to have him around."

"He is rather hard."

"You know I think that boy's got a future. But personally I don't want him around."

"Jake's rather the same way."

"He gives me the willys."

"Well," the count shrugged his shoulders. "About his future you can't ever tell. Anyhow, his father was a great friend of my father."

"Come on. Let's dance," Brett said.

We danced. It was crowded and close.

"Oh, darling," Brett said, "I'm so miserable."

I had that feeling of going through something that has all happened before. "You were happy a minute ago."

The drummer shouted: "You can't two time--"

"It's all gone."

"What's the matter?"

"I don't know. I just feel terribly."

"......" the drummer chanted. Then turned to his sticks.

"Want to go?"

I had the feeling as in a nightmare of it all being something repeated, something I had been through and that now I must go through again.

"......" the drummer sang softly.

"Let's go," said Brett. "You don't mind."

"......" the drummer shouted and grinned at Brett.

"All right," I said. We got out from the crowd. Brett went to the dressing-room.

"Brett wants to go," I said to the count. He nodded. "Does she? That's fine. You take the car. I'm going to stay here for a while, Mr. Barnes."

We shook hands.

"It was a wonderful time," I said. "I wish you would let me get this." I took a note out of my pocket.

"Mr. Barnes, don't be ridiculous," the count said.

Brett came over with her wrap on. She kissed the count and put her hand on his shoulder to keep him from standing up. As we went out the door I looked back and there were three girls at his table. We got into the big car. Brett gave the chauffeur the address of her hotel.

"No, don't come up," she said at the hotel. She had rung and the door was unlatched.

"Really?"

"No. Please."

"Good night, Brett," I said. "I'm sorry you feel rotten."

"Good night, Jake. Good night, darling. I won't see you again." We kissed standing at the door. She pushed me away. We kissed again. "Oh, don't!" Brett said.

She turned quickly and went into the hotel. The chauffeur drove me around to my flat. I gave him twenty francs and he touched his cap and said: "Good night, sir," and drove off. I rang the bell. The door opened and I went up-stairs and went to bed.


BOOK II

CHAPTER 8

I did not see Brett again until she came back from San Sebastian. One card came from her from there. It had a picture of the Concha, and said: "Darling. Very quiet and healthy. Love to all the chaps. BRETT."

Nor did I see Robert Cohn again. I heard Frances had left for England and I had a note from Cohn saying he was going out in the country for a couple of weeks, he did not know where, but that he wanted to hold me to the fishing-trip in Spain we had talked about last winter. I could reach him always, he wrote, through his bankers.

Brett was gone, I was not bothered by Cohn's troubles, I rather enjoyed not having to play tennis, there was plenty of work to do, I went often to the races, dined with friends, and put in some extra time at the office getting things ahead so I could leave it in charge of my secretary when Bill Gorton and I should shove off to Spain the end of June. Bill Gorton arrived, put up a couple of days at the flat and went off to Vienna. He was very cheerful and said the States were wonderful. New York was wonderful. There had been a grand theatrical season and a whole crop of great young light heavyweights. Any one of them was a good prospect to grow up, put on weight and trim Dempsey. Bill was very happy. He had made a lot of money on his last book, and was going to make a lot more. We had a good time while he was in Paris, and then he went off to Vienna. He was coming back in three weeks and we would leave for Spain to get in some fishing and go to the fiesta at Pamplona. He wrote that Vienna was wonderful. Then a card from Budapest: "Jake, Budapest is wonderful." Then I got a wire: "Back on Monday."

Monday evening he turned up at the flat. I heard his taxi stop and went to the window and called to him; he waved and started up-stairs carrying his bags. I met him on the stairs, and took one of the bags.

"Well," I said, "I hear you had a wonderful trip."

"Wonderful," he said. "Budapest is absolutely wonderful."

"How about Vienna?"

"Not so good, Jake. Not so good. It seemed better than it was."

"How do you mean?" I was getting glasses and a siphon.

"Tight, Jake. I was tight."

"That's strange. Better have a drink."

Bill rubbed his forehead. "Remarkable thing," he said. "Don't know how it happened. Suddenly it happened."

"Last long?"

"Four days, Jake. Lasted just four days."

"Where did you go?"

"Don't remember. Wrote you a post-card. Remember that perfectly."

"Do anything else?"

"Not so sure. Possible."

"Go on. Tell me about it."

"Can't remember. Tell you anything I could remember."

"Go on. Take that drink and remember."

"Might remember a little," Bill said. "Remember something about a prize-fight. Enormous Vienna prize-fight. Had a nigger in it. Remember the nigger perfectly."

"Go on."

"Wonderful nigger. Looked like Tiger Flowers, only four times as big. All of a sudden everybody started to throw things. Not me. Nigger'd just knocked local boy down. Nigger put up his glove. Wanted to make a speech. Awful noble-looking nigger. Started to make a speech. Then local white boy hit him. Then he knocked white boy cold. Then everybody commenced to throw chairs. Nigger went home with us in our car. Couldn't get his clothes. Wore my coat. Remember the whole thing now. Big sporting evening."

"What happened?"

"Loaned the nigger some clothes and went around with him to try and get his money. Claimed nigger owed them money on account of wrecking hall. Wonder who translated? Was it me?"

"Probably it wasn't you."

"You're right. Wasn't me at all. Was another fellow. Think we called him the local Harvard man. Remember him now. Studying music."

"How'd you come out?"

"Not so good, Jake. Injustice everywhere. Promoter claimed nigger promised let local boy stay. Claimed nigger violated contract. Can't knock out Vienna boy in Vienna. 'My God, Mister Gorton,' said nigger, 'I didn't do nothing in there for forty minutes but try and let him stay. That white boy musta ruptured himself swinging at me. I never did hit him.'"

"Did you get any money?"

"No money, Jake. All we could get was nigger's clothes. Somebody took his watch, too. Splendid nigger. Big mistake to have come to Vienna. Not so good, Jake. Not so good."

"What became of the nigger?"

"Went back to Cologne. Lives there. Married. Got a family. Going to write me a letter and send me the money I loaned him. Wonderful nigger. Hope I gave him the right address."

"You probably did."

"Well, anyway, let's eat," said Bill. "Unless you want me to tell you some more travel stories."

"Go on."

"Let's eat."

We went down-stairs and out onto the Boulevard St. Michel in the warm June evening.

"Where will we go?"

"Want to eat on the island?"

"Sure."

We walked down the Boulevard. At the juncture of the Rue Denfert-Rochereau with the Boulevard is a statue of two men in flowing robes.

"I know who they are." Bill eyed the monument. "Gentlemen who invented pharmacy. Don't try and fool me on Paris."

We went on.

"Here's a taxidermist's," Bill said. "Want to buy anything? Nice stuffed dog?"

"Come on," I said. "You're pie-eyed."

"Pretty nice stuffed dogs," Bill said. "Certainly brighten up your flat."

"Come on."

"Just one stuffed dog. I can take 'em or leave 'em alone. But listen, Jake. Just one stuffed dog."

"Come on."

"Mean everything in the world to you after you bought it. Simple exchange of values. You give them money. They give you a stuffed dog."

"We'll get one on the way back."

"All right. Have it your own way. Road to hell paved with unbought stuffed dogs. Not my fault."

We went on.

"How'd you feel that way about dogs so sudden?"

"Always felt that way about dogs. Always been a great lover of stuffed animals."

We stopped and had a drink.

"Certainly like to drink," Bill said. "You ought to try it some times, Jake."

"You're about a hundred and forty-four ahead of me."

"Ought not to daunt you. Never be daunted. Secret of my success. Never been daunted. Never been daunted in public."

"Where were you drinking?"

"Stopped at the Crillon. George made me a couple of Jack Roses. George's a great man. Know the secret of his success? Never been daunted."

"You'll be daunted after about three more pernods."

"Not in public. If I begin to feel daunted I'll go off by myself. I'm like a cat that way."

"When did you see Harvey Stone?"

"At the Crillon. Harvey was just a little daunted. Hadn't eaten for three days. Doesn't eat any more. Just goes off like a cat. Pretty sad."

"He's all right."

"Splendid. Wish he wouldn't keep going off like a cat, though. Makes me nervous."

"What'll we do to-night?"

"Doesn't make any difference. Only let's not get daunted. Suppose they got any hard-boiled eggs here? If they had hard-boiled eggs here we wouldn't have to go all the way down to the island to eat."

"Nix," I said. "We're going to have a regular meal."

"Just a suggestion," said Bill. "Want to start now?"

"Come on."

We started on again down the Boulevard. A horse-cab passed us. Bill looked at it.

"See that horse-cab? Going to have that horse-cab stuffed for you for Christmas. Going to give all my friends stuffed animals. I'm a nature-writer."

A taxi passed, some one in it waved, then banged for the driver to stop. The taxi backed up to the curb. In it was Brett.

"Beautiful lady," said Bill. "Going to kidnap us."

"Hullo!" Brett said. "Hullo!"

"This is Bill Gorton. Lady Ashley."

Brett smiled at Bill. "I say I'm just back. Haven't bathed even. Michael comes in to-night."

"Good. Come on and eat with us, and we'll all go to meet him."

"Must clean myself."

"Oh, rot! Come on."

"Must bathe. He doesn't get in till nine."

"Come and have a drink, then, before you bathe."

"Might do that. Now you're not talking rot."

We got in the taxi. The driver looked around.

"Stop at the nearest bistro," I said.

"We might as well go to the Closerie," Brett said. "I can't drink these rotten brandies."

"Closerie des Lilas."

Brett turned to Bill.

"Have you been in this pestilential city long?"

"Just got in to-day from Budapest."

"How was Budapest?"

"Wonderful. Budapest was wonderful."

"Ask him about Vienna."

"Vienna," said Bill, "is a strange city."

"Very much like Paris," Brett smiled at him, wrinkling the corners of her eyes.

"Exactly," Bill said. "Very much like Paris at this moment."

"You have a good start."

Sitting out on the terraces of the Lilas Brett ordered a whiskey and soda, I took one, too, and Bill took another pernod.

"How are you, Jake?"

"Great," I said. "I've had a good time."

Brett looked at me. "I was a fool to go away," she said. "One's an ass to leave Paris."

"Did you have a good time?"

"Oh, all right. Interesting. Not frightfully amusing."

"See anybody?"

"No, hardly anybody. I never went out."

"Didn't you swim?"

"No. Didn't do a thing."

"Sounds like Vienna," Bill said.

Brett wrinkled up the corners of her eyes at him.

"So that's the way it was in Vienna."

"It was like everything in Vienna."

Brett smiled at him again.

"You've a nice friend, Jake."

"He's all right," I said. "He's a taxidermist."

"That was in another country," Bill said. "And besides all the animals were dead."

"One more," Brett said, "and I must run. Do send the waiter for a taxi."

"There's a line of them. Right out in front."

"Good."

We had the drink and put Brett into her taxi.

"Mind you're at the Select around ten. Make him come. Michael will be there."

"We'll be there," Bill said. The taxi started and Brett waved.

"Quite a girl," Bill said. "She's damned nice. Who's Michael?"

"The man she's going to marry."

"Well, well," Bill said. "That's always just the stage I meet anybody. What'll I send them? Think they'd like a couple of stuffed race-horses?"

"We better eat."

"Is she really Lady something or other?" Bill asked in the taxi on our way down to the Ile Saint Louis.

"Oh, yes. In the stud-book and everything."

"Well, well."

We ate dinner at Madame Lecomte's restaurant on the far side of the island. It was crowded with Americans and we had to stand up and wait for a place. Some one had put it in the American Women's Club list as a quaint restaurant on the Paris quais as yet untouched by Americans, so we had to wait forty-five minutes for a table. Bill had eaten at the restaurant in 1918, and right after the armistice, and Madame Lecomte made a great fuss over seeing him.

"Doesn't get us a table, though," Bill said. "Grand woman, though."

We had a good meal, a roast chicken, new green beans, mashed potatoes, a salad, and some apple-pie and cheese.

"You've got the world here all right," Bill said to Madame Lecomte. She raised her hand. "Oh, my God!"

"You'll be rich."

"I hope so."

After the coffee and a fine we got the bill, chalked up the same as ever on a slate, that was doubtless one of the "quaint" features, paid it, shook hands, and went out.

"You never come here any more, Monsieur Barnes," Madame Lecomte said.

"Too many compatriots."

"Come at lunch-time. It's not crowded then."

"Good. I'll be down soon."

We walked along under the trees that grew out over the river on the Quai d'Orléans side of the island. Across the river were the broken walls of old houses that were being torn down.

"They're going to cut a street through."

"They would," Bill said.

We walked on and circled the island. The river was dark and a bateau mouche went by, all bright with lights, going fast and quiet up and out of sight under the bridge. Down the river was Notre Dame squatting against the night sky. We crossed to the left bank of the Seine by the wooden foot-bridge from the Quai de Bethune, and stopped on the bridge and looked down the river at Notre Dame. Standing on the bridge the island looked dark, the houses were high against the sky, and the trees were shadows.

"It's pretty grand," Bill said. "God, I love to get back."

We leaned on the wooden rail of the bridge and looked up the river to the lights of the big bridges. Below the water was smooth and black. It made no sound against the piles of the bridge. A man and a girl passed us. They were walking with their arms around each other.

We crossed the bridge and walked up the Rue du Cardinal Lemoine. It was steep walking, and we went all the way up to the Place Contrescarpe. The arc-light shone through the leaves of the trees in the square, and underneath the trees was an S bus ready to start. Music came out of the door of the Negre Joyeux. Through the window of the Café Aux Amateurs I saw the long zinc bar. Outside on the terrace working people were drinking. In the open kitchen of the Amateurs a girl was cooking potato-chips in oil. There was an iron pot of stew. The girl ladled some onto a plate for an old man who stood holding a bottle of red wine in one hand.

"Want to have a drink?"

"No," said Bill. "I don't need it."

We turned to the right off the Place Contrescarpe, walking along smooth narrow streets with high old houses on both sides. Some of the houses jutted out toward the street. Others were cut back. We came onto the Rue du Pot de Fer and followed it along until it brought us to the rigid north and south of the Rue Saint Jacques and then walked south, past Val de Grâce, set back behind the courtyard and the iron fence, to the Boulevard du Port Royal.

"What do you want to do?" I asked. "Go up to the café and see Brett and Mike?"

"Why not?"

We walked along Port Royal until it became Montparnasse, and then on past the Lilas, Lavigne's, and all the little cafés, Damoy's, crossed the street to the Rotonde, past its lights and tables to the Select.

Michael came toward us from the tables. He was tanned and healthy-looking.

"Hel-lo, Jake," he said. "Hel-lo! Hel-lo! How are you, old lad?"

"You look very fit, Mike."

"Oh, I am. I'm frightfully fit. I've done nothing but walk. Walk all day long. One drink a day with my mother at tea."

Bill had gone into the bar. He was standing talking with Brett, who was sitting on a high stool, her legs crossed. She had no stockings on.

"It's good to see you, Jake," Michael said. "I'm a little tight you know. Amazing, isn't it? Did you see my nose?"

There was a patch of dried blood on the bridge of his nose.

"An old lady's bags did that," Mike said. "I reached up to help her with them and they fell on me."

Brett gestured at him from the bar with her cigarette-holder and wrinkled the corners of her eyes.

"An old lady," said Mike. "Her bags fell on me. Let's go in and see Brett. I say, she is a piece. You are a lovely lady, Brett. Where did you get that hat?"

"Chap bought it for me. Don't you like it?"

"It's a dreadful hat. Do get a good hat."

"Oh, we've so much money now," Brett said. "I say, haven't you met Bill yet? You are a lovely host, Jake."

She turned to Mike. "This is Bill Gorton. This drunkard is Mike Campbell. Mr. Campbell is an undischarged bankrupt."

"Aren't I, though? You know I met my ex-partner yesterday in London. Chap who did me in."

"What did he say?"

"Bought me a drink. I thought I might as well take it. I say, Brett, you are a lovely piece. Don't you think she's beautiful?"

"Beautiful. With this nose?"

"It's a lovely nose. Go on, point it at me. Isn't she a lovely piece?"

"Couldn't we have kept the man in Scotland?"

"I say, Brett, let's turn in early."

"Don't be indecent, Michael. Remember there are ladies at this bar."

"Isn't she a lovely piece? Don't you think so, Jake?"

"There's a fight to-night," Bill said. "Like to go?"

"Fight," said Mike. "Who's fighting?"

"Ledoux and somebody."

"He's very good, Ledoux," Mike said. "I'd like to see it, rather"--he was making an effort to pull himself together--"but I can't go. I had a date with this thing here. I say, Brett, do get a new hat."

Brett pulled the felt hat down far over one eye and smiled out from under it. "You two run along to the fight. I'll have to be taking Mr. Campbell home directly."

"I'm not tight," Mike said. "Perhaps just a little. I say, Brett, you are a lovely piece."

"Go on to the fight," Brett said. "Mr. Campbell's getting difficult. What are these outbursts of affection, Michael?"

"I say, you are a lovely piece."

We said good night. "I'm sorry I can't go," Mike said. Brett laughed. I looked back from the door. Mike had one hand on the bar and was leaning toward Brett, talking. Brett was looking at him quite coolly, but the corners of her eyes were smiling.

Outside on the pavement I said: "Do you want to go to the fight?"

"Sure," said Bill. "If we don't have to walk."

"Mike was pretty excited about his girl friend," I said in the taxi.

"Well," said Bill. "You can't blame him such a hell of a lot."


CHAPTER 9

The Ledoux-Kid Francis fight was the night of the 20th of June. It was a good fight. The morning after the fight I had a letter from Robert Cohn, written from Hendaye. He was having a very quiet time, he said, bathing, playing some golf and much bridge. Hendaye had a splendid beach, but he was anxious to start on the fishing-trip. When would I be down? If I would buy him a double-tapered line he would pay me when I came down.

That same morning I wrote Cohn from the office that Bill and I would leave Paris on the 25th unless I wired him otherwise, and would meet him at Bayonne, where we could get a bus over the mountains to Pamplona. The same evening about seven o'clock I stopped in at the Select to see Michael and Brett. They were not there, and I went over to the Dingo. They were inside sitting at the bar.

"Hello, darling." Brett put out her hand.

"Hello, Jake," Mike said. "I understand I was tight last night."

"Weren't you, though," Brett said. "Disgraceful business."

"Look," said Mike, "when do you go down to Spain? Would you mind if we came down with you?"

"It would be grand."

"You wouldn't mind, really? I've been at Pamplona, you know. Brett's mad to go. You're sure we wouldn't just be a bloody nuisance?"

"Don't talk like a fool."

"I'm a little tight, you know. I wouldn't ask you like this if I weren't. You're sure you don't mind?"

"Oh, shut up, Michael," Brett said. "How can the man say he'd mind now? I'll ask him later."

"But you don't mind, do you?"

"Don't ask that again unless you want to make me sore. Bill and I go down on the morning of the 25th."

"By the way, where is Bill?" Brett asked.

"He's out at Chantilly dining with some people."

"He's a good chap."

"Splendid chap," said Mike. "He is, you know."

"You don't remember him," Brett said.

"I do. Remember him perfectly. Look, Jake, we'll come down the night of the 25th. Brett can't get up in the morning."

"Indeed not!"

"If our money comes and you're sure you don't mind."

"It will come, all right. I'll see to that."

"Tell me what tackle to send for."

"Get two or three rods with reels, and lines, and some flies."

"I won't fish," Brett put in.

"Get two rods, then, and Bill won't have to buy one."

"Right," said Mike. "I'll send a wire to the keeper."

"Won't it be splendid," Brett said. "Spain! We will have fun."

"The 25th. When is that?"

"Saturday."

"We will have to get ready."

"I say," said Mike, "I'm going to the barber's."

"I must bathe," said Brett. "Walk up to the hotel with me, Jake. Be a good chap."

"We have got the loveliest hotel," Mike said. "I think it's a brothel!"

"We left our bags here at the Dingo when we got in, and they asked us at this hotel if we wanted a room for the afternoon only. Seemed frightfully pleased we were going to stay all night."

"I believe it's a brothel," Mike said. "And I should know."

"Oh, shut it and go and get your hair cut."

Mike went out. Brett and I sat on at the bar.

"Have another?"

"Might."

"I needed that," Brett said.

We walked up the Rue Delambre.

"I haven't seen you since I've been back," Brett said.

"No."

"How are you, Jake?"

"Fine."

Brett looked at me. "I say," she said, "is Robert Cohn going on this trip?"

"Yes. Why?"

"Don't you think it will be a bit rough on him?"

"Why should it?"

"Who did you think I went down to San Sebastian with?"

"Congratulations," I said.

We walked along.

"What did you say that for?"

"I don't know. What would you like me to say?"

We walked along and turned a corner.

"He behaved rather well, too. He gets a little dull."

"Does he?"

"I rather thought it would be good for him."

"You might take up social service."

"Don't be nasty."

"I won't."

"Didn't you really know?"

"No," I said. "I guess I didn't think about it."

"Do you think it will be too rough on him?"

"That's up to him," I said. "Tell him you're coming. He can always not come."

"I'll write him and give him a chance to pull out of it."

I did not see Brett again until the night of the 24th of June.

"Did you hear from Cohn?"

"Rather. He's keen about it."

"My God!"

"I thought it was rather odd myself."

"Says he can't wait to see me."

"Does he think you're coming alone?"

"No. I told him we were all coming down together. Michael and all."

"He's wonderful."

"Isn't he?"

They expected their money the next day. We arranged to meet at Pamplona. They would go directly to San Sebastian and take the train from there. We would all meet at the Montoya in Pamplona. If they did not turn up on Monday at the latest we would go on ahead up to Burguete in the mountains, to start fishing. There was a bus to Burguete. I wrote out an itinerary so they could follow us.

Bill and I took the morning train from the Gare d'Orsay. It was a lovely day, not too hot, and the country was beautiful from the start. We went back into the diner and had breakfast. Leaving the dining-car I asked the conductor for tickets for the first service.

"Nothing until the fifth."

"What's this?"

There were never more than two servings of lunch on that train, and always plenty of places for both of them.

"They're all reserved," the dining-car conductor said. "There will be a fifth service at three-thirty."

"This is serious," I said to Bill.

"Give him ten francs."

"Here," I said. "We want to eat in the first service."

The conductor put the ten francs in his pocket.

"Thank you," he said. "I would advise you gentlemen to get some sandwiches. All the places for the first four services were reserved at the office of the company."

"You'll go a long way, brother," Bill said to him in English. "I suppose if I'd given you five francs you would have advised us to jump off the train."

"Comment?"

"Go to hell!" said Bill. "Get the sandwiches made and a bottle of wine. You tell him, Jake."

"And send it up to the next car." I described where we were.

In our compartment were a man and his wife and their young son.

"I suppose you're Americans, aren't you?" the man asked. "Having a good trip?"

"Wonderful," said Bill.

"That's what you want to do. Travel while you're young. Mother and I always wanted to get over, but we had to wait a while."

"You could have come over ten years ago, if you'd wanted to," the wife said. "What you always said was: 'See America first!' I will say we've seen a good deal, take it one way and another."

"Say, there's plenty of Americans on this train," the husband said. "They've got seven cars of them from Dayton, Ohio. They've been on a pilgrimage to Rome, and now they're going down to Biarritz and Lourdes."

"So, that's what they are. Pilgrims. Goddam Puritans," Bill said.

"What part of the States you boys from?"

"Kansas City," I said. "He's from Chicago."

"You both going to Biarritz?"

"No. We're going fishing in Spain."

"Well, I never cared for it, myself. There's plenty that do out where I come from, though. We got some of the best fishing in the State of Montana. I've been out with the boys, but I never cared for it any."

"Mighty little fishing you did on them trips," his wife said.

He winked at us.

"You know how the ladies are. If there's a jug goes along, or a case of beer, they think it's hell and damnation."

"That's the way men are," his wife said to us. She smoothed her comfortable lap. "I voted against prohibition to please him, and because I like a little beer in the house, and then he talks that way. It's a wonder they ever find any one to marry them."

"Say," said Bill, "do you know that gang of Pilgrim Fathers have cornered the dining-car until half past three this afternoon?"

"How do you mean? They can't do a thing like that."

"You try and get seats."

"Well, mother, it looks as though we better go back and get another breakfast."

She stood up and straightened her dress.

"Will you boys keep an eye on our things? Come on, Hubert."

They all three went up to the wagon restaurant. A little while after they were gone a steward went through announcing the first service, and pilgrims, with their priests, commenced filing down the corridor. Our friend and his family did not come back. A waiter passed in the corridor with our sandwiches and the bottle of Chablis, and we called him in.

"You're going to work to-day," I said.

He nodded his head. "They start now, at ten-thirty."

"When do we eat?"

"Huh! When do I eat?"

He left two glasses for the bottle, and we paid him for the sandwiches and tipped him.

"I'll get the plates," he said, "or bring them with you."

We ate the sandwiches and drank the Chablis and watched the country out of the window. The grain was just beginning to ripen and the fields were full of poppies. The pastureland was green, and there were fine trees, and sometimes big rivers and chateaux off in the trees.

At Tours we got off and bought another bottle of wine, and when we got back in the compartment the gentleman from Montana and his wife and his son, Hubert, were sitting comfortably.

"Is there good swimming in Biarritz?" asked Hubert.

"That boy's just crazy till he can get in the water," his mother said. "It's pretty hard on youngsters travelling."

"There's good swimming," I said. "But it's dangerous when it's rough."

"Did you get a meal?" Bill asked.

"We sure did. We set right there when they started to come in, and they must have just thought we were in the party. One of the waiters said something to us in French, and then they just sent three of them back."

"They thought we were snappers, all right," the man said. "It certainly shows you the power of the Catholic Church. It's a pity you boys ain't Catholics. You could get a meal, then, all right."

"I am," I said. "That's what makes me so sore."

Finally at a quarter past four we had lunch. Bill had been rather difficult at the last. He buttonholed a priest who was coming back with one of the returning streams of pilgrims.

"When do us Protestants get a chance to eat, father?"

"I don't know anything about it. Haven't you got tickets?"

"It's enough to make a man join the Klan," Bill said. The priest looked back at him.

Inside the dining-car the waiters served the fifth successive table d'hôte meal. The waiter who served us was soaked through. His white jacket was purple under the arms.

"He must drink a lot of wine."

"Or wear purple undershirts."

"Let's ask him."

"No. He's too tired."

The train stopped for half an hour at Bordeaux and we went out through the station for a little walk. There was not time to get in to the town. Afterward we passed through the Landes and watched the sun set. There were wide fire-gaps cut through the pines, and you could look up them like avenues and see wooded hills way off. About seven-thirty we had dinner and watched the country through the open window in the diner. It was all sandy pine country full of heather. There were little clearings with houses in them, and once in a while we passed a sawmill. It got dark and we could feel the country hot and sandy and dark outside of the window, and about nine o'clock we got into Bayonne. The man and his wife and Hubert all shook hands with us. They were going on to LaNegresse to change for Biarritz.

"Well, I hope you have lots of luck," he said.

"Be careful about those bull-fights."

"Maybe we'll see you at Biarritz," Hubert said.

We got off with our bags and rod-cases and passed through the dark station and out to the lights and the line of cabs and hotel buses. There, standing with the hotel runners, was Robert Cohn. He did not see us at first. Then he started forward.

"Hello, Jake. Have a good trip?"

"Fine," I said. "This is Bill Gorton."

"How are you?"

"Come on," said Robert. "I've got a cab." He was a little near-sighted. I had never noticed it before. He was looking at Bill, trying to make him out. He was shy, too.

"We'll go up to my hotel. It's all right. It's quite nice."

We got into the cab, and the cabman put the bags up on the seat beside him and climbed up and cracked his whip, and we drove over the dark bridge and into the town.

"I'm awfully glad to meet you," Robert said to Bill. "I've heard so much about you from Jake and I've read your books. Did you get my line, Jake?"

The cab stopped in front of the hotel and we all got out and went in. It was a nice hotel, and the people at the desk were very cheerful, and we each had a good small room.


CHAPTER 10

In the morning it was bright, and they were sprinkling the streets of the town, and we all had breakfast in a café. Bayonne is a nice town. It is like a very clean Spanish town and it is on a big river. Already, so early in the morning, it was very hot on the bridge across the river. We walked out on the bridge and then took a walk through the town.

I was not at all sure Mike's rods would come from Scotland in time, so we hunted a tackle store and finally bought a rod for Bill up-stairs over a drygoods store. The man who sold the tackle was out, and we had to wait for him to come back. Finally he came in, and we bought a pretty good rod cheap, and two landing-nets.

We went out into the street again and took a look at the cathedral. Cohn made some remark about it being a very good example of something or other, I forget what. It seemed like a nice cathedral, nice and dim, like Spanish churches. Then we went up past the old fort and out to the local Syndicat d'Initiative office, where the bus was supposed to start from. There they told us the bus service did not start until the 1st of July. We found out at the tourist office what we ought to pay for a motor-car to Pamplona and hired one at a big garage just around the corner from the Municipal Theatre for four hundred francs. The car was to pick us up at the hotel in forty minutes, and we stopped at the café on the square where we had eaten breakfast, and had a beer. It was hot, but the town had a cool, fresh, early-morning smell and it was pleasant sitting in the café. A breeze started to blow, and you could feel that the air came from the sea. There were pigeons out in the square, and the houses were a yellow, sun-baked color, and I did not want to leave the café. But we had to go to the hotel to get our bags packed and pay the bill. We paid for the beers, we matched and I think Cohn paid, and went up to the hotel. It was only sixteen francs apiece for Bill and me, with ten per cent added for the service, and we had the bags sent down and waited for Robert Cohn. While we were waiting I saw a cockroach on the parquet floor that must have been at least three inches long. I pointed him out to Bill and then put my shoe on him. We agreed he must have just come in from the garden. It was really an awfully clean hotel.

Cohn came down, finally, and we all went out to the car. It was a big, closed car, with a driver in a white duster with blue collar and cuffs, and we had him put the back of the car down. He piled in the bags and we started off up the street and out of the town. We passed some lovely gardens and had a good look back at the town, and then we were out in the country, green and rolling, and the road climbing all the time. We passed lots of Basques with oxen, or cattle, hauling carts along the road, and nice farmhouses, low roofs, and all white-plastered. In the Basque country the land all looks very rich and green and the houses and villages look well-off and clean. Every village had a pelota court and on some of them kids were playing in the hot sun. There were signs on the walls of the churches saying it was forbidden to play pelota against them, and the houses in the villages had red tiled roofs, and then the road turned off and commenced to climb and we were going way up close along a hillside, with a valley below and hills stretched off back toward the sea. You couldn't see the sea. It was too far away. You could see only hills and more hills, and you knew where the sea was.

We crossed the Spanish frontier. There was a little stream and a bridge, and Spanish carabineers, with patent-leather Bonaparte hats, and short guns on their backs, on one side, and on the other fat Frenchmen in kepis and mustaches. They only opened one bag and took the passports in and looked at them. There was a general store and inn on each side of the line. The chauffeur had to go in and fill out some papers about the car and we got out and went over to the stream to see if there were any trout. Bill tried to talk some Spanish to one of the carabineers, but it did not go very well. Robert Cohn asked, pointing with his finger, if there were any trout in the stream, and the carabineer said yes, but not many.

I asked him if he ever fished, and he said no, that he didn't care for it.

Just then an old man with long, sunburned hair and beard, and clothes that looked as though they were made of gunny-sacking, came striding up to the bridge. He was carrying a long staff, and he had a kid slung on his back, tied by the four legs, the head hanging down.

The carabineer waved him back with his sword. The man turned without saying anything, and started back up the white road into Spain.

"What's the matter with the old one?" I asked.

"He hasn't got any passport."

I offered the guard a cigarette. He took it and thanked me.

"What will he do?" I asked.

The guard spat in the dust.

"Oh, he'll just wade across the stream."

"Do you have much smuggling?"

"Oh," he said, "they go through."

The chauffeur came out, folding up the papers and putting them in the inside pocket of his coat. We all got in the car and it started up the white dusty road into Spain. For a while the country was much as it had been; then, climbing all the time, we crossed the top of a Col, the road winding back and forth on itself, and then it was really Spain. There were long brown mountains and a few pines and far-off forests of beech-trees on some of the mountainsides. The road went along the summit of the Col and then dropped down, and the driver had to honk, and slow up, and turn out to avoid running into two donkeys that were sleeping in the road. We came down out of the mountains and through an oak forest, and there were white cattle grazing in the forest. Down below there were grassy plains and clear streams, and then we crossed a stream and went through a gloomy little village, and started to climb again. We climbed up and up and crossed another high Col and turned along it, and the road ran down to the right, and we saw a whole new range of mountains off to the south, all brown and baked-looking and furrowed in strange shapes.

After a while we came out of the mountains, and there were trees along both sides of the road, and a stream and ripe fields of grain, and the road went on, very white and straight ahead, and then lifted to a little rise, and off on the left was a hill with an old castle, with buildings close around it and a field of grain going right up to the walls and shifting in the wind. I was up in front with the driver and I turned around. Robert Cohn was asleep, but Bill looked and nodded his head. Then we crossed a wide plain, and there was a big river off on the right shining in the sun from between the line of trees, and away off you could see the plateau of Pamplona rising out of the plain, and the walls of the city, and the great brown cathedral, and the broken skyline of the other churches. In back of the plateau were the mountains, and every way you looked there were other mountains, and ahead the road stretched out white across the plain going toward Pamplona.

We came into the town on the other side of the plateau, the road slanting up steeply and dustily with shade-trees on both sides, and then levelling out through the new part of town they are building up outside the old walls. We passed the bull-ring, high and white and concrete-looking in the sun, and then came into the big square by a side street and stopped in front of the Hotel Montoya.

The driver helped us down with the bags. There was a crowd of kids watching the car, and the square was hot, and the trees were green, and the flags hung on their staffs, and it was good to get out of the sun and under the shade of the arcade that runs all the way around the square. Montoya was glad to see us, and shook hands and gave us good rooms looking out on the square, and then we washed and cleaned up and went down-stairs in the dining-room for lunch. The driver stayed for lunch, too, and afterward we paid him and he started back to Bayonne.

There are two dining-rooms in the Montoya. One is up-stairs on the second floor and looks out on the square. The other is down one floor below the level of the square and has a door that opens on the back street that the bulls pass along when they run through the streets early in the morning on their way to the ring. It is always cool in the down-stairs dining-room and we had a very good lunch. The first meal in Spain was always a shock with the hors d'oeuvres, an egg course, two meat courses, vegetables, salad, and dessert and fruit. You have to drink plenty of wine to get it all down. Robert Cohn tried to say he did not want any of the second meat course, but we would not interpret for him, and so the waitress brought him something else as a replacement, a plate of cold meats, I think. Cohn had been rather nervous ever since we had met at Bayonne. He did not know whether we knew Brett had been with him at San Sebastian, and it made him rather awkward.

"Well," I said, "Brett and Mike ought to get in to-night."

"I'm not sure they'll come," Cohn said.

"Why not?" Bill said. "Of course they'll come."

"They're always late," I said.

"I rather think they're not coming," Robert Cohn said.

He said it with an air of superior knowledge that irritated both of us.

"I'll bet you fifty pesetas they're here to-night," Bill said. He always bets when he is angered, and so he usually bets foolishly.

"I'll take it," Cohn said. "Good. You remember it, Jake. Fifty pesetas."

"I'll remember it myself," Bill said. I saw he was angry and wanted to smooth him down.

"It's a sure thing they'll come," I said. "But maybe not to-night."

"Want to call it off?" Cohn asked.

"No. Why should I? Make it a hundred if you like."

"All right. I'll take that."

"That's enough," I said. "Or you'll have to make a book and give me some of it."

"I'm satisfied," Cohn said. He smiled. "You'll probably win it back at bridge, anyway."

"You haven't got it yet," Bill said.

We went out to walk around under the arcade to the Café Iruña for coffee. Cohn said he was going over and get a shave.

"Say," Bill said to me, "have I got any chance on that bet?"

"You've got a rotten chance. They've never been on time anywhere. If their money doesn't come it's a cinch they won't get in to-night."

"I was sorry as soon as I opened my mouth. But I had to call him. He's all right, I guess, but where does he get this inside stuff? Mike and Brett fixed it up with us about coming down here."

I saw Cohn coming over across the square.

"Here he comes."

"Well, let him not get superior and Jewish."

"The barber shop's closed," Cohn said. "It's not open till four."

We had coffee at the Iruña, sitting in comfortable wicker chairs looking out from the cool of the arcade at the big square. After a while Bill went to write some letters and Cohn went over to the barber-shop. It was still closed, so he decided to go up to the hotel and get a bath, and I sat out in front of the café and then went for a walk in the town. It was very hot, but I kept on the shady side of the streets and went through the market and had a good time seeing the town again. I went to the Ayuntamiento and found the old gentleman who subscribes for the bull-fight tickets for me every year, and he had gotten the money I sent him from Paris and renewed my subscriptions, so that was all set. He was the archivist, and all the archives of the town were in his office. That has nothing to do with the story. Anyway, his office had a green baize door and a big wooden door, and when I went out I left him sitting among the archives that covered all the walls, and I shut both the doors, and as I went out of the building into the street the porter stopped me to brush off my coat.

"You must have been in a motor-car," he said.

The back of the collar and the upper part of the shoulders were gray with dust.

"From Bayonne."

"Well, well," he said. "I knew you were in a motor-car from the way the dust was." So I gave him two copper coins.

At the end of the street I saw the cathedral and walked up toward it. The first time I ever saw it I thought the façade was ugly but I liked it now. I went inside. It was dim and dark and the pillars went high up, and there were people praying, and it smelt of incense, and there were some wonderful big windows. I knelt and started to pray and prayed for everybody I thought of, Brett and Mike and Bill and Robert Cohn and myself, and all the bull-fighters, separately for the ones I liked, and lumping all the rest, then I prayed for myself again, and while I was praying for myself I found I was getting sleepy, so I prayed that the bull-fights would be good, and that it would be a fine fiesta, and that we would get some fishing. I wondered if there was anything else I might pray for, and I thought I would like to have some money, so I prayed that I would make a lot of money, and then I started to think how I would make it, and thinking of making money reminded me of the count, and I started wondering about where he was, and regretting I hadn't seen him since that night in Montmartre, and about something funny Brett told me about him, and as all the time I was kneeling with my forehead on the wood in front of me, and was thinking of myself as praying, I was a little ashamed, and regretted that I was such a rotten Catholic, but realized there was nothing I could do about it, at least for a while, and maybe never, but that anyway it was a grand religion, and I only wished I felt religious and maybe I would the next time; and then I was out in the hot sun on the steps of the cathedral, and the forefingers and the thumb of my right hand were still damp, and I felt them dry in the sun. The sunlight was hot and hard, and I crossed over beside some buildings, and walked back along side-streets to the hotel.

At dinner that night we found that Robert Cohn had taken a bath, had had a shave and a haircut and a shampoo, and something put on his hair afterward to make it stay down. He was nervous, and I did not try to help him any. The train was due in at nine o'clock from San Sebastian, and, if Brett and Mike were coming, they would be on it. At twenty minutes to nine we were not half through dinner. Robert Cohn got up from the table and said he would go to the station. I said I would go with him, just to devil him. Bill said he would be damned if he would leave his dinner. I said we would be right back.

We walked to the station. I was enjoying Cohn's nervousness. I hoped Brett would be on the train. At the station the train was late, and we sat on a baggage-truck and waited outside in the dark. I have never seen a man in civil life as nervous as Robert Cohn--nor as eager. I was enjoying it. It was lousy to enjoy it, but I felt lousy. Cohn had a wonderful quality of bringing out the worst in anybody.

After a while we heard the train-whistle way off below on the other side of the plateau, and then we saw the headlight coming up the hill. We went inside the station and stood with a crowd of people just back of the gates, and the train came in and stopped, and everybody started coming out through the gates.

They were not in the crowd. We waited till everybody had gone through and out of the station and gotten into buses, or taken cabs, or were walking with their friends or relatives through the dark into the town.

"I knew they wouldn't come," Robert said. We were going back to the hotel.

"I thought they might," I said.

Bill was eating fruit when we came in and finishing a bottle of wine.

"Didn't come, eh?"

"No."

"Do you mind if I give you that hundred pesetas in the morning, Cohn?" Bill asked. "I haven't changed any money here yet."

"Oh, forget about it," Robert Cohn said. "Let's bet on something else. Can you bet on bull-fights?"

"You could," Bill said, "but you don't need to."

"It would be like betting on the war," I said. "You don't need any economic interest."

"I'm very curious to see them," Robert said.

Montoya came up to our table. He had a telegram in his hand. "It's for you." He handed it to me.

It read: "Stopped night San Sebastian."

"It's from them," I said. I put it in my pocket. Ordinarily I should have handed it over.

"They've stopped over in San Sebastian," I said. "Send their regards to you."

Why I felt that impulse to devil him I do not know. Of course I do know. I was blind, unforgivingly jealous of what had happened to him. The fact that I took it as a matter of course did not alter that any. I certainly did hate him. I do not think I ever really hated him until he had that little spell of superiority at lunch--that and when he went through all that barbering. So I put the telegram in my pocket. The telegram came to me, anyway.

"Well," I said. "We ought to pull out on the noon bus for Burguete. They can follow us if they get in to-morrow night."

There were only two trains up from San Sebastian, an early morning train and the one we had just met.

"That sounds like a good idea," Cohn said.

"The sooner we get on the stream the better."

"It's all one to me when we start," Bill said. "The sooner the better."

We sat in the Iruña for a while and had coffee and then took a little walk out to the bull-ring and across the field and under the trees at the edge of the cliff and looked down at the river in the dark, and I turned in early. Bill and Cohn stayed out in the café quite late, I believe, because I was asleep when they came in.

In the morning I bought three tickets for the bus to Burguete. It was scheduled to leave at two o'clock. There was nothing earlier. I was sitting over at the Iruña reading the papers when I saw Robert Cohn coming across the square. He came up to the table and sat down in one of the wicker chairs.

"This is a comfortable café," he said. "Did you have a good night, Jake?"

"I slept like a log."

"I didn't sleep very well. Bill and I were out late, too."

"Where were you?"

"Here. And after it shut we went over to that other café. The old man there speaks German and English."

"The Café Suizo."

"That's it. He seems like a nice old fellow. I think it's a better café than this one."

"It's not so good in the daytime," I said. "Too hot. By the way, I got the bus tickets."

"I'm not going up to-day. You and Bill go on ahead."

"I've got your ticket."

"Give it to me. I'll get the money back."

"It's five pesetas."

Robert Cohn took out a silver five-peseta piece and gave it to me.

"I ought to stay," he said. "You see I'm afraid there's some sort of misunderstanding."

"Why," I said. "They may not come here for three or four days now if they start on parties at San Sebastian."

"That's just it," said Robert. "I'm afraid they expected to meet me at San Sebastian, and that's why they stopped over."

"What makes you think that?"

"Well, I wrote suggesting it to Brett."

"Why in hell didn't you stay there and meet them then?" I started to say, but I stopped. I thought that idea would come to him by itself, but I do not believe it ever did.

He was being confidential now and it was giving him pleasure to be able to talk with the understanding that I knew there was something between him and Brett.

"Well, Bill and I will go up right after lunch," I said.

"I wish I could go. We've been looking forward to this fishing all winter." He was being sentimental about it. "But I ought to stay. I really ought. As soon as they come I'll bring them right up."

"Let's find Bill."

"I want to go over to the barber-shop."

"See you at lunch."

I found Bill up in his room. He was shaving.

"Oh, yes, he told me all about it last night," Bill said. "He's a great little confider. He said he had a date with Brett at San Sebastian."

"The lying bastard!"

"Oh, no," said Bill. "Don't get sore. Don't get sore at this stage of the trip. How did you ever happen to know this fellow, anyway?"

"Don't rub it in."

Bill looked around, half-shaved, and then went on talking into the mirror while he lathered his face.

"Didn't you send him with a letter to me in New York last winter? Thank God, I'm a travelling man. Haven't you got some more Jewish friends you could bring along?" He rubbed his chin with his thumb, looked at it, and then started scraping again.

"You've got some fine ones yourself."

"Oh, yes. I've got some darbs. But not alongside of this Robert Cohn. The funny thing is he's nice, too. I like him. But he's just so awful."

"He can be damn nice."

"I know it. That's the terrible part."

I laughed.

"Yes. Go on and laugh," said Bill. "You weren't out with him last night until two o'clock."

"Was he very bad?"

"Awful. What's all this about him and Brett, anyway? Did she ever have anything to do with him?"

He raised his chin up and pulled it from side to side.

"Sure. She went down to San Sebastian with him."

"What a damn-fool thing to do. Why did she do that?"

"She wanted to get out of town and she can't go anywhere alone. She said she thought it would be good for him."

"What bloody-fool things people do. Why didn't she go off with some of her own people? Or you?"--he slurred that over--"or me? Why not me?" He looked at his face carefully in the glass, put a big dab of lather on each cheek-bone. "It's an honest face. It's a face any woman would be safe with."

"She'd never seen it."

"She should have. All women should see it. It's a face that ought to be thrown on every screen in the country. Every woman ought to be given a copy of this face as she leaves the altar. Mothers should tell their daughters about this face. My son"--he pointed the razor at me--"go west with this face and grow up with the country."

He ducked down to the bowl, rinsed his face with cold water, put on some alcohol, and then looked at himself carefully in the glass, pulling down his long upper lip.

"My God!" he said, "isn't it an awful face?"

He looked in the glass.

"And as for this Robert Cohn," Bill said, "he makes me sick, and he can go to hell, and I'm damn glad he's staying here so we won't have him fishing with us."

"You're damn right."

"We're going trout-fishing. We're going trout-fishing in the Irati River, and we're going to get tight now at lunch on the wine of the country, and then take a swell bus ride."

"Come on. Let's go over to the Iruña and start," I said.


CHAPTER 11

It was baking hot in the square when we came out after lunch with our bags and the rod-case to go to Burguete. People were on top of the bus, and others were climbing up a ladder. Bill went up and Robert sat beside Bill to save a place for me, and I went back in the hotel to get a couple of bottles of wine to take with us. When I came out the bus was crowded. Men and women were sitting on all the baggage and boxes on top, and the women all had their fans going in the sun. It certainly was hot. Robert climbed down and I fitted into the place he had saved on the one wooden seat that ran across the top.

Robert Cohn stood in the shade of the arcade waiting for us start. A Basque with a big leather wine-bag in his lap lay across the top of the bus in front of our seat, leaning back against our legs. He offered the wine-skin to Bill and to me, and when I tipped it up to drink he imitated the sound of a klaxon motor-horn so well and so suddenly that I spilled some of the wine, and everybody laughed. He apologized and made me take another drink. He made the klaxon again a little later, and it fooled me the second time. He was very good at it. The Basques liked it. The man next to Bill was talking to him in Spanish and Bill was not getting it, so he offered the man one of the bottles of wine. The man waved it away. He said it was too hot and he had drunk too much at lunch. When Bill offered the bottle the second time he took a long drink, and then the bottle went all over that part of the bus. Every one took a drink very politely, and then they made us cork it up and put it away. They all wanted us to drink from their leather wine-bottles. They were peasants going up into the hills.

Finally, after a couple more false klaxons, the bus started, and Robert Cohn waved good-by to us, and all the Basques waved good-by to him. As soon as we started out on the road outside of town it was cool. It felt nice riding high up and close under the trees. The bus went quite fast and made a good breeze, and as we went out along the road with the dust powdering the trees and down the hill, we had a fine view, back through the trees, of the town rising up from the bluff above the river. The Basque lying against my knees pointed out the view with the neck of the wine-bottle, and winked at us. He nodded his head.

"Pretty nice, eh?"

"These Basques are swell people," Bill said.

The Basque lying against my legs was tanned the color of saddle-leather. He wore a black smock like all the rest. There were wrinkles in his tanned neck. He turned around and offered his wine-bag to Bill. Bill handed him one of our bottles. The Basque wagged a forefinger at him and handed the bottle back, slapping in the cork with the palm of his hand. He shoved the wine-bag up.

"Arriba! Arriba!" he said. "Lift it up."

Bill raised the wine-skin and let the stream of wine spurt out and into his mouth, his head tipped back. When he stopped drinking and tipped the leather bottle down a few drops ran down his chin.

"No! No!" several Basques said. "Not like that." One snatched the bottle away from the owner, who was himself about to give a demonstration. He was a young fellow and he held the wine-bottle at full arms' length and raised it high up, squeezing the leather bag with his hand so the stream of wine hissed into his mouth. He held the bag out there, the wine making a flat, hard trajectory into his mouth, and he kept on swallowing smoothly and regularly.

"Hey!" the owner of the bottle shouted. "Whose wine is that?"

The drinker waggled his little finger at him and smiled at us with his eyes. Then he bit the stream off sharp, made a quick lift with the wine-bag and lowered it down to the owner. He winked at us. The owner shook the wine-skin sadly.

We passed through a town and stopped in front of the posada, and the driver took on several packages. Then we started on again, and outside the town the road commenced to mount. We were going through farming country with rocky hills that sloped down into the fields. The grain-fields went up the hillsides. Now as we went higher there was a wind blowing the grain. The road was white and dusty, and the dust rose under the wheels and hung in the air behind us. The road climbed up into the hills and left the rich grain-fields below. Now there were only patches of grain on the bare hillsides and on each side of the water-courses. We turned sharply out to the side of the road to give room to pass to a long string of six mules, following one after the other, hauling a high-hooded wagon loaded with freight. The wagon and the mules were covered with dust. Close behind was another string of mules and another wagon. This was loaded with lumber, and the arriero driving the mules leaned back and put on the thick wooden brakes as we passed. Up here the country was quite barren and the hills were rocky and hard-baked clay furrowed by the rain.

We came around a curve into a town, and on both sides opened out a sudden green valley. A stream went through the centre of the town and fields of grapes touched the houses.

The bus stopped in front of a posada and many of the passengers got down, and a lot of the baggage was unstrapped from the roof from under the big tarpaulins and lifted down. Bill and I got down and went into the posada. There was a low, dark room with saddles and harness, and hay-forks made of white wood, and clusters of canvas rope-soled shoes and hams and slabs of bacon and white garlics and long sausages hanging from the roof. It was cool and dusky, and we stood in front of a long wooden counter with two women behind it serving drinks. Behind them were shelves stacked with supplies and goods.

We each had an aguardiente and paid forty centimes for the two drinks. I gave the woman fifty centimes to make a tip, and she gave me back the copper piece, thinking I had misunderstood the price.

Two of our Basques came in and insisted on buying a drink. So they bought a drink and then we bought a drink, and then they slapped us on the back and bought another drink. Then we bought, and then we all went out into the sunlight and the heat, and climbed back on top of the bus. There was plenty of room now for every one to sit on the seat, and the Basque who had been lying on the tin roof now sat between us. The woman who had been serving drinks came out wiping her hands on her apron and talked to somebody inside the bus. Then the driver came out swinging two flat leather mail-pouches and climbed up, and everybody waving we started off.

The road left the green valley at once, and we were up in the hills again. Bill and the wine-bottle Basque were having a conversation. A man leaned over from the other side of the seat and asked in English: "You're Americans?"

"Sure."

"I been there," he said. "Forty years ago."

He was an old man, as brown as the others, with the stubble of a white beard.

"How was it?"

"What you say?"

"How was America?"

"Oh, I was in California. It was fine."

"Why did you leave?"

"What you say?"

"Why did you come back here?"

"Oh! I come back to get married. I was going to go back but my wife she don't like to travel. Where you from?"

"Kansas City."

"I been there," he said. "I been in Chicago, St. Louis, Kansas City, Denver, Los Angeles, Salt Lake City."

He named them carefully.

"How long were you over?"

"Fifteen years. Then I come back and got married."

"Have a drink?"

"All right," he said. "You can't get this in America, eh?"

"There's plenty if you can pay for it."

"What you come over here for?"

"We're going to the fiesta at Pamplona."

"You like the bull-fights?"

"Sure. Don't you?"

"Yes," he said. "I guess I like them."

Then after a little:

"Where you go now?"

"Up to Burguete to fish."

"Well," he said, "I hope you catch something."

He shook hands and turned around to the back seat again. The other Basques had been impressed. He sat back comfortably and smiled at me when I turned around to look at the country. But the effort of talking American seemed to have tired him. He did not say anything after that.

The bus climbed steadily up the road. The country was barren and rocks stuck up through the clay. There was no grass beside the road. Looking back we could see the country spread out below. Far back the fields were squares of green and brown on the hillsides. Making the horizon were the brown mountains. They were strangely shaped. As we climbed higher the horizon kept changing. As the bus ground slowly up the road we could see other mountains coming up in the south. Then the road came over the crest, flattened out, and went into a forest. It was a forest of cork oaks, and the sun came through the trees in patches, and there were cattle grazing back in the trees. We went through the forest and the road came out and turned along a rise of land, and out ahead of us was a rolling green plain, with dark mountains beyond it. These were not like the brown, heat-baked mountains we had left behind. These were wooded and there were clouds coming down from them. The green plain stretched off. It was cut by fences and the white of the road showed through the trunks of a double line of trees that crossed the plain toward the north. As we came to the edge of the rise we saw the red roofs and white houses of Burguete ahead strung out on the plain, and away off on the shoulder of the first dark mountain was the gray metal-sheathed roof of the monastery of Roncesvalles.

"There's Roncevaux," I said.

"Where?"

"Way off there where the mountain starts."

"It's cold up here," Bill said.

"It's high," I said. "It must be twelve hundred metres."

"It's awful cold," Bill said.

The bus levelled down onto the straight line of road that ran to Burguete. We passed a crossroads and crossed a bridge over a stream. The houses of Burguete were along both sides of the road. There were no side-streets. We passed the church and the school-yard, and the bus stopped. We got down and the driver handed down our bags and the rod-case. A carabineer in his cocked hat and yellow leather cross-straps came up.

"What's in there?" he pointed to the rod-case.

I opened it and showed him. He asked to see our fishing permits and I got them out. He looked at the date and then waved us on.

"Is that all right?" I asked.

"Yes. Of course."

We went up the street, past the whitewashed stone houses, families sitting in their doorways watching us, to the inn.

The fat woman who ran the inn came out from the kitchen and shook hands with us. She took off her spectacles, wiped them, and put them on again. It was cold in the inn and the wind was starting to blow outside. The woman sent a girl up-stairs with us to show the room. There were two beds, a washstand, a clothes-chest, and a big, framed steel-engraving of Nuestra Señora de Roncesvalles. The wind was blowing against the shutters. The room was on the north side of the inn. We washed, put on sweaters, and came down-stairs into the dining-room. It had a stone floor, low ceiling, and was oak-panelled. The shutters were up and it was so cold you could see your breath.

"My God!" said Bill. "It can't be this cold to-morrow. I'm not going to wade a stream in this weather."

There was an upright piano in the far corner of the room beyond the wooden tables and Bill went over and started to play.

"I got to keep warm," he said.

I went out to find the woman and ask her how much the room and board was. She put her hands under her apron and looked away from me.

"Twelve pesetas."

"Why, we only paid that in Pamplona."

She did not say anything, just took off her glasses and wiped them on her apron.

"That's too much," I said. "We didn't pay more than that at a big hotel."

"We've put in a bathroom."

"Haven't you got anything cheaper?"

"Not in the summer. Now is the big season."

We were the only people in the inn. Well, I thought, it's only a few days.

"Is the wine included?"

"Oh, yes."

"Well," I said. "It's all right."

I went back to Bill. He blew his breath at me to show how cold it was, and went on playing. I sat at one of the tables and looked at the pictures on the wall. There was one panel of rabbits, dead, one of pheasants, also dead, and one panel of dead ducks. The panels were all dark and smoky-looking. There was a cupboard full of liqueur bottles. I looked at them all. Bill was still playing. "How about a hot rum punch?" he said. "This isn't going to keep me warm permanently."

I went out and told the woman what a rum punch was and how to make it. In a few minutes a girl brought a stone pitcher, steaming, into the room. Bill came over from the piano and we drank the hot punch and listened to the wind.

"There isn't too much rum in that."

I went over to the cupboard and brought the rum bottle and poured a half-tumblerful into the pitcher.

"Direct action," said Bill. "It beats legislation."

The girl came in and laid the table for supper.

"It blows like hell up here," Bill said.

The girl brought in a big bowl of hot vegetable soup and the wine. We had fried trout afterward and some sort of a stew and a big bowl full of wild strawberries. We did not lose money on the wine, and the girl was shy but nice about bringing it The old woman looked in once and counted the empty bottles.

After supper we went up-stairs and smoked and read in bed to keep warm. Once in the night I woke and heard the wind blowing. It felt good to be warm and in bed.


CHAPTER 12

When I woke in the morning I went to the window and looked out. It had cleared and there were no clouds on the mountains. Outside under the window were some carts and an old diligence, the wood of the roof cracked and split by the weather. It must have been left from the days before the motor-buses. A goat hopped up on one of the carts and then to the roof of the diligence. He jerked his head at the other goats below and when I waved at him he bounded down.

Bill was still sleeping, so I dressed, put on my shoes outside in the hall, and went down-stairs. No one was stirring down-stairs, so I unbolted the door and went out. It was cool outside in the early morning and the sun had not yet dried the dew that had come when the wind died down. I hunted around in the shed behind the inn and found a sort of mattock, and went down toward the stream to try and dig some worms for bait. The stream was clear and shallow but it did not look trouty. On the grassy bank where it was damp I drove the mattock into the earth and loosened a chunk of sod. There were worms underneath. They slid out of sight as I lifted the sod and I dug carefully and got a good many. Digging at the edge of the damp ground I filled two empty tobacco-tins with worms and sifted dirt onto them. The goats watched me dig.

When I went back into the inn the woman was down in the kitchen, and I asked her to get coffee for us, and that we wanted a lunch. Bill was awake and sitting on the edge of the bed.

"I saw you out of the window," he said. "Didn't want to interrupt you. What were you doing? Burying your money?"

"You lazy bum!"

"Been working for the common good? Splendid. I want you to do that every morning."

"Come on," I said. "Get up."

"What? Get up? I never get up."

He climbed into bed and pulled the sheet up to his chin.

"Try and argue me into getting up."

I went on looking for the tackle and putting it all together in the tackle-bag.

"Aren't you interested?" Bill asked.

"I'm going down and eat."

"Eat? Why didn't you say eat? I thought you just wanted me to get up for fun. Eat? Fine. Now you're reasonable. You go out and dig some more worms and I'll be right down."

"Oh, go to hell!"

"Work for the good of all." Bill stepped into his underclothes. "Show irony and pity."

I started out of the room with the tackle-bag, the nets, and the rod-case.

"Hey! come back!"

I put my head in the door.

"Aren't you going to show a little irony and pity?"

I thumbed my nose.

"That's not irony."

As I went down-stairs I heard Bill singing, "Irony and Pity. When you're feeling ... Oh, Give them Irony and Give them Pity. Oh, give them Irony. When they're feeling ... Just a little irony. Just a little pity ..." He kept on singing until he came down-stairs. The tune was: "The Bells are Ringing for Me and my Gal." I was reading a week-old Spanish paper.

"What's all this irony and pity?"

"What? Don't you know about Irony and Pity?"

"No. Who got it up?"

"Everybody. They're mad about it in New York. It's just like the Fratellinis used to be."

The girl came in with the coffee and buttered toast. Or, rather, it was bread toasted and buttered.

"Ask her if she's got any jam," Bill said. "Be ironical with her."

"Have you got any jam?"

"That's not ironical. I wish I could talk Spanish."

The coffee was good and we drank it out of big bowls. The girl brought in a glass dish of raspberry jam.

"Thank you."

"Hey! that's not the way," Bill said. "Say something ironical. Make some crack about Primo de Rivera."

"I could ask her what kind of a jam they think they've gotten into in the Riff."

"Poor," said Bill. "Very poor. You can't do it. That's all. You don't understand irony. You have no pity. Say something pitiful."

"Robert Cohn."

"Not so bad. That's better. Now why is Cohn pitiful? Be ironic."

He took a big gulp of coffee.

"Aw, hell!" I said. "It's too early in the morning."

"There you go. And you claim you want to be a writer, too. You're only a newspaper man. An expatriated newspaper man. You ought to be ironical the minute you get out of bed. You ought to wake up with your mouth full of pity."

"Go on," I said. "Who did you get this stuff from?"

"Everybody. Don't you read? Don't you ever see anybody? You know what you are? You're an expatriate. Why don't you live in New York? Then you'd know these things. What do you want me to do? Come over here and tell you every year?"

"Take some more coffee," I said.

"Good. Coffee is good for you. It's the caffeine in it. Caffeine, we are here. Caffeine puts a man on her horse and a woman in his grave. You know what's the trouble with you? You're an expatriate. One of the worst type. Haven't you heard that? Nobody that ever left their own country ever wrote anything worth printing. Not even in the newspapers."

He drank the coffee.

"You're an expatriate. You've lost touch with the soil. You get precious. Fake European standards have ruined you. You drink yourself to death. You become obsessed by sex. You spend all your time talking, not working. You are an expatriate, see? You hang around cafés."

"It sounds like a swell life," I said. "When do I work?"

"You don't work. One group claims women support you. Another group claims you're impotent."

"No," I said. "I just had an accident."

"Never mention that," Bill said. "That's the sort of thing that can't be spoken of. That's what you ought to work up into a mystery. Like Henry's bicycle."

He had been going splendidly, but he stopped. I was afraid he thought he had hurt me with that crack about being impotent. I wanted to start him again.

"It wasn't a bicycle," I said. "He was riding horseback."

"I heard it was a tricycle."

"Well," I said. "A plane is sort of like a tricycle. The joystick works the same way."

"But you don't pedal it."

"No," I said, "I guess you don't pedal it."

"Let's lay off that," Bill said.

"All right. I was just standing up for the tricycle."

"I think he's a good writer, too," Bill said. "And you're a hell of a good guy. Anybody ever tell you you were a good guy?"

"I'm not a good guy."

"Listen. You're a hell of a good guy, and I'm fonder of you than anybody on earth. I couldn't tell you that in New York. It'd mean I was a faggot. That was what the Civil War was about. Abraham Lincoln was a faggot. He was in love with General Grant. So was Jefferson Davis. Lincoln just freed the slaves on a bet. The Dred Scott case was framed by the Anti-Saloon League. Sex explains it all. The Colonel's Lady and Judy O'Grady are Lesbians under their skin."

He stopped.

"Want to hear some more?"

"Shoot," I said.

"I don't know any more. Tell you some more at lunch."

"Old Bill," I said.

"You bum!"

We packed the lunch and two bottles of wine in the rucksack, and Bill put it on. I carried the rod-case and the landing-nets slung over my back. We started up the road and then went across a meadow and found a path that crossed the fields and went toward the woods on the slope of the first hill. We walked across the fields on the sandy path. The fields were rolling and grassy and the grass was short from the sheep grazing. The cattle were up in the hills. We heard their bells in the woods.

The path crossed a stream on a foot-log. The log was surfaced off, and there was a sapling bent across for a rail. In the flat pool beside the stream tadpoles spotted the sand. We went up a steep bank and across the rolling fields. Looking back we saw Burguete, white houses and red roofs, and the white road with a truck going along it and the dust rising.

Beyond the fields we crossed another faster-flowing stream. A sandy road led down to the ford and beyond into the woods. The path crossed the stream on another foot-log below the ford, and joined the road, and we went into the woods.

It was a beech wood and the trees were very old. Their roots bulked above the ground and the branches were twisted. We walked on the road between the thick trunks of the old beeches and the sunlight came through the leaves in light patches on the grass. The trees were big, and the foliage was thick but it was not gloomy. There was no undergrowth, only the smooth grass, very green and fresh, and the big gray trees well spaced as though it were a park.

"This is country," Bill said.

The road went up a hill and we got into thick woods, and the road kept on climbing. Sometimes it dipped down but rose again steeply. All the time we heard the cattle in the woods. Finally, the road came out on the top of the hills. We were on the top of the height of land that was the highest part of the range of wooded hills we had seen from Burguete. There were wild strawberries growing on the sunny side of the ridge in a little clearing in the trees.

Ahead the road came out of the forest and went along the shoulder of the ridge of hills. The hills ahead were not wooded, and there were great fields of yellow gorse. Way off we saw the steep bluffs, dark with trees and jutting with gray stone, that marked the course of the Irati River.

"We have to follow this road along the ridge, cross these hills, go through the woods on the far hills, and come down to the Irati valley," I pointed out to Bill.

"That's a hell of a hike."

"It's too far to go and fish and come back the same day, comfortably."

"Comfortably. That's a nice word. We'll have to go like hell to get there and back and have any fishing at all."

It was a long walk and the country was very fine, but we were tired when we came down the steep road that led out of the wooded hills into the valley of the Rio de la Fabrica.

The road came out from the shadow of the woods into the hot sun. Ahead was a river-valley. Beyond the river was a steep hill. There was a field of buckwheat on the hill. We saw a white house under some trees on the hillside. It was very hot and we stopped under some trees beside a dam that crossed the river.

Bill put the pack against one of the trees and we jointed up the rods, put on the reels, tied on leaders, and got ready to fish.

"You're sure this thing has trout in it?" Bill asked.

"It's full of them."

"I'm going to fish a fly. You got any McGintys?"

"There's some in there."

"You going to fish bait?"

"Yeah. I'm going to fish the dam here."

"Well, I'll take the fly-book, then." He tied on a fly. "Where'd I better go? Up or down?"

"Down is the best. They're plenty up above, too."

Bill went down the bank.

"Take a worm can."

"No, I don't want one. If they won't take a fly I'll just flick it around."

Bill was down below watching the stream.

"Say," he called up against the noise of the dam. "How about putting the wine in that spring up the road?"

"All right," I shouted. Bill waved his hand and started down the stream. I found the two wine-bottles in the pack, and carried them up the road to where the water of a spring flowed out of an iron pipe. There was a board over the spring and I lifted it and, knocking the corks firmly into the bottles, lowered them down into the water. It was so cold my hand and wrist felt numbed. I put back the slab of wood, and hoped nobody would find the wine.

I got my rod that was leaning against the tree, took the bait-can and landing-net, and walked out onto the dam. It was built to provide a head of water for driving logs. The gate was up, and I sat on one of the squared timbers and watched the smooth apron of water before the river tumbled into the falls. In the white water at the foot of the dam it was deep. As I baited up, a trout shot up out of the white water into the falls and was carried down. Before I could finish baiting, another trout jumped at the falls, making the same lovely arc and disappearing into the water that was thundering down. I put on a good-sized sinker and dropped into the white water close to the edge of the timbers of the dam.

I did not feel the first trout strike. When I started to pull up I felt that I had one and brought him, fighting and bending the rod almost double, out of the boiling water at the foot of the falls, and swung him up and onto the dam. He was a good trout, and I banged his head against the timber so that he quivered out straight, and then slipped him into my bag.

While I had him on, several trout had jumped at the falls. As soon as I baited up and dropped in again I hooked another and brought him in the same way. In a little while I had six. They were all about the same size. I laid them out, side by side, all their heads pointing the same way, and looked at them. They were beautifully colored and firm and hard from the cold water. It was a hot day, so I slit them all and shucked out the insides, gills and all, and tossed them over across the river. I took the trout ashore, washed them in the cold, smoothly heavy water above the dam, and then picked some ferns and packed them all in the bag, three trout on a layer of ferns, then another layer of fems, then three more trout, and then covered them with ferns. They looked nice in the ferns, and now the bag was bulky, and I put it in the shade of the tree.

It was very hot on the dam, so I put my worm-can in the shade with the bag, and got a book out of the pack and settled down under the tree to read until Bill should come up for lunch.

It was a little past noon and there was not much shade, but I sat against the trunk of two of the trees that grew together, and read. The book was something by A. E. W. Mason, and I was reading a wonderful story about a man who had been frozen in the Alps and then fallen into a glacier and disappeared, and his bride was going to wait twenty-four years exactly for his body to come out on the moraine, while her true love waited too, and they were still waiting when Bill came up.

"Get any?" he asked. He had his rod and his bag and his net all in one hand, and he was sweating. I hadn't heard him come up, because of the noise from the dam.

"Six. What did you get?"

Bill sat down, opened up his bag, laid a big trout on the grass. He took out three more, each one a little bigger than the last, and laid them side by side in the shade from the tree. His face was sweaty and happy.

"How are yours?"

"Smaller."

"Let's see them."

"They're packed."

"How big are they really?"

"They're all about the size of your smallest."

"You're not holding out on me?"

"I wish I were."

"Get them all on worms?"

"Yes."

"You lazy bum!"

Bill put the trout in the bag and started for the river, swinging the open bag. He was wet from the waist down and I knew he must have been wading the stream.

I walked up the road and got out the two bottles of wine. They were cold. Moisture beaded on the bottles as I walked back to the trees. I spread the lunch on a newspaper, and uncorked one of the bottles and leaned the other against a tree. Bill came up drying his hands, his bag plump with ferns.

"Let's see that bottle," he said. He pulled the cork, and tipped up the bottle and drank. "Whew! That makes my eyes ache."

"Let's try it."

The wine was icy cold and tasted faintly rusty.

"That's not such filthy wine," Bill said.

"The cold helps it," I said.

We unwrapped the little parcels of lunch.

"Chicken."

"There's hard-boiled eggs."

"Find any salt?"

"First the egg," said Bill. "Then the chicken. Even Bryan could see that."

"He's dead. I read it in the paper yesterday."

"No. Not really?"

"Yes. Bryan's dead."

Bill laid down the egg he was peeling.

"Gentlemen," he said, and unwrapped a drumstick from a piece of newspaper. "I reverse the order. For Bryan's sake. As a tribute to the Great Commoner. First the chicken; then the egg."

"Wonder what day God created the chicken?"

"Oh," said Bill, sucking the drumstick, "how should we know? We should not question. Our stay on earth is not for long. Let us rejoice and believe and give thanks."

"Eat an egg."

Bill gestured with the drumstick in one hand and the bottle of wine in the other.

"Let us rejoice in our blessings. Let us utilize the fowls of the air. Let us utilize the product of the vine. Will you utilize a little, brother?"

"After you, brother."

Bill took a long drink.

"Utilize a little, brother," he handed me the bottle. "Let us not doubt, brother. Let us not pry into the holy mysteries of the hen-coop with simian fingers. Let us accept on faith and simply say--I want you to join with me in saying--What shall we say, brother?" He pointed the drumstick at me and went on. "Let me tell you. We will say, and I for one am proud to say--and I want you to say with me, on your knees, brother. Let no man be ashamed to kneel here in the great out-of-doors. Remember the woods were God's first temples. Let us kneel and say: 'Don't eat that, Lady--that's Mencken.'"

"Here," I said. "Utilize a little of this."

We uncorked the other bottle.

"What's the matter?" I said. "Didn't you like Bryan?"

"I loved Bryan," said Bill. "We were like brothers."

"Where did you know him?"

"He and Mencken and I all went to Holy Cross together."

"And Frankie Fritsch."

"It's a lie. Frankie Fritsch went to Fordham."

"Well," I said, "I went to Loyola with Bishop Manning."

"It's a lie," Bill said. "I went to Loyola with Bishop Manning myself."

"You're cock-eyed," I said.

"On wine?"

"Why not?"

"It's the humidity," Bill said. "They ought to take this damn humidity away."

"Have another shot."

"Is this all we've got?"

"Only the two bottles."

"Do you know what you are?" Bill looked at the bottle affectionately.

"No," I said.

"You're in the pay of the Anti-Saloon League."

"I went to Notre Dame with Wayne B. Wheeler."

"It's a lie," said Bill. "I went to Austin Business College with Wayne B. Wheeler. He was class president."

"Well," I said, "the saloon must go."

"You're right there, old classmate," Bill said. "The saloon must go, and I will take it with me."

"You're cock-eyed."

"On wine?"

"On wine."

"Well, maybe I am."

"Want to take a nap?"

"All right."

We lay with our heads in the shade and looked up into the trees.

"You asleep?"

"No," Bill said. "I was thinking."

I shut my eyes. It felt good lying on the ground.

"Say," Bill said, "what about this Brett business?"

"What about it?"

"Were you ever in love with her?"

"Sure."

"For how long?"

"Off and on for a hell of a long time."

"Oh, hell!" Bill said. "I'm sorry, fella."

"It's all right," I said. "I don't give a damn any more."

"Really?"

"Really. Only I'd a hell of a lot rather not talk about it."

"You aren't sore I asked you?"

"Why the hell should I be?"

"I'm going to sleep," Bill said. He put a newspaper over his face.

"Listen, Jake," he said, "are you really a Catholic?"

"Technically."

"What does that mean?"

"I don't know."

"All right, I'll go to sleep now," he said. "Don't keep me awake by talking so much."

I went to sleep, too. When I woke up Bill was packing the rucksack. It was late in the afternoon and the shadow from the trees was long and went out over the dam. I was stiff from sleeping on the ground.

"What did you do? Wake up?" Bill asked. "Why didn't you spend the night?" I stretched and rubbed my eyes.

"I had a lovely dream," Bill said. "I don't remember what it was about, but it was a lovely dream."

"I don't think I dreamt."

"You ought to dream," Bill said. "All our biggest business men have been dreamers. Look at Ford. Look at President Coolidge. Look at Rockefeller. Look at Jo Davidson."

I disjointed my rod and Bill's and packed them in the rod-case. I put the reels in the tackle-bag. Bill had packed the rucksack and we put one of the trout-bags in. I carried the other.

"Well," said Bill, "have we got everything?"

"The worms."

"Your worms. Put them in there."

He had the pack on his back and I put the worm-cans in one of the outside flap pockets.

"You got everything now?"

I looked around on the grass at the foot of the elm-trees.

"Yes."

We started up the road into the woods. It was a long walk home to Burguete, and it was dark when we came down across the fields to the road, and along the road between the houses of the town, their windows lighted, to the inn.

We stayed five days at Burguete and had good fishing. The nights were cold and the days were hot, and there was always a breeze even in the heat of the day. It was hot enough so that it felt good to wade in a cold stream, and the sun dried you when you came out and sat on the bank. We found a stream with a pool deep enough to swim in. In the evenings we played three-handed bridge with an Englishman named Harris, who had walked over from Saint Jean Pied de Port and was stopping at the inn for the fishing. He was very pleasant and went with us twice to the Irati River. There was no word from Robert Cohn nor from Brett and Mike.


CHAPTER 13

One morning I went down to breakfast and the Englishman, Harris, was already at the table. He was reading the paper through spectacles. He looked up and smiled.

"Good morning," he said. "Letter for you. I stopped at the post and they gave it me with mine."

The letter was at my place at the table, leaning against a coffee-cup. Harris was reading the paper again. I opened the letter. It had been forwarded from Pamplona. It was dated San Sebastian, Sunday:

DEAR JAKE,

We got here Friday, Brett passed out on the train, so brought her here for 3 days rest with old friends of ours. We go to Montoya Hotel Pamplona Tuesday, arriving at I don't know what hour. Will you send a note by the bus to tell us what to do to rejoin you all on Wednesday. All our love and sorry to be late, but Brett was really done in and will be quite all right by Tues. and is practically so now. I know her so well and try to look after her but it's not so easy. Love to all the chaps,

MICHAEL.
"What day of the week is it?" I asked Harris.

"Wednesday, I think. Yes, quite. Wednesday. Wonderful how one loses track of the days up here in the mountains."

"Yes. We've been here nearly a week."

"I hope you're not thinking of leaving?"

"Yes. We'll go in on the afternoon bus, I'm afraid."

"What a rotten business. I had hoped we'd all have another go at the Irati together."

"We have to go into Pamplona. We're meeting people there."

"What rotten luck for me. We've had a jolly time here at Burguete."

"Come on in to Pamplona. We can play some bridge there, and there's going to be a damned fine fiesta."

"I'd like to. Awfully nice of you to ask me. I'd best stop on here, though. I've not much more time to fish."

"You want those big ones in the Irati."

"I say, I do, you know. They're enormous trout there."

"I'd like to try them once more."

"Do. Stop over another day. Be a good chap."

"We really have to get into town," I said.

"What a pity."

After breakfast Bill and I were sitting warming in the sun on a bench out in front of the inn and talking it over. I saw a girl coming up the road from the centre of the town. She stopped in front of us and took a telegram out of the leather wallet that hung against her skirt.

"Por ustedes?"

I looked at it. The address was: "Barnes, Burguete."

"Yes. It's for us."

She brought out a book for me to sign, and I gave her a couple of coppers. The telegram was in Spanish: "Vengo Jueves Cohn."

I handed it to Bill.

"What does the word Cohn mean?" he asked.

"What a lousy telegram!" I said. "He could send ten words for the same price. 'I come Thursday.' That gives you a lot of dope, doesn't it?"

"It gives you all the dope that's of interest to Cohn."

"We're going in, anyway," I said. "There's no use trying to move Brett and Mike out here and back before the fiesta. Should we answer it?"

"We might as well," said Bill. "There's no need for us to be snooty."

We walked up to the post-office and asked for a telegraph blank.

"What will we say?" Bill asked.

"'Arriving to-night.' That's enough."

We paid for the message and walked back to the inn. Harris was there and the three of us walked up to Roncesvalles. We went through the monastery.

"It's a remarkable place," Harris said, when we came out. "But you know I'm not much on those sort of places."

"Me either," Bill said.

"It's a remarkable place, though," Harris said. "I wouldn't not have seen it. I'd been intending coming up each day."

"It isn't the same as fishing, though, is it?" Bill asked. He liked Harris.

"I say not."

We were standing in front of the old chapel of the monastery.

"Isn't that a pub across the way?" Harris asked. "Or do my eyes deceive me?"

"It has the look of a pub," Bill said.

"It looks to me like a pub," I said.

"I say," said Harris, "let's utilize it." He had taken up utilizing from Bill.

We had a bottle of wine apiece. Harris would not let us pay. He talked Spanish quite well, and the innkeeper would not take our money.

"I say. You don't know what it's meant to me to have you chaps up here."

"We've had a grand time, Harris."

Harris was a little tight.

"I say. Really you don't know how much it means. I've not had much fun since the war."

"We'll fish together again, some time. Don't you forget it, Harris."

"We must. We have had such a jolly good time."

"How about another bottle around?"

"Jolly good idea," said Harris.

"This is mine," said Bill. "Or we don't drink it."

"I wish you'd let me pay for it. It does give me pleasure, you know."

"This is going to give me pleasure," Bill said.

The innkeeper brought in the fourth bottle. We had kept the same glasses. Harris lifted his glass.

"I say. You know this does utilize well."

Bill slapped him on the back.

"Good old Harris."

"I say. You know my name isn't really Harris. It's Wilson-Harris. All one name. With a hyphen, you know."

"Good old Wilson-Harris," Bill said. "We call you Harris because we're so fond of you."

"I say, Barnes. You don't know what this all means to me."

"Come on and utilize another glass," I said.

"Barnes. Really, Barnes, you can't know. That's all."

"Drink up, Harris."

We walked back down the road from Roncesvalles with Harris between us. We had lunch at the inn and Harris went with us to the bus. He gave us his card, with his address in London and his club and his business address, and as we got on the bus he handed us each an envelope. I opened mine and there were a dozen flies in it. Harris had tied them himself. He tied all his own flies.

"I say, Harris--" I began.

"No, no!" he said. He was climbing down from the bus. "They're not first-rate flies at all. I only thought if you fished them some time it might remind you of what a good time we had."

The bus started. Harris stood in front of the post-office. He waved. As we started along the road he turned and walked back toward the inn.

"Say, wasn't that Harris nice?" Bill said.

"I think he really did have a good time."

"Harris? You bet he did."

"I wish he'd come into Pamplona."

"He wanted to fish."

"Yes. You couldn't tell how English would mix with each other, anyway."

"I suppose not."

We got into Pamplona late in the afternoon and the bus stopped in front of the Hotel Montoya. Out in the plaza they were stringing electric-light wires to light the plaza for the fiesta. A few kids came up when the bus stopped, and a customs officer for the town made all the people getting down from the bus open their bundles on the sidewalk. We went into the hotel and on the stairs I met Montoya. He shook hands with us, smiling in his embarrassed way.

"Your friends are here," he said.

"Mr. Campbell?"

"Yes. Mr. Cohn and Mr. Campbell and Lady Ashley."

He smiled as though there were something I would hear about.

"When did they get in?"

"Yesterday. I've saved you the rooms you had."

"That's fine. Did you give Mr. Campbell the room on the plaza?"

"Yes. All the rooms we looked at."

"Where are our friends now?"

"I think they went to the pelota."

"And how about the bulls?"

Montoya smiled. "To-night," he said. "To-night at seven o'clock they bring in the Villar bulls, and to-morrow come the Miuras. Do you all go down?"

"Oh, yes. They've never seen a desencajonada."

Montoya put his hand on my shoulder.

"I'll see you there."

He smiled again. He always smiled as though bull-fighting were a very special secret between the two of us; a rather shocking but really very deep secret that we knew about. He always smiled as though there were something lewd about the secret to outsiders, but that it was something that we understood. It would not do to expose it to people who would not understand.

"Your friend, is he aficionado, too?" Montoya smiled at Bill.

"Yes. He came all the way from New York to see the San Fermines."

"Yes?" Montoya politely disbelieved. "But he's not aficionado like you."

He put his hand on my shoulder again embarrassedly.

"Yes," I said. "He's a real aficionado."

"But he's not aficionado like you are."

Aficion means passion. An aficionado is one who is passionate about the bull-fights. All the good bull-fighters stayed at Montoya's hotel; that is, those with aficion stayed there. The commercial bull-fighters stayed once, perhaps, and then did not come back. The good ones came each year. In Montoya's room were their photographs. The photographs were dedicated to Juanito Montoya or to his sister. The photographs of bull-fighters Montoya had really believed in were framed. Photographs of bull-fighters who had been without aficion Montoya kept in a drawer of his desk. They often had the most flattering inscriptions. But they did not mean anything. One day Montoya took them all out and dropped them in the waste-basket. He did not want them around.

We often talked about bulls and bull-fighters. I had stopped at the Montoya for several years. We never talked for very long at a time. It was simply the pleasure of discovering what we each felt. Men would come in from distant towns and before they left Pamplona stop and talk for a few minutes with Montoya about bulls. These men were aficionados. Those who were aficionados could always get rooms even when the hotel was full. Montoya introduced me to some of them. They were always very polite at first, and it amused them very much that I should be an American. Somehow it was taken for granted that an American could not have aficion. He might simulate it or confuse it with excitement, but he could not really have it. When they saw that I had aficion, and there was no password, no set questions that could bring it out, rather it was a sort of oral spiritual examination with the questions always a little on the defensive and never apparent, there was this same embarrassed putting the hand on the shoulder, or a "Buen hombre." But nearly always there was the actual touching. It seemed as though they wanted to touch you to make it certain.

Montoya could forgive anything of a bull-fighter who had aficion. He could forgive attacks of nerves, panic, bad unexplainable actions, all sorts of lapses. For one who had aficion he could forgive anything. At once he forgave me all my friends. Without his ever saying anything they were simply a little something shameful between us, like the spilling open of the horses in bull-fighting.

Bill had gone up-stairs as we came in, and I found him washing and changing in his room.

"Well," he said, "talk a lot of Spanish?"

"He was telling me about the bulls coming in to-night."

"Let's find the gang and go down."

"All right. They'll probably be at the café."

"Have you got tickets?"

"Yes. I got them for all the unloadings."

"What's it like?" He was pulling his cheek before the glass, looking to see if there were unshaved patches under the line of the jaw.

"It's pretty good," I said. "They let the bulls out of the cages one at a time, and they have steers in the corral to receive them and keep them from fighting, and the bulls tear in at the steers and the steers run around like old maids trying to quiet them down."

"Do they ever gore the steers?"

"Sure. Sometimes they go right after them and kill them."

"Can't the steers do anything?"

"No. They're trying to make friends."

"What do they have them in for?"

"To quiet down the bulls and keep them from breaking horns against the stone walls, or goring each other."

"Must be swell being a steer."

We went down the stairs and out of the door and walked across the square toward the Café Iruña. There were two lonely looking ticket-houses standing in the square. Their windows, marked SOL, SOL Y SOMBRA, and SOMBRA, were shut. They would not open until the day before the fiesta.

Across the square the white wicker tables and chairs of the Iruña extended out beyond the Arcade to the edge of the street. I looked for Brett and Mike at the tables. There they were. Brett and Mike and Robert Cohn. Brett was wearing a Basque beret. So was Mike. Robert Cohn was bare-headed and wearing his spectacles. Brett saw us coming and waved. Her eyes crinkled up as we came up to the table.

"Hello, you chaps!" she called.

Brett was happy. Mike had a way of getting an intensity of feeling into shaking hands. Robert Cohn shook hands because we were back.

"Where the hell have you been?" I asked.

"I brought them up here," Cohn said.

"What rot," Brett said. "We'd have gotten here earlier if you hadn't come."

"You'd never have gotten here."

"What rot! You chaps are brown. Look at Bill."

"Did you get good fishing?" Mike asked. "We wanted to join you."

"It wasn't bad. We missed you."

"I wanted to come," Cohn said, "but I thought I ought to bring them."

"You bring us. What rot."

"Was it really good?" Mike asked. "Did you take many?"

"Some days we took a dozen apiece. There was an Englishman up there."

"Named Harris," Bill said. "Ever know him, Mike? He was in the war, too."

"Fortunate fellow," Mike said. "What times we had. How I wish those dear days were back."

"Don't be an ass."

"Were you in the war, Mike?" Cohn asked.

"Was I not."

"He was a very distinguished soldier," Brett said. "Tell them about the time your horse bolted down Piccadilly."

"I'll not. I've told that four times."

"You never told me," Robert Cohn said.

"I'll not tell that story. It reflects discredit on me."

"Tell them about your medals."

"I'll not. That story reflects great discredit on me."

"What story's that?"

"Brett will tell you. She tells all the stories that reflect discredit on me."

"Go on. Tell it, Brett."

"Should I?"

"I'll tell it myself."

"What medals have you got, Mike?"

"I haven't got any medals."

"You must have some."

"I suppose I've the usual medals. But I never sent in for them. One time there was this wopping big dinner and the Prince of Wales was to be there, and the cards said medals will be worn. So naturally I had no medals, and I stopped at my tailor's and he was impressed by the invitation, and I thought that's a good piece of business, and I said to him: 'You've got to fix me up with some medals.' He said: 'What medals, sir?' And I said: 'Oh, any medals. Just give me a few medals.' So he said: 'What medals have you, sir?' And I said: 'How should I know?' Did he think I spent all my time reading the bloody gazette? 'Just give me a good lot. Pick them out yourself.' So he got me some medals, you know, miniature medals, and handed me the box, and I put it in my pocket and forgot it. Well, I went to the dinner, and it was the night they'd shot Henry Wilson, so the Prince didn't come and the King didn't come, and no one wore any medals, and all these coves were busy taking off their medals, and I had mine in my pocket."

He stopped for us to laugh.

"Is that all?"

"That's all. Perhaps I didn't tell it right."

"You didn't," said Brett. "But no matter."

We were all laughing.

"Ah, yes," said Mike. "I know now. It was a damn dull dinner, and I couldn't stick it, so I left. Later on in the evening I found the box in my pocket. What's this? I said. Medals? Bloody military medals? So I cut them all off their backing--you know, they put them on a strip--and gave them all around. Gave one to each girl. Form of souvenir. They thought I was hell's own shakes of a soldier. Give away medals in a night club. Dashing fellow."

"Tell the rest," Brett said.

"Don't you think that was funny?" Mike asked. We were all laughing. "It was. I swear it was. Any rate, my tailor wrote me and wanted the medals back. Sent a man around. Kept on writing for months. Seems some chap had left them to be cleaned. Frightfully military cove. Set hell's own store by them." Mike paused. "Rotten luck for the tailor," he said.

"You don't mean it," Bill said. "I should think it would have been grand for the tailor."

"Frightfully good tailor. Never believe it to see me now," Mike said. "I used to pay him a hundred pounds a year just to keep him quiet. So he wouldn't send me any bills. Frightful blow to him when I went bankrupt. It was right after the medals. Gave his letters rather a bitter tone."

"How did you go bankrupt?" Bill asked.

"Two ways," Mike said. "Gradually and then suddenly."

"What brought it on?"

"Friends," said Mike. "I had a lot of friends. False friends. Then I had creditors, too. Probably had more creditors than anybody in England."

"Tell them about in the court," Brett said.

"I don't remember," Mike said. "I was just a little tight."

"Tight!" Brett exclaimed. "You were blind!"

"Extraordinary thing," Mike said. "Met my former partner the other day. Offered to buy me a drink."

"Tell them about your learned counsel," Brett said.

"I will not," Mike said. "My learned counsel was blind, too. I say this is a gloomy subject. Are we going down and see these bulls unloaded or not?"

"Let's go down."

We called the waiter, paid, and started to walk through the town. I started off walking with Brett, but Robert Cohn came up and joined her on the other side. The three of us walked along, past the Ayuntamiento with the banners hung from the balcony, down past the market and down past the steep street that led to the bridge across the Arga. There were many people walking to go and see the bulls, and carriages drove down the hill and across the bridge, the drivers, the horses, and the whips rising above the walking people in the street. Across the bridge we turned up a road to the corrals. We passed a wine-shop with a sign in the window: Good Wine 30 Centimes A Liter.

"That's where we'll go when funds get low," Brett said.

The woman standing in the door of the wine-shop looked at us as we passed. She called to some one in the house and three girls came to the window and stared. They were staring at Brett.

At the gate of the corrals two men took tickets from the people that went in. We went in through the gate. There were trees inside and a low, stone house. At the far end was the stone wall of the corrals, with apertures in the stone that were like loopholes running all along the face of each corral. A ladder led up to the top of the wall, and people were climbing up the ladder and spreading down to stand on the walls that separated the two corrals. As we came up the ladder, walking across the grass under the trees, we passed the big, gray painted cages with the bulls in them. There was one bull in each travelling-box. They had come by train from a bull-breeding ranch in Castile, and had been unloaded off flat-cars at the station and brought up here to be let out of their cages into the corrals. Each cage was stencilled with the name and the brand of the bull-breeder.

We climbed up and found a place on the wall looking down into the corral. The stone walls were whitewashed, and there was straw on the ground and wooden feed-boxes and water-troughs set against the wall.

"Look up there," I said.

Beyond the river rose the plateau of the town. All along the old walls and ramparts people were standing. The three lines of fortifications made three black lines of people. Above the walls there were heads in the windows of the houses. At the far end of the plateau boys had climbed into the trees.

"They must think something is going to happen," Brett said.

"They want to see the bulls."

Mike and Bill were on the other wall across the pit of the corral. They waved to us. People who had come late were standing behind us, pressing against us when other people crowded them.

"Why don't they start?" Robert Cohn asked.

A single mule was hitched to one of the cages and dragged it up against the gate in the corral wall. The men shoved and lifted it with crowbars into position against the gate. Men were standing on the wall ready to pull up the gate of the corral and then the gate of the cage. At the other end of the corral a gate opened and two steers came in, swaying their heads and trotting, their lean flanks swinging. They stood together at the far end, their heads toward the gate where the bull would enter.

"They don't look happy," Brett said.

The men on top of the wall leaned back and pulled up the door of the corral. Then they pulled up the door of the cage.

I leaned way over the wall and tried to see into the cage. It was dark. Some one rapped on the cage with an iron bar. Inside something seemed to explode. The bull, striking into the wood from side to side with his horns, made a great noise. Then I saw a dark muzzle and the shadow of horns, and then, with a clattering on the wood in the hollow box, the bull charged and came out into the corral, skidding with his forefeet in the straw as he stopped, his head up, the great hump of muscle on his neck swollen tight, his body muscles quivering as he looked up at the crowd on the stone walls. The two steers backed away against the wall, their heads sunken, their eyes watching the bull.

The bull saw them and charged. A man shouted from behind one of the boxes and slapped his hat against the planks, and the bull, before he reached the steer, turned, gathered himself and charged where the man had been, trying to reach him behind the planks with a half-dozen quick, searching drives with the right horn.

"My God, isn't he beautiful?" Brett said. We were looking right down on him.

"Look how he knows how to use his horns," I said. "He's got a left and a right just like a boxer."

"Not really?"

"You watch."

"It goes too fast."

"Wait. There'll be another one in a minute."

They had backed up another cage into the entrance. In the far corner a man, from behind one of the plank shelters, attracted the bull, and while the bull was facing away the gate was pulled up and a second bull came out into the corral.

He charged straight for the steers and two men ran out from behind the planks and shouted, to turn him. He did not change his direction and the men shouted: "Hah! Hah! Toro!" and waved their arms; the two steers turned sideways to take the shock, and the bull drove into one of the steers.

"Don't look," I said to Brett. She was watching, fascinated.

"Fine," I said. "If it doesn't buck you."

"I saw it," she said. "I saw him shift from his left to his right horn."

"Damn good!"

The steer was down now, his neck stretched out, his head twisted, he lay the way he had fallen. Suddenly the bull left off and made for the other steer which had been standing at the far end, his head swinging, watching it all. The steer ran awkwardly and the bull caught him, hooked him lightly in the flank, and then turned away and looked up at the crowd on the walls, his crest of muscle rising. The steer came up to him and made as though to nose at him and the bull hooked perfunctorily. The next time he nosed at the steer and then the two of them trotted over to the other bull.

When the next bull came out, all three, the two bulls and the steer, stood together, their heads side by side, their horns against the newcomer. In a few minutes the steer picked the new bull up, quieted him down, and made him one of the herd. When the last two bulls had been unloaded the herd were all together.

The steer who had been gored had gotten to his feet and stood against the stone wall. None of the bulls came near him, and he did not attempt to join the herd.

We climbed down from the wall with the crowd, and had a last look at the bulls through the loopholes in the wall of the corral. They were all quiet now, their heads down. We got a carriage outside and rode up to the café. Mike and Bill came in half an hour later. They had stopped on the way for several drinks.

We were sitting in the café.

"That's an extraordinary business," Brett said.

"Will those last ones fight as well as the first?" Robert Cohn asked. "They seemed to quiet down awfully fast."

"They all know each other," I said. "They're only dangerous when they're alone, or only two or three of them together."

"What do you mean, dangerous?" Bill said. "They all looked dangerous to me."

"They only want to kill when they're alone. Of course, if you went in there you'd probably detach one of them from the herd, and he'd be dangerous."

"That's too complicated," Bill said. "Don't you ever detach me from the herd, Mike."

"I say," Mike said, "they were fine bulls, weren't they? Did you see their horns?"

"Did I not," said Brett. "I had no idea what they were like."

"Did you see the one hit that steer?" Mike asked. "That was extraordinary."

"It's no life being a steer," Robert Cohn said.

"Don't you think so?" Mike said. "I would have thought you'd loved being a steer, Robert."

"What do you mean, Mike?"

"They lead such a quiet life. They never say anything and they're always hanging about so."

We were embarrassed. Bill laughed. Robert Cohn was angry. Mike went on talking.

"I should think you'd love it. You'd never have to say a word. Come on, Robert. Do say something. Don't just sit there."

"I said something, Mike. Don't you remember? About the steers."

"Oh, say something more. Say something funny. Can't you see we're all having a good time here?"

"Come off it, Michael. You're drunk," Brett said.

"I'm not drunk. I'm quite serious. Is Robert Cohn going to follow Brett around like a steer all the time?"

"Shut up, Michael. Try and show a little breeding."

"Breeding be damned. Who has any breeding, anyway, except the bulls? Aren't the bulls lovely? Don't you like them, Bill? Why don't you say something, Robert? Don't sit there looking like a bloody funeral. What if Brett did sleep with you? She's slept with lots of better people than you."

"Shut up," Cohn said. He stood up. "Shut up, Mike."

"Oh, don't stand up and act as though you were going to hit me. That won't make any difference to me. Tell me, Robert. Why do you follow Brett around like a poor bloody steer? Don't you know you're not wanted? I know when I'm not wanted. Why don't you know when you're not wanted? You came down to San Sebastian where you weren't wanted, and followed Brett around like a bloody steer. Do you think that's right?"

"Shut up. You're drunk."

"Perhaps I am drunk. Why aren't you drunk? Why don't you ever get drunk, Robert? You know you didn't have a good time at San Sebastian because none of our friends would invite you on any of the parties. You can't blame them hardly. Can you? I asked them to. They wouldn't do it. You can't blame them, now. Can you? Now, answer me. Can you blame them?"

"Go to hell, Mike."

"I can't blame them. Can you blame them? Why do you follow Brett around? Haven't you any manners? How do you think it makes me feel?"

"You're a splendid one to talk about manners," Brett said. "You've such lovely manners."

"Come on, Robert," Bill said.

"What do you follow her around for?"

Bill stood up and took hold of Cohn.

"Don't go," Mike said. "Robert Cohn's going to buy a drink."

Bill went off with Cohn. Cohn's face was sallow. Mike went on talking. I sat and listened for a while. Brett looked disgusted.

"I say, Michael, you might not be such a bloody ass," she interrupted. "I'm not saying he's not right, you know." She turned to me.

The emotion left Mike's voice. We were all friends together.

"I'm not so damn drunk as I sounded," he said.

"I know you're not," Brett said.

"We're none of us sober," I said.

"I didn't say anything I didn't mean."

"But you put it so badly," Brett laughed.

"He was an ass, though. He came down to San Sebastian where he damn well wasn't wanted. He hung around Brett and just looked at her. It made me damned well sick."

"He did behave very badly," Brett said.

"Mark you. Brett's had affairs with men before. She tells me all about everything. She gave me this chap Cohn's letters to read. I wouldn't read them."

"Damned noble of you."

"No, listen, Jake. Brett's gone off with men. But they weren't ever Jews, and they didn't come and hang about afterward."

"Damned good chaps," Brett said. "It's all rot to talk about it. Michael and I understand each other."

"She gave me Robert Cohn's letters. I wouldn't read them."

"You wouldn't read any letters, darling. You wouldn't read mine."

"I can't read letters," Mike said. "Funny, isn't it?"

"You can't read anything."

"No. You're wrong there. I read quite a bit. I read when I'm at home."

"You'll be writing next," Brett said. "Come on, Michael. Do buck up. You've got to go through with this thing now. He's here. Don't spoil the fiesta."

"Well, let him behave, then."

"He'll behave. I'll tell him."

"You tell him, Jake. Tell him either he must behave or get out."

"Yes," I said, "it would be nice for me to tell him."

"Look, Brett. Tell Jake what Robert calls you. That is perfect, you know."

"Oh, no. I can't."

"Go on. We're all friends. Aren't we all friends, Jake?"

"I can't tell him. It's too ridiculous."

"I'll tell him."

"You won't, Michael. Don't be an ass."

"He calls her Circe," Mike said. "He claims she turns men into swine. Damn good. I wish I were one of these literary chaps."

"He'd be good, you know," Brett said. "He writes a good letter."

"I know," I said. "He wrote me from San Sebastian."

"That was nothing," Brett said. "He can write a damned amusing letter."

"She made me write that. She was supposed to be ill."

"I damned well was, too."

"Come on," I said, "we must go in and eat."

"How should I meet Cohn?" Mike said.

"Just act as though nothing had happened."

"It's quite all right with me," Mike said. "I'm not embarrassed."

"If he says anything, just say you were tight."

"Quite. And the funny thing is I think I was tight."

"Come on," Brett said. "Are these poisonous things paid for? I must bathe before dinner."

We walked across the square. It was dark and all around the square were the lights from the cafés under the arcades. We walked across the gravel under the trees to the hotel.

They went up-stairs and I stopped to speak with Montoya.

"Well, how did you like the bulls?" he asked.

"Good. They were nice bulls."

"They're all right"--Montoya shook his head--"but they're not too good."

"What didn't you like about them?"

"I don't know. They just didn't give me the feeling that they were so good."

"I know what you mean."

"They're all right."

"Yes. They're all right."

"How did your friends like them?"

"Fine."

"Good," Montoya said.

I went up-stairs. Bill was in his room standing on the balcony looking out at the square. I stood beside him.

"Where's Cohn?"

"Up-stairs in his room."

"How does he feel?"

"Like hell, naturally. Mike was awful. He's terrible when he's tight."

"He wasn't so tight."

"The hell he wasn't. I know what we had before we came to the café."

"He sobered up afterward."

"Good. He was terrible. I don't like Cohn, God knows, and I think it was a silly trick for him to go down to San Sebastian, but nobody has any business to talk like Mike."

"How'd you like the bulls?"

"Grand. It's grand the way they bring them out."

"To-morrow come the Miuras."

"When does the fiesta start?"

"Day after to-morrow."

"We've got to keep Mike from getting so tight. That kind of stuff is terrible."

"We'd better get cleaned up for supper."

"Yes. That will be a pleasant meal."

"Won't it?"

As a matter of fact, supper was a pleasant meal. Brett wore a black, sleeveless evening dress. She looked quite beautiful. Mike acted as though nothing had happened. I had to go up and bring Robert Cohn down. He was reserved and formal, and his face was still taut and sallow, but he cheered up finally. He could not stop looking at Brett. It seemed to make him happy. It must have been pleasant for him to see her looking so lovely, and know he had been away with her and that every one knew it. They could not take that away from him. Bill was very funny. So was Michael. They were good together.

It was like certain dinners I remember from the war. There was much wine, an ignored tension, and a feeling of things coming that you could not prevent happening. Under the wine I lost the disgusted feeling and was happy. It seemed they were all such nice people.


CHAPTER 14

I do not know what time I got to bed. I remember undressing, putting on a bathrobe, and standing out on the balcony. I knew I was quite drunk, and when I came in I put on the light over the head of the bed and started to read. I was reading a book by Turgenieff. Probably I read the same two pages over several times. It was one of the stories in "A Sportsman's Sketches." I had read it before, but it seemed quite new. The country became very clear and the feeling of pressure in my head seemed to loosen. I was very drunk and I did not want to shut my eyes because the room would go round and round. If I kept on reading that feeling would pass.

I heard Brett and Robert Cohn come up the stairs. Cohn said good night outside the door and went on up to his room. I heard Brett go into the room next door. Mike was already in bed. He had come in with me an hour before. He woke as she came in, and they talked together. I heard them laugh. I turned off the light and tried to go to sleep. It was not necessary to read any more. I could shut my eyes without getting the wheeling sensation. But I could not sleep. There is no reason why because it is dark you should look at things differently from when it is light. The hell there isn't!

I figured that all out once, and for six months I never slept with the electric light off. That was another bright idea. To hell with women, anyway. To hell with you, Brett Ashley.

Women made such swell friends. Awfully swell. In the first place, you had to be in love with a woman to have a basis of friendship. I had been having Brett for a friend. I had not been thinking about her side of it. I had been getting something for nothing. That only delayed the presentation of the bill. The bill always came. That was one of the swell things you could count on.

I thought I had paid for everything. Not like the woman pays and pays and pays. No idea of retribution or punishment. Just exchange of values. You gave up something and got something else. Or you worked for something. You paid some way for everything that was any good. I paid my way into enough things that I liked, so that I had a good time. Either you paid by learning about them, or by experience, or by taking chances, or by money. Enjoying living was learning to get your money's worth and knowing when you had it. You could get your money's worth. The world was a good place to buy in. It seemed like a fine philosophy. In five years, I thought, it will seem just as silly as all the other fine philosophies I've had.

Perhaps that wasn't true, though. Perhaps as you went along you did learn something. I did not care what it was all about. All I wanted to know was how to live in it. Maybe if you found out how to live in it you learned from that what it was all about.

I wished Mike would not behave so terribly to Cohn, though. Mike was a bad drunk. Brett was a good drunk. Bill was a good drunk. Cohn was never drunk. Mike was unpleasant after he passed a certain point. I liked to see him hurt Cohn. I wished he would not do it, though, because afterward it made me disgusted at myself. That was morality; things that made you disgusted afterward. No, that must be immorality. That was a large statement. What a lot of bilge I could think up at night. What rot, I could hear Brett say it. What rot! When you were with English you got into the habit of using English expressions in your thinking. The English spoken language--the upper classes, anyway--must have fewer words than the Eskimo. Of course I didn't know anything about the Eskimo. Maybe the Eskimo was a fine language. Say the Cherokee. I didn't know anything about the Cherokee, either. The English talked with inflected phrases. One phrase to mean everything. I liked them, though. I liked the way they talked. Take Harris. Still Harris was not the upper classes.

I turned on the light again and read. I read the Turgenieff. I knew that now, reading it in the oversensitized state of my mind after much too much brandy, I would remember it somewhere, and afterward it would seem as though it had really happened to me. I would always have it. That was another good thing you paid for and then had. Some time along toward daylight I went to sleep.

* * * * *

The next two days in Pamplona were quiet, and there were no more rows. The town was getting ready for the fiesta. Workmen put up the gate-posts that were to shut off the side streets when the bulls were released from the corrals and came running through the streets in the morning on their way to the ring. The workmen dug holes and fitted in the timbers, each timber numbered for its regular place. Out on the plateau beyond the town employees of the bull-ring exercised picador horses, galloping them stiff-legged on the hard, sun-baked fields behind the bull-ring. The big gate of the bull-ring was open, and inside the amphitheatre was being swept. The ring was rolled and sprinkled, and carpenters replaced weakened or cracked planks in the barrera. Standing at the edge of the smooth rolled sand you could look up in the empty stands and see old women sweeping out the boxes.

Outside, the fence that led from the last street of the town to the entrance of the bull-ring was already in place and made a long pen; the crowd would come running down with the bulls behind them on the morning of the day of the first bull-fight. Out across the plain, where the horse and cattle fair would be, some gypsies had camped under the trees. The wine and aguardiente sellers were putting up their booths. One booth advertised ANIS DEL TORO. The cloth sign hung against the planks in the hot sun. In the big square that was the centre of the town there was no change yet. We sat in the white wicker chairs on the terrasse of the café and watched the motor-buses come in and unload peasants from the country coming in to the market, and we watched the buses fill up and start out with peasants sitting with their saddle-bags full of the things they had bought in the town. The tall gray motor-buses were the only life of the square except for the pigeons and the man with a hose who sprinkled the gravelled square and watered the streets.

In the evening was the paseo. For an hour after dinner every one, all the good-looking girls, the officers from the garrison, all the fashionable people of the town, walked in the street on one side of the square while the café tables filled with the regular after-dinner crowd.

During the morning I usually sat in the café and read the Madrid papers and then walked in the town or out into the country. Sometimes Bill went along. Sometimes he wrote in his room. Robert Cohn spent the mornings studying Spanish or trying to get a shave at the barber-shop. Brett and Mike never got up until noon. We all had a vermouth at the café. It was a quiet life and no one was drunk. I went to church a couple of times, once with Brett. She said she wanted to hear me go to confession, but I told her that not only was it impossible but it was not as interesting as it sounded, and, besides, it would be in a language she did not know. We met Cohn as we came out of church, and although it was obvious he had followed us, yet he was very pleasant and nice, and we all three went for a walk out to the gypsy camp, and Brett had her fortune told.

It was a good morning, there were high white clouds above the mountains. It had rained a little in the night and it was fresh and cool on the plateau, and there was a wonderful view. We all felt good and we felt healthy, and I felt quite friendly to Cohn. You could not be upset about anything on a day like that.

That was the last day before the fiesta.


CHAPTER 15

At noon of Sunday, the 6th of July, the fiesta exploded. There is no other way to describe it. People had been coming in all day from the country, but they were assimilated in the town and you did not notice them. The square was as quiet in the hot sun as on any other day. The peasants were in the outlying wine-shops. There they were drinking, getting ready for the fiesta. They had come in so recently from the plains and the hills that it was necessary that they make their shifting in values gradually. They could not start in paying café prices. They got their money's worth in the wine-shops. Money still had a definite value in hours worked and bushels of grain sold. Late in the fiesta it would not matter what they paid, nor where they bought.

Now on the day of the starting of the fiesta of San Fermin they had been in the wine-shops of the narrow streets of the town since early morning. Going down the streets in the morning on the way to mass in the cathedral, I heard them singing through the open doors of the shops. They were warming up. There were many people at the eleven o'clock mass. San Fermin is also a religious festival.

I walked down the hill from the cathedral and up the street to the café on the square. It was a little before noon. Robert Cohn and Bill were sitting at one of the tables. The marble-topped tables and the white wicker chairs were gone. They were replaced by cast-iron tables and severe folding chairs. The café was like a battleship stripped for action. To-day the waiters did not leave you alone all morning to read without asking if you wanted to order something. A waiter came up as soon as I sat down.

"What are you drinking?" I asked Bill and Robert.

"Sherry," Cohn said.

"Jerez," I said to the waiter.

Before the waiter brought the sherry the rocket that announced the fiesta went up in the square. It burst and there was a gray ball of smoke high up above the Theatre Gayarre, across on the other side of the plaza. The ball of smoke hung in the sky like a shrapnel burst, and as I watched, another rocket came up to it, trickling smoke in the bright sunlight. I saw the bright flash as it burst and another little cloud of smoke appeared. By the time the second rocket had burst there were so many people in the arcade, that had been empty a minute before, that the waiter, holding the bottle high up over his head, could hardly get through the crowd to our table. People were coming into the square from all sides, and down the street we heard the pipes and the fifes and the drums coming. They were playing the riau-riau music, the pipes shrill and the drums pounding, and behind them came the men and boys dancing. When the fifers stopped they all crouched down in the street, and when the reed-pipes and the fifes shrilled, and the flat, dry, hollow drums tapped it out again, they all went up in the air dancing. In the crowd you saw only the heads and shoulders of the dancers going up and down.

In the square a man, bent over, was playing on a reed-pipe, and a crowd of children were following him shouting, and pulling at his clothes. He came out of the square, the children following him, and piped them past the café and down a side street. We saw his blank pockmarked face as he went by, piping, the children close behind him shouting and pulling at him.

"He must be the village idiot," Bill said. "My God! look at that!"

Down the street came dancers. The street was solid with dancers, all men. They were all dancing in time behind their own fifers and drummers. They were a club of some sort, and all wore workmen's blue smocks, and red handkerchiefs around their necks, and carried a great banner on two poles. The banner danced up and down with them as they came down surrounded by the crowd.

"Hurray for Wine! Hurray for the Foreigners!" was painted on the banner.

"Where are the foreigners?" Robert Cohn asked.

"We're the foreigners," Bill said.

All the time rockets were going up. The café tables were all full now. The square was emptying of people and the crowd was filling the cafés.

"Where's Brett and Mike?" Bill asked.

"I'll go and get them," Cohn said.

"Bring them here."

The fiesta was really started. It kept up day and night for seven days. The dancing kept up, the drinking kept up, the noise went on. The things that happened could only have happened during a fiesta. Everything became quite unreal finally and it seemed as though nothing could have any consequences. It seemed out of place to think of consequences during the fiesta. All during the fiesta you had the feeling, even when it was quiet, that you had to shout any remark to make it heard. It was the same feeling about any action. It was a fiesta and it went on for seven days.

That afternoon was the big religious procession. San Fermin was translated from one church to another. In the procession were all the dignitaries, civil and religious. We could not see them because the crowd was too great. Ahead of the formal procession and behind it danced the riau-riau dancers. There was one mass of yellow shirts dancing up and down in the crowd. All we could see of the procession through the closely pressed people that crowded all the side streets and curbs were the great giants, cigar-store Indians, thirty feet high, Moors, a King and Queen, whirling and waltzing solemnly to the riau-riau.

They were all standing outside the chapel where San Fermin and the dignitaries had passed in, leaving a guard of soldiers, the giants, with the men who danced in them standing beside their resting frames, and the dwarfs moving with their whacking bladders through the crowd. We started inside and there was a smell of incense and people filing back into the church, but Brett was stopped just inside the door because she had no hat, so we went out again and along the street that ran back from the chapel into town. The street was lined on both sides with people keeping their place at the curb for the return of the procession. Some dancers formed a circle around Brett and started to dance. They wore big wreaths of white garlics around their necks. They took Bill and me by the arms and put us in the circle. Bill started to dance, too. They were all chanting. Brett wanted to dance but they did not want her to. They wanted her as an image to dance around. When the song ended with the sharp riau-riau! they rushed us into a wine-shop.

We stood at the counter. They had Brett seated on a wine-cask. It was dark in the wine-shop and full of men singing, hard-voiced singing. Back of the counter they drew the wine from casks. I put down money for the wine, but one of the men picked it up and put it back in my pocket.

"I want a leather wine-bottle," Bill said.

"There's a place down the street," I said. "I'll go get a couple."

The dancers did not want me to go out. Three of them were sitting on the high wine-cask beside Brett, teaching her to drink out of the wine-skins. They had hung a wreath of garlics around her neck. Some one insisted on giving her a glass. Somebody was teaching Bill a song. Singing it into his ear. Beating time on Bill's back.

I explained to them that I would be back. Outside in the street I went down the street looking for the shop that made leather wine-bottles. The crowd was packed on the sidewalks and many of the shops were shuttered, and I could not find it. I walked as far as the church, looking on both sides of the street. Then I asked a man and he took me by the arm and led me to it. The shutters were up but the door was open.

Inside it smelled of fresh tanned leather and hot tar. A man was stencilling completed wine-skins. They hung from the roof in bunches. He took one down, blew it up, screwed the nozzle tight, and then jumped on it

"See! It doesn't leak."

"I want another one, too. A big one."

He took down a big one that would hold a gallon or more, from the roof. He blew it up, his cheeks puffing ahead of the wine-skin, and stood on the bota holding on to a chair.

"What are you going to do? Sell them in Bayonne?"

"No. Drink out of them."

He slapped me on the back.

"Good man. Eight pesetas for the two. The lowest price."

The man who was stencilling the new ones and tossing them into a pile stopped.

"It's true," he said. "Eight pesetas is cheap."

I paid and went out and along the street back to the wine-shop. It was darker than ever inside and very crowded. I did not see Brett and Bill, and some one said they were in the back room. At the counter the girl filled the two wine-skins for me. One held two litres. The other held five litres. Filling them both cost three pesetas sixty centimos. Some one at the counter, that I had never seen before, tried to pay for the wine, but I finally paid for it myself. The man who had wanted to pay then bought me a drink. He would not let me buy one in return, but said he would take a rinse of the mouth from the new wine-bag. He tipped the big five-litre bag up and squeezed it so the wine hissed against the back of his throat.

"All right," he said, and handed back the bag.

In the back room Brett and Bill were sitting on barrels surrounded by the dancers. Everybody had his arms on everybody else's shoulders, and they were all singing. Mike was sitting at a table with several men in their shirt-sleeves, eating from a bowl of tuna fish, chopped onions and vinegar. They were all drinking wine and mopping up the oil and vinegar with pieces of bread.

"Hello, Jake. Hello!" Mike called. "Come here. I want you to meet my friends. We're all having an hors-d'oeuvre."

I was introduced to the people at the table. They supplied their names to Mike and sent for a fork for me.

"Stop eating their dinner, Michael," Brett shouted from the wine-barrels.

"I don't want to eat up your meal," I said when some one handed me a fork.

"Eat," he said. "What do you think it's here for?"

I unscrewed the nozzle of the big wine-bottle and handed it around. Every one took a drink, tipping the wine-skin at arm's length.

Outside, above the singing, we could hear the music of the procession going by.

"Isn't that the procession?" Mike asked.

"Nada," some one said. "It's nothing. Drink up. Lift the bottle."

"Where did they find you?" I asked Mike.

"Some one brought me here," Mike said. "They said you were here."

"Where's Cohn?"

"He's passed out," Brett called. "They've put him away somewhere."

"Where is he?"

"I don't know."

"How should we know," Bill said. "I think he's dead."

"He's not dead," Mike said. "I know he's not dead. He's just passed out on Anis del Mono."

As he said Anis del Mono one of the men at the table looked up, brought out a bottle from inside his smock, and handed it to me.

"No," I said. "No, thanks!"

"Yes. Yes. Arriba! Up with the bottle!"

I took a drink. It tasted of licorice and warmed all the way. I could feel it warming in my stomach.

"Where the hell is Cohn?"

"I don't know," Mike said. "I'll ask. Where is the drunken comrade?" he asked in Spanish.

"You want to see him?"

"Yes," I said.

"Not me," said Mike. "This gent."

The Anis del Mono man wiped his mouth and stood up.

"Come on."

In a back room Robert Cohn was sleeping quietly on some wine-casks. It was almost too dark to see his face. They had covered him with a coat and another coat was folded under his head. Around his neck and on his chest was a big wreath of twisted garlics.

"Let him sleep," the man whispered. "He's all right."

Two hours later Cohn appeared. He came into the front room still with the wreath of garlics around his neck. The Spaniards shouted when he came in. Cohn wiped his eyes and grinned.

"I must have been sleeping," he said.

"Oh, not at all," Brett said.

"You were only dead," Bill said.

"Aren't we going to go and have some supper?" Cohn asked.

"Do you want to eat?"

"Yes. Why not? I'm hungry."

"Eat those garlics, Robert," Mike said. "I say. Do eat those garlics."

Cohn stood there. His sleep had made him quite all right.

"Do let's go and eat," Brett said. "I must get a bath."

"Come on," Bill said. "Let's translate Brett to the hotel."

We said good-bye to many people and shook hands with many people and went out. Outside it was dark.

"What time is it do you suppose?" Cohn asked.

"It's to-morrow," Mike said. "You've been asleep two days."

"No," said Cohn, "what time is it?"

"It's ten o'clock."

"What a lot we've drunk."

"You mean what a lot we've drunk. You went to sleep."

Going down the dark streets to the hotel we saw the sky-rockets going up in the square. Down the side streets that led to the square we saw the square solid with people, those in the centre all dancing.

It was a big meal at the hotel. It was the first meal of the prices being doubled for the fiesta, and there were several new courses. After the dinner we were out in the town. I remember resolving that I would stay up all night to watch the bulls go through the streets at six o'clock in the morning, and being so sleepy that I went to bed around four o'clock. The others stayed up.

My own room was locked and I could not find the key, so I went up-stairs and slept on one of the beds in Cohn's room. The fiesta was going on outside in the night, but I was too sleepy for it to keep me awake. When I woke it was the sound of the rocket exploding that announced the release of the bulls from the corrals at the edge of town. They would race through the streets and out to the bull-ring. I had been sleeping heavily and I woke feeling I was too late. I put on a coat of Cohn's and went out on the balcony. Down below the narrow street was empty. All the balconies were crowded with people. Suddenly a crowd came down the street. They were all running, packed close together. They passed along and up the street toward the bull-ring and behind them came more men running faster, and then some stragglers who were really running. Behind them was a little bare space, and then the bulls galloping, tossing their heads up and down. It all went out of sight around the corner. One man fell, rolled to the gutter, and lay quiet. But the bulls went right on and did not notice him. They were all running together.

After they went out of sight a great roar came from the bull-ring. It kept on. Then finally the pop of the rocket that meant the bulls had gotten through the people in the ring and into the corrals. I went back in the room and got into bed. I had been standing on the stone balcony in bare feet. I knew our crowd must have all been out at the bull-ring. Back in bed, I went to sleep.

Cohn woke me when he came in. He started to undress and went over and closed the window because the people on the balcony of the house just across the street were looking in.

"Did you see the show?" I asked.

"Yes. We were all there."

"Anybody get hurt?"

"One of the bulls got into the crowd in the ring and tossed six or eight people."

"How did Brett like it?"

"It was all so sudden there wasn't any time for it to bother anybody."

"I wish I'd been up."

"We didn't know where you were. We went to your room but it was locked."

"Where did you stay up?"

"We danced at some club."

"I got sleepy," I said.

"My gosh! I'm sleepy now," Cohn said. "Doesn't this thing ever stop?"

"Not for a week."

Bill opened the door and put his head in.

"Where were you, Jake?"

"I saw them go through from the balcony. How was it?"

"Grand."

"Where you going?"

"To sleep."

No one was up before noon. We ate at tables set out under the arcade. The town was full of people. We had to wait for a table. After lunch we went over to the Iruña. It had filled up, and as the time for the bull-fight came it got fuller, and the tables were crowded closer. There was a close, crowded hum that came every day before the bull-fight. The café did not make this same noise at any other time, no matter how crowded it was. This hum went on, and we were in it and a part of it.

I had taken six seats for all the fights. Three of them were barreras, the first row at the ring-side, and three were sobrepuertos, seats with wooden backs, half-way up the amphitheatre. Mike thought Brett had best sit high up for her first time, and Cohn wanted to sit with them. Bill and I were going to sit in the barreras, and I gave the extra ticket to a waiter to sell. Bill said something to Cohn about what to do and how to look so he would not mind the horses. Bill had seen one season of bull-fights.

"I'm not worried about how I'll stand it. I'm only afraid I may be bored," Cohn said.

"You think so?"

"Don't look at the horses, after the bull hits them," I said to Brett. "Watch the charge and see the picador try and keep the bull off, but then don't look again until the horse is dead if it's been hit."

"I'm a little nervy about it," Brett said. "I'm worried whether I'll be able to go through with it all right."

"You'll be all right. There's nothing but that horse part that will bother you, and they're only in for a few minutes with each bull. Just don't watch when it's bad."

"She'll be all right," Mike said. "I'll look after her."

"I don't think you'll be bored," Bill said.

"I'm going over to the hotel to get the glasses and the wine-skin," I said. "See you back here. Don't get cock-eyed."

"I'll come along," Bill said. Brett smiled at us.

We walked around through the arcade to avoid the heat of the square.

"That Cohn gets me," Bill said. "He's got this Jewish superiority so strong that he thinks the only emotion he'll get out of the fight will be being bored."

"We'll watch him with the glasses," I said.

"Oh, to hell with him!"

"He spends a lot of time there."

"I want him to stay there."

In the hotel on the stairs we met Montoya.

"Come on," said Montoya. "Do you want to meet Pedro Romero?"

"Fine," said Bill. "Let's go see him."

We followed Montoya up a flight and down the corridor.

"He's in room number eight," Montoya explained. "He's getting dressed for the bull-fight."

Montoya knocked on the door and opened it. It was a gloomy room with a little light coming in from the window on the narrow street. There were two beds separated by a monastic partition. The electric light was on. The boy stood very straight and unsmiling in his bull-fighting clothes. His jacket hung over the back of a chair. They were just finishing winding his sash. His black hair shone under the electric light. He wore a white linen shirt and the sword-handler finished his sash and stood up and stepped back. Pedro Romero nodded, seeming very far away and dignified when we shook hands. Montoya said something about what great aficionados we were, and that we wanted to wish him luck. Romero listened very seriously. Then he turned to me. He was the best-looking boy I have ever seen.

"You go to the bull-fight," he said in English.

"You know English," I said, feeling like an idiot.

"No," he answered, and smiled.

One of three men who had been sitting on the beds came up and asked us if we spoke French. "Would you like me to interpret for you? Is there anything you would like to ask Pedro Romero?"

We thanked him. What was there that you would like to ask? The boy was nineteen years old, alone except for his sword-handler, and the three hangers-on, and the bull-fight was to commence in twenty minutes. We wished him "Mucha suerte," shook hands, and went out. He was standing, straight and handsome and altogether by himself, alone in the room with the hangers-on as we shut the door.

"He's a fine boy, don't you think so?" Montoya asked.

"He's a good-looking kid," I said.

"He looks like a torero," Montoya said. "He has the type."

"He's a fine boy."

"We'll see how he is in the ring," Montoya said.

We found the big leather wine-bottle leaning against the wall in my room, took it and the field-glasses, locked the door, and went down-stairs.

It was a good bull-light. Bill and I were very excited about Pedro Romero. Montoya was sitting about ten places away. After Romero had killed his first bull Montoya caught my eye and nodded his head. This was a real one. There had not been a real one for a long time. Of the other two matadors, one was very fair and the other was passable. But there was no comparison with Romero, although neither of his bulls was much.

Several times during the bull-fight I looked up at Mike and Brett and Cohn, with the glasses. They seemed to be all right. Brett did not look upset. All three were leaning forward on the concrete railing in front of them.

"Let me take the glasses," Bill said.

"Does Cohn look bored?" I asked.

"That kike!"

Outside the ring, after the bull-fight was over, you could not move in the crowd. We could not make our way through but had to be moved with the whole thing, slowly, as a glacier, back to town. We had that disturbed emotional feeling that always comes after a bull-fight, and the feeling of elation that comes after a good bull-fight. The fiesta was going on. The drums pounded and the pipe music was shrill, and everywhere the flow of the crowd was broken by patches of dancers. The dancers were in a crowd, so you did not see the intricate play of the feet. All you saw was the heads and shoulders going up and down, up and down. Finally, we got out of the crowd and made for the café. The waiter saved chairs for the others, and we each ordered an absinthe and watched the crowd in the square and the dancers.

"What do you suppose that dance is?" Bill asked.

"It's a sort of jota."

"They're not all the same," Bill said. "They dance differently to all the different tunes."

"It's swell dancing."

In front of us on a clear part of the street a company of boys were dancing. The steps were very intricate and their faces were intent and concentrated. They all looked down while they danced. Their rope-soled shoes tapped and spatted on the pavement. The toes touched. The heels touched. The balls of the feet touched. Then the music broke wildly and the step was finished and they were all dancing on up the street.

"Here come the gentry," Bill said.

They were crossing the street

"Hello, men," I said.

"Hello, gents!" said Brett. "You saved us seats? How nice."

"I say," Mike said, "that Romero what'shisname is somebody. Am I wrong?"

"Oh, isn't he lovely," Brett said. "And those green trousers."

"Brett never took her eyes off them."

"I say, I must borrow your glasses to-morrow."

"How did it go?"

"Wonderfully! Simply perfect. I say, it is a spectacle!"

"How about the horses?"

"I couldn't help looking at them."

"She couldn't take her eyes off them," Mike said. "She's an extraordinary wench."

"They do have some rather awful things happen to them," Brett said. "I couldn't look away, though."

"Did you feel all right?"

"I didn't feel badly at all."

"Robert Cohn did," Mike put in. "You were quite green, Robert."

"The first horse did bother me," Cohn said.

"You weren't bored, were you?" asked Bill.

Cohn laughed.

"No. I wasn't bored. I wish you'd forgive me that."

"It's all right," Bill said, "so long as you weren't bored."

"He didn't look bored," Mike said. "I thought he was going to be sick."

"I never felt that bad. It was just for a minute."

"I thought he was going to be sick. You weren't bored, were you, Robert?"

"Let up on that, Mike. I said I was sorry I said it."

"He was, you know. He was positively green."

"Oh, shove it along, Michael."

"You mustn't ever get bored at your first bull-fight, Robert," Mike said. "It might make such a mess."

"Oh, shove it along, Michael," Brett said.

"He said Brett was a sadist," Mike said. "Brett's not a sadist. She's just a lovely, healthy wench."

"Are you a sadist, Brett?" I asked.

"Hope not."

"He said Brett was a sadist just because she has a good, healthy stomach."

"Won't be healthy long."

Bill got Mike started on something else than Cohn. The waiter brought the absinthe glasses.

"Did you really like it?" Bill asked Cohn.

"No, I can't say I liked it. I think it's a wonderful show."

"Gad, yes! What a spectacle!" Brett said.

"I wish they didn't have the horse part," Cohn said.

"They're not important," Bill said. "After a while you never notice anything disgusting."

"It is a bit strong just at the start," Brett said. "There's a dreadful moment for me just when the bull starts for the horse."

"The bulls were fine," Cohn said.

"They were very good," Mike said.

"I want to sit down below, next time." Brett drank from her glass of absinthe.

"She wants to see the bull-fighters close by," Mike said.

"They are something," Brett said. "That Romero lad is just a child."

"He's a damned good-looking boy," I said. "When we were up in his room I never saw a better-looking kid."

"How old do you suppose he is?"

"Nineteen or twenty."

"Just imagine it."

The bull-fight on the second day was much better than on the first. Brett sat between Mike and me at the barrera, and Bill and Cohn went up above. Romero was the whole show. I do not think Brett saw any other bull-fighter. No one else did either, except the hard-shelled technicians. It was all Romero. There were two other matadors, but they did not count. I sat beside Brett and explained to Brett what it was all about. I told her about watching the bull, not the horse, when the bulls charged the picadors, and got her to watching the picador place the point of his pic so that she saw what it was all about, so that it became more something that was going on with a definite end, and less of a spectacle with unexplained horrors. I had her watch how Romero took the bull away from a fallen horse with his cape, and how he held him with the cape and turned him, smoothly and suavely, never wasting the bull. She saw how Romero avoided every brusque movement and saved his bulls for the last when he wanted them, not winded and discomposed but smoothly worn down. She saw how close Romero always worked to the bull, and I pointed out to her the tricks the other bull-fighters used to make it look as though they were working closely. She saw why she liked Romero's cape-work and why she did not like the others.

Romero never made any contortions, always it was straight and pure and natural in line. The others twisted themselves like corkscrews, their elbows raised, and leaned against the flanks of the bull after his horns had passed, to give a faked look of danger. Afterward, all that was faked turned bad and gave an unpleasant feeling. Romero's bull-fighting gave real emotion, because he kept the absolute purity of line in his movements and always quietly and calmly let the horns pass him close each time. He did not have to emphasize their closeness. Brett saw how something that was beautiful done close to the bull was ridiculous if it were done a little way off. I told her how since the death of Joselito all the bull-fighters had been developing a technic that simulated this appearance of danger in order to give a fake emotional feeling, while the bull-fighter was really safe. Romero had the old thing, the holding of his purity of line through the maximum of exposure, while he dominated the bull by making him realize he was unattainable, while he prepared him for the killing.

"I've never seen him do an awkward thing," Brett said.

"You won't until he gets frightened," I said.

"He'll never be frightened," Mike said. "He knows too damned much."

"He knew everything when he started. The others can't ever learn what he was born with."

"And God, what looks," Brett said.

"I believe, you know, that she's falling in love with this bull-fighter chap," Mike said.

"I wouldn't be surprised."

"Be a good chap, Jake. Don't tell her anything more about him. Tell her how they beat their old mothers."

"Tell me what drunks they are."

"Oh, frightful," Mike said. "Drunk all day and spend all their time beating their poor old mothers."

"He looks that way," Brett said.

"Doesn't he?" I said.

They had hitched the mules to the dead bull and then the whips cracked, the men ran, and the mules, straining forward, their legs pushing, broke into a gallop, and the bull, one horn up, his head on its side, swept a swath smoothly across the sand and out the red gate.

"This next is the last one."

"Not really," Brett said. She leaned forward on the barrera. Romero waved his picadors to their places, then stood, his cape against his chest, looking across the ring to where the bull would come out.

After it was over we went out and were pressed tight in the crowd.

"These bull-fights are hell on one," Brett said. "I'm limp as a rag."

"Oh, you'll get a drink," Mike said.

The next day Pedro Romero did not fight. It was Miura bulls, and a very bad bull-fight. The next day there was no bull-fight scheduled. But all day and all night the fiesta kept on.


CHAPTER 16

In the morning it was raining. A fog had come over the mountains from the sea. You could not see the tops of the mountains. The plateau was dull and gloomy, and the shapes of the trees and the houses were changed. I walked out beyond the town to look at the weather. The bad weather was coming over the mountains from the sea.

The flags in the square hung wet from the white poles and the banners were wet and hung damp against the front of the houses, and in between the steady drizzle the rain came down and drove every one under the arcades and made pools of water in the square, and the streets wet and dark and deserted; yet the fiesta kept up without any pause. It was only driven under cover.

The covered seats of the bull-ring had been crowded with people sitting out of the rain watching the concourse of Basque and Navarrais dancers and singers, and afterward the Val Carlos dancers in their costumes danced down the street in the rain, the drums sounding hollow and damp, and the chiefs of the bands riding ahead on their big, heavy-footed horses, their costumes wet, the horses' coats wet in the rain. The crowd was in the cafés and the dancers came in, too, and sat, their tight-wound white legs under the tables, shaking the water from their belled caps, and spreading their red and purple jackets over the chairs to dry. It was raining hard outside.

I left the crowd in the café and went over to the hotel to get shaved for dinner. I was shaving in my room when there was a knock on the door.

"Come in," I called.

Montoya walked in.

"How are you?" he said.

"Fine," I said.

"No bulls to-day."

"No," I said, "nothing but rain."

"Where are your friends?"

"Over at the Iruña."

Montoya smiled his embarrassed smile.

"Look," he said. "Do you know the American ambassador?"

"Yes," I said. "Everybody knows the American ambassador."

"He's here in town, now."

"Yes," I said. "Everybody's seen them."

"I've seen them, too," Montoya said. He didn't say anything. I went on shaving.

"Sit down," I said. "Let me send for a drink."

"No, I have to go."

I finished shaving and put my face down into the bowl and washed it with cold water. Montoya was standing there looking more embarrassed.

"Look," he said. "I've just had a message from them at the Grand Hotel that they want Pedro Romero and Marcial Lalanda to come over for coffee to-night after dinner."

"Well," I said, "it can't hurt Marcial any."

"Marcial has been in San Sebastian all day. He drove over in a car this morning with Marquez. I don't think they'll be back to-night."

Montoya stood embarrassed. He wanted me to say something.

"Don't give Romero the message," I said.

"You think so?"

"Absolutely."

Montoya was very pleased.

"I wanted to ask you because you were an American," he said.

"That's what I'd do."

"Look," said Montoya. "People take a boy like that. They don't know what he's worth. They don't know what he means. Any foreigner can flatter him. They start this Grand Hotel business, and in one year they're through."

"Like Algabeno," I said.

"Yes, like Algabeno."

"They're a fine lot," I said. "There's one American woman down here now that collects bull-fighters."

"I know. They only want the young ones."

"Yes," I said. "The old ones get fat."

"Or crazy like Gallo."

"Well," I said, "it's easy. All you have to do is not give him the message."

"He's such a fine boy," said Montoya. "He ought to stay with his own people. He shouldn't mix in that stuff."

"Won't you have a drink?" I asked.

"No," said Montoya, "I have to go." He went out.

I went down-stairs and out the door and took a walk around through the arcades around the square. It was still raining. I looked in at the Iruña for the gang and they were not there, so I walked on around the square and back to the hotel. They were eating dinner in the down-stairs dining-room.

They were well ahead of me and it was no use trying to catch them. Bill was buying shoe-shines for Mike. Bootblacks opened the street door and each one Bill called over and started to work on Mike.

"This is the eleventh time my boots have been polished," Mike said. "I say, Bill is an ass."

The bootblacks had evidently spread the report. Another came in.

"Limpia botas?" he said to Bill.

"No," said Bill. "For this Señor."

The bootblack knelt down beside the one at work and started on Mike's free shoe that shone already in the electric light.

"Bill's a yell of laughter," Mike said.

I was drinking red wine, and so far behind them that I felt a little uncomfortable about all this shoe-shining. I looked around the room. At the next table was Pedro Romero. He stood up when I nodded, and asked me to come over and meet a friend. His table was beside ours, almost touching. I met the friend, a Madrid bull-fight critic, a little man with a drawn face. I told Romero how much I liked his work, and he was very pleased. We talked Spanish and the critic knew a little French. I reached to our table for my wine-bottle, but the critic took my arm. Romero laughed.

"Drink here," he said in English.

He was very bashful about his English, but he was really very pleased with it, and as we went on talking he brought out words he was not sure of, and asked me about them. He was anxious to know the English for Corrida de toros, the exact translation. Bull-fight he was suspicious of. I explained that bull-fight in Spanish was the lidia of a toro. The Spanish word corrida means in English the running of bulls--the French translation is Course de taureaux. The critic put that in. There is no Spanish word for bull-fight.

Pedro Romero said he had learned a little English in Gibraltar. He was born in Ronda. That is not far above Gibraltar. He started bull-fighting in Malaga in the bull-fighting school there. He had only been at it three years. The bull-fight critic joked him about the number of Malagueño expressions he used. He was nineteen years old, he said. His older brother was with him as a banderillero, but he did not live in this hotel. He lived in a smaller hotel with the other people who worked for Romero. He asked me how many times I had seen him in the ring. I told him only three. It was really only two, but I did not want to explain after I had made the mistake.

"Where did you see me the other time? In Madrid?"

"Yes," I lied. I had read the accounts of his two appearances in Madrid in the bull-fight papers, so I was all right.

"The first or the second time?"

"The first."

"I was very bad," he said. "The second time I was better. You remember?" He turned to the critic.

He was not at all embarrassed. He talked of his work as something altogether apart from himself. There was nothing conceited or braggartly about him.

"I like it very much that you like my work," he said. "But you haven't seen it yet. To-morrow, if I get a good bull, I will try and show it to you."

When he said this he smiled, anxious that neither the bull-fight critic nor I would think he was boasting.

"I am anxious to see it," the critic said. "I would like to be convinced."

"He doesn't like my work much." Romero turned to me. He was serious.

The critic explained that he liked it very much, but that so far it had been incomplete.

"Wait till to-morrow, if a good one comes out."

"Have you seen the bulls for to-morrow?" the critic asked me.

"Yes. I saw them unloaded."

Pedro Romero leaned forward.

"What did you think of them?"

"Very nice," I said. "About twenty-six arrobas. Very short horns. Haven't you seen them?"

"Oh, yes," said Romero.

"They won't weigh twenty-six arrobas," said the critic.

"No," said Romero.

"They've got bananas for horns," the critic said.

"You call them bananas?" asked Romero. He turned to me and smiled. "You wouldn't call them bananas?"

"No," I said. "They're horns all right."

"They're very short," said Pedro Romero. "Very, very short. Still, they aren't bananas."

"I say, Jake," Brett called from the next table, "you have deserted us."

"Just temporarily," I said. "We're talking bulls."

"You are superior."

"Tell him that bulls have no balls," Mike shouted. He was drunk.

Romero looked at me inquiringly.

"Drunk," I said. "Borracho! Muy borracho!"

"You might introduce your friends," Brett said. She had not stopped looking at Pedro Romero. I asked them if they would like to have coffee with us. They both stood up. Romero's face was very brown. He had very nice manners.

I introduced them all around and they started to sit down, but there was not enough room, so we all moved over to the big table by the wall to have coffee. Mike ordered a bottle of Fundador and glasses for everybody. There was a lot of drunken talking.

"Tell him I think writing is lousy," Bill said. "Go on, tell him. Tell him I'm ashamed of being a writer."

Pedro Romero was sitting beside Brett and listening to her.

"Go on. Tell him!" Bill said.

Romero looked up smiling.

"This gentleman," I said, "is a writer."

Romero was impressed. "This other one, too," I said, pointing at Cohn.

"He looks like Villalta," Romero said, looking at Bill. "Rafael, doesn't he look like Villalta?"

"I can't see it," the critic said.

"Really," Romero said in Spanish. "He looks a lot like Villalta. What does the drunken one do?"

"Nothing."

"Is that why he drinks?"

"No. He's waiting to marry this lady."

"Tell him bulls have no balls!" Mike shouted, very drunk, from the other end of the table.

"What does he say?"

"He's drunk."

"Jake," Mike called. "Tell him bulls have no balls!"

"You understand?" I said.

"Yes."

I was sure he didn't, so it was all right.

"Tell him Brett wants to see him put on those green pants."

"Pipe down, Mike."

"Tell him Brett is dying to know how he can get into those pants."

"Pipe down."

During this Romero was fingering his glass and talking with Brett. Brett was talking French and he was talking Spanish and a little English, and laughing.

Bill was filling the glasses.

"Tell him Brett wants to come into----"

"Oh, pipe down, Mike, for Christ's sake!"

Romero looked up smiling. "Pipe down! I know that," he said.

Just then Montoya came into the room. He started to smile at me, then he saw Pedro Romero with a big glass of cognac in his hand, sitting laughing between me and a woman with bare shoulders, at a table full of drunks. He did not even nod.

Montoya went out of the room. Mike was on his feet proposing a toast. "Let's all drink to--" he began. "Pedro Romero," I said. Everybody stood up. Romero took it very seriously, and we touched glasses and drank it down, I rushing it a little because Mike was trying to make it clear that that was not at all what he was going to drink to. But it went off all right, and Pedro Romero shook hands with every one and he and the critic went out together.

"My God! he's a lovely boy," Brett said. "And how I would love to see him get into those clothes. He must use a shoe-horn."

"I started to tell him," Mike began. "And Jake kept interrupting me. Why do you interrupt me? Do you think you talk Spanish better than I do?"

"Oh, shut up, Mike! Nobody interrupted you."

"No, I'd like to get this settled." He turned away from me. "Do you think you amount to something, Cohn? Do you think you belong here among us? People who are out to have a good time? For God's sake don't be so noisy, Cohn!"

"Oh, cut it out, Mike," Cohn said.

"Do you think Brett wants you here? Do you think you add to the party? Why don't you say something?"

"I said all I had to say the other night, Mike."

"I'm not one of you literary chaps." Mike stood shakily and leaned against the table. "I'm not clever. But I do know when I'm not wanted. Why don't you see when you're not wanted, Cohn? Go away. Go away, for God's sake. Take that sad Jewish face away. Don't you think I'm right?"

He looked at us.

"Sure," I said. "Let's all go over to the Iruña."

"No. Don't you think I'm right? I love that woman."

"Oh, don't start that again. Do shove it along, Michael," Brett said.

"Don't you think I'm right, Jake?"

Cohn still sat at the table. His face had the sallow, yellow look it got when he was insulted, but somehow he seemed to be enjoying it. The childish, drunken heroics of it. It was his affair with a lady of title.

"Jake," Mike said. He was almost crying. "You know I'm right. Listen, you!" He turned to Cohn: "Go away! Go away now!"

"But I won't go, Mike," said Cohn.

"Then I'll make you!" Mike started toward him around the table. Cohn stood up and took off his glasses. He stood waiting, his face sallow, his hands fairly low, proudly and firmly waiting for the assault, ready to do battle for his lady love.

I grabbed Mike. "Come on to the café," I said. "You can't hit him here in the hotel."

"Good!" said Mike. "Good idea!"

We started off. I looked back as Mike stumbled up the stairs and saw Cohn putting his glasses on again. Bill was sitting at the table pouring another glass of Fundador. Brett was sitting looking straight ahead at nothing.

Outside on the square it had stopped raining and the moon was trying to get through the clouds. There was a wind blowing. The military band was playing and the crowd was massed on the far side of the square where the fireworks specialist and his son were trying to send up fire balloons. A balloon would start up jerkily, on a great bias, and be torn by the wind or blown against the houses of the square. Some fell into the crowd. The magnesium flared and the fireworks exploded and chased about in the crowd. There was no one dancing in the square. The gravel was too wet.

Brett came out with Bill and joined us. We stood in the crowd and watched Don Manuel Orquito, the fireworks king, standing on a little platform, carefully starting the balloons with sticks, standing above the heads of the crowd to launch the balloons off into the wind. The wind brought them all down, and Don Manuel Orquito's face was sweaty in the light of his complicated fireworks that fell into the crowd and charged and chased, sputtering and cracking, between the legs of the people. The people shouted as each new luminous paper bubble careened, caught fire, and fell.

"They're razzing Don Manuel," Bill said.

"How do you know he's Don Manuel?" Brett said.

"His name's on the programme. Don Manuel Orquito, the pirotecnico of esta ciudad."

"Globos illuminados," Mike said. "A collection of globos illuminados. That's what the paper said."

The wind blew the band music away.

"I say, I wish one would go up," Brett said. "That Don Manuel chap is furious."

"He's probably worked for weeks fixing them to go off, spelling out 'Hail to San Fermin,'" Bill said.

"Globos illuminados," Mike said. "A bunch of bloody globos illuminados."

"Come on," said Brett. "We can't stand here."

"Her ladyship wants a drink," Mike said.

"How you know things," Brett said.

Inside, the café was crowded and very noisy. No one noticed us come in. We could not find a table. There was a great noise going on.

"Come on, let's get out of here," Bill said.

Outside the paseo was going in under the arcade. There were some English and Americans from Biarritz in sport clothes scattered at the tables. Some of the women stared at the people going by with lorgnons. We had acquired, at some time, a friend of Bill's from Biarritz. She was staying with another girl at the Grand Hotel. The other girl had a headache and had gone to bed.

"Here's the pub," Mike said. It was the Bar Milano, a small, tough bar where you could get food and where they danced in the back room. We all sat down at a table and ordered a bottle of Fundador. The bar was not full. There was nothing going on.

"This is a hell of a place," Bill said.

"It's too early."

"Let's take the bottle and come back later," Bill said. "I don't want to sit here on a night like this."

"Let's go and look at the English," Mike said. "I love to look at the English."

"They're awful," Bill said. "Where did they all come from?"

"They come from Biarritz," Mike said, "They come to see the last day of the quaint little Spanish fiesta."

"I'll festa them," Bill said.

"You're an extraordinarily beautiful girl." Mike turned to Bill's friend. "When did you come here?"

"Come off it, Michael."

"I say, she is a lovely girl. Where have I been? Where have I been looking all this while? You're a lovely thing. Have we met? Come along with me and Bill. We're going to festa the English."

"I'll festa them," Bill said, "What the hell are they doing at this fiesta?"

"Come on," Mike said. "Just us three. We're going to festa the bloody English. I hope you're not English? I'm Scotch. I hate the English. I'm going to festa them. Come on, Bill."

Through the window we saw them, all three arm in arm, going toward the café. Rockets were going up in the square.

"I'm going to sit here," Brett said.

"I'll stay with you," Cohn said.

"Oh, don't!" Brett said. "For God's sake, go off somewhere. Can't you see Jake and I want to talk?"

"I didn't," Cohn said. "I thought I'd sit here because I felt a little tight."

"What a hell of a reason for sitting with any one. If you're tight, go to bed. Go on to bed."

"Was I rude enough to him?" Brett asked. Cohn was gone. "My God! I'm so sick of him!"

"He doesn't add much to the gayety."

"He depresses me so."

"He's behaved very badly."

"Damned badly. He had a chance to behave so well."

"He's probably waiting just outside the door now."

"Yes. He would. You know I do know how he feels. He can't believe it didn't mean anything."

"I know."

"Nobody else would behave as badly. Oh, I'm so sick of the whole thing. And Michael. Michael's been lovely, too."

"It's been damned hard on Mike."

"Yes. But he didn't need to be a swine."

"Everybody behaves badly," I said. "Give them the proper chance."

"You wouldn't behave badly." Brett looked at me.

"I'd be as big an ass as Cohn," I said.

"Darling, don't let's talk a lot of rot."

"All right. Talk about anything you like."

"Don't be difficult. You're the only person I've got, and I feel rather awful to-night."

"You've got Mike."

"Yes, Mike. Hasn't he been pretty?"

"Well," I said, "it's been damned hard on Mike, having Cohn around and seeing him with you."

"Don't I know it, darling? Please don't make me feel any worse than I do."

Brett was nervous as I had never seen her before. She kept looking away from me and looking ahead at the wall.

"Want to go for a walk?"

"Yes. Come on."

I corked up the Fundador bottle and gave it to the bartender.

"Let's have one more drink of that," Brett said. "My nerves are rotten."

We each drank a glass of the smooth amontillado brandy.

"Come on," said Brett.

As we came out the door I saw Cohn walk out from under the arcade.

"He was there," Brett said.

"He can't be away from you."

"Poor devil!"

"I'm not sorry for him. I hate him, myself."

"I hate him, too," she shivered. "I hate his damned suffering."

We walked arm in arm down the side street away from the crowd and the lights of the square. The street was dark and wet, and we walked along it to the fortifications at the edge of town. We passed wine-shops with light coming out from their doors onto the black, wet street, and sudden bursts of music.

"Want to go in?"

"No."

We walked out across the wet grass and onto the stone wall of the fortifications. I spread a newspaper on the stone and Brett sat down. Across the plain it was dark, and we could see the mountains. The wind was high up and took the clouds across the moon. Below us were the dark pits of the fortifications. Behind were the trees and the shadow of the cathedral, and the town silhouetted against the moon.

"Don't feel bad," I said.

"I feel like hell," Brett said. "Don't let's talk."

We looked out at the plain. The long lines of trees were dark in the moonlight. There were the lights of a car on the road climbing the mountain. Up on the top of the mountain we saw the lights of the fort. Below to the left was the river. It was high from the rain, and black and smooth. Trees were dark along the banks. We sat and looked out. Brett stared straight ahead. Suddenly she shivered.

"It's cold."

"Want to walk back?"

"Through the park."

We climbed down. It was clouding over again. In the park it was dark under the trees.

"Do you still love me, Jake?"

"Yes," I said.

"Because I'm a goner," Brett said.

"How?"

"I'm a goner. I'm mad about the Romero boy. I'm in love with him, I think."

"I wouldn't be if I were you."

"I can't help it. I'm a goner. It's tearing me all up inside."

"Don't do it."

"I can't help it. I've never been able to help anything."

"You ought to stop it."

"How can I stop it? I can't stop things. Feel that?"

Her hand was trembling.

"I'm like that all through."

"You oughtn't to do it."

"I can't help it. I'm a goner now, anyway. Don't you see the difference?"

"No."

"I've got to do something. I've got to do something I really want to do. I've lost my self-respect."

"You don't have to do that."

"Oh, darling, don't be difficult. What do you think it's meant to have that damned Jew about, and Mike the way he's acted?"

"Sure."

"I can't just stay tight all the time."

"No."

"Oh, darling, please stay by me. Please stay by me and see me through this."

"Sure."

"I don't say it's right. It is right though for me. God knows, I've never felt such a bitch."

"What do you want me to do?"

"Come on," Brett said. "Let's go and find him."

Together we walked down the gravel path in the park in the dark, under the trees and then out from under the trees and past the gate into the street that led into town.

Pedro Romero was in the café. He was at a table with other bull-fighters and bull-fight critics. They were smoking cigars. When we came in they looked up. Romero smiled and bowed. We sat down at a table half-way down the room.

"Ask him to come over and have a drink."

"Not yet. He'll come over."

"I can't look at him."

"He's nice to look at," I said.

"I've always done just what I wanted."

"I know."

"I do feel such a bitch."

"Well," I said.

"My God!" said Brett, "the things a woman goes through."

"Yes?"

"Oh, I do feel such a bitch."

I looked across at the table. Pedro Romero smiled. He said something to the other people at his table, and stood up. He came over to our table. I stood up and we shook hands.

"Won't you have a drink?"

"You must have a drink with me," he said. He seated himself, asking Brett's permission without saying anything. He had very nice manners. But he kept on smoking his cigar. It went well with his face.

"You like cigars?" I asked.

"Oh, yes. I always smoke cigars."

It was part of his system of authority. It made him seem older. I noticed his skin. It was clear and smooth and very brown. There was a triangular scar on his cheek-bone. I saw he was watching Brett. He felt there was something between them. He must have felt it when Brett gave him her hand. He was being very careful. I think he was sure, but he did not want to make any mistake.

"You fight to-morrow?" I said.

"Yes," he said. "Algabeno was hurt to-day in Madrid. Did you hear?"

"No," I said. "Badly?"

He shook his head.

"Nothing. Here," he showed his hand. Brett reached out and spread the fingers apart.

"Oh!" he said in English, "you tell fortunes?"

"Sometimes. Do you mind?"

"No. I like it." He spread his hand flat on the table. "Tell me I live for always, and be a millionaire."

He was still very polite, but he was surer of himself. "Look," he said, "do you see any bulls in my hand?"

He laughed. His hand was very fine and the wrist was small.

"There are thousands of bulls," Brett said. She was not at all nervous now. She looked lovely.

"Good," Romero laughed. "At a thousand duros apiece," he said to me in Spanish. "Tell me some more."

"It's a good hand," Brett said. "I think he'll live a long time."

"Say it to me. Not to your friend."

"I said you'd live a long time."

"I know it," Romero said. "I'm never going to die."

I tapped with my finger-tips on the table. Romero saw it. He shook his head.

"No. Don't do that. The bulls are my best friends."

I translated to Brett.

"You kill your friends?" she asked.

"Always," he said in English, and laughed. "So they don't kill me." He looked at her across the table.

"You know English well."

"Yes," he said. "Pretty well, sometimes. But I must not let anybody know. It would be very bad, a torero who speaks English."

"Why?" asked Brett.

"It would be bad. The people would not like it. Not yet."

"Why not?"

"They would not like it. Bull-fighters are not like that."

"What are bull-fighters like?"

He laughed and tipped his hat down over his eyes and changed the angle of his cigar and the expression of his face.

"Like at the table," he said. I glanced over. He had mimicked exactly the expression of Nacional. He smiled, his face natural again. "No. I must forget English."

"Don't forget it, yet," Brett said.

"No?"

"No."

"All right."

He laughed again.

"I would like a hat like that," Brett said.

"Good. I'll get you one."

"Right. See that you do."

"I will. I'll get you one to-night."

I stood up. Romero rose, too.

"Sit down," I said. "I must go and find our friends and bring them here."

He looked at me. It was a final look to ask if it were understood. It was understood all right.

"Sit down," Brett said to him. "You must teach me Spanish."

He sat down and looked at her across the table. I went out. The hard-eyed people at the bull-fighter table watched me go. It was not pleasant. When I came back and looked in the café, twenty minutes later, Brett and Pedro Romero were gone. The coffee-glasses and our three empty cognac-glasses were on the table. A waiter came with a cloth and picked up the glasses and mopped off the table.


CHAPTER 17

Outside the Bar Milano I found Bill and Mike and Edna. Edna was the girl's name.

"We've been thrown out," Edna said.

"By the police," said Mike. "There's some people in there that don't like me."

"I've kept them out of four fights," Edna said. "You've got to help me."

Bill's face was red.

"Come back in, Edna," he said. "Go on in there and dance with Mike."

"It's silly," Edna said. "There'll just be another row."

"Damned Biarritz swine," Bill said.

"Come on," Mike said. "After all, it's a pub. They can't occupy a whole pub."

"Good old Mike," Bill said. "Damned English swine come here and insult Mike and try and spoil the fiesta."

"They're so bloody," Mike said. "I hate the English."

"They can't insult Mike," Bill said. "Mike is a swell fellow. They can't insult Mike. I won't stand it. Who cares if he is a damn bankrupt?" His voice broke.

"Who cares?" Mike said. "I don't care. Jake doesn't care. Do you care?"

"No," Edna said. "Are you a bankrupt?"

"Of course I am. You don't care, do you, Bill?"

Bill put his arm around Mike's shoulder.

"I wish to hell I was a bankrupt. I'd show those bastards."

"They're just English," Mike said. "It never makes any difference what the English say."

"The dirty swine," Bill said. "I'm going to clean them out."

"Bill," Edna looked at me. "Please don't go in again, Bill. They're so stupid."

"That's it," said Mike. "They're stupid. I knew that was what it was."

"They can't say things like that about Mike," Bill said.

"Do you know them?" I asked Mike.

"No. I never saw them. They say they know me."

"I won't stand it," Bill said.

"Come on. Let's go over to the Suizo," I said.

"They're a bunch of Edna's friends from Biarritz," Bill said.

"They're simply stupid," Edna said.

"One of them's Charley Blackman, from Chicago," Bill said.

"I was never in Chicago," Mike said.

Edna started to laugh and could not stop.

"Take me away from here," she said, "you bankrupts."

"What kind of a row was it?" I asked Edna. We were walking across the square to the Suizo. Bill was gone.

"I don't know what happened, but some one had the police called to keep Mike out of the back room. There were some people that had known Mike at Cannes. What's the matter with Mike?"

"Probably he owes them money" I said. "That's what people usually get bitter about."

In front of the ticket-booths out in the square there were two lines of people waiting. They were sitting on chairs or crouched on the ground with blankets and newspapers around them. They were waiting for the wickets to open in the morning to buy tickets for the bull-fight. The night was clearing and the moon was out. Some of the people in the line were sleeping.

At the Café Suizo we had just sat down and ordered Fundador when Robert Cohn came up.

"Where's Brett?" he asked.

"I don't know."

"She was with you."

"She must have gone to bed."

"She's not."

"I don't know where she is."

His face was sallow under the light. He was standing up.

"Tell me where she is."

"Sit down," I said. "I don't know where she is."

"The hell you don't!"

"You can shut your face."

"Tell me where Brett is."

"I'll not tell you a damn thing."

"You know where she is."

"If I did I wouldn't tell you."

"Oh, go to hell, Cohn," Mike called from the table. "Brett's gone off with the bull-fighter chap. They're on their honeymoon."

"You shut up."

"Oh, go to hell!" Mike said languidly.

"Is that where she is?" Cohn turned to me.

"Go to hell!"

"She was with you. Is that where she is?"

"Go to hell!"

"I'll make you tell me"--he stepped forward--"you damned pimp."

I swung at him and he ducked. I saw his face duck sideways in the light. He hit me and I sat down on the pavement. As I started to get on my feet he hit me twice. I went down backward under a table. I tried to get up and felt I did not have any legs. I felt I must get on my feet and try and hit him. Mike helped me up. Some one poured a carafe of water on my head. Mike had an arm around me, and I found I was sitting on a chair. Mike was pulling at my ears.

"I say, you were cold," Mike said.

"Where the hell were you?"

"Oh, I was around."

"You didn't want to mix in it?"

"He knocked Mike down, too," Edna said.

"He didn't knock me out," Mike said. "I just lay there."

"Does this happen every night at your fiestas?" Edna asked. "Wasn't that Mr. Cohn?"

"I'm all right," I said. "My head's a little wobbly."

There were several waiters and a crowd of people standing around.

"Vaya!" said Mike. "Get away. Go on."

The waiters moved the people away.

"It was quite a thing to watch," Edna said. "He must be a boxer."

"He is."

"I wish Bill had been here," Edna said. "I'd like to have seen Bill knocked down, too. I've always wanted to see Bill knocked down. He's so big."

"I was hoping he would knock down a waiter," Mike said, "and get arrested. I'd like to see Mr. Robert Cohn in jail."

"No," I said.

"Oh, no," said Edna. "You don't mean that."

"I do, though," Mike said. "I'm not one of these chaps likes being knocked about. I never play games, even."

Mike took a drink.

"I never liked to hunt, you know. There was always the danger of having a horse fall on you. How do you feel, Jake?"

"All right."

"You're nice," Edna said to Mike. "Are you really a bankrupt?"

"I'm a tremendous bankrupt," Mike said. "I owe money to everybody. Don't you owe any money?"

"Tons."

"I owe everybody money," Mike said. "I borrowed a hundred pesetas from Montoya to-night."

"The hell you did," I said.

"I'll pay it back," Mike said. "I always pay everything back."

"That's why you're a bankrupt, isn't it?" Edna said.

I stood up. I had heard them talking from a long way away. It all seemed like some bad play.

"I'm going over to the hotel," I said. Then I heard them talking about me.

"Is he all right?" Edna asked.

"We'd better walk with him."

"I'm all right," I said. "Don't come. I'll see you all later."

I walked away from the café. They were sitting at the table. I looked back at them and at the empty tables. There was a waiter sitting at one of the tables with his head in his hands.

Walking across the square to the hotel everything looked new and changed. I had never seen the trees before. I had never seen the flagpoles before, nor the front of the theatre. It was all different. I felt as I felt once coming home from an out-of-town football game. I was carrying a suitcase with my football things in it, and I walked up the street from the station in the town I had lived in all my life and it was all new. They were raking the lawns and burning leaves in the road, and I stopped for a long time and watched. It was all strange. Then I went on, and my feet seemed to be a long way off, and everything seemed to come from a long way off, and I could hear my feet walking a great distance away. I had been kicked in the head early in the game. It was like that crossing the square. It was like that going up the stairs in the hotel. Going up the stairs took a long time, and I had the feeling that I was carrying my suitcase. There was a light in the room. Bill came out and met me in the hall.

"Say," he said, "go up and see Cohn. He's been in a jam, and he's asking for you."

"The hell with him."

"Go on. Go on up and see him."

I did not want to climb another flight of stairs.

"What are you looking at me that way for?"

"I'm not looking at you. Go on up and see Cohn. He's in bad shape."

"You were drunk a little while ago," I said.

"I'm drunk now," Bill said. "But you go up and see Cohn. He wants to see you."

"All right," I said. It was just a matter of climbing more stairs. I went on up the stairs carrying my phantom suitcase. I walked down the hall to Cohn's room. The door was shut and I knocked.

"Who is it?"

"Barnes."

"Come in, Jake."

I opened the door and went in, and set down my suitcase. There was no light in the room. Cohn was lying, face down, on the bed in the dark.

"Hello, Jake."

"Don't call me Jake."

I stood by the door. It was just like this that I had come home. Now it was a hot bath that I needed. A deep, hot bath, to lie back in.

"Where's the bathroom?" I asked.

Cohn was crying. There he was, face down on the bed, crying. He had on a white polo shirt, the kind he'd worn at Princeton.

"I'm sorry, Jake. Please forgive me."

"Forgive you, hell."

"Please forgive me, Jake."

I did not say anything. I stood there by the door.

"I was crazy. You must see how it was."

"Oh, that's all right."

"I couldn't stand it about Brett."

"You called me a pimp."

I did not care. I wanted a hot bath. I wanted a hot bath in deep water.

"I know. Please don't remember it. I was crazy."

"That's all right."

He was crying. His voice was funny. He lay there in his white shirt on the bed in the dark. His polo shirt.

"I'm going away in the morning."

He was crying without making any noise.

"I just couldn't stand it about Brett. I've been through hell, Jake. It's been simply hell. When I met her down here Brett treated me as though I were a perfect stranger. I just couldn't stand it. We lived together at San Sebastian. I suppose you know it. I can't stand it any more."

He lay there on the bed.

"Well," I said, "I'm going to take a bath."

"You were the only friend I had, and I loved Brett so."

"Well," I said, "so long."

"I guess it isn't any use," he said. "I guess it isn't any damn use."

"What?"

"Everything. Please say you forgive me, Jake."

"Sure," I said. "It's all right."

"I felt so terribly. I've been through such hell, Jake. Now everything's gone. Everything."

"Well," I said, "so long. I've got to go."

He rolled over, sat on the edge of the bed, and then stood up.

"So long, Jake," he said. "You'll shake hands, won't you?"

"Sure. Why not?"

We shook hands. In the dark I could not see his face very well.

"Well," I said, "see you in the morning."

"I'm going away in the morning."

"Oh, yes," I said.

I went out. Cohn was standing in the door of the room.

"Are you all right, Jake?" he asked.

"Oh, yes," I said. "I'm all right."

I could not find the bathroom. After a while I found it. There was a deep stone tub. I turned on the taps and the water would not run. I sat down on the edge of the bath-tub. When I got up to go I found I had taken off my shoes. I hunted for them and found them and carried them down-stairs. I found my room and went inside and undressed and got into bed.

* * * * *

I woke with a headache and the noise of the bands going by in the street. I remembered I had promised to take Bill's friend Edna to see the bulls go through the street and into the ring. I dressed and went down-stairs and out into the cold early morning. People were crossing the square, hurrying toward the bull-ring. Across the square were the two lines of men in front of the ticket-booths. They were still waiting for the tickets to go on sale at seven o'clock. I hurried across the street to the café. The waiter told me that my friends had been there and gone.

"How many were they?"

"Two gentlemen and a lady."

That was all right. Bill and Mike were with Edna. She had been afraid last night they would pass out. That was why I was to be sure to take her. I drank the coffee and hurried with the other people toward the bull-ring. I was not groggy now. There was only a bad headache. Everything looked sharp and clear, and the town smelt of the early morning.

The stretch of ground from the edge of the town to the bull-ring was muddy. There was a crowd all along the fence that led to the ring, and the outside balconies and the top of the bull-ring were solid with people. I heard the rocket and I knew I could not get into the ring in time to see the bulls come in, so I shoved through the crowd to the fence. I was pushed close against the planks of the fence. Between the two fences of the runway the police were clearing the crowd along. They walked or trotted on into the bull-ring. Then people commenced to come running. A drunk slipped and fell. Two policemen grabbed him and rushed him over to the fence. The crowd were running fast now. There was a great shout from the crowd, and putting my head through between the boards I saw the bulls just coming out of the street into the long running pen. They were going fast and gaining on the crowd. Just then another drunk started out from the fence with a blouse in his hands. He wanted to do capework with the bulls. The two policemen tore out, collared him, one hit him with a club, and they dragged him against the fence and stood flattened out against the fence as the last of the crowd and the bulls went by. There were so many people running ahead of the bulls that the mass thickened and slowed up going through the gate into the ring, and as the bulls passed, galloping together, heavy, muddy-sided, horns swinging, one shot ahead, caught a man in the running crowd in the back and lifted him in the air. Both the man's arms were by his sides, his head went back as the horn went in, and the bull lifted him and then dropped him. The bull picked another man running in front, but the man disappeared into the crowd, and the crowd was through the gate and into the ring with the bulls behind them. The red door of the ring went shut, the crowd on the outside balconies of the bull-ring were pressing through to the inside, there was a shout, then another shout.

The man who had been gored lay face down in the trampled mud. People climbed over the fence, and I could not see the man because the crowd was so thick around him. From inside the ring came the shouts. Each shout meant a charge by some bull into the crowd. You could tell by the degree of intensity in the shout how bad a thing it was that was happening. Then the rocket went up that meant the steers had gotten the bulls out of the ring and into the corrals. I left the fence and started back toward the town.

Back in the town I went to the café to have a second coffee and some buttered toast. The waiters were sweeping out the café and mopping off the tables. One came over and took my order.

"Anything happen at the encierro?"

"I didn't see it all. One man was badly cogido."

"Where?"

"Here." I put one hand on the small of my back and the other on my chest, where it looked as though the horn must have come through. The waiter nodded his head and swept the crumbs from the table with his cloth.

"Badly cogido," he said. "All for sport. All for pleasure."

He went away and came back with the long-handled coffee and milk pots. He poured the milk and coffee. It came out of the long spouts in two streams into the big cup. The waiter nodded his head.

"Badly cogido through the back," he said. He put the pots down on the table and sat down in the chair at the table. "A big horn wound. All for fun. Just for fun. What do you think of that?"

"I don't know."

"That's it. All for fun. Fun, you understand."

"You're not an aficionado?"

"Me? What are bulls? Animals. Brute animals." He stood up and put his hand on the small of his back. "Right through the back. A cornada right through the back. For fun--you understand."

He shook his head and walked away, carrying the coffee-pots. Two men were going by in the street. The waiter shouted to them. They were grave-looking. One shook his head. "Muerto!" he called.

The waiter nodded his head. The two men went on. They were on some errand. The waiter came over to my table.

"You hear? Muerto. Dead. He's dead. With a horn through him. All for morning fun. Es muy flamenco."

"It's bad."

"Not for me," the waiter said. "No fun in that for me."

Later in the day we learned that the man who was killed was named Vicente Girones, and came from near Tafalla. The next day in the paper we read that he was twenty-eight years old, and had a farm, a wife, and two children. He had continued to come to the fiesta each year after he was married. The next day his wife came in from Tafalla to be with the body, and the day after there was a service in the chapel of San Fermin, and the coffin was carried to the railway-station by members of the dancing and drinking society of Tafalla. The drums marched ahead, and there was music on the fifes, and behind the men who carried the coffin walked the wife and two children.... Behind them marched all the members of the dancing and drinking societies of Pamplona, Estella, Tafalla, and Sanguesa who could stay over for the funeral. The coffin was loaded into the baggage-car of the train, and the widow and the two children rode, sitting, all three together, in an open third-class railway-carriage. The train started with a jerk, and then ran smoothly, going down grade around the edge of the plateau and out into the fields of grain that blew in the wind on the plain on the way to Tafalla.

The bull who killed Vicente Girones was named Bocanegra, was Number 118 of the bull-breeding establishment of Sanchez Tabemo, and was killed by Pedro Romero as the third bull of that same afternoon. His ear was cut by popular acclamation and given to Pedro Romero, who, in turn, gave it to Brett, who wrapped it in a handkerchief belonging to myself, and left both ear and handkerchief, along with a number of Muratti cigarette-stubs, shoved far back in the drawer of the bed-table that stood beside her bed in the Hotel Montoya, in Pamplona.

* * * * *

Back in the hotel, the night watchman was sitting on a bench inside the door. He had been there all night and was very sleepy. He stood up as I came in. Three of the waitresses came in at the same time. They had been to the morning show at the bull-ring. They went up-stairs laughing. I followed them up-stairs and went into my room. I took off my shoes and lay down on the bed. The window was open onto the balcony and the sunlight was bright in the room. I did not feel sleepy. It must have been half past three o'clock when I had gone to bed and the bands had waked me at six. My jaw was sore on both sides. I felt it with my thumb and fingers. That damn Cohn. He should have hit somebody the first time he was insulted, and then gone away. He was so sure that Brett loved him. He was going to stay, and true love would conquer all. Some one knocked on the door.

"Come in."

It was Bill and Mike. They sat down on the bed.

"Some encierro," Bill said. "Some encierro."

"I say, weren't you there?" Mike asked. "Ring for some beer, Bill."

"What a morning!" Bill said. He mopped off his face. "My God! what a morning! And here's old Jake. Old Jake, the human punching-bag."

"What happened inside?"

"Good God!" Bill said, "what happened, Mike?"

"There were these bulls coming in," Mike said. "Just ahead of them was the crowd, and some chap tripped and brought the whole lot of them down."

"And the bulls all came in right over them," Bill said.

"I heard them yell."

"That was Edna," Bill said.

"Chaps kept coming out and waving their shirts."

"One bull went along the barrera and hooked everybody over."

"They took about twenty chaps to the infirmary," Mike said.

"What a morning!" Bill said. "The damn police kept arresting chaps that wanted to go and commit suicide with the bulls."

"The steers took them in, in the end," Mike said.

"It took about an hour."

"It was really about a quarter of an hour," Mike objected.

"Oh, go to hell," Bill said. "You've been in the war. It was two hours and a half for me."

"Where's that beer?" Mike asked.

"What did you do with the lovely Edna?"

"We took her home just now. She's gone to bed."

"How did she like it?"

"Fine. We told her it was just like that every morning."

"She was impressed," Mike said.

"She wanted us to go down in the ring, too," Bill said. "She likes action."

"I said it wouldn't be fair to my creditors," Mike said.

"What a morning," Bill said. "And what a night!"

"How's your jaw, Jake?" Mike asked.

"Sore," I said.

Bill laughed.

"Why didn't you hit him with a chair?"

"You can talk," Mike said. "He'd have knocked you out, too. I never saw him hit me. I rather think I saw him just before, and then quite suddenly I was sitting down in the street, and Jake was lying under a table."

"Where did he go afterward?" I asked.

"Here she is," Mike said. "Here's the beautiful lady with the beer."

The chambermaid put the tray with the beer-bottles and glasses down on the table.

"Now bring up three more bottles," Mike said.

"Where did Cohn go after he hit me?" I asked Bill.

"Don't you know about that?" Mike was opening a beer-bottle. He poured the beer into one of the glasses, holding the glass close to the bottle.

"Really?" Bill asked.

"Why he went in and found Brett and the bull-fighter chap in the bull-fighter's room, and then he massacred the poor, bloody bull-fighter."

"No."

"Yes."

"What a night!" Bill said.

"He nearly killed the poor, bloody bull-fighter. Then Cohn wanted to take Brett away. Wanted to make an honest woman of her, I imagine. Damned touching scene."

He took a long drink of the beer.

"He is an ass."

"What happened?"

"Brett gave him what for. She told him off. I think she was rather good."

"I'll bet she was," Bill said.

"Then Cohn broke down and cried, and wanted to shake hands with the bull-fighter fellow. He wanted to shake hands with Brett, too."

"I know. He shook hands with me."

"Did he? Well, they weren't having any of it. The bull-fighter fellow was rather good. He didn't say much, but he kept getting up and getting knocked down again. Cohn couldn't knock him out. It must have been damned funny."

"Where did you hear all this?"

"Brett. I saw her this morning."

"What happened finally?"

"It seems the bull-fighter fellow was sitting on the bed. He'd been knocked down about fifteen times, and he wanted to fight some more. Brett held him and wouldn't let him get up. He was weak, but Brett couldn't hold him, and he got up. Then Cohn said he wouldn't hit him again. Said he couldn't do it. Said it would be wicked. So the bull-fighter chap sort of rather staggered over to him. Cohn went back against the wall.

"'So you won't hit me?'

"'No,' said Cohn. 'I'd be ashamed to.'

"So the bull-fighter fellow hit him just as hard as he could in the face, and then sat down on the floor. He couldn't get up, Brett said. Cohn wanted to pick him up and carry him to the bed. He said if Cohn helped him he'd kill him, and he'd kill him anyway this morning if Cohn wasn't out of town. Cohn was crying, and Brett had told him off, and he wanted to shake hands. I've told you that before."

"Tell the rest," Bill said.

"It seems the bull-fighter chap was sitting on the floor. He was waiting to get strength enough to get up and hit Cohn again. Brett wasn't having any shaking hands, and Cohn was crying and telling her how much he loved her, and she was telling him not to be a ruddy ass. Then Cohn leaned down to shake hands with the bull-fighter fellow. No hard feelings, you know. All for forgiveness. And the bull-fighter chap hit him in the face again."

"That's quite a kid," Bill said.

"He ruined Cohn," Mike said. "You know I don't think Cohn will ever want to knock people about again."

"When did you see Brett?"

"This morning. She came in to get some things. She's looking after this Romero lad."

He poured out another bottle of beer.

"Brett's rather cut up. But she loves looking after people. That's how we came to go off together. She was looking after me."

"I know," I said.

"I'm rather drunk," Mike said. "I think I'll stay rather drunk. This is all awfully amusing, but it's not too pleasant. It's not too pleasant for me."

He drank off the beer.

"I gave Brett what for, you know. I said if she would go about with Jews and bull-fighters and such people, she must expect trouble." He leaned forward. "I say, Jake, do you mind if I drink that bottle of yours? She'll bring you another one."

"Please," I said. "I wasn't drinking it, anyway."

Mike started to open the bottle. "Would you mind opening it?" I pressed up the wire fastener and poured it for him.

"You know," Mike went on, "Brett was rather good. She's always rather good. I gave her a fearful hiding about Jews and bull-fighters, and all those sort of people, and do you know what she said: 'Yes. I've had such a hell of a happy life with the British aristocracy!'"

He took a drink.

"That was rather good. Ashley, chap she got the title from, was a sailor, you know. Ninth baronet. When he came home he wouldn't sleep in a bed. Always made Brett sleep on the floor. Finally, when he got really bad, he used to tell her he'd kill her. Always slept with a loaded service revolver. Brett used to take the shells out when he'd gone to sleep. She hasn't had an absolutely happy life. Brett. Damned shame, too. She enjoys things so."

He stood up. His hand was shaky.

"I'm going in the room. Try and get a little sleep."

He smiled.

"We go too long without sleep in these fiestas. I'm going to start now and get plenty of sleep. Damn bad thing not to get sleep. Makes you frightfully nervy."

"We'll see you at noon at the Iruña," Bill said.

Mike went out the door. We heard him in the next room.

He rang the bell and the chambermaid came and knocked at the door.

"Bring up half a dozen bottles of beer and a bottle of Fundador," Mike told her.

"Si, Señorito."

"I'm going to bed," Bill said. "Poor old Mike. I had a hell of a row about him last night."

"Where? At that Milano place?"

"Yes. There was a fellow there that had helped pay Brett and Mike out of Cannes, once. He was damned nasty."

"I know the story."

"I didn't. Nobody ought to have a right to say things about Mike."

"That's what makes it bad."

"They oughtn't to have any right. I wish to hell they didn't have any right. I'm going to bed."

"Was anybody killed in the ring?"

"I don't think so. Just badly hurt."

"A man was killed outside in the runway."

"Was there?" said Bill.


CHAPTER 18

At noon we were all at the café. It was crowded. We were eating shrimps and drinking beer. The town was crowded. Every street was full. Big motor-cars from Biarritz and San Sebastian kept driving up and parking around the square. They brought people for the bull-fight. Sight-seeing cars came up, too. There was one with twenty-five Englishwomen in it. They sat in the big, white car and looked through their glasses at the fiesta. The dancers were all quite drunk. It was the last day of the fiesta.

The fiesta was solid and unbroken, but the motor-cars and tourist-cars made little islands of onlookers. When the cars emptied, the onlookers were absorbed into the crowd. You did not see them again except as sport clothes, odd-looking at a table among the closely packed peasants in black smocks. The fiesta absorbed even the Biarritz English so that you did not see them unless you passed close to a table. All the time there was music in the street. The drums kept on pounding and the pipes were going. Inside the cafés men with their hands gripping the table, or on each other's shoulders, were singing the hard-voiced singing.

"Here comes Brett," Bill said.

I looked and saw her coming through the crowd in the square, walking, her head up, as though the fiesta were being staged in her honor, and she found it pleasant and amusing.

"Hello, you chaps!" she said. "I say, I have a thirst."

"Get another big beer," Bill said to the waiter.

"Shrimps?"

"Is Cohn gone?" Brett asked.

"Yes," Bill said. "He hired a car."

The beer came. Brett started to lift the glass mug and her hand shook. She saw it and smiled, and leaned forward and took a long sip.

"Good beer."

"Very good," I said. I was nervous about Mike. I did not think he had slept. He must have been drinking all the time, but he seemed to be under control.

"I heard Cohn had hurt you, Jake," Brett said.

"No. Knocked me out. That was all."

"I say, he did hurt Pedro Romero," Brett said. "He hurt him most badly."

"How is he?"

"He'll be all right. He won't go out of the room."

"Does he look badly?"

"Very. He was really hurt. I told him I wanted to pop out and see you chaps for a minute."

"Is he going to fight?"

"Rather. I'm going with you, if you don't mind."

"How's your boy friend?" Mike asked. He had not listened to anything that Brett had said.

"Brett's got a bull-fighter," he said. "She had a Jew named Cohn, but he turned out badly."

Brett stood up.

"I am not going to listen to that sort of rot from you, Michael."

"How's your boy friend?"

"Damned well," Brett said. "Watch him this afternoon."

"Brett's got a bull-fighter," Mike said. "A beautiful, bloody bull-fighter."

"Would you mind walking over with me? I want to talk to you, Jake."

"Tell him all about your bull-fighter," Mike said. "Oh, to hell with your bull-fighter!" He tipped the table so that all the beers and the dish of shrimps went over in a crash.

"Come on," Brett said. "Let's get out of this."

In the crowd crossing the square I said: "How is it?"

"I'm not going to see him after lunch until the fight. His people come in and dress him. They're very angry about me, he says."

Brett was radiant. She was happy. The sun was out and the day was bright.

"I feel altogether changed," Brett said. "You've no idea, Jake."

"Anything you want me to do?"

"No, just go to the fight with me."

"We'll see you at lunch?"

"No. I'm eating with him."

We were standing under the arcade at the door of the hotel. They were carrying tables out and setting them up under the arcade.

"Want to take a turn out to the park?" Brett asked. "I don't want to go up yet. I fancy he's sleeping."

We walked along past the theatre and out of the square and along through the barracks of the fair, moving with the crowd between the lines of booths. We came out on a cross-street that led to the Paseo de Sarasate. We could see the crowd walking there, all the fashionably dressed people. They were making the turn at the upper end of the park.

"Don't let's go there," Brett said. "I don't want staring at just now."

We stood in the sunlight. It was hot and good after the rain and the clouds from the sea.

"I hope the wind goes down," Brett said. "It's very bad for him."

"So do I."

"He says the bulls are all right."

"They're good."

"Is that San Fermin's?"

Brett looked at the yellow wall of the chapel.

"Yes. Where the show started on Sunday."

"Let's go in. Do you mind? I'd rather like to pray a little for him or something."

We went in through the heavy leather door that moved very lightly. It was dark inside. Many people were praying. You saw them as your eyes adjusted themselves to the half-light. We knelt at one of the long wooden benches. After a little I felt Brett stiffen beside me, and saw she was looking straight ahead.

"Come on," she whispered throatily. "Let's get out of here. Makes me damned nervous."

Outside in the hot brightness of the street Brett looked up at the tree-tops in the wind. The praying had not been much of a success.

"Don't know why I get so nervy in church," Brett said. "Never does me any good."

We walked along.

"I'm damned bad for a religious atmosphere," Brett said. "I've the wrong type of face.

"You know," Brett said, "I'm not worried about him at all. I just feel happy about him."

"Good."

"I wish the wind would drop, though."

"It's liable to go down by five o'clock."

"Let's hope."

"You might pray," I laughed.

"Never does me any good. I've never gotten anything I prayed for. Have you?"

"Oh, yes."

"Oh, rot," said Brett. "Maybe it works for some people, though. You don't look very religious, Jake."

"I'm pretty religious."

"Oh, rot," said Brett. "Don't start proselyting to-day. To-day's going to be bad enough as it is."

It was the first time I had seen her in the old happy, careless way since before she went off with Cohn. We were back again in front of the hotel. All the tables were set now, and already several were filled with people eating.

"Do look after Mike," Brett said. "Don't let him get too bad."

"Your frients haff gone up-stairs," the German maître d'hôtel said in English. He was a continual eavesdropper. Brett turned to him:

"Thank you, so much. Have you anything else to say?"

"No, ma'am."

"Good," said Brett.

"Save us a table for three," I said to the German. He smiled his dirty little pink-and-white smile.

"Iss madam eating here?"

"No," Brett said.

"Den I think a tabul for two will be enuff."

"Don't talk to him," Brett said. "Mike must have been in bad shape," she said on the stairs. We passed Montoya on the stairs. He bowed and did not smile.

"I'll see you at the café," Brett said. "Thank you, so much, Jake."

We had stopped at the floor our rooms were on. She went straight down the hall and into Romero's room. She did not knock. She simply opened the door, went in, and closed it behind her.

I stood in front of the door of Mike's room and knocked. There was no answer. I tried the knob and it opened. Inside the room was in great disorder. All the bags were opened and clothing was strewn around. There were empty bottles beside the bed. Mike lay on the bed looking like a death mask of himself. He opened his eyes and looked at me.

"Hello, Jake," he said very slowly. "I'm getting a lit tle sleep. I've want ed a lit tle sleep for a long time."

"Let me cover you over."

"No. I'm quite warm."

"Don't go. I have n't got ten to sleep yet."

"You'll sleep, Mike. Don't worry, boy."

"Brett's got a bull-fighter," Mike said. "But her Jew has gone away."

He turned his head and looked at me.

"Damned good thing, what?"

"Yes. Now go to sleep, Mike. You ought to get some sleep."

"I'm just start ing. I'm go ing to get a lit tle sleep."

He shut his eyes. I went out of the room and turned the door to quietly. Bill was in my room reading the paper.

"See Mike?"

"Yes."

"Let's go and eat."

"I won't eat down-stairs with that German head waiter. He was damned snotty when I was getting Mike up-stairs."

"He was snotty to us, too."

"Let's go out and eat in the town."

We went down the stairs. On the stairs we passed a girl coming up with a covered tray.

"There goes Brett's lunch," Bill said.

"And the kid's," I said.

Outside on the terrace under the arcade the German head waiter came up. His red cheeks were shiny. He was being polite.

"I haff a tabul for two for you gentlemen," he said.

"Go sit at it," Bill said. We went on out across the street.

We ate at a restaurant in a side street off the square. They were all men eating in the restaurant. It was full of smoke and drinking and singing. The food was good and so was the wine. We did not talk much. Afterward we went to the café and watched the fiesta come to the boiling-point. Brett came over soon after lunch. She said she had looked in the room and that Mike was asleep.

When the fiesta boiled over and toward the bull-ring we went with the crowd. Brett sat at the ringside between Bill and me. Directly below us was the callejon, the passageway between the stands and the red fence of the barrera. Behind us the concrete stands filled solidly. Out in front, beyond the red fence, the sand of the ring was smooth-rolled and yellow. It looked a little heavy from the rain, but it was dry in the sun and firm and smooth. The sword-handlers and bull-ring servants came down the callejon carrying on their shoulders the wicker baskets of fighting capes and muletas. They were bloodstained and compactly folded and packed in the baskets. The sword-handlers opened the heavy leather sword-cases so the red wrapped hilts of the sheaf of swords showed as the leather case leaned against the fence. They unfolded the dark-stained red flannel of the muletas and fixed batons in them to spread the stuff and give the matador something to hold. Brett watched it all. She was absorbed in the professional details.

"He's his name stencilled on all the capes and muletas," she said. "Why do they call them muletas?"

"I don't know."

"I wonder if they ever launder them."

"I don't think so. It might spoil the color."

"The blood must stiffen them," Bill said.

"Funny," Brett said. "How one doesn't mind the blood."

Below in the narrow passage of the callejon the sword-handlers arranged everything. All the seats were full. Above, all the boxes were full. There was not an empty seat except in the President's box. When he came in the fight would start. Across the smooth sand, in the high doorway that led into the corrals, the bull-fighters were standing, their arms furled in their capes, talking, waiting for the signal to march in across the arena. Brett was watching them with the glasses.

"Here, would you like to look?"

I looked through the glasses and saw the three matadors. Romero was in the centre, Belmonte on his left, Marcial on his right. Back of them were their people, and behind the banderilleros, back in the passageway and in the open space of the corral, I saw the picadors. Romero was wearing a black suit. His tricornered hat was low down over his eyes. I could not see his face clearly under the hat, but it looked badly marked. He was looking straight ahead. Marcial was smoking a cigarette guardedly, holding it in his hand. Belmonte looked ahead, his face wan and yellow, his long wolf jaw out. He was looking at nothing. Neither he nor Romero seemed to have anything in common with the others. They were all alone. The President came in; there was handclapping above us in the grand stand, and I handed the glasses to Brett. There was applause. The music started. Brett looked through the glasses.

"Here, take them," she said.

Through the glasses I saw Belmonte speak to Romero. Marcial straightened up and dropped his cigarette, and, looking straight ahead, their heads back, their free arms swinging, the three matadors walked out. Behind them came all the procession, opening out, all striding in step, all the capes furled, everybody with free arms swinging, and behind rode the picadors, their pics rising like lances. Behind all came the two trains of mules and the bull-ring servants. The matadors bowed, holding their hats on, before the President's box, and then came over to the barrera below us. Pedro Romero took off his heavy gold-brocaded cape and handed it over the fence to his sword-handler. He said something to the sword-handler. Close below us we saw Romero's lips were puffed, both eyes were discolored. His face was discolored and swollen. The sword-handler took the cape, looked up at Brett, and came over to us and handed up the cape.

"Spread it out in front of you," I said.

Brett leaned forward. The cape was heavy and smoothly stiff with gold. The sword-handler looked back, shook his head, and said something. A man beside me leaned over toward Brett.

"He doesn't want you to spread it," he said. "You should fold it and keep it in your lap."

Brett folded the heavy cape.

Romero did not look up at us. He was speaking to Belmonte. Belmonte had sent his formal cape over to some friends. He looked across at them and smiled, his wolf smile that was only with the mouth. Romero leaned over the barrera and asked for the water-jug. The sword-handler brought it and Romero poured water over the percale of his fighting-cape, and then scuffed the lower folds in the sand with his slippered foot.

"What's that for?" Brett asked.

"To give it weight in the wind."

"His face looks bad," Bill said.

"He feels very badly," Brett said. "He should be in bed."

The first bull was Belmonte's. Belmonte was very good. But because he got thirty thousand pesetas and people had stayed in line all night to buy tickets to see him, the crowd demanded that he should be more than very good. Belmonte's great attraction is working close to the bull. In bull-fighting they speak of the terrain of the bull and the terrain of the bull-fighter. As long as a bull-fighter stays in his own terrain he is comparatively safe. Each time he enters into the terrain of the bull he is in great danger. Belmonte, in his best days, worked always in the terrain of the bull. This way he gave the sensation of coming tragedy. People went to the corrida to see Belmonte, to be given tragic sensations, and perhaps to see the death of Belmonte. Fifteen years ago they said if you wanted to see Belmonte you should go quickly, while he was still alive. Since then he has killed more than a thousand bulls. When he retired the legend grew up about how his bull-fighting had been, and when he came out of retirement the public were disappointed because no real man could work as close to the bulls as Belmonte was supposed to have done, not, of course, even Belmonte.

Also Belmonte imposed conditions and insisted that his bulls should not be too large, nor too dangerously armed with horns, and so the element that was necessary to give the sensation of tragedy was not there, and the public, who wanted three times as much from Belmonte, who was sick with a fistula, as Belmonte had ever been able to give, felt defrauded and cheated, and Belmonte's jaw came further out in contempt, and his face turned yellower, and he moved with greater difficulty as his pain increased, and finally the crowd were actively against him, and he was utterly contemptuous and indifferent. He had meant to have a great afternoon, and instead it was an afternoon of sneers, shouted insults, and finally a volley of cushions and pieces of bread and vegetables, thrown down at him in the plaza where he had had his greatest triumphs. His jaw only went further out. Sometimes he turned to smile that toothed, long-jawed, lipless smile when he was called something particularly insulting, and always the pain that any movement produced grew stronger and stronger, until finally his yellow face was parchment color, and after his second bull was dead and the throwing of bread and cushions was over, after he had saluted the President with the same wolf-jawed smile and contemptuous eyes, and handed his sword over the barrera to be wiped, and put back in its case, he passed through into the callejon and leaned on the barrera below us, his head on his arms, not seeing, not hearing anything, only going through his pain. When he looked up, finally, he asked for a drink of water. He swallowed a little, rinsed his mouth, spat the water, took his cape, and went back into the ring.

Because they were against Belmonte the public were for Romero. From the moment he left the barrera and went toward the bull they applauded him. Belmonte watched Romero, too, watched him always without seeming to. He paid no attention to Marcial. Marcial was the sort of thing he knew all about. He had come out of retirement to compete with Marcial, knowing it was a competition gained in advance. He had expected to compete with Marcial and the other stars of the decadence of bull-fighting, and he knew that the sincerity of his own bull-fighting would be so set off by the false æsthetics of the bull-fighters of the decadent period that he would only have to be in the ring. His return from retirement had been spoiled by Romero. Romero did always, smoothly, calmly, and beautifully, what he, Belmonte, could only bring himself to do now sometimes. The crowd felt it, even the people from Biarritz, even the American ambassador saw it, finally. It was a competition that Belmonte would not enter because it would lead only to a bad horn wound or death. Belmonte was no longer well enough. He no longer had his greatest moments in the bull-ring. He was not sure that there were any great moments. Things were not the same and now life only came in flashes. He had flashes of the old greatness with his bulls, but they were not of value because he had discounted them in advance when he had picked the bulls out for their safety, getting out of a motor and leaning on a fence, looking over at the herd on the ranch of his friend the bull-breeder. So he had two small, manageable bulls without much horns, and when he felt the greatness again coming, just a little of it through the pain that was always with him, it had been discounted and sold in advance, and it did not give him a good feeling. It was the greatness, but it did not make bull-fighting wonderful to him any more.

Pedro Romero had the greatness. He loved bull-fighting, and I think he loved the bulls, and I think he loved Brett. Everything of which he could control the locality he did in front of her all that afternoon. Never once did he look up. He made it stronger that way, and did it for himself, too, as well as for her. Because he did not look up to ask if it pleased he did it all for himself inside, and it strengthened him, and yet he did it for her, too. But he did not do it for her at any loss to himself. He gained by it all through the afternoon.

His first "quite" was directly below us. The three matadors take the bull in turn after each charge he makes at a picador. Belmonte was the first. Marcial was the second. Then came Romero. The three of them were standing at the left of the horse. The picador, his hat down over his eyes, the shaft of his pic angling sharply toward the bull, kicked in the spurs and held them and with the reins in his left hand walked the horse forward toward the bull. The bull was watching. Seemingly he watched the white horse, but really he watched the triangular steel point of the pic. Romero, watching, saw the bull start to turn his head. He did not want to charge. Romero flicked his cape so the color caught the bull's eye. The bull charged with the reflex, charged, and found not the flash of color but a white horse, and a man leaned far over the horse, shot the steel point of the long hickory shaft into the hump of muscle on the bull's shoulder, and pulled his horse sideways as he pivoted on the pic, making a wound, enforcing the iron into the bull's shoulder, making him bleed for Belmonte.

The bull did not insist under the iron. He did not really want to get at the horse. He turned and the group broke apart and Romero was taking him out with his cape. He took him out softly and smoothly, and then stopped and, standing squarely in front of the bull, offered him the cape. The bull's tail went up and he charged, and Romero moved his arms ahead of the bull, wheeling, his feet firmed. The dampened, mud-weighted cape swung open and full as a sail fills, and Romero pivoted with it just ahead of the bull. At the end of the pass they were facing each other again. Romero smiled. The bull wanted it again, and Romero's cape filled again, this time on the other side. Each time he let the bull pass so close that the man and the bull and the cape that filled and pivoted ahead of the bull were all one sharply etched mass. It was all so slow and so controlled. It was as though he were rocking the bull to sleep. He made four veronicas like that, and finished with a half-veronica that turned his back on the bull and came away toward the applause, his hand on his hip, his cape on his arm, and the bull watching his back going away.

In his own bulls he was perfect. His first bull did not see well. After the first two passes with the cape Romero knew exactly how bad the vision was impaired. He worked accordingly. It was not brilliant bull-fighting. It was only perfect bull-fighting. The crowd wanted the bull changed. They made a great row. Nothing very fine could happen with a bull that could not see the lures, but the President would not order him replaced.

"Why don't they change him?" Brett asked.

"They've paid for him. They don't want to lose their money."

"It's hardly fair to Romero."

"Watch how he handles a bull that can't see the color."

"It's the sort of thing I don't like to see."

It was not nice to watch if you cared anything about the person who was doing it. With the bull who could not see the colors of the capes, or the scarlet flannel of the muleta, Romero had to make the bull consent with his body. He had to get so close that the bull saw his body, and would start for it, and then shift the bull's charge to the flannel and finish out the pass in the classic manner. The Biarritz crowd did not like it They thought Romero was afraid, and that was why he gave that little sidestep each time as he transferred the bull's charge from his own body to the flannel. They preferred Belmonte's imitation of himself or Marcial's imitation of Belmonte. There were three of them in the row behind us.

"What's he afraid of the bull for? The bull's so dumb he only goes after the cloth."

"He's just a young bull-fighter. He hasn't learned it yet."

"But I thought he was fine with the cape before."

"Probably he's nervous now."

Out in the centre of the ring, all alone, Romero was going on with the same thing, getting so close that the bull could see him plainly, offering the body, offering it again a little closer, the bull watching dully, then so close that the bull thought he had him, offering again and finally drawing the charge and then, just before the horns came, giving the bull the red cloth to follow with at little, almost imperceptible, jerk that so offended the critical judgment of the Biarritz bull-fight experts.

"He's going to kill now," I said to Brett. "The bull's still strong. He wouldn't wear himself out."

Out in the centre of the ring Romero profiled in front of the bull, drew the sword out from the folds of the muleta, rose on his toes, and sighted along the blade. The bull charged as Romero charged. Romero's left hand dropped the muleta over the bull's muzzle to blind him, his left shoulder went forward between the horns as the sword went in, and for just an instant he and the bull were one, Romero way out over the bull, the right arm extended high up to where the hilt of the sword had gone in between the bull's shoulders. Then the figure was broken. There was a little jolt as Romero came clear, and then he was standing, one hand up, facing the bull, his shirt ripped out from under his sleeve, the white blowing in the wind, and the bull, the red sword hilt tight between his shoulders, his head going down and his legs settling.

"There he goes," Bill said.

Romero was close enough so the bull could see him. His hand still up, he spoke to the bull. The bull gathered himself, then his head went forward and he went over slowly, then all over, suddenly, four feet in the air.

They handed the sword to Romero, and carrying it blade down, the muleta in his other hand, he walked over to in front of the President's box, bowed, straightened, and came over to the barrera and handed over the sword and muleta.

"Bad one," said the sword-handler.

"He made me sweat," said Romero. He wiped off his face. The sword-handler handed him the water-jug. Romero wiped his lips. It hurt him to drink out of the jug. He did not look up at us.

Marcial had a big day. They were still applauding him when Romero's last bull came in. It was the bull that had sprinted out and killed the man in the morning running.

During Romero's first bull his hurt face had been very noticeable. Everything he did showed it. All the concentration of the awkwardly delicate working with the bull that could not see well brought it out. The fight with Cohn had not touched his spirit but his face had been smashed and his body hurt. He was wiping all that out now. Each thing that he did with this bull wiped that out a little cleaner. It was a good bull, a big bull, and with horns, and it turned and recharged easily and surely. He was what Romero wanted in bulls.

When he had finished his work with the muleta and was ready to kill, the crowd made him go on. They did not want the bull killed yet, they did not want it to be over. Romero went on. It was like a course in bull-fighting. All the passes he linked up, all completed, all slow, templed and smooth. There were no tricks and no mystifications. There was no brusqueness. And each pass as it reached the summit gave you a sudden ache inside. The crowd did not want it ever to be finished.

The bull was squared on all four feet to be killed, and Romero killed directly below us. He killed not as he had been forced to by the last bull, but as he wanted to. He profiled directly in front of the bull, drew the sword out of the folds of the muleta and sighted along the blade. The bull watched him. Romero spoke to the bull and tapped one of his feet. The bull charged and Romero waited for the charge, the muleta held low, sighting along the blade, his feet firm. Then without taking a step forward, he became one with the bull, the sword was in high between the shoulders, the bull had followed the low-swung flannel, that disappeared as Romero lurched clear to the left, and it was over. The bull tried to go forward, his legs commenced to settle, he swung from side to side, hesitated, then went down on his knees, and Romero's older brother leaned forward behind him and drove a short knife into the bull's neck at the base of the horns. The first time he missed. He drove the knife in again, and the bull went over, twitching and rigid. Romero's brother, holding the bull's horn in one hand, the knife in the other, looked up at the President's box. Handkerchiefs were waving all over the bull-ring. The President looked down from the box and waved his handkerchief. The brother cut the notched black ear from the dead bull and trotted over with it to Romero. The bull lay heavy and black on the sand, his tongue out. Boys were running toward him from all parts of the arena, making a little circle around him. They were starting to dance around the bull.

Romero took the ear from his brother and held it up toward the President. The President bowed and Romero, running to get ahead of the crowd, came toward us. He leaned up against the barrera and gave the ear to Brett. He nodded his head and smiled. The crowd were all about him. Brett held down the cape.

"You liked it?" Romero called.

Brett did not say anything. They looked at each other and smiled. Brett had the ear in her hand.

"Don't get bloody," Romero said, and grinned. The crowd wanted him. Several boys shouted at Brett. The crowd was the boys, the dancers, and the drunks. Romero turned and tried to get through the crowd. They were all around him trying to lift him and put him on their shoulders. He fought and twisted away, and started running, in the midst of them, toward the exit. He did not want to be carried on people's shoulders. But they held him and lifted him. It was uncomfortable and his legs were spraddled and his body was very sore. They were lifting him and all running toward the gate. He had his hand on somebody's shoulder. He looked around at us apologetically. The crowd, running, went out the gate with him.

We all three went back to the hotel. Brett went up-stairs. Bill and I sat in the down-stairs dining-room and ate some hard-boiled eggs and drank several bottles of beer. Belmonte came down in his street clothes with his manager and two other men. They sat at the next table and ate. Belmonte ate very little. They were leaving on the seven o'clock train for Barcelona. Belmonte wore a blue-striped shirt and a dark suit, and ate soft-boiled eggs. The others ate a big meal. Belmonte did not talk. He only answered questions.

Bill was tired after the bull-fight. So was I. We both took a bull-fight very hard. We sat and ate the eggs and I watched Belmonte and the people at his table. The men with him were tough-looking and businesslike.

"Come on over to the café," Bill said. "I want an absinthe."

It was the last day of the fiesta. Outside it was beginning to be cloudy again. The square was full of people and the fireworks experts were making up their set pieces for the night and covering them over with beech branches. Boys were watching. We passed stands of rockets with long bamboo stems. Outside the café there was a great crowd. The music and the dancing were going on. The giants and the dwarfs were passing.

"Where's Edna?" I asked Bill.

"I don't know."

We watched the beginning of the evening of the last night of the fiesta. The absinthe made everything seem better. I drank it without sugar in the dripping glass, and it was pleasantly bitter.

"I feel sorry about Cohn," Bill said. "He had an awful time."

"Oh, to hell with Cohn," I said.

"Where do you suppose he went?"

"Up to Paris."

"What do you suppose he'll do?"

"Oh, to hell with him."

"What do you suppose he'll do?"

"Pick up with his old girl, probably."

"Who was his old girl?"

"Somebody named Frances."

We had another absinthe.

"When do you go back?" I asked.

"To-morrow."

After a little while Bill said: "Well, it was a swell fiesta."

"Yes," I said; "something doing all the time."

"You wouldn't believe it. It's like a wonderful nightmare."

"Sure," I said. "I'd believe anything. Including nightmares."

"What's the matter? Feel low?"

"Low as hell."

"Have another absinthe. Here, waiter! Another absinthe for this señor."

"I feel like hell," I said.

"Drink that," said Bill. "Drink it slow."

It was beginning to get dark. The fiesta was going on. I began to feel drunk but I did not feel any better.

"How do you feel?"

"I feel like hell."

"Have another?"

"It won't do any good."

"Try it. You can't tell; maybe this is the one that gets it. Hey, waiter! Another absinthe for this señor!"

I poured the water directly into it and stirred it instead of letting it drip. Bill put in a lump of ice. I stirred the ice around with a spoon in the brownish, cloudy mixture.

"How is it?"

"Fine."

"Don't drink it fast that way. It will make you sick."

I set down the glass. I had not meant to drink it fast.

"I feel tight."

"You ought to."

"That's what you wanted, wasn't it?"

"Sure. Get tight. Get over your damn depression."

"Well, I'm tight. Is that what you want?"

"Sit down."

"I won't sit down," I said. "I'm going over to the hotel."

I was very drunk. I was drunker than I ever remembered having been. At the hotel I went up-stairs. Brett's door was open. I put my head in the room. Mike was sitting on the bed. He waved a bottle.

"Jake," he said. "Come in, Jake."

I went in and sat down. The room was unstable unless I looked at some fixed point.

"Brett, you know. She's gone off with the bull-fighter chap."

"No."

"Yes. She looked for you to say good-bye. They went on the seven o'clock train."

"Did they?"

"Bad thing to do," Mike said. "She shouldn't have done it."

"No."

"Have a drink? Wait while I ring for some beer."

"I'm drunk," I said. "I'm going in and lie down."

"Are you blind? I was blind myself."

"Yes," I said, "I'm blind."

"Well, bung-o," Mike said. "Get some sleep, old Jake."

I went out the door and into my own room and lay on the bed. The bed went sailing off and I sat up in bed and looked at the wall to make it stop. Outside in the square the fiesta was going on. It did not mean anything. Later Bill and Mike came in to get me to go down and eat with them. I pretended to be asleep.

"He's asleep. Better let him alone."

"He's blind as a tick," Mike said. They went out.

I got up and went to the balcony and looked out at the dancing in the square. The world was not wheeling any more. It was just very clear and bright, and inclined to blur at the edges. I washed, brushed my hair. I looked strange to myself in the glass, and went down-stairs to the dining-room.

"Here he is!" said Bill. "Good old Jake! I knew you wouldn't pass out."

"Hello, you old drunk," Mike said.

"I got hungry and woke up."

"Eat some soup," Bill said.

The three of us sat at the table, and it seemed as though about six people were missing.


BOOK III

CHAPTER 19

In the morning it was all over. The fiesta was finished. I woke about nine o'clock, had a bath, dressed, and went down-stairs. The square was empty and there were no people on the streets. A few children were picking up rocket-sticks in the square. The cafés were just opening and the waiters were carrying out the comfortable white wicker chairs and arranging them around the marble-topped tables in the shade of the arcade. They were sweeping the streets and sprinkling them with a hose.

I sat in one of the wicker chairs and leaned back comfortably. The waiter was in no hurry to come. The white-paper announcements of the unloading of the bulls and the big schedules of special trains were still up on the pillars of the arcade. A waiter wearing a blue apron came out with a bucket of water and a cloth, and commenced to tear down the notices, pulling the paper off in strips and washing and rubbing away the paper that stuck to the stone. The fiesta was over.

I drank a coffee and after a while Bill came over. I watched him come walking across the square. He sat down at the table and ordered a coffee.

"Well," he said, "it's all over."

"Yes," I said. "When do you go?"

"I don't know. We better get a car, I think. Aren't you going back to Paris?"

"No. I can stay away another week. I think I'll go to San Sebastian."

"I want to get back."

"What's Mike going to do?"

"He's going to Saint Jean de Luz."

"Let's get a car and all go as far as Bayonne. You can get the train up from there to-night."

"Good. Let's go after lunch."

"All right. I'll get the car."

We had lunch and paid the bill. Montoya did not come near us. One of the maids brought the bill. The car was outside. The chauffeur piled and strapped the bags on top of the car and put them in beside him in the front seat and we got in. The car went out of the square, along through the side streets, out under the trees and down the hill and away from Pamplona. It did not seem like a very long ride. Mike had a bottle of Fundador. I only took a couple of drinks. We came over the mountains and out of Spain and down the white roads and through the overfoliaged, wet, green, Basque country, and finally into Bayonne. We left Bill's baggage at the station, and he bought a ticket to Paris. His train left at seven-ten. We came out of the station. The car was standing out in front.

"What shall we do about the car?" Bill asked.

"Oh, bother the car," Mike said. "Let's just keep the car with us."

"All right," Bill said. "Where shall we go?"

"Let's go to Biarritz and have a drink."

"Old Mike the spender," Bill said.

We drove in to Biarritz and left the car outside a very Ritz place. We went into the bar and sat on high stools and drank a whiskey and soda.

"That drink's mine," Mike said.

"Let's roll for it."

So we rolled poker dice out of a deep leather dice-cup. Bill was out first roll. Mike lost to me and handed the bartender a hundred-franc note. The whiskeys were twelve francs apiece. We had another round and Mike lost again. Each time he gave the bartender a good tip. In a room off the bar there was a good jazz band playing. It was a pleasant bar. We had another round. I went out on the first roll with four kings. Bill and Mike rolled. Mike won the first roll with four jacks. Bill won the second. On the final roll Mike had three kings and let them stay. He handed the dice-cup to Bill. Bill rattled them and rolled, and there were three kings, an ace, and a queen.

"It's yours, Mike," Bill said. "Old Mike, the gambler."

"I'm so sorry," Mike said. "I can't get it."

"What's the matter?"

"I've no money," Mike said. "I'm stony. I've just twenty francs. Here, take twenty francs."

Bill's face sort of changed.

"I just had enough to pay Montoya. Damned lucky to have it, too."

"I'll cash you a check," Bill said.

"That's damned nice of you, but you see I can't write checks."

"What are you going to do for money?"

"Oh, some will come through. I've two weeks allowance should be here. I can live on tick at this pub in Saint Jean."

"What do you want to do about the car?" Bill asked me. "Do you want to keep it on?"

"It doesn't make any difference. Seems sort of idiotic."

"Come on, let's have another drink," Mike said.

"Fine. This one is on me," Bill said. "Has Brett any money?" He turned to Mike.

"I shouldn't think so. She put up most of what I gave to old Montoya."

"She hasn't any money with her?" I asked.

"I shouldn't think so. She never has any money. She gets five hundred quid a year and pays three hundred and fifty of it in interest to Jews."

"I suppose they get it at the source," said Bill.

"Quite. They're not really Jews. We just call them Jews. They're Scotsmen, I believe."

"Hasn't she any at all with her?" I asked.

"I hardly think so. She gave it all to me when she left."

"Well," Bill said, "we might as well have another drink."

"Damned good idea," Mike said. "One never gets anywhere by discussing finances."

"No," said Bill. Bill and I rolled for the next two rounds. Bill lost and paid. We went out to the car.

"Anywhere you'd like to go, Mike?" Bill asked.

"Let's take a drive. It might do my credit good. Let's drive about a little."

"Fine. I'd like to see the coast. Let's drive down toward Hendaye."

"I haven't any credit along the coast."

"You can't ever tell," said Bill.

We drove out along the coast road. There was the green of the headlands, the white, red-roofed villas, patches of forest, and the ocean very blue with the tide out and the water curling far out along the beach. We drove through Saint Jean de Luz and passed through villages farther down the coast. Back of the rolling country we were going through we saw the mountains we had come over from Pamplona. The road went on ahead. Bill looked at his watch. It was time for us to go back. He knocked on the glass and told the driver to turn around. The driver backed the car out into the grass to turn it. In back of us were the woods, below a stretch of meadow, then the sea.

At the hotel where Mike was going to stay in Saint Jean we stopped the car and he got out. The chauffeur carried in his bags. Mike stood by the side of the car.

"Good-bye, you chaps," Mike said. "It was a damned fine fiesta."

"So long, Mike," Bill said.

"I'll see you around," I said.

"Don't worry about money," Mike said. "You can pay for the car, Jake, and I'll send you my share."

"So long, Mike."

"So long, you chaps. You've been damned nice."

We all shook hands. We waved from the car to Mike. He stood in the road watching. We got to Bayonne just before the train left. A porter carried Bill's bags in from the consigne. I went as far as the inner gate to the tracks.

"So long, fella," Bill said.

"So long, kid!"

"It was swell. I've had a swell time."

"Will you be in Paris?"

"No, I have to sail on the 17th. So long, fella!"

"So long, old kid!"

He went in through the gate to the train. The porter went ahead with the bags. I watched the train pull out. Bill was at one of the windows. The window passed, the rest of the train passed, and the tracks were empty. I went outside to the car.

"How much do we owe you?" I asked the driver. The price to Bayonne had been fixed at a hundred and fifty pesetas.

"Two hundred pesetas."

"How much more will it be if you drive me to San Sebastian on your way back?"

"Fifty pesetas."

"Don't kid me."

"Thirty-five pesetas."

"It's not worth it," I said. "Drive me to the Hotel Panier Fleuri."

At the hotel I paid the driver and gave him a tip. The car was powdered with dust. I rubbed the rod-case through the dust. It seemed the last thing that connected me with Spain and the fiesta. The driver put the car in gear and went down the street. I watched it turn off to take the road to Spain. I went into the hotel and they gave me a room. It was the same room I had slept in when Bill and Cohn and I were in Bayonne. That seemed a very long time ago. I washed, changed my shirt, and went out in the town.

At a newspaper kiosque I bought a copy of the New York Herald and sat in a café to read it. It felt strange to be in France again. There was a safe, suburban feeling. I wished I had gone up to Paris with Bill, except that Paris would have meant more fiesta-ing. I was through with fiestas for a while. It would be quiet in San Sebastian. The season does not open there until August. I could get a good hotel room and read and swim. There was a fine beach there. There were wonderful trees along the promenade above the beach, and there were many children sent down with their nurses before the season opened. In the evening there would be band concerts under the trees across from the Café Marinas. I could sit in the Marinas and listen.

"How does one eat inside?" I asked the waiter. Inside the café was a restaurant.

"Well. Very well. One eats very well."

"Good."

I went in and ate dinner. It was a big meal for France but it seemed very carefully apportioned after Spain. I drank a bottle of wine for company. It was a Château Margaux. It was pleasant to be drinking slowly and to be tasting the wine and to be drinking alone. A bottle of wine was good company. Afterward I had coffee. The waiter recommended a Basque liqueur called Izzarra. He brought in the bottle and poured a liqueur-glass full. He said Izzarra was made of the flowers of the Pyrenees. The veritable flowers of the Pyrenees. It looked like hair-oil and smelled like Italian strega. I told him to take the flowers of the Pyrenees away and bring me a vieux marc. The marc was good. I had a second marc after the coffee.

The waiter seemed a little offended about the flowers of the Pyrenees, so I overtipped him. That made him happy. It felt comfortable to be in a country where it is so simple to make people happy. You can never tell whether a Spanish waiter will thank you. Everything is on such a clear financial basis in France. It is the simplest country to live in. No one makes things complicated by becoming your friend for any obscure reason. If you want people to like you you have only to spend a little money. I spent a little money and the waiter liked me. He appreciated my valuable qualities. He would be glad to see me back. I would dine there again some time and he would be glad to see me, and would want me at his table. It would be a sincere liking because it would have a sound basis. I was back in France.

Next morning I tipped every one a little too much at the hotel to make more friends, and left on the morning train for San Sebastian. At the station I did not tip the porter more than I should because I did not think I would ever see him again. I only wanted a few good French friends in Bayonne to make me welcome in case I should come back there again. I knew that if they remembered me their friendship would be loyal.

At Irun we had to change trains and show passports. I hated to leave France. Life was so simple in France. I felt I was a fool to be going back into Spain. In Spain you could not tell about anything. I felt like a fool to be going back into it, but I stood in line with my passport, opened my bags for the customs, bought a ticket, went through a gate, climbed onto the train, and after forty minutes and eight tunnels I was at San Sebastian.

Even on a hot day San Sebastian has a certain early-morning quality. The trees seem as though their leaves were never quite dry. The streets feel as though they had just been sprinkled. It is always cool and shady on certain streets on the hottest day. I went to a hotel in the town where I had stopped before, and they gave me a room with a balcony that opened out above the roofs of the town. There was a green mountainside beyond the roofs.

I unpacked my bags and stacked my books on the table beside the head of the bed, put out my shaving things, hung up some clothes in the big armoire, and made up a bundle for the laundry. Then I took a shower in the bathroom and went down to lunch. Spain had not changed to summer-time, so I was early. I set my watch again. I had recovered an hour by coming to San Sebastian.

As I went into the dining-room the concierge brought me a police bulletin to fill out. I signed it and asked him for two telegraph forms, and wrote a message to the Hotel Montoya, telling them to forward all mail and telegrams for me to this address. I calculated how many days I would be in San Sebastian and then wrote out a wire to the office asking them to hold mail, but forward all wires for me to San Sebastian for six days. Then I went in and had lunch.

After lunch I went up to my room, read a while, and went to sleep. When I woke it was half past four. I found my swimming-suit, wrapped it with a comb in a towel, and went down-stairs and walked up the street to the Concha. The tide was about half-way out. The beach was smooth and firm, and the sand yellow. I went into a bathing-cabin, undressed, put on my suit, and walked across the smooth sand to the sea. The sand was warm under bare feet. There were quite a few people in the water and on the beach. Out beyond where the headlands of the Concha almost met to form the harbor there was a white line of breakers and the open sea. Although the tide was going out, there were a few slow rollers. They came in like undulations in the water, gathered weight of water, and then broke smoothly on the warm sand. I waded out. The water was cold. As a roller came I dove, swam out under water, and came to the surface with all the chill gone. I swam out to the raft, pulled myself up, and lay on the hot planks. A boy and girl were at the other end. The girl had undone the top strap of her bathing-suit and was browning her back. The boy lay face downward on the raft and talked to her. She laughed at things he said, and turned her brown back in the sun. I lay on the raft in the sun until I was dry. Then I tried several dives. I dove deep once, swimming down to the bottom. I swam with my eyes open and it was green and dark. The raft made a dark shadow. I came out of water beside the raft, pulled up, dove once more, holding it for length, and then swam ashore. I lay on the beach until I was dry, then went into the bathing-cabin, took off my suit, sloshed myself with fresh water, and rubbed dry.

I walked around the harbor under the trees to the casino, and then up one of the cool streets to the Café Marinas. There was an orchestra playing inside the café and I sat out on the terrace and enjoyed the fresh coolness in the hot day, and had a glass of lemon-juice and shaved ice and then a long whiskey and soda. I sat in front of the Marinas for a long time and read and watched the people, and listened to the music.

Later when it began to get dark, I walked around the harbor and out along the promenade, and finally back to the hotel for supper. There was a bicycle-race on, the Tour du Pays Basque, and the riders were stopping that night in San Sebastian. In the dining-room, at one side, there was a long table of bicycle-riders, eating with their trainers and managers. They were all French and Belgians, and paid close attention to their meal, but they were having a good time. At the head of the table were two good-looking French girls, with much Rue du Faubourg Montmartre chic. I could not make out whom they belonged to. They all spoke in slang at the long table and there were many private jokes and some jokes at the far end that were not repeated when the girls asked to hear them. The next morning at five o'clock the race resumed with the last lap, San Sebastian-Bilbao. The bicycle-riders drank much wine, and were burned and browned by the sun. They did not take the race seriously except among themselves. They had raced among themselves so often that it did not make much difference who won. Especially in a foreign country. The money could be arranged.

The man who had a matter of two minutes lead in the race had an attack of boils, which were very painful. He sat on the small of his back. His neck was very red and the blond hairs were sunburned. The other riders joked him about his boils. He tapped on the table with his fork.

"Listen," he said, "to-morrow my nose is so tight on the handle-bars that the only thing touches those boils is a lovely breeze."

One of the girls looked at him down the table, and he grinned and turned red. The Spaniards, they said, did not know how to pedal.

I had coffee out on the terrasse with the team manager of one of the big bicycle manufacturers. He said it had been a very pleasant race, and would have been worth watching if Bottechia had not abandoned it at Pamplona. The dust had been bad, but in Spain the roads were better than in France. Bicycle road-racing was the only sport in the world, he said. Had I ever followed the Tour de France? Only in the papers. The Tour de France was the greatest sporting event in the world. Following and organizing the road races had made him know France. Few people know France. All spring and all summer and all fall he spent on the road with bicycle road-racers. Look at the number of motor-cars now that followed the riders from town to town in a road race. It was a rich country and more sportif every year. It would be the most sportif country in the world. It was bicycle road-racing did it. That and football. He knew France. La France Sportive. He knew road-racing. We had a cognac. After all, though, it wasn't bad to get back to Paris. There is only one Paname. In all the world, that is. Paris is the town the most sportif in the world. Did I know the Chope de Negre? Did I not. I would see him there some time. I certainly would. We would drink another fine together. We certainly would. They started at six o'clock less a quarter in the morning. Would I be up for the depart? I would certainly try to. Would I like him to call me? It was very interesting. I would leave a call at the desk. He would not mind calling me. I could not let him take the trouble. I would leave a call at the desk. We said good-bye until the next morning.

In the morning when I awoke the bicycle-riders and their following cars had been on the road for three hours. I had coffee and the papers in bed and then dressed and took my bathing-suit down to the beach. Everything was fresh and cool and damp in the early morning. Nurses in uniform and in peasant costume walked under the trees with children. The Spanish children were beautiful. Some bootblacks sat together under a tree talking to a soldier. The soldier had only one arm. The tide was in and there was a good breeze and a surf on the beach.

I undressed in one of the bath-cabins, crossed the narrow line of beach and went into the water. I swam out, trying to swim through the rollers, but having to dive sometimes. Then in the quiet water I turned and floated. Floating I saw only the sky, and felt the drop and lift of the swells. I swam back to the surf and coasted in, face down, on a big roller, then turned and swam, trying to keep in the trough and not have a wave break over me. It made me tired, swimming in the trough, and I turned and swam out to the raft. The water was buoyant and cold. It felt as though you could never sink. I swam slowly, it seemed like a long swim with the high tide, and then pulled up on the raft and sat, dripping, on the boards that were becoming hot in the sun. I looked around at the bay, the old town, the casino, the line of trees along the promenade, and the big hotels with their white porches and gold-lettered names. Off on the right, almost closing the harbor, was a green hill with a castle. The raft rocked with the motion of the water. On the other side of the narrow gap that led into the open sea was another high headland. I thought I would like to swim across the bay but I was afraid of cramp.

I sat in the sun and watched the bathers on the beach. They looked very small. After a while I stood up, gripped with my toes on the edge of the raft as it tipped with my weight, and dove cleanly and deeply, to come up through the lightening water, blew the salt water out of my head, and swam slowly and steadily in to shore.

After I was dressed and had paid for the bath-cabin, I walked back to the hotel. The bicycle-racers had left several copies of L'Auto around, and I gathered them up in the reading-room and took them out and sat in an easy chair in the sun to read about and catch up on French sporting life. While I was sitting there the concierge came out with a blue envelope in his hand.

"A telegram for you, sir."

I poked my finger along under the fold that was fastened down, spread it open, and read it. It had been forwarded from Paris:

COULD YOU COME HOTEL MONTANA MADRID
AM RATHER IN TROUBLE BRETT.
I tipped the concierge and read the message again. A postman was coming along the sidewalk. He turned in the hotel. He had a big moustache and looked very military. He came out of the hotel again. The concierge was just behind him.

"Here's another telegram for you, sir."

"Thank you," I said.

I opened it. It was forwarded from Pamplona.

COULD YOU COME HOTEL MONTANA MADRID
AM RATHER IN TROUBLE BRETT.
The concierge stood there waiting for another tip, probably.

"What time is there a train for Madrid?"

"It left at nine this morning. There is a slow train at eleven, and the Sud Express at ten to-night."

"Get me a berth on the Sud Express. Do you want the money now?"

"Just as you wish," he said. "I will have it put on the bill."

"Do that."

Well, that meant San Sebastian all shot to hell. I suppose, vaguely, I had expected something of the sort. I saw the concierge standing in the doorway.

"Bring me a telegram form, please."

He brought it and I took out my fountain-pen and printed:

LADY ASHLEY HOTEL MONTANA MADRID
ARRIVING SUD EXPRESS TOMORROW LOVE
JAKE.
That seemed to handle it. That was it. Send a girl off with one man. Introduce her to another to go off with him. Now go and bring her back. And sign the wire with love. That was it all right. I went in to lunch.

I did not sleep much that night on the Sud Express. In the morning I had breakfast in the dining-car and watched the rock and pine country between Avila and Escorial. I saw the Escorial out of the window, gray and long and cold in the sun, and did not give a damn about it. I saw Madrid come up over the plain, a compact white sky-line on the top of a little cliff away off across the sun-hardened country.

The Norte station in Madrid is the end of the line. All trains finish there. They don't go on anywhere. Outside were cabs and taxis and a line of hotel runners. It was like a country town. I took a taxi and we climbed up through the gardens, by the empty palace and the unfinished church on the edge of the cliff, and on up until we were in the high, hot, modern town. The taxi coasted down a smooth street to the Puerta del Sol, and then through the traffic and out into the Carrera San Jeronimo. All the shops had their awnings down against the heat. The windows on the sunny side of the street were shuttered. The taxi stopped at the curb. I saw the sign HOTEL MONTANA on the second floor. The taxi-driver carried the bags in and left them by the elevator. I could not make the elevator work, so I walked up. On the second floor up was a cut brass sign: HOTEL MONTANA. I rang and no one came to the door. I rang again and a maid with a sullen face opened the door.

"Is Lady Ashley here?" I asked.

She looked at me dully.

"Is an Englishwoman here?"

She turned and called some one inside. A very fat woman came to the door. Her hair was gray and stiffly oiled in scallops around her face. She was short and commanding.

"Muy buenos," I said. "Is there an Englishwoman here? I would like to see this English lady."

"Muy buenos. Yes, there is a female English. Certainly you can see her if she wishes to see you."

"She wishes to see me."

"The chica will ask her."

"It is very hot."

"It is very hot in the summer in Madrid."

"And how cold in winter."

"Yes, it is very cold in winter."

Did I want to stay myself in person in the Hotel Montana?

Of that as yet I was undecided, but it would give me pleasure if my bags were brought up from the ground floor in order that they might not be stolen. Nothing was ever stolen in the Hotel Montana. In other fondas, yes. Not here. No. The personages of this establishment were rigidly selectioned. I was happy to hear it. Nevertheless I would welcome the upbringal of my bags.

The maid came in and said that the female English wanted to see the male English now, at once.

"Good," I said. "You see. It is as I said."

"Clearly."

I followed the maid's back down a long, dark corridor. At the end she knocked on a door.

"Hello," said Brett. "Is it you, Jake?"

"It's me."

"Come in. Come in."

I opened the door. The maid closed it after me. Brett was in bed. She had just been brushing her hair and held the brush in her hand. The room was in that disorder produced only by those who have always had servants.

"Darling!" Brett said.

I went over to the bed and put my arms around her. She kissed me, and while she kissed me I could feel she was thinking of something else. She was trembling in my arms. She felt very small.

"Darling! I've had such a hell of a time."

"Tell me about it."

"Nothing to tell. He only left yesterday. I made him go."

"Why didn't you keep him?"

"I don't know. It isn't the sort of thing one does. I don't think I hurt him any."

"You were probably damn good for him."

"He shouldn't be living with any one. I realized that right away."

"No."

"Oh, hell!" she said, "let's not talk about it. Let's never talk about it."

"All right."

"It was rather a knock his being ashamed of me. He was ashamed of me for a while, you know."

"No."

"Oh, yes. They ragged him about me at the café, I guess. He wanted me to grow my hair out. Me, with long hair. I'd look so like hell."

"It's funny."

"He said it would make me more womanly. I'd look a fright."

"What happened?"

"Oh, he got over that. He wasn't ashamed of me long."

"What was it about being in trouble?"

"I didn't know whether I could make him go, and I didn't have a sou to go away and leave him. He tried to give me a lot of money, you know. I told him I had scads of it. He knew that was a lie. I couldn't take his money, you know."

"No."

"Oh, let's not talk about it. There were some funny things, though. Do give me a cigarette."

I lit the cigarette.

"He learned his English as a waiter in Gib."

"Yes."

"He wanted to marry me, finally."

"Really?"

"Of course. I can't even marry Mike."

"Maybe he thought that would make him Lord Ashley."

"No. It wasn't that. He really wanted to marry me. So I couldn't go away from him, he said. He wanted to make it sure I could never go away from him. After I'd gotten more womanly, of course."

"You ought to feel set up."

"I do. I'm all right again. He's wiped out that damned Cohn."

"Good."

"You know I'd have lived with him if I hadn't seen it was bad for him. We got along damned well."

"Outside of your personal appearance."

"Oh, he'd have gotten used to that."

She put out the cigarette.

"I'm thirty-four, you know. I'm not going to be one of these bitches that ruins children."

"No."

"I'm not going to be that way. I feel rather good, you know. I feel rather set up."

"Good."

She looked away. I thought she was looking for another cigarette. Then I saw she was crying. I could feel her crying. Shaking and crying. She wouldn't look up. I put my arms around her.

"Don't let's ever talk about it. Please don't let's ever talk about it."

"Dear Brett."

"I'm going back to Mike." I could feel her crying as I held her close. "He's so damned nice and he's so awful. He's my sort of thing."

She would not look up. I stroked her hair. I could feel her shaking.

"I won't be one of those bitches," she said. "But, oh, Jake, please let's never talk about it."

We left the Hotel Montana. The woman who ran the hotel would not let me pay the bill. The bill had been paid.

"Oh, well. Let it go," Brett said. "It doesn't matter now."

We rode in a taxi down to the Palace Hotel, left the bags, arranged for berths on the Sud Express for the night, and went into the bar of the hotel for a cocktail. We sat on high stools at the bar while the barman shook the Martinis in a large nickelled shaker.

"It's funny what a wonderful gentility you get in the bar of a big hotel," I said.

"Barmen and jockeys are the only people who are polite any more."

"No matter how vulgar a hotel is, the bar is always nice."

"It's odd."

"Bartenders have always been fine."

"You know," Brett said, "it's quite true. He is only nineteen. Isn't it amazing?"

We touched the two glasses as they stood side by side on the bar. They were coldly beaded. Outside the curtained window was the summer heat of Madrid.

"I like an olive in a Martini," I said to the barman.

"Right you are, sir. There you are."

"Thanks."

"I should have asked, you know."

The barman went far enough up the bar so that he would not hear our conversation. Brett had sipped from the Martini as it stood, on the wood. Then she picked it up. Her hand was steady enough to lift it after that first sip.

"It's good. Isn't it a nice bar?"

"They're all nice bars."

"You know I didn't believe it at first. He was born in 1905. I was in school in Paris, then. Think of that."

"Anything you want me to think about it?"

"Don't be an ass. Would you buy a lady a drink?"

"We'll have two more Martinis."

"As they were before, sir?"

"They were very good." Brett smiled at him.

"Thank you, ma'am."

"Well, bung-o," Brett said.

"Bung-o!"

"You know," Brett said, "he'd only been with two women before. He never cared about anything but bull-fighting."

"He's got plenty of time."

"I don't know. He thinks it was me. Not the show in general."

"Well, it was you."

"Yes. It was me."

"I thought you weren't going to ever talk about it."

"How can I help it?"

"You'll lose it if you talk about it."

"I just talk around it. You know I feel rather damned good, Jake."

"You should."

"You know it makes one feel rather good deciding not to be a bitch."

"Yes."

"It's sort of what we have instead of God."

"Some people have God," I said. "Quite a lot."

"He never worked very well with me."

"Should we have another Martini?"

The barman shook up two more Martinis and poured them out into fresh glasses.

"Where will we have lunch?" I asked Brett. The bar was cool. You could feel the heat outside through the window.

"Here?" asked Brett.

"It's rotten here in the hotel. Do you know a place called Botin's?" I asked the barman.

"Yes, sir. Would you like to have me write out the address?"

"Thank you."

We lunched up-stairs at Botin's. It is one of the best restaurants in the world. We had roast young suckling pig and drank rioja alta. Brett did not eat much. She never ate much. I ate a very big meal and drank three bottles of rioja alta.

"How do you feel, Jake?" Brett asked. "My God! what a meal you've eaten."

"I feel fine. Do you want a dessert?"

"Lord, no."

Brett was smoking.

"You like to eat, don't you?" she said.

"Yes." I said. "I like to do a lot of things."

"What do you like to do?"

"Oh," I said, "I like to do a lot of things. Don't you want a dessert?"

"You asked me that once," Brett said.

"Yes," I said. "So I did. Let's have another bottle of rioja alta."

"It's very good."

"You haven't drunk much of it," I said.

"I have. You haven't seen."

"Let's get two bottles," I said. The bottles came. I poured a little in my glass, then a glass for Brett, then filled my glass. We touched glasses.

"Bung-o!" Brett said. I drank my glass and poured out another. Brett put her hand on my arm.

"Don't get drunk, Jake," she said. "You don't have to."

"How do you know?"

"Don't," she said. "You'll be all right."

"I'm not getting drunk," I said. "I'm just drinking a little wine. I like to drink wine."

"Don't get drunk," she said. "Jake, don't get drunk."

"Want to go for a ride?" I said. "Want to ride through the town?"

"Right," Brett said. "I haven't seen Madrid. I should see Madrid."

"I'll finish this," I said.

Down-stairs we came out through the first-floor dining-room to the street. A waiter went for a taxi. It was hot and bright. Up the street was a little square with trees and grass where there were taxis parked. A taxi came up the street, the waiter hanging out at the side. I tipped him and told the driver where to drive, and got in beside Brett. The driver started up the street. I settled back. Brett moved close to me. We sat close against each other. I put my arm around her and she rested against me comfortably. It was very hot and bright, and the houses looked sharply white. We turned out onto the Gran Via.

"Oh, Jake," Brett said, "we could have had such a damned good time together."

Ahead was a mounted policeman in khaki directing traffic. He raised his baton. The car slowed suddenly pressing Brett against me.

"Yes," I said. "Isn't it pretty to think so?"
THE UNDEFEATED


Manuel Garcia climbed the stairs to Don Miguel Retana's office. He set
down his suitcase and knocked on the door. There was no answer. Manuel,
standing in the hallway, felt there was some one in the room. He felt it
through the door.

"Retana," he said, listening.

There was no answer.

He's there, all right, Manuel thought.

"Retana," he said and banged the door.

"Who's there?" said some one in the office.

"Me, Manolo," Manuel said.

"What do you want?" asked the voice.

"I want to work," Manuel said.

Something in the door clicked several times and it swung open. Manuel
went in, carrying his suitcase.

A little man sat behind a desk at the far side of the room. Over his
head was a bull's head, stuffed by a Madrid taxidermist; on the walls
were framed photographs and bull-fight posters.

The little man sat looking at Manuel.

"I thought they'd killed you," he said.

Manuel knocked with his knuckles on the desk. The little man sat looking
at him across the desk.

"How many corridas you had this year?" Retana asked.

"One," he answered.

"Just that one?" the little man asked.

"That's all."

"I read about it in the papers," Retana said. He leaned back in the
chair and looked at Manuel.

Manuel looked up at the stuffed bull. He had seen it often before. He
felt a certain family interest in it. It had killed his brother, the
promising one, about nine years ago. Manuel remembered the day. There
was a brass plate on the oak shield the bull's head was mounted on.
Manuel could not read it, but he imagined it was in memory of his
brother. Well, he had been a good kid.

The plate said: "The Bull 'Mariposa' of the Duke of Veragua, which
accepted 9 varas for 7 caballos, and caused the death of Antonio Garcia,
Novillero, April 27, 1909."

Retana saw him looking at the stuffed bull's head.

"The lot the Duke sent me for Sunday will make a scandal," he said.
"They're all bad in the legs. What do they say about them at the Café?"

"I don't know," Manuel said. "I just got in."

"Yes," Retana said. "You still have your bag."

He looked at Manuel, leaning back behind the big desk.

"Sit down," he said. "Take off your cap."

Manuel sat down; his cap off, his face was changed. He looked pale, and
his coleta pinned forward on his head, so that it would not show under
the cap, gave him a strange look.

"You don't look well," Retana said.

"I just got out of the hospital," Manuel said.

"I heard they'd cut your leg off," Retana said.

"No," said Manuel. "It got all right."

Retana leaned forward across the desk and pushed a wooden box of
cigarettes toward Manuel.

"Have a cigarette," he said.

"Thanks."

Manuel lit it.

"Smoke?" he said, offering the match to Retana.

"No," Retana waved his hand, "I never smoke."

Retana watched him smoking.

"Why don't you get a job and go to work?" he said.

"I don't want to work," Manuel said. "I am a bull-fighter."

"There aren't any bull-fighters any more," Retana said.

"I'm a bull-fighter," Manuel said.

"Yes, while you're in there," Retana said.

Manuel laughed.

Retana sat, saying nothing and looking at Manuel.

"I'll put you in a nocturnal if you want," Retana offered.

"When?" Manuel asked.

"To-morrow night."

"I don't like to substitute for anybody," Manuel said. That was the way
they all got killed. That was the way Salvador got killed. He tapped
with his knuckles on the table.

"It's all I've got," Retana said.

"Why don't you put me on next week?" Manuel suggested.

"You wouldn't draw," Retana said. "All they want is Litri and Rubito and
La Torre. Those kids are good."

"They'd come to see me get it," Manuel said, hopefully.

"No, they wouldn't. They don't know who you are any more."

"I've got a lot of stuff," Manuel said.

"I'm offering to put you on to-morrow night," Retana said. "You can work
with young Hernandez and kill two novillos after the Chariots."

"Whose novillos?" Manuel asked.

"I don't know. Whatever stuff they've got in the corrals. What the
veterinaries won't pass in the daytime."

"I don't like to substitute," Manuel said.

"You can take it or leave it," Retana said. He leaned forward over the
papers. He was no longer interested. The appeal that Manuel had made to
him for a moment when he thought of the old days was gone. He would like
to get him to substitute for Larita because he could get him cheaply. He
could get others cheaply too. He would like to help him though. Still he
had given him the chance. It was up to him.

"How much do I get?" Manuel asked. He was still playing with the idea of
refusing. But he knew he could not refuse.

"Two hundred and fifty pesetas," Retana said. He had thought of five
hundred, but when he opened his mouth it said two hundred and fifty.

"You pay Villalta seven thousand," Manuel said.

"You're not Villalta," Retana said.

"I know it," Manuel said.

"He draws it, Manolo," Retana said in explanation.

"Sure," said Manuel. He stood up. "Give me three hundred, Retana."

"All right," Retana agreed. He reached in the drawer for a paper.

"Can I have fifty now?" Manuel asked.

"Sure," said Retana. He took a fifty peseta note out of his pocket-book
and laid it, spread out flat, on the table.

Manuel picked it up and put it in his pocket.

"What about a cuadrilla?" he asked.

"There's the boys that always work for me nights," Retana said. "They're
all right."

"How about picadors?" Manuel asked.

"They're not much," Retana admitted.

"I've got to have one good pic," Manuel said.

"Get him then," Retana said. "Go and get him."

"Not out of this," Manuel said. "I'm not paying for any cuadrilla out of
sixty duros."

Retana said nothing but looked at Manuel across the big desk.

"You know I've got to have one good pic," Manuel said.

Retana said nothing but looked at Manuel from a long way off.

"It isn't right," Manuel said.

Retana was still considering him, leaning back in his chair, considering
him from a long way away.

"There're the regular pics," he offered.

"I know," Manuel said. "I know your regular pics."

Retana did not smile. Manuel knew it was over.

"All I want is an even break," Manuel said reasoningly. "When I go out
there I want to be able to call my shots on the bull. It only takes one
good picador."

He was talking to a man who was no longer listening.

"If you want something extra," Retana said, "go and get it. There will
be a regular cuadrilla out there. Bring as many of your own pics as you
want. The charlotada is over by 10.30."

"All right," Manuel said. "If that's the way you feel about it."

"That's the way," Retana said.

"I'll see you to-morrow night," Manuel said.

"I'll be out there," Retana said.

Manuel picked up his suitcase and went out.

"Shut the door," Retana called.

Manuel looked back. Retana was sitting forward looking at some papers.
Manuel pulled the door tight until it clicked.

He went down the stairs and out of the door into the hot brightness of
the street. It was very hot in the street and the light on the white
buildings was sudden and hard on his eyes. He walked down the shady side
of the steep street toward the Puerta del Sol. The shade felt solid and
cool as running water. The heat came suddenly as he crossed the
intersecting streets. Manuel saw no one he knew in all the people he
passed.

Just before the Puerta del Sol he turned into a café.

It was quiet in the café. There were a few men sitting at tables against
the wall. At one table four men played cards. Most of the men sat
against the wall smoking, empty coffee-cups and liqueur-glasses before
them on the tables. Manuel went through the long room to a small room in
back. A man sat at a table in the corner asleep. Manuel sat down at one
of the tables.

A waiter came in and stood beside Manuel's table.

"Have you seen Zurito?" Manuel asked him.

"He was in before lunch," the waiter answered. "He won't be back before
five o'clock."

"Bring me some coffee and milk and a shot of the ordinary," Manuel said.

The waiter came back into the room carrying a tray with a big
coffee-glass and a liqueur-glass on it. In his left hand he held a
bottle of brandy. He swung these down to the table and a boy who had
followed him poured coffee and milk into the glass from two shiny,
spouted pots with long handles.

Manuel took off his cap and the waiter noticed his pigtail pinned
forward on his head. He winked at the coffee-boy as he poured out the
brandy into the little glass beside Manuel's coffee. The coffee-boy
looked at Manuel's pale face curiously.

"You fighting here?" asked the waiter, corking up the bottle.

"Yes," Manuel said. "To-morrow."

The waiter stood there, holding the bottle on one hip.

"You in the Charlie Chaplins?" he asked.

The coffee-boy looked away, embarrassed.

"No. In the ordinary."

"I thought they were going to have Chaves and Hernandez," the waiter
said.

"No. Me and another."

"Who? Chaves or Hernandez?"

"Hernandez, I think."

"What's the matter with Chaves?"

"He got hurt."

"Where did you hear that?"

"Retana."

"Hey, Looie," the waiter called to the next room, "Chaves got cogida."

Manuel had taken the wrapper off the lumps of sugar and dropped them
into his coffee. He stirred it and drank it down, sweet, hot, and
warming in his empty stomach. He drank off the brandy.

"Give me another shot of that," he said to the waiter.

The waiter uncorked the bottle and poured the glass full, slopping
another drink into the saucer. Another waiter had come up in front of
the table. The coffee-boy was gone.

"Is Chaves hurt bad?" the second waiter asked Manuel.

"I don't know," Manuel said, "Retana didn't say."

"A hell of a lot he cares," the tall waiter said. Manuel had not seen
him before. He must have just come up.

"If you stand in with Retana in this town, you're a made man," the tall
waiter said. "If you aren't in with him, you might just as well go out
and shoot yourself."

"You said it," the other waiter who had come in said. "You said it
then."

"You're right I said it," said the tall waiter. "I know what I'm talking
about when I talk about that bird."

"Look what he's done for Villalta," the first waiter said.

"And that ain't all," the tall waiter said. "Look what he's done for
Marcial Lalanda. Look what he's done for Nacional."

"You said it, kid," agreed the short waiter.

Manuel looked at them, standing talking in front of his table. He had
drunk his second brandy. They had forgotten about him. They were not
interested in him.

"Look at that bunch of camels," the tall waiter went on. "Did you ever
see this Nacional II?"

"I seen him last Sunday didn't I?" the original waiter said.

"He's a giraffe," the short waiter said.

"What did I tell you?" the tall waiter said. "Those are Retana's boys."

"Say, give me another shot of that," Manuel said. He had poured the
brandy the waiter had slopped over in the saucer into his glass and
drank it while they were talking.

The original waiter poured his glass full mechanically, and the three of
them went out of the room talking.

In the far corner the man was still asleep, snoring slightly on the
intaking breath, his head back against the wall.

Manuel drank his brandy. He felt sleepy himself. It was too hot to go
out into the town. Besides there was nothing to do. He wanted to see
Zurito. He would go to sleep while he waited. He kicked his suitcase
under the table to be sure it was there. Perhaps it would be better to
put it back under the seat, against the wall. He leaned down and shoved
it under. Then he leaned forward on the table and went to sleep.

When he woke there was some one sitting across the table from him. It
was a big man with a heavy brown face like an Indian. He had been
sitting there some time. He had waved the waiter away and sat reading
the paper and occasionally looking down at Manuel, asleep, his head on
the table. He read the paper laboriously, forming the words with his
lips as he read. When it tired him he looked at Manuel. He sat heavily
in the chair, his black Cordoba hat tipped forward.

Manuel sat up and looked at him.

"Hello, Zurito," he said.

"Hello, kid," the big man said.

"I've been asleep." Manuel rubbed his forehead with the back of his
fist.

"I thought maybe you were."

"How's everything?"

"Good. How is everything with you?"

"Not so good."

They were both silent. Zurito, the picador, looked at Manuel's white
face. Manuel looked down at the picador's enormous hands folding the
paper to put away in his pocket.

"I got a favor to ask you, Manos," Manuel said.

Manosduros was Zurito's nickname. He never heard it without thinking of
his huge hands. He put them forward on the table self-consciously.

"Let's have a drink," he said.

"Sure," said Manuel.

The waiter came and went and came again. He went out of the room looking
back at the two men at the table.

"What's the matter, Manolo?" Zurito set down his glass.

"Would you pic two bulls for me to-morrow night?" Manuel asked, looking
up at Zurito across the table.

"No," said Zurito. "I'm not pic-ing."

Manuel looked down at his glass. He had expected that answer; now he had
it. Well, he had it.

"I'm sorry, Manolo, but I'm not pic-ing." Zurito looked at his hands.

"That's all right," Manuel said.

"I'm too old," Zurito said.

"I just asked you," Manuel said.

"Is it the nocturnal to-morrow?"

"That's it. I figured if I had just one good pic, I could get away with
it."

"How much are you getting?"

"Three hundred pesetas."

"I get more than that for pic-ing."

"I know," said Manuel. "I didn't have any right to ask you."

"What do you keep on doing it for?" Zurito asked. "Why don't you cut off
your coleta, Manolo?"

"I don't know," Manuel said.

"You're pretty near as old as I am," Zurito said.

"I don't know," Manuel said. "I got to do it. If I can fix it so that I
get an even break, that's all I want. I got to stick with it, Manos."

"No, you don't."

"Yes, I do. I've tried keeping away from it."

"I know how you feel. But it isn't right. You ought to get out and stay
out."

"I can't do it. Besides, I've been going good lately."

Zurito looked at his face.

"You've been in the hospital."

"But I was going great when I got hurt."

Zurito said nothing. He tipped the cognac out of his saucer into his
glass.

"The papers said they never saw a better faena," Manuel said.

Zurito looked at him.

"You know when I get going I'm good," Manuel said.

"You're too old," the picador said.

"No," said Manuel. "You're ten years older than I am."

"With me it's different."

"I'm not too old," Manuel said.

They sat silent, Manuel watching the picador's face.

"I was going great till I got hurt," Manuel offered.

"You ought to have seen me, Manos," Manuel said, reproachfully.

"I don't want to see you," Zurito said. "It makes me nervous."

"You haven't seen me lately."

"I've seen you plenty."

Zurito looked at Manuel, avoiding his eyes.

"You ought to quit it, Manolo."

"I can't," Manuel said. "I'm going good now, I tell you."

Zurito leaned forward, his hands on the table.

"Listen. I'll pic for you and if you don't go big to-morrow night,
you'll quit. See? Will you do that?"

"Sure."

Zurito leaned back, relieved.

"You got to quit," he said. "No monkey business. You got to cut the
coleta."

"I won't have to quit," Manuel said. "You watch me. I've got the stuff."

Zurito stood up. He felt tired from arguing.

"You got to quit," he said. "I'll cut your coleta myself."

"No, you won't," Manuel said. "You won't have a chance."

Zurito called the waiter.

"Come on," said Zurito. "Come on up to the house."

Manuel reached under the seat for his suitcase. He was happy. He knew
Zurito would pic for him. He was the best picador living. It was all
simple now.

"Come on up to the house and we'll eat," Zurito said.

*        *        *        *        *

Manuel stood in the patio de caballos waiting for the Charlie Chaplins
to be over. Zurito stood beside him. Where they stood it was dark. The
high door that led into the bull-ring was shut. Above them they heard a
shout, then another shout of laughter. Then there was silence. Manuel
liked the smell of the stables about the patio de caballos. It smelt
good in the dark. There was another roar from the arena and then
applause, prolonged applause, going on and on.

"You ever seen these fellows?" Zurito asked, big and looming beside
Manuel in the dark.

"No," Manuel said.

"They're pretty funny." Zurito said. He smiled to himself in the dark.

The high, double, tight-fitting door into the bull-ring swung open and
Manuel saw the ring in the hard light of the arc-lights, the plaza, dark
all the way around, rising high; around the edge of the ring were
running and bowing two men dressed like tramps, followed by a third in
the uniform of a hotel bell-boy who stooped and picked up the hats and
canes thrown down onto the sand and tossed them back up into the
darkness.

The electric light went on in the patio.

"I'll climb onto one of those ponies while you collect the kids," Zurito
said.

Behind them came the jingle of the mules, coming out to go into the
arena and be hitched onto the dead bull.

The members of the cuadrilla, who had been watching the burlesque from
the runway between the barrera and the seats, came walking back and
stood in a group talking, under the electric light in the patio. A
good-looking lad in a silver-and-orange suit came up to Manuel and
smiled.

"I'm Hernandez," he said and put out his hand.

Manuel shook it.

"They're regular elephants we've got to-night," the boy said cheerfully.

"They're big ones with horns," Manuel agreed.

"You drew the worst lot," the boy said.

"That's all right," Manuel said. "The bigger they are, the more meat for
the poor."

"Where did you get that one?" Hernandez grinned.

"That's an old one," Manuel said. "You line up your cuadrilla, so I can
see what I've got."

"You've got some good kids," Hernandez said. He was very cheerful. He
had been on twice before in nocturnals and was beginning to get a
following in Madrid. He was happy the fight would start in a few
minutes.

"Where are the pics?" Manuel asked.

"They're back in the corrals fighting about who gets the beautiful
horses," Hernandez grinned.

The mules came through the gate in a rush, the whips snapping, bells
jangling and the young bull ploughing a furrow of sand.

They formed up for the paseo as soon as the bull had gone through.

Manuel and Hernandez stood in front. The youths of the cuadrillas were
behind, their heavy capes furled over their arms. In back, the four
picadors, mounted, holding their steel-tipped push-poles erect in the
half-dark of the corral.

"It's a wonder Retana wouldn't give us enough light to see the horses
by," one picador said.

"He knows we'll be happier if we don't get too good a look at these
skins," another pic answered.

"This thing I'm on barely keeps me off the ground," the first picador
said.

"Well, they're horses."

"Sure, they're horses."

They talked, sitting their gaunt horses in the dark.

Zurito said nothing. He had the only steady horse of the lot. He had
tried him, wheeling him in the corrals and he responded to the bit and
the spurs. He had taken the bandage off his right eye and cut the
strings where they had tied his ears tight shut at the base. He was a
good, solid horse, solid on his legs. That was all he needed. He
intended to ride him all through the corrida. He had already, since he
had mounted, sitting in the half-dark in the big, quilted saddle,
waiting for the paseo, pic-ed through the whole corrida in his mind. The
other picadors went on talking on both sides of him. He did not hear
them.

The two matadors stood together in front of their three peones, their
capes furled over their left arms in the same fashion. Manuel was
thinking about the three lads in back of him. They were all three
Madrileños, like Hernandez, boys about nineteen. One of them, a gypsy,
serious, aloof, and dark-faced, he liked the look of. He turned.

"What's your name, kid?" he asked the gypsy.

"Fuentes," the gypsy said.

"That's a good name," Manuel said.

The gypsy smiled, showing his teeth.

"You take the bull and give him a little run when he comes out," Manuel
said.

"All right," the gypsy said. His face was serious. He began to think
about just what he would do.

"Here she goes," Manuel said to Hernandez.

"All right. We'll go."

Heads up, swinging with the music, their right arms swinging free, they
stepped out, crossing the sanded arena under the arc-lights, the
cuadrillas opening out behind, the picadors riding after, behind came
the bull-ring servants and the jingling mules. The crowd applauded
Hernandez as they marched across the arena. Arrogant, swinging, they
looked straight ahead as they marched.

They bowed before the president, and the procession broke up into its
component parts. The bull-fighters went over to the barrera and changed
their heavy mantles for the light fighting capes. The mules went out.
The picadors galloped jerkily around the ring, and two rode out the gate
they had come in by. The servants swept the sand smooth.

Manuel drank a glass of water poured for him by one of Retana's
deputies, who was acting as his manager and sword-handler. Hernandez
came over from speaking with his own manager.

"You got a good hand, kid," Manuel complimented him.

"They like me," Hernandez said happily.

"How did the paseo go?" Manuel asked Retana's man.

"Like a wedding," said the handler. "Fine. You came out like Joselito
and Belmonte."

Zurito rode by, a bulky equestrian statue. He wheeled his horse and
faced him toward the toril on the far side of the ring where the bull
would come out. It was strange under the arc-light. He pic-ed in the hot
afternoon sun for big money. He didn't like this arc-light business. He
wished they would get started.

Manuel went up to him.

"Pic him, Manos," he said. "Cut him down to size for me."

"I'll pic him, kid," Zurito spat on the sand. "I'll make him jump out of
the ring."

"Lean on him, Manos," Manuel said.

"I'll lean on him," Zurito said. "What's holding it up?"

"He's coming now," Manuel said.

Zurito sat there, his feet in the box-stirrups, his great legs in the
buckskin-covered armor gripping the horse, the reins in his left hand,
the long pic held in his right hand, his broad hat well down over his
eyes to shade them from the lights, watching the distant door of the
toril. His horse's ears quivered. Zurito patted him with his left hand.

The red door of the toril swung back and for a moment Zurito looked into
the empty passageway far across the arena. Then the bull came out in a
rush, skidding on his four legs as he came out under the lights, then
charging in a gallop, moving softly in a fast gallop, silent except as
he woofed through wide nostrils as he charged, glad to be free after the
dark pen.

In the first row of seats, slightly bored, leaning forward to write on
the cement wall in front of his knees, the substitute bull-fight critic
of _El Heraldo_ scribbled: "Campagnero, Negro, 42, came out at 90 miles
an hour with plenty of gas----"

Manuel, leaning against the barrera, watching the bull, waved his hand
and the gypsy ran out, trailing his cape. The bull, in full gallop,
pivoted and charged the cape, his head down, his tail rising. The gypsy
moved in a zigzag, and as he passed, the bull caught sight of him and
abandoned the cape to charge the man. The gyp sprinted and vaulted the
red fence of the barrera as the bull struck it with his horns. He tossed
into it twice with his horns, banging into the wood blindly.

The critic of _El Heraldo_ lit a cigarette and tossed the match at the
bull, then wrote in his note-book, "large and with enough horns to
satisfy the cash customers, Campagnero showed a tendency to cut into the
terrane of the bull-fighters."

Manuel stepped out on the hard sand as the bull banged into the fence.
Out of the corner of his eye he saw Zurito sitting the white horse close
to the barrera, about a quarter of the way around the ring to the left.
Manuel held the cape close in front of him, a fold in each hand, and
shouted at the bull. "Huh! Huh!" The bull turned, seemed to brace
against the fence as he charged in a scramble, driving into the cape as
Manuel side-stepped, pivoted on his heels with the charge of the bull,
and swung the cape just ahead of the horns. At the end of the swing he
was facing the bull again and held the cape in the same position close
in front of his body, and pivoted again as the bull recharged. Each
time, as he swung, the crowd shouted.

Four times he swung with the bull, lifting the cape so it billowed full,
and each time bringing the bull around to charge again. Then, at the end
of the fifth swing, he held the cape against his hip and pivoted, so the
cape swung out like a ballet dancer's skirt and wound the bull around
himself like a belt, to step clear, leaving the bull facing Zurito on
the white horse, come up and planted firm, the horse facing the bull,
its ears forward, its lips nervous, Zurito, his hat over his eyes,
leaning forward, the long pole sticking out before and behind in a sharp
angle under his right arm, held half-way down, the triangular iron point
facing the bull.

_El Heraldo's_ second-string critic, drawing on his cigarette, his eyes
on the bull, wrote: "the veteran Manolo designed a series of acceptable
veronicas, ending in a very Belmontistic recorte that earned applause
from the regulars, and we entered the tercio of the cavalry."

Zurito sat his horse, measuring the distance between the bull and the
end of the pic. As he looked, the bull gathered himself together and
charged, his eyes on the horse's chest. As he lowered his head to hook,
Zurito sunk the point of the pic in the swelling hump of muscle above
the bull's shoulder, leaned all his weight on the shaft, and with his
left hand pulled the white horse into the air, front hoofs pawing, and
swung him to the right as he pushed the bull under and through so the
horns passed safely under the horse's belly and the horse came down,
quivering, the bull's tail brushing his chest as he charged the cape
Hernandez offered him.

Hernandez ran sideways, taking the bull out and away with the cape,
toward the other picador. He fixed him with a swing of the cape,
squarely facing the horse and rider, and stepped back. As the bull saw
the horse he charged. The picador's lance slid along his back, and as
the shock of the charge lifted the horse, the picador was already
half-way out of the saddle, lifting his right leg clear as he missed
with the lance and falling to the left side to keep the horse between
him and the bull. The horse, lifted and gored, crashed over with the
bull driving into him, the picador gave a shove with his boots against
the horse and lay clear, waiting to be lifted and hauled away and put on
his feet.

Manuel let the bull drive into the fallen horse; he was in no hurry, the
picador was safe; besides, it did a picador like that good to worry.
He'd stay on longer next time. Lousy pics! He looked across the sand at
Zurito a little way out from the barrera, his horse rigid, waiting.

"Huh!" he called to the bull, "Tomar!" holding the cape in both hands so
it would catch his eye. The bull detached himself from the horse and
charged the cape, and Manuel, running sideways and holding the cape
spread wide, stopped, swung on his heels, and brought the bull sharply
around facing Zurito.

"Campagnero accepted a pair of varas for the death of one rosinante,
with Hernandez and Manolo at the quites," _El Heraldo's_ critic wrote.
"He pressed on the iron and clearly showed he was no horse-lover. The
veteran Zurito resurrected some of his old stuff with the pike-pole,
notably the suerte----"

"Olé Olé!" the man sitting beside him shouted. The shout was lost in the
roar of the crowd, and he slapped the critic on the back. The critic
looked up to see Zurito, directly below him, leaning far out over his
horse, the length of the pic rising in a sharp angle under his armpit,
holding the pic almost by the point, bearing down with all his weight,
holding the bull off, the bull pushing and driving to get at the horse,
and Zurito, far out, on top of him, holding him, holding him, and slowly
pivoting the horse against the pressure, so that at last he was clear.
Zurito felt the moment when the horse was clear and the bull could come
past, and relaxed the absolute steel lock of his resistance, and the
triangular steel point of the pic ripped in the bull's hump of shoulder
muscle as he tore loose to find Hernandez's cape before his muzzle. He
charged blindly into the cape and the boy took him out into the open
arena.

Zurito sat patting his horse and looking at the bull charging the cape
that Hernandez swung for him out under the bright light while the crowd
shouted.

"You see that one?" he said to Manuel.

"It was a wonder," Manuel said.

"I got him that time," Zurito said. "Look at him now."

At the conclusion of a closely turned pass of the cape the bull slid to
his knees. He was up at once, but far out across the sand Manuel and
Zurito saw the shine of the pumping flow of blood, smooth against the
black of the bull's shoulder.

"I got him that time," Zurito said.

"He's a good bull," Manuel said.

"If they gave me another shot at him, I'd kill him," Zurito said.

"They'll change the thirds on us," Manuel said.

"Look at him now," Zurito said.

"I got to go over there," Manuel said, and started on a run for the
other side of the ring, where the monos were leading a horse out by the
bridle toward the bull, whacking him on the legs with rods and all, in a
procession, trying to get him toward the bull, who stood, dropping his
head, pawing, unable to make up his mind to charge.

Zurito, sitting his horse, walking him toward the scene, not missing any
detail, scowled.

Finally the bull charged, the horse leaders ran for the barrera, the
picador hit too far back, and the bull got under the horse, lifted him,
threw him onto his back.

Zurito watched. The monos, in their red shirts, running out to drag the
picador clear. The picador, now on his feet, swearing and flopping his
arms. Manuel and Hernandez standing ready with their capes. And the
bull, the great, black bull, with a horse on his back, hooves dangling,
the bridle caught in the horns. Black bull with a horse on his back,
staggering short-legged, then arching his neck and lifting, thrusting,
charging to slide the horse off, horse sliding down. Then the bull into
a lunging charge at the cape Manuel spread for him.

The bull was slower now, Manuel felt. He was bleeding badly. There was a
sheen of blood all down his flank.

Manuel offered him the cape again. There he came, eyes open, ugly,
watching the cape. Manuel stepped to the side and raised his arms,
tightening the cape ahead of the bull for the veronica.

Now he was facing the bull. Yes, his head was going down a little. He
was carrying it lower. That was Zurito.

Manuel flopped the cape; there he comes; he side-stepped and swung in
another veronica. He's shooting awfully accurately, he thought. He's had
enough fight, so he's watching now. He's hunting now. Got his eye on me.
But I always give him the cape.

He shook the cape at the bull; there he comes; he side-stepped. Awful
close that time. I don't want to work that close to him.

The edge of the cape was wet with blood where it had swept along the
bull's back as he went by.

All right, here's the last one.

Manuel, facing the bull, having turned with him each charge, offered the
cape with his two hands. The bull looked at him. Eyes watching, horns
straight forward, the bull looked at him, watching.

"Huh!" Manuel said, "Toro!" and leaning back, swung the cape forward.
Here he comes. He side-stepped, swung the cape in back of him, and
pivoted, so the bull followed a swirl of cape and then was left with
nothing, fixed by the pass, dominated by the cape. Manuel swung the cape
under his muzzle with one hand, to show the bull was fixed, and walked
away.

There was no applause.

Manuel walked across the sand toward the barrera, while Zurito rode out
of the ring. The trumpet had blown to change the act to the planting of
the banderillos while Manuel had been working with the bull. He had not
consciously noticed it. The monos were spreading canvas over the two
dead horses and sprinkling sawdust around them.

Manuel came up to the barrera for a drink of water. Retana's man handed
him the heavy porous jug.

Fuentes, the tall gypsy, was standing holding a pair of banderillos,
holding them together, slim, red sticks, fish-hook points out. He looked
at Manuel.

"Go on out there," Manuel said.

The gypsy trotted out. Manuel set down the jug and watched. He wiped his
face with his handkerchief.

The critic of _El Heraldo_ reached for the bottle of warm champagne that
stood between his feet, took a drink, and finished his paragraph.

"--the aged Manolo rated no applause for a vulgar series of lances with
the cape and we entered the third of the palings."

Alone in the centre of the ring the bull stood, still fixed. Fuentes,
tall, flat-backed, walking toward him arrogantly, his arms spread out,
the two slim, red sticks, one in each hand, held by the fingers, points
straight forward. Fuentes walked forward. Back of him and to one side
was a peon with a cape. The bull looked at him and was no longer fixed.

His eyes watched Fuentes, now standing still. Now he leaned back,
calling to him. Fuentes twitched the two banderillos and the light on
the steel points caught the bull's eye.

His tail went up and he charged.

He came straight, his eyes on the man. Fuentes stood still, leaning
back, the banderillos pointing forward. As the bull lowered his head to
hook, Fuentes leaned backward, his arms came together and rose, his two
hands touching, the banderillos two descending red lines, and leaning
forward drove the points into the bull's shoulder, leaning far in over
the bull's horns and pivoting on the two upright sticks, his legs tight
together, his body curving to one side to let the bull pass.

"Olé!" from the crowd.

The bull was hooking wildly, jumping like a trout, all four feet off the
ground. The red shaft of the banderillos tossed as he jumped.

Manuel standing at the barrera, noticed that he hooked always to the
right.

"Tell him to drop the next pair on the right," he said to the kid who
started to run out to Fuentes with the new banderillos.

A heavy hand fell on his shoulder. It was Zurito.

"How do you feel, kid?" he asked.

Manuel was watching the bull.

Zurito leaned forward on the barrera, leaning the weight of his body on
his arms. Manuel turned to him.

"You're going good," Zurito said.

Manuel shook his head. He had nothing to do now until the next third.
The gypsy was very good with the banderillos. The bull would come to him
in the next third in good shape. He was a good bull. It had all been
easy up to now. The final stuff with the sword was all he worried over.
He did not really worry. He did not even think about it. But standing
there he had a heavy sense of apprehension. He looked out at the bull,
planning his faena, his work with the red cloth that was to reduce the
bull, to make him manageable.

The gypsy was walking out toward the bull again, walking heel-and-toe,
insultingly, like a ball-room dancer, the red shafts of the banderillos
twitching with his walk. The bull watched him, not fixed now, hunting
him, but waiting to get close enough so he could be sure of getting him,
getting the horns into him.

As Fuentes walked forward the bull charged. Fuentes ran across the
quarter of a circle as the bull charged and, as he passed running
backward, stopped, swung forward, rose on his toes, arms straight out,
and sunk the banderillos straight down into the tight of the big
shoulder muscles as the bull missed him.

The crowd were wild about it.

"That kid won't stay in this night stuff long," Retana's man said to
Zurito.

"He's good," Zurito said.

"Watch him now."

They watched.

Fuentes was standing with his back against the barrera. Two of the
cuadrilla were back of him, with their capes ready to flop over the
fence to distract the bull.

The bull, with his tongue out, his barrel heaving, was watching the
gypsy. He thought he had him now. Back against the red planks. Only a
short charge away. The bull watched him.

The gypsy bent back, drew back his arms, the banderillos pointing at the
bull. He called to the bull, stamped one foot. The bull was suspicious.
He wanted the man. No more barbs in the shoulder.

Fuentes walked a little closer to the bull. Bent back. Called again.
Somebody in the crowd shouted a warning.

"He's too damn close," Zurito said.

"Watch him," Retana's man said.

Leaning back, inciting the bull with the banderillos, Fuentes jumped,
both feet off the ground. As he jumped the bull's tail rose and he
charged. Fuentes came down on his toes, arms straight out, whole body
arching forward, and drove the shafts straight down as he swung his body
clear of the right horn.

The bull crashed into the barrera where the flopping capes had attracted
his eye as he lost the man.

The gypsy came running along the barrera toward Manuel, taking the
applause of the crowd. His vest was ripped where he had not quite
cleared the point of the horn. He was happy about it, showing it to the
spectators. He made the tour of the ring. Zurito saw him go by, smiling,
pointing at his vest. He smiled.

Somebody else was planting the last pair of banderillos. Nobody was
paying any attention.

Retana's man tucked a baton inside the red cloth of a muleta, folded the
cloth over it, and handed it over the barrera to Manuel. He reached in
the leather sword-case, took out a sword, and holding it by its leather
scabbard, reached it over the fence to Manuel. Manuel pulled the blade
out by the red hilt and the scabbard fell limp.

He looked at Zurito. The big man saw he was sweating.

"Now you get him, kid," Zurito said.

Manuel nodded.

"He's in good shape," Zurito said.

"Just like you want him," Retana's man assured him.

Manuel nodded.

The trumpeter, up under the roof, blew for the final act, and Manuel
walked across the arena toward where, up in the dark boxes, the
president must be.

In the front row of seats the substitute bull-fight critic of _El
Heraldo_ took a long drink of the warm champagne. He had decided it was
not worth while to write a running story and would write up the corrida
back in the office. What the hell was it anyway? Only a nocturnal. If he
missed anything he would get it out of the morning papers. He took
another drink of the champagne. He had a date at Maxim's at twelve. Who
were these bull-fighters anyway? Kids and bums. A bunch of bums. He put
his pad of paper in his pocket and looked over toward Manuel, standing
very much alone in the ring, gesturing with his hat in a salute toward a
box he could not see high up in the dark plaza. Out in the ring the bull
stood quiet, looking at nothing.

"I dedicate this bull to you, Mr. President, and to the public of
Madrid, the most intelligent and generous of the world," was what Manuel
was saying. It was a formula. He said it all. It was a little long for
nocturnal use.

He bowed at the dark, straightened, tossed his hat over his shoulder,
and, carrying the muleta in his left hand and the sword in his right,
walked out toward the bull.

Manuel walked toward the bull. The bull looked at him; his eyes were
quick. Manuel noticed the way the banderillos hung down on his left
shoulder and the steady sheen of blood from Zurito's pic-ing. He noticed
the way the bull's feet were. As he walked forward, holding the muleta
in his left hand and the sword in his right, he watched the bull's feet.
The bull could not charge without gathering his feet together. Now he
stood square on them, dully.

Manuel walked toward him, watching his feet. This was all right. He
could do this. He must work to get the bull's head down, so he could go
in past the horns and kill him. He did not think about the sword, not
about killing the bull. He thought about one thing at a time. The coming
things oppressed him, though. Walking forward, watching the bull's feet,
he saw successively his eyes, his wet muzzle, and the wide,
forward-pointing spread of his horns. The bull had light circles about
his eyes. His eyes watched Manuel. He felt he was going to get this
little one with the white face.

Standing still now and spreading the red cloth of the muleta with the
sword, pricking the point into the cloth so that the sword, now held in
his left hand, spread the red flannel like the jib of a boat, Manuel
noticed the points of the bull's horns. One of them was splintered from
banging against the barrera. The other was sharp as a porcupine quill.
Manuel noticed while spreading the muleta that the white base of the
horn was stained red. While he noticed these things he did not lose
sight of the bull's feet. The bull watched Manuel steadily.

He's on the defensive now, Manuel thought. He's reserving himself. I've
got to bring him out of that and get his head down. Always get his head
down. Zurito had his head down once, but he's come back. He'll bleed
when I start him going and that will bring it down.

Holding the muleta, with the sword in his left hand widening it in front
of him, he called to the bull.

The bull looked at him.

He leaned back insultingly and shook the wide-spread flannel.

The bull saw the muleta. It was a bright scarlet under the arc-light.
The bull's legs tightened.

Here he comes. Whoosh! Manuel turned as the bull came and raised the
muleta so that it passed over the bull's horns and swept down his broad
back from head to tail. The bull had gone clean up in the air with the
charge. Manuel had not moved.

At the end of the pass the bull turned like a cat coming around a corner
and faced Manuel.

He was on the offensive again. His heaviness was gone. Manuel noted the
fresh blood shining down the black shoulder and dripping down the bull's
leg. He drew the sword out of the muleta and held it in his right hand.
The muleta held low down in his left hand, leaning toward the left, he
called to the bull. The bull's legs tightened, his eyes on the muleta.
Here he comes, Manuel thought. Yuh!

He swung with the charge, sweeping the muleta ahead of the bull, his
feet firm, the sword following the curve, a point of light under the
arcs.

The bull recharged as the pase natural finished and Manuel raised the
muleta for a pase de pecho. Firmly planted, the bull came by his chest
under the raised muleta. Manuel leaned his head back to avoid the
clattering banderillo shafts. The hot, black bull body touched his chest
as it passed.

Too damn close, Manuel thought. Zurito, leaning on the barrera, spoke
rapidly to the gypsy, who trotted out toward Manuel with a cape. Zurito
pulled his hat down low and looked out across the arena at Manuel.

Manuel was facing the bull again, the muleta held low and to the left.
The bull's head was down as he watched the muleta.

"If it was Belmonte doing that stuff, they'd go crazy," Retana's man
said.

Zurito said nothing. He was watching Manuel out in the centre of the
arena.

"Where did the boss dig this fellow up?" Retana's man asked.

"Out of the hospital," Zurito said.

"That's where he's going damn quick," Retana's man said.

Zurito turned on him.

"Knock on that," he said, pointing to the barrera.

"I was just kidding, man," Retana's man said.

"Knock on the wood."

Retana's man leaned forward and knocked three times on the barrera.

"Watch the faena," Zurito said.

Out in the centre of the ring, under the lights, Manuel was kneeling,
facing the bull, and as he raised the muleta in both hands the bull
charged, tail up.

Manuel swung his body clear and, as the bull recharged, brought around
the muleta in a half-circle that pulled the bull to his knees.

"Why, that one's a great bull-fighter," Retana's man said.

"No, he's not," said Zurito.

Manuel stood up and, the muleta in his left hand, the sword in his
right, acknowledged the applause from the dark plaza.

The bull had humped himself up from his knees and stood waiting, his
head hung low.

Zurito spoke to two of the other lads of the cuadrilla and they ran out
to stand back of Manuel with their capes. There were four men back of
him now. Hernandez had followed him since he first came out with the
muleta. Fuentes stood watching, his cape held against his body, tall, in
repose, watching lazy-eyed. Now the two came up. Hernandez motioned them
to stand one at each side. Manuel stood alone, facing the bull.

Manuel waved back the men with the capes. Stepping back cautiously, they
saw his face was white and sweating.

Didn't they know enough to keep back? Did they want to catch the bull's
eye with the capes after he was fixed and ready? He had enough to worry
about without that kind of thing.

The bull was standing, his four feet square, looking at the muleta.
Manuel furled the muleta in his left hand. The bull's eyes watched it.
His body was heavy on his feet. He carried his head low, but not too
low.

Manuel lifted the muleta at him. The bull did not move. Only his eyes
watched.

He's all lead, Manuel thought. He's all square. He's framed right. He'll
take it.

He thought in bull-fight terms. Sometimes he had a thought and the
particular piece of slang would not come into his mind and he could not
realize the thought. His instincts and his knowledge worked
automatically, and his brain worked slowly and in words. He knew all
about bulls. He did not have to think about them. He just did the right
thing. His eyes noted things and his body performed the necessary
measures without thought. If he thought about it, he would be gone.

Now, facing the bull, he was conscious of many things at the same time.
There were the horns, the one splintered, the other smoothly sharp, the
need to profile himself toward the left horn, lance himself short and
straight, lower the muleta so the bull would follow it, and, going in
over the horns, put the sword all the way into a little spot about as
big as a five-peseta piece straight in back of the neck, between the
sharp pitch of the bull's shoulders. He must do all this and must then
come out from between the horns. He was conscious he must do all this,
but his only thought was in words: "Corto y derecho."

"Corto y derecho," he thought, furling the muleta. Short and straight.
Corto y derecho, he drew the sword out of the muleta, profiled on the
splintered left horn, dropped the muleta across his body, so his right
hand with the sword on the level with his eye made the sign of the
cross, and, rising on his toes, sighted along the dipping blade of the
sword at the spot high up between the bull's shoulders.

Corto y derecho he lanced himself on the bull.

There was a shock, and he felt himself go up in the air. He pushed on
the sword as he went up and over, and it flew out of his hand. He hit
the ground and the bull was on him. Manuel, lying on the ground, kicked
at the bull's muzzle with his slippered feet. Kicking, kicking, the bull
after him, missing him in his excitement, bumping him with his head,
driving the horns into the sand. Kicking like a man keeping a ball in
the air, Manuel kept the bull from getting a clean thrust at him.

Manuel felt the wind on his back from the capes flopping at the bull,
and then the bull was gone, gone over him in a rush. Dark, as his belly
went over. Not even stepped on.

Manuel stood up and picked up the muleta. Fuentes handed him the sword.
It was bent where it had struck the shoulder-blade. Manuel straightened
it on his knee and ran toward the bull, standing now beside one of the
dead horses. As he ran, his jacket flopped where it had been ripped
under his armpit.

"Get him out of there," Manuel shouted to the gypsy. The bull had
smelled the blood of the dead horse and ripped into the canvas-cover
with his horns. He charged Fuentes's cape, with the canvas hanging from
his splintered horn, and the crowd laughed. Out in the ring, he tossed
his head to rid himself of the canvas. Hernandez, running up from behind
him, grabbed the end of the canvas and neatly lifted it off the horn.

The bull followed it in a half-charge and stopped still. He was on the
defensive again. Manuel was walking toward him with the sword and
muleta. Manuel swung the muleta before him. The bull would not charge.

Manuel profiled toward the bull, sighting along the dipping blade of the
sword. The bull was motionless, seemingly dead on his feet, incapable of
another charge.

Manuel rose to his toes, sighting along the steel, and charged.

Again there was the shock and he felt himself being borne back in a
rush, to strike hard on the sand. There was no chance of kicking this
time. The bull was on top of him. Manuel lay as though dead, his head on
his arms, and the bull bumped him. Bumped his back, bumped his face in
the sand. He felt the horn go into the sand between his folded arms. The
bull hit him in the small of the back. His face drove into the sand. The
horn drove through one of his sleeves and the bull ripped it off. Manuel
was tossed clear and the bull followed the capes.

Manuel got up, found the sword and muleta, tried the point of the sword
with his thumb, and then ran toward the barrera for a new sword.

Retana's man handed him the sword over the edge of the barrera.

"Wipe off your face," he said.

Manuel, running again toward the bull, wiped his bloody face with his
handkerchief. He had not seen Zurito. Where was Zurito?

The cuadrilla had stepped away from the bull and waited with their
capes. The bull stood, heavy and dull again after the action.

Manuel walked toward him with the muleta. He stopped and shook it. The
bull did not respond. He passed it right and left, left and right before
the bull's muzzle. The bull's eyes watched it and turned with the swing,
but he would not charge. He was waiting for Manuel.

Manuel was worried. There was nothing to do but go in. Corto y derecho.
He profiled close to the bull, crossed the muleta in front of his body
and charged. As he pushed in the sword, he jerked his body to the left
to clear the horn. The bull passed him and the sword shot up in the air,
twinkling under the arc-lights, to fall red-hilted on the sand.

Manuel ran over and picked it up. It was bent and he straightened it
over his knee.

As he came running toward the bull, fixed again now, he passed Hernandez
standing with his cape.

"He's all bone," the boy said encouragingly.

Manuel nodded, wiping his face. He put the bloody handkerchief in his
pocket.

There was the bull. He was close to the barrera now. Damn him. Maybe he
was all bone. Maybe there was not any place for the sword to go in. The
hell there wasn't! He'd show them.

He tried a pass with the muleta and the bull did not move. Manuel
chopped the muleta back and forth in front of the bull. Nothing doing.

He furled the muleta, drew the sword out, profiled and drove in on the
bull. He felt the sword buckle as he shoved it in, leaning his weight on
it, and then it shot high in the air, end-over-ending into the crowd.
Manuel had jerked clear as the sword jumped.

The first cushions thrown down out of the dark missed him. Then one hit
him in the face, his bloody face looking toward the crowd. They were
coming down fast. Spotting the sand. Somebody threw an empty
champagne-bottle from close range. It hit Manuel on the foot. He stood
there watching the dark, where the things were coming from. Then
something whished through the air and struck by him. Manuel leaned over
and picked it up. It was his sword. He straightened it over his knee and
gestured with it to the crowd.

"Thank you," he said. "Thank you."

Oh, the dirty bastards! Dirty bastards! Oh, the lousy, dirty bastards!
He kicked into a cushion as he ran.

There was the bull. The same as ever. All right, you dirty, lousy
bastard!

Manuel passed the muleta in front of the bull's black muzzle.

Nothing doing.

You won't! All right. He stepped close and jammed the sharp peak of the
muleta into the bull's damp muzzle.

The bull was on him as he jumped back and as he tripped on a cushion he
felt the horn go into him, into his side. He grabbed the horn with his
two hands and rode backward, holding tight onto the place. The bull
tossed him and he was clear. He lay still. It was all right. The bull
was gone.

He got up coughing and feeling broken and gone. The dirty bastards!

"Give me the sword," he shouted. "Give me the stuff."

Fuentes came up with the muleta and the sword.

Hernandez put his arm around him.

"Go on to the infirmary, man," he said. "Don't be a damn fool."

"Get away from me," Manuel said. "Get to hell away from me."

He twisted free. Hernandez shrugged his shoulders. Manuel ran toward the
bull.

There was the bull standing, heavy, firmly planted.

All right, you bastard! Manuel drew the sword out of the muleta, sighted
with the same movement, and flung himself onto the bull. He felt the
sword go in all the way. Right up to the guard. Four fingers and his
thumb into the bull. The blood was hot on his knuckles, and he was on
top of the bull.

The bull lurched with him as he lay on, and seemed to sink; then he was
standing clear. He looked at the bull going down slowly over on his
side, then suddenly four feet in the air.

Then he gestured at the crowd, his hand warm from the bull blood.

All right, you bastards! He wanted to say something, but he started to
cough. It was hot and choking. He looked down for the muleta. He must go
over and salute the president. President hell! He was sitting down
looking at something. It was the bull. His four feet up. Thick tongue
out. Things crawling around on his belly and under his legs. Crawling
where the hair was thin. Dead bull. To hell with the bull! To hell with
them all! He started to get to his feet and commenced to cough. He sat
down again, coughing. Somebody came and pushed him up.

They carried him across the ring to the infirmary, running with him
across the sand, standing blocked at the gate as the mules came in, then
around under the dark passageway, men grunting as they took him up the
stairway, and then laid him down.

The doctor and two men in white were waiting for him. They laid him out
on the table. They were cutting away his shirt. Manuel felt tired. His
whole chest felt scalding inside. He started to cough and they held
something to his mouth. Everybody was very busy.

There was an electric light in his eyes. He shut his eyes.

He heard some one coming very heavily up the stairs. Then he did not
hear it. Then he heard a noise far off. That was the crowd. Well,
somebody would have to kill his other bull. They had cut away all his
shirt. The doctor smiled at him. There was Retana.

"Hello, Retana!" Manuel said. He could not hear his voice.

Retana smiled at him and said something. Manuel could not hear it.

Zurito stood beside the table, bending over where the doctor was
working. He was in his picador clothes, without his hat.

Zurito said something to him. Manuel could not hear it.

Zurito was speaking to Retana. One of the men in white smiled and handed
Retana a pair of scissors. Retana gave them to Zurito. Zurito said
something to Manuel. He could not hear it.

To hell with this operating-table! He'd been on plenty of
operating-tables before. He was not going to die. There would be a
priest if he was going to die.

Zurito was saying something to him. Holding up the scissors.

That was it. They were going to cut off his coleta. They were going to
cut off his pigtail.

Manuel sat up on the operating-table. The doctor stepped back, angry.
Some one grabbed him and held him.

"You couldn't do a thing like that, Manos," he said.

He heard suddenly, clearly, Zurito's voice.

"That's all right," Zurito said. "I won't do it. I was joking."

"I was going good," Manuel said. "I didn't have any luck. That was all."

Manuel lay back. They had put something over his face. It was all
familiar. He inhaled deeply. He felt very tired. He was very, very
tired. They took the thing away from his face.

"I was going good," Manuel said weakly. "I was going great."

Retana looked at Zurito and started for the door.

"I'll stay here with him," Zurito said.

Retana shrugged his shoulders.

Manuel opened his eyes and looked at Zurito.

"Wasn't I going good, Manos?" he asked, for confirmation.

"Sure," said Zurito. "You were going great."

The doctor's assistant put the cone over Manuel's face and he inhaled
deeply. Zurito stood awkwardly, watching.




  IN ANOTHER COUNTRY


In the fall the war was always there, but we did not go to it any more.
It was cold in the fall in Milan and the dark came very early. Then the
electric lights came on, and it was pleasant along the streets looking
in the windows. There was much game hanging outside the shops, and the
snow powdered in the fur of the foxes and the wind blew their tails. The
deer hung stiff and heavy and empty, and small birds blew in the wind
and the wind turned their feathers. It was a cold fall and the wind came
down from the mountains.

We were all at the hospital every afternoon, and there were different
ways of walking across the town through the dusk to the hospital. Two of
the ways were alongside canals, but they were long. Always, though, you
crossed a bridge across a canal to enter the hospital. There was a
choice of three bridges. On one of them a woman sold roasted chestnuts.
It was warm, standing in front of her charcoal fire, and the chestnuts
were warm afterward in your pocket. The hospital was very old and very
beautiful, and you entered through a gate and walked across a courtyard
and out a gate on the other side. There were usually funerals starting
from the courtyard. Beyond the old hospital were the new brick
pavilions, and there we met every afternoon and were all very polite and
interested in what was the matter, and sat in the machines that were to
make so much difference.

The doctor came up to the machine where I was sitting and said: "What
did you like best to do before the war? Did you practise a sport?"

I said: "Yes, football."

"Good," he said. "You will be able to play football again better than
ever."

My knee did not bend and the leg dropped straight from the knee to the
ankle without a calf, and the machine was to bend the knee and make it
move as in riding a tricycle. But it did not bend yet, and instead the
machine lurched when it came to the bending part. The doctor said: "That
will all pass. You are a fortunate young man. You will play football
again like a champion."

In the next machine was a major who had a little hand like a baby's. He
winked at me when the doctor examined his hand, which was between two
leather straps that bounced up and down and flapped the stiff fingers,
and said: "And will I too play football, captain-doctor?" He had been a
very great fencer, and before the war the greatest fencer in Italy.

The doctor went to his office in a back room and brought a photograph
which showed a hand that had been withered almost as small as the
major's, before it had taken a machine course, and after was a little
larger. The major held the photograph with his good hand and looked at
it very carefully. "A wound?" he asked.

"An industrial accident," the doctor said.

"Very interesting, very interesting," the major said, and handed it back
to the doctor.

"You have confidence?"

"No," said the major.

There were three boys who came each day who were about the same age I
was. They were all three from Milan, and one of them was to be a lawyer,
and one was to be a painter, and one had intended to be a soldier, and
after we were finished with the machines, sometimes we walked back
together to the Café Cova, which was next door to the Scala. We walked
the short way through the communist quarter because we were four
together. The people hated us because we were officers, and from a
wine-shop some one would call out, "A basso gli ufficiali!" as we
passed. Another boy who walked with us sometimes and made us five wore a
black silk handkerchief across his face because he had no nose then and
his face was to be rebuilt. He had gone out to the front from the
military academy and been wounded within an hour after he had gone into
the front line for the first time. They rebuilt his face, but he came
from a very old family and they could never get the nose exactly right.
He went to South America and worked in a bank. But this was a long time
ago, and then we did not any of us know how it was going to be
afterward. We only knew then that there was always the war, but that we
were not going to it any more.

We all had the same medals, except the boy with the black silk bandage
across his face, and he had not been at the front long enough to get any
medals. The tall boy with a very pale face who was to be a lawyer had
been a lieutenant of Arditi and had three medals of the sort we each had
only one of. He had lived a very long time with death and was a little
detached. We were all a little detached, and there was nothing that held
us together except that we met every afternoon at the hospital.
Although, as we walked to the Cova through the tough part of town,
walking in the dark, with light and singing coming out of the
wine-shops, and sometimes having to walk into the street when the men
and women would crowd together on the sidewalk so that we would have had
to jostle them to get by, we felt held together by there being something
that had happened that they, the people who disliked us, did not
understand.

We ourselves all understood the Cova, where it was rich and warm and not
too brightly lighted, and noisy and smoky at certain hours, and there
were always girls at the tables and the illustrated papers on a rack on
the wall. The girls at the Cova were very patriotic, and I found that
the most patriotic people in Italy were the café girls--and I believe
they are still patriotic.

The boys at first were very polite about my medals and asked me what I
had done to get them. I showed them the papers, which were written in
very beautiful language and full of _fratellanza_ and _abnegazione_, but
which really said, with the adjectives removed, that I had been given
the medals because I was an American. After that their manner changed a
little toward me, although I was their friend against outsiders. I was a
friend, but I was never really one of them after they had read the
citations, because it had been different with them and they had done
very different things to get their medals. I had been wounded, it was
true; but we all knew that being wounded, after all, was really an
accident. I was never ashamed of the ribbons, though, and sometimes,
after the cocktail hour, I would imagine myself having done all the
things they had done to get their medals; but walking home at night
through the empty streets with the cold wind and all the shops closed,
trying to keep near the street lights, I knew that I would never have
done such things, and I was very much afraid to die, and often lay in
bed at night by myself, afraid to die and wondering how I would be when
I went back to the front again.

The three with the medals were like hunting-hawks; and I was not a hawk,
although I might seem a hawk to those who had never hunted; they, the
three, knew better and so we drifted apart. But I stayed good friends
with the boy who had been wounded his first day at the front, because he
would never know now how he would have turned out; so he could never be
accepted either, and I liked him because I thought perhaps he would not
have turned out to be a hawk either.

The major, who had been the great fencer, did not believe in bravery,
and spent much time while we sat in the machines correcting my grammar.
He had complimented me on how I spoke Italian, and we talked together
very easily. One day I had said that Italian seemed such an easy
language to me that I could not take a great interest in it; everything
was so easy to say. "Ah, yes," the major said. "Why, then, do you not
take up the use of grammar?" So we took up the use of grammar, and soon
Italian was such a difficult language that I was afraid to talk to him
until I had the grammar straight in my mind.

The major came very regularly to the hospital. I do not think he ever
missed a day, although I am sure he did not believe in the machines.
There was a time when none of us believed in the machines, and one day
the major said it was all nonsense. The machines were new then and it
was we who were to prove them. It was an idiotic idea, he said, "a
theory, like another." I had not learned my grammar, and he said I was a
stupid impossible disgrace, and he was a fool to have bothered with me.
He was a small man and he sat straight up in his chair with his right
hand thrust into the machine and looked straight ahead at the wall while
the straps thumped up and down with his fingers in them.

"What will you do when the war is over if it is over?" he asked me.
"Speak grammatically!"

"I will go to the States."

"Are you married?"

"No, but I hope to be."

"The more of a fool you are," he said. He seemed very angry. "A man must
not marry."

"Why, Signor Maggiore?"

"Don't call me 'Signor Maggiore.'"

"Why must not a man marry?"

"He cannot marry. He cannot marry," he said angrily. "If he is to lose
everything, he should not place himself in a position to lose that. He
should not place himself in a position to lose. He should find things he
cannot lose."

He spoke very angrily and bitterly, and looked straight ahead while he
talked.

"But why should he necessarily lose it?"

"He'll lose it," the major said. He was looking at the wall. Then he
looked down at the machine and jerked his little hand out from between
the straps and slapped it hard against his thigh. "He'll lose it," he
almost shouted. "Don't argue with me!" Then he called to the attendant
who ran the machines. "Come and turn this damned thing off."

He went back into the other room for the light treatment and the
massage. Then I heard him ask the doctor if he might use his telephone
and he shut the door. When he came back into the room, I was sitting in
another machine. He was wearing his cape and had his cap on, and he came
directly toward my machine and put his arm on my shoulder.

"I am so sorry," he said, and patted me on the shoulder with his good
hand. "I would not be rude. My wife has just died. You must forgive me."

"Oh--" I said, feeling sick for him. "I am _so_ sorry."

He stood there biting his lower lip. "It is very difficult," he said. "I
cannot resign myself."

He looked straight past me and out through the window. Then he began to
cry. "I am utterly unable to resign myself," he said and choked. And
then crying, his head up looking at nothing, carrying himself straight
and soldierly, with tears on both his cheeks and biting his lips, he
walked past the machines and out the door.

The doctor told me that the major's wife, who was very young and whom he
had not married until he was definitely invalided out of the war, had
died of pneumonia. She had been sick only a few days. No one expected
her to die. The major did not come to the hospital for three days. Then
he came at the usual hour, wearing a black band on the sleeve of his
uniform. When he came back, there were large framed photographs around
the wall, of all sorts of wounds before and after they had been cured by
the machines. In front of the machine the major used were three
photographs of hands like his that were completely restored. I do not
know where the doctor got them. I always understood we were the first to
use the machines. The photographs did not make much difference to the
major because he only looked out of the window.




HILLS LIKE WHITE ELEPHANTS


The hills across the valley of the Ebro were long and white. On this
side there was no shade and no trees and the station was between two
lines of rails in the sun. Close against the side of the station there
was the warm shadow of the building and a curtain, made of strings of
bamboo beads, hung across the open door into the bar, to keep out flies.
The American and the girl with him sat at a table in the shade, outside
the building. It was very hot and the express from Barcelona would come
in forty minutes. It stopped at this junction for two minutes and went
on to Madrid.

"What should we drink?" the girl asked. She had taken off her hat and
put it on the table.

"It's pretty hot," the man said.

"Let's drink beer."

"Dos cervezas," the man said into the curtain.

"Big ones?" a woman asked from the doorway.

"Yes. Two big ones."

The woman brought two glasses of beer and two felt pads. She put the
felt pads and the beer glasses on the table and looked at the man and
the girl. The girl was looking off at the line of hills. They were white
in the sun and the country was brown and dry.

"They look like white elephants," she said.

"I've never seen one," the man drank his beer.

"No, you wouldn't have."

"I might have," the man said. "Just because you say I wouldn't have
doesn't prove anything."

The girl looked at the bead curtain. "They've painted something on it,"
she said. "What does it say?"

"Anis del Toro. It's a drink."

"Could we try it?"

The man called "Listen" through the curtain. The woman came out from the
bar.

"Four reales."

"We want two Anis del Toro."

"With water?"

"Do you want it with water?"

"I don't know," the girl said. "Is it good with water?"

"It's all right."

"You want them with water?" asked the woman.

"Yes, with water."

"It tastes like licorice," the girl said and put the glass down.

"That's the way with everything."

"Yes," said the girl. "Everything tastes of licorice. Especially all the
things you've waited so long for, like absinthe."

"Oh, cut it out."

"You started it," the girl said. "I was being amused. I was having a
fine time."

"Well, let's try and have a fine time."

"All right. I was trying. I said the mountains looked like white
elephants. Wasn't that bright?"

"That was bright."

"I wanted to try this new drink. That's all we do, isn't it--look at
things and try new drinks?"

"I guess so."

The girl looked across at the hills.

"They're lovely hills," she said. "They don't really look like white
elephants. I just meant the coloring of their skin through the trees."

"Should we have another drink?"

"All right."

The warm wind blew the bead curtain against the table.

"The beer's nice and cool," the man said.

"It's lovely," the girl said.

"It's really an awfully simple operation, Jig," the man said. "It's not
really an operation at all."

The girl looked at the ground the table legs rested on.

"I know you wouldn't mind it, Jig. It's really not anything. It's just
to let the air in."

The girl did not say anything.

"I'll go with you and I'll stay with you all the time. They just let the
air in and then it's all perfectly natural."

"Then what will we do afterward?"

"We'll be fine afterward. Just like we were before."

"What makes you think so?"

"That's the only thing that bothers us. It's the only thing that's made
us unhappy."

The girl looked at the bead curtain, put her hand out and took hold of
two of the strings of beads.

"And you think then we'll be all right and be happy."

"I know we will. You don't have to be afraid. I've known lots of people
that have done it."

"So have I," said the girl. "And afterward they were all so happy."

"Well," the man said, "if you don't want to you don't have to. I
wouldn't have you do it if you didn't want to. But I know it's perfectly
simple."

"And you really want to?"

"I think it's the best thing to do. But I don't want you to do it if you
don't really want to."

"And if I do it you'll be happy and things will be like they were and
you'll love me?"

"I love you now. You know I love you."

"I know. But if I do it, then it will be nice again if I say things are
like white elephants, and you'll like it?"

"I'll love it. I love it now but I just can't think about it. You know
how I get when I worry."

"If I do it you won't ever worry?"

"I won't worry about that because it's perfectly simple."

"Then I'll do it. Because I don't care about me."

"What do you mean?"

"I don't care about me."

"Well, I care about you."

"Oh, yes. But I don't care about me. And I'll do it and then everything
will be fine."

"I don't want you to do it if you feel that way."

The girl stood up and walked to the end of the station. Across, on the
other side, were fields of grain and trees along the banks of the Ebro.
Far away, beyond the river, were mountains. The shadow of a cloud moved
across the field of grain and she saw the river through the trees.

"And we could have all this," she said. "And we could have everything
and every day we make it more impossible."

"What did you say?"

"I said we could have everything."

"We can have everything."

"No, we can't."

"We can have the whole world."

"No, we can't."

"We can go everywhere."

"No, we can't. It isn't ours any more."

"It's ours."

"No, it isn't. And once they take it away, you never get it back."

"But they haven't taken it away."

"We'll wait and see."

"Come on back in the shade," he said. "You mustn't feel that way."

"I don't feel any way," the girl said. "I just know things."

"I don't want you to do anything that you don't want to do----"

"Nor that isn't good for me," she said. "I know. Could we have another
beer?"

"All right. But you've got to realize----"

"I realize," the girl said. "Can't we maybe stop talking?"

They sat down at the table and the girl looked across at the hills on
the dry side of the valley and the man looked at her and at the table.

"You've got to realize," he said, "that I don't want you to do it if you
don't want to. I'm perfectly willing to go through with it if it means
anything to you."

"Doesn't it mean anything to you? We could get along."

"Of course it does. But I don't want anybody but you. I don't want any
one else. And I know it's perfectly simple."

"Yes, you know it's perfectly simple."

"It's all right for you to say that, but I do know it."

"Would you do something for me now?"

"I'd do anything for you."

"Would you please please please please please please please stop
talking?"

He did not say anything but looked at the bags against the wall of the
station. There were labels on them from all the hotels where they had
spent nights.

"But I don't want you to," he said, "I don't care anything about it."

"I'll scream," the girl said.

The woman came out through the curtains with two glasses of beer and put
them down on the damp felt pads. "The train comes in five minutes," she
said.

"What did she say?" asked the girl.

"That the train is coming in five minutes."

The girl smiled brightly at the woman, to thank her.

"I'd better take the bags over to the other side of the station," the
man said. She smiled at him.

"All right. Then come back and we'll finish the beer."

He picked up the two heavy bags and carried them around the station to
the other tracks. He looked up the tracks but could not see the train.
Coming back, he walked through the barroom, where people waiting for the
train were drinking. He drank an Anis at the bar and looked at the
people. They were all waiting reasonably for the train. He went out
through the bead curtain. She was sitting at the table and smiled at
him.

"Do you feel better?" he asked.

"I feel fine," she said. "There's nothing wrong with me. I feel fine."




     THE KILLERS


The door of Henry's lunch-room opened and two men came in. They sat down
at the counter.

"What's yours?" George asked them.

"I don't know," one of the men said. "What do you want to eat, Al?"

"I don't know," said Al. "I don't know what I want to eat."

Outside it was getting dark. The street-light came on outside the
window. The two men at the counter read the menu. From the other end of
the counter Nick Adams watched them. He had been talking to George when
they came in.

"I'll have a roast pork tenderloin with apple sauce and mashed
potatoes," the first man said.

"It isn't ready yet."

"What the hell do you put it on the card for?"

"That's the dinner," George explained. "You can get that at six
o'clock."

George looked at the clock on the wall behind the counter.

"It's five o'clock."

"The clock says twenty minutes past five," the second man said.

"It's twenty minutes fast."

"Oh, to hell with the clock," the first man said. "What have you got to
eat?"

"I can give you any kind of sandwiches," George said. "You can have ham
and eggs, bacon and eggs, liver and bacon, or a steak."

"Give me chicken croquettes with green peas and cream sauce and mashed
potatoes."

"That's the dinner."

"Everything we want's the dinner, eh? That's the way you work it."

"I can give you ham and eggs, bacon and eggs, liver----"

"I'll take ham and eggs," the man called Al said. He wore a derby hat
and a black overcoat buttoned across the chest. His face was small and
white and he had tight lips. He wore a silk muffler and gloves.

"Give me bacon and eggs," said the other man. He was about the same size
as Al. Their faces were different, but they were dressed like twins.
Both wore overcoats too tight for them. They sat leaning forward, their
elbows on the counter.

"Got anything to drink?" Al asked.

"Silver beer, bevo, ginger-ale," George said.

"I mean you got anything to _drink_?"

"Just those I said."

"This is a hot town," said the other. "What do they call it?"

"Summit."

"Ever hear of it?" Al asked his friend.

"No," said the friend.

"What do you do here nights?" Al asked.

"They eat the dinner," his friend said. "They all come here and eat the
big dinner."

"That's right," George said.

"So you think that's right?" Al asked George.

"Sure."

"You're a pretty bright boy, aren't you?"

"Sure," said George.

"Well, you're not," said the other little man. "Is he, Al?"

"He's dumb," said Al. He turned to Nick. "What's your name?"

"Adams."

"Another bright boy," Al said. "Ain't he a bright boy, Max?"

"The town's full of bright boys," Max said.

George put the two platters, one of ham and eggs, the other of bacon and
eggs, on the counter. He set down two side-dishes of fried potatoes and
closed the wicket into the kitchen.

"Which is yours?" he asked Al.

"Don't you remember?"

"Ham and eggs."

"Just a bright boy," Max said. He leaned forward and took the ham and
eggs. Both men ate with their gloves on. George watched them eat.

"What are _you_ looking at?" Max looked at George.

"Nothing."

"The hell you were. You were looking at me."

"Maybe the boy meant it for a joke, Max," Al said.

George laughed.

"_You_ don't have to laugh," Max said to him. "_You_ don't have to laugh
at all, see?"

"All right," said George.

"So he thinks it's all right." Max turned to Al. "He thinks it's all
right. That's a good one."

"Oh, he's a thinker," Al said. They went on eating.

"What's the bright boy's name down the counter?" Al asked Max.

"Hey, bright boy," Max said to Nick. "You go around on the other side of
the counter with your boy friend."

"What's the idea?" Nick asked.

"There isn't any idea."

"You better go around, bright boy," Al said. Nick went around behind the
counter.

"What's the idea?" George asked.

"None of your damn business," Al said. "Who's out in the kitchen?"

"The nigger."

"What do you mean the nigger?"

"The nigger that cooks."

"Tell him to come in."

"What's the idea?"

"Tell him to come in."

"Where do you think you are?"

"We know damn well where we are," the man called Max said. "Do we look
silly?"

"You talk silly," Al said to him. "What the hell do you argue with this
kid for? Listen," he said to George, "tell the nigger to come out here."

"What are you going to do to him?"

"Nothing. Use your head, bright boy. What would we do to a nigger?"

George opened the slit that opened back into the kitchen. "Sam," he
called. "Come in here a minute."

The door to the kitchen opened and the nigger came in. "What was it?" he
asked. The two men at the counter took a look at him.

"All right, nigger. You stand right there," Al said.

Sam, the nigger, standing in his apron, looked at the two men sitting at
the counter. "Yes, sir," he said. Al got down from his stool.

"I'm going back to the kitchen with the nigger and bright boy," he said.
"Go on back to the kitchen, nigger. You go with him, bright boy." The
little man walked after Nick and Sam, the cook, back into the kitchen.
The door shut after them. The man called Max sat at the counter opposite
George. He didn't look at George but looked in the mirror that ran along
back of the counter. Henry's had been made over from a saloon into a
lunch-counter.

"Well, bright boy," Max said, looking into the mirror, "why don't you
say something?"

"What's it all about?"

"Hey, Al," Max called, "bright boy wants to know what it's all about."

"Why don't you tell him?" Al's voice came from the kitchen.

"What do you think it's all about?"

"I don't know."

"What do you think?"

Max looked into the mirror all the time he was talking.

"I wouldn't say."

"Hey, Al, bright boy says he wouldn't say what he thinks it's all
about."

"I can hear you, all right," Al said from the kitchen. He had propped
open the slit that dishes passed through into the kitchen with a catsup
bottle. "Listen, bright boy," he said from the kitchen to George. "Stand
a little further along the bar. You move a little to the left, Max." He
was like a photographer arranging for a group picture.

"Talk to me, bright boy," Max said. "What do you think's going to
happen?"

George did not say anything.

"I'll tell you," Max said. "We're going to kill a Swede. Do you know a
big Swede named Ole Andreson?"

"Yes."

"He comes here to eat every night, don't he?"

"Sometimes he comes here."

"He comes here at six o'clock, don't he?"

"If he comes."

"We know all that, bright boy," Max said. "Talk about something else.
Ever go to the movies?"

"Once in a while."

"You ought to go to the movies more. The movies are fine for a bright
boy like you."

"What are you going to kill Ole Andreson for? What did he ever do to
you?"

"He never had a chance to do anything to us. He never even seen us."

"And he's only going to see us once," Al said from the kitchen.

"What are you going to kill him for, then?" George asked.

"We're killing him for a friend. Just to oblige a friend, bright boy."

"Shut up," said Al from the kitchen. "You talk too goddam much."

"Well, I got to keep bright boy amused. Don't I, bright boy?"

"You talk too damn much," Al said. "The nigger and my bright boy are
amused by themselves. I got them tied up like a couple of girl friends
in the convent."

"I suppose you were in a convent."

"You never know."

"You were in a kosher convent. That's where you were."

George looked up at the clock.

"If anybody comes in you tell them the cook is off, and if they keep
after it, you tell them you'll go back and cook yourself. Do you get
that, bright boy?"

"All right," George said. "What you going to do with us afterward?"

"That'll depend," Max said. "That's one of those things you never know
at the time."

George looked up at the clock. It was a quarter past six. The door from
the street opened. A street-car motorman came in.

"Hello, George," he said. "Can I get supper?"

"Sam's gone out," George said. "He'll be back in about half an hour."

"I'd better go up the street," the motorman said. George looked at the
clock. It was twenty minutes past six.

"That was nice, bright boy," Max said. "You're a regular little
gentleman."

"He knew I'd blow his head off," Al said from the kitchen.

"No," said Max. "It ain't that. Bright boy is nice. He's a nice boy. I
like him."

At six-fifty-five George said: "He's not coming."

Two other people had been in the lunch-room. Once George had gone out to
the kitchen and made a ham-and-egg sandwich "to go" that a man wanted to
take with him. Inside the kitchen he saw Al, his derby hat tipped back,
sitting on a stool beside the wicket with the muzzle of a sawed-off
shotgun resting on the ledge. Nick and the cook were back to back in the
corner, a towel tied in each of their mouths. George had cooked the
sandwich, wrapped it up in oiled paper, put it in a bag, brought it in,
and the man had paid for it and gone out.

"Bright boy can do everything," Max said. "He can cook and everything.
You'd make some girl a nice wife, bright boy."

"Yes?" George said. "Your friend, Ole Andreson, isn't going to come."

"We'll give him ten minutes," Max said.

Max watched the mirror and the clock. The hands of the clock marked
seven o'clock, and then five minutes past seven.

"Come on, Al," said Max. "We better go. He's not coming."

"Better give him five minutes," Al said from the kitchen.

In the five minutes a man came in, and George explained that the cook
was sick.

"Why the hell don't you get another cook?" the man asked. "Aren't you
running a lunch-counter?" He went out.

"Come on, Al," Max said.

"What about the two bright boys and the nigger?"

"They're all right."

"You think so?"

"Sure. We're through with it."

"I don't like it," said Al. "It's sloppy. You talk too much."

"Oh, what the hell," said Max. "We got to keep amused, haven't we?"

"You talk too much, all the same," Al said. He came out from the
kitchen. The cut-off barrels of the shotgun made a slight bulge under
the waist of his too tight-fitting overcoat. He straightened his coat
with his gloved hands.

"So long, bright boy," he said to George. "You got a lot of luck."

"That's the truth," Max said. "You ought to play the races, bright boy."

The two of them went out the door. George watched them, through the
window, pass under the arc-light and cross the street. In their tight
overcoats and derby hats they looked like a vaudeville team. George went
back through the swinging-door into the kitchen and untied Nick and the
cook.

"I don't want any more of that," said Sam, the cook. "I don't want any
more of that."

Nick stood up. He had never had a towel in his mouth before.

"Say," he said. "What the hell?" He was trying to swagger it off.

"They were going to kill Ole Andreson," George said. "They were going to
shoot him when he came in to eat."

"Ole Andreson?"

"Sure."

The cook felt the corners of his mouth with his thumbs.

"They all gone?" he asked.

"Yeah," said George. "They're gone now."

"I don't like it," said the cook. "I don't like any of it at all."

"Listen," George said to Nick. "You better go see Ole Andreson."

"All right."

"You better not have anything to do with it at all," Sam, the cook,
said. "You better stay way out of it."

"Don't go if you don't want to," George said.

"Mixing up in this ain't going to get you anywhere," the cook said. "You
stay out of it."

"I'll go see him," Nick said to George. "Where does he live?"

The cook turned away.

"Little boys always know what they want to do," he said.

"He lives up at Hirsch's rooming-house," George said to Nick.

"I'll go up there."

Outside the arc-light shone through the bare branches of a tree. Nick
walked up the street beside the car-tracks and turned at the next
arc-light down a side-street. Three houses up the street was Hirsch's
rooming-house. Nick walked up the two steps and pushed the bell. A woman
came to the door.

"Is Ole Andreson here?"

"Do you want to see him?"

"Yes, if he's in."

Nick followed the woman up a flight of stairs and back to the end of a
corridor. She knocked on the door.

"Who is it?"

"It's somebody to see you, Mr. Andreson," the woman said.

"It's Nick Adams."

"Come in."

Nick opened the door and went into the room. Ole Andreson was lying on
the bed with all his clothes on. He had been a heavyweight prizefighter
and he was too long for the bed. He lay with his head on two pillows. He
did not look at Nick.

"What was it?" he asked.

"I was up at Henry's," Nick said, "and two fellows came in and tied up
me and the cook, and they said they were going to kill you."

It sounded silly when he said it. Ole Andreson said nothing.

"They put us out in the kitchen," Nick went on. "They were going to
shoot you when you came in to supper."

Ole Andreson looked at the wall and did not say anything.

"George thought I better come and tell you about it."

"There isn't anything I can do about it," Ole Andreson said.

"I'll tell you what they were like."

"I don't want to know what they were like," Ole Andreson said. He looked
at the wall. "Thanks for coming to tell me about it."

"That's all right."

Nick looked at the big man lying on the bed.

"Don't you want me to go and see the police?"

"No," Ole Andreson said. "That wouldn't do any good."

"Isn't there something I could do?"

"No. There ain't anything to do."

"Maybe it was just a bluff."

"No. It ain't just a bluff."

Ole Andreson rolled over toward the wall.

"The only thing is," he said, talking toward the wall, "I just can't
make up my mind to go out. I been in here all day."

"Couldn't you get out of town?"

"No," Ole Andreson said. "I'm through with all that running around."

He looked at the wall.

"There ain't anything to do now."

"Couldn't you fix it up some way?"

"No. I got in wrong." He talked in the same flat voice. "There ain't
anything to do. After a while I'll make up my mind to go out."

"I better go back and see George," Nick said.

"So long," said Ole Andreson. He did not look toward Nick. "Thanks for
coming around."

Nick went out. As he shut the door he saw Ole Andreson with all his
clothes on, lying on the bed looking at the wall.

"He's been in his room all day," the landlady said downstairs. "I guess
he don't feel well. I said to him: 'Mr. Andreson, you ought to go out
and take a walk on a nice fall day like this,' but he didn't feel like
it."

"He doesn't want to go out."

"I'm sorry he don't feel well," the woman said. "He's an awfully nice
man. He was in the ring, you know."

"I know it."

"You'd never know it except from the way his face is," the woman said.
They stood talking just inside the street door. "He's just as gentle."

"Well, good-night, Mrs. Hirsch," Nick said.

"I'm not Mrs. Hirsch," the woman said. "She owns the place. I just look
after it for her. I'm Mrs. Bell."

"Well, good-night, Mrs. Bell," Nick said.

"Good-night," the woman said.

Nick walked up the dark street to the corner under the arc-light, and
then along the car-tracks to Henry's eating-house. George was inside,
back of the counter.

"Did you see Ole?"

"Yes," said Nick. "He's in his room and he won't go out."

The cook opened the door from the kitchen when he heard Nick's voice.

"I don't even listen to it," he said and shut the door.

"Did you tell him about it?" George asked.

"Sure. I told him but he knows what it's all about."

"What's he going to do?"

"Nothing."

"They'll kill him."

"I guess they will."

"He must have got mixed up in something in Chicago."

"I guess so," said Nick.

"It's a hell of a thing."

"It's an awful thing," Nick said.

They did not say anything. George reached down for a towel and wiped the
counter.

"I wonder what he did?" Nick said.

"Double-crossed somebody. That's what they kill them for."

"I'm going to get out of this town," Nick said.

"Yes," said George. "That's a good thing to do."

"I can't stand to think about him waiting in the room and knowing he's
going to get it. It's too damned awful."

"Well," said George, "you better not think about it."




CHE TI DICE LA PATRIA?


The road of the pass was hard and smooth and not yet dusty in the early
morning. Below were the hills with oak and chestnut trees, and far away
below was the sea. On the other side were snowy mountains.

We came down from the pass through wooded country. There were bags of
charcoal piled beside the road, and through the trees we saw
charcoal-burners' huts. It was Sunday and the road, rising and falling,
but always dropping away from the altitude of the pass, went through the
scrub woods and through villages.

Outside the villages there were fields with vines. The fields were brown
and the vines coarse and thick. The houses were white, and in the
streets the men, in their Sunday clothes, were playing bowls. Against
the walls of some of the houses there were pear trees, their branches
candelabraed against the white walls. The pear trees had been sprayed,
and the walls of the houses were stained a metallic blue-green by the
spray vapor. There were small clearings around the villages where the
vines grew, and then the woods.

In a village, twenty kilometres above Spezia, there was a crowd in the
square, and a young man carrying a suitcase came up to the car and asked
us to take him in to Spezia.

"There are only two places, and they are occupied," I said. We had an
old Ford coupé.

"I will ride on the outside."

"You will be uncomfortable."

"That makes nothing. I must go to Spezia."

"Should we take him?" I asked Guy.

"He seems to be going anyway," Guy said. The young man handed in a
parcel through the window.

"Look after this," he said. Two men tied his suitcase on the back of the
car, above our suitcases. He shook hands with every one, explained that
to a Fascist and a man as used to travelling as himself there was no
discomfort, and climbed up on the running-board on the left-hand side of
the car, holding on inside, his right arm through the open window.

"You can start," he said. The crowd waved. He waved with his free hand.

"What did he say?" Guy asked me.

"That we could start."

"Isn't he nice?" Guy said.

The road followed a river. Across the river were mountains. The sun was
taking the frost out of the grass. It was bright and cold and the air
came cold through the open wind-shield.

"How do you think he likes it out there?" Guy was looking up the road.
His view out of his side of the car was blocked by our guest. The young
man projected from the side of the car like the figurehead of a ship. He
had turned his coat collar up and pulled his hat down and his nose
looked cold in the wind.

"Maybe he'll get enough of it," Guy said. "That's the side our bum
tire's on."

"Oh, he'd leave us if we blew out," I said. "He wouldn't get his
travelling-clothes dirty."

"Well, I don't mind him," Guy said--"except the way he leans out on the
turns."

The woods were gone; the road had left the river to climb; the radiator
was boiling; the young man looked annoyedly and suspiciously at the
steam and rusty water; the engine was grinding, with both Guy's feet on
the first-speed pedal, up and up, back and forth and up, and, finally,
out level. The grinding stopped, and in the new quiet there was a great
churning bubbling in the radiator. We were at the top of the last range
above Spezia and the sea. The road descended with short, barely rounded
turns. Our guest hung out on the turns and nearly pulled the top-heavy
car over.

"You can't tell him not to," I said to Guy. "It's his sense of
self-preservation."

"The great Italian sense."

"The greatest Italian sense."

We came down around curves, through deep dust, the dust powdering the
olive trees. Spezia spread below along the sea. The road flattened
outside the town. Our guest put his head in the window.

"I want to stop."

"Stop it," I said to Guy.

We slowed up, at the side of the road. The young man got down, went to
the back of the car and untied the suitcase.

"I stop here, so you won't get into trouble carrying passengers," he
said. "My package."

I handed him the package. He reached in his pocket.

"How much do I owe you?"

"Nothing."

"Why not?"

"I don't know," I said.

"Then thanks," the young man said, not "thank you," or "thank you very
much," or "thank you a thousand times," all of which you formerly said
in Italy to a man when he handed you a time-table or explained about a
direction. The young man uttered the lowest form of the word "thanks"
and looked after us suspiciously as Guy started the car. I waved my hand
at him. He was too dignified to reply. We went on into Spezia.

"That's a young man that will go a long way in Italy," I said to Guy.

"Well," said Guy, "he went twenty kilometres with us."

   A MEAL IN SPEZIA

We came into Spezia looking for a place to eat. The street was wide and
the houses high and yellow. We followed the tram-track into the centre
of town. On the walls of the houses were stencilled eye-bugging
portraits of Mussolini, with hand-painted "vivas," the double V in black
paint with drippings of paint down the wall. Side-streets went down to
the harbor. It was bright and the people were all out for Sunday. The
stone paving had been sprinkled and there were damp stretches in the
dust. We went close to the curb to avoid a tram.

"Let's eat somewhere simple," Guy said.

We stopped opposite two restaurant signs. We were standing across the
street and I was buying the papers. The two restaurants were side by
side. A woman standing in the doorway of one smiled at us and we crossed
the street and went in.

It was dark inside and at the back of the room three girls were sitting
at a table with an old woman. Across from us, at another table, sat a
sailor. He sat there neither eating nor drinking. Further back, a young
man in a blue suit was writing at a table. His hair was pomaded and
shining and he was very smartly dressed and clean-cut looking.

The light came through the doorway, and through the window where
vegetables, fruit, steaks, and chops were arranged in a show-case. A
girl came and took our order and another girl stood in the doorway. We
noticed that she wore nothing under her house dress. The girl who took
our order put her arm around Guy's neck while we were looking at the
menu. There were three girls in all, and they all took turns going and
standing in the doorway. The old woman at the table in the back of the
room spoke to them and they sat down again with her.

There was no doorway leading from the room except into the kitchen. A
curtain hung over it. The girl who had taken our order came in from the
kitchen with spaghetti. She put it on the table and brought a bottle of
red wine and sat down at the table.

"Well," I said to Guy, "you wanted to eat some place simple."

"This isn't simple. This is complicated."

"What do you say?" asked the girl. "Are you Germans?"

"South Germans," I said. "The South Germans are a gentle, lovable
people."

"Don't understand," she said.

"What's the mechanics of this place?" Guy asked. "Do I have to let her
put her arm around my neck?"

"Certainly," I said. "Mussolini has abolished the brothels. This is a
restaurant."

The girl wore a one-piece dress. She leaned forward against the table
and put her hands on her breasts and smiled. She smiled better on one
side than on the other and turned the good side toward us. The charm of
the good side had been enhanced by some event which had smoothed the
other side of her nose in, as warm wax can be smoothed. Her nose,
however, did not look like warm wax. It was very cold and firmed, only
smoothed in. "You like me?" she asked Guy.

"He adores you," I said. "But he doesn't speak Italian."

"Ich spreche Deutsch," she said, and stroked Guy's hair.

"Speak to the lady in your native tongue, Guy."

"Where do you come from?" asked the lady.

"Potsdam."

"And you will stay here now for a little while?"

"In this so dear Spezia?" I asked.

"Tell her we have to go," said Guy. "Tell her we are very ill, and have
no money."

"My friend is a misogynist," I said, "an old German misogynist."

"Tell him I love him."

I told him.

"Will you shut your mouth and get us out of here?" Guy said. The lady
had placed another arm around his neck. "Tell him he is mine," she said.
I told him.

"Will you get us out of here?"

"You are quarrelling," the lady said. "You do not love one another."

"We are Germans," I said proudly, "old South Germans."

"Tell him he is a beautiful boy," the lady said. Guy is thirty-eight and
takes some pride in the fact that he is taken for a travelling salesman
in France. "You are a beautiful boy," I said.

"Who says so?" Guy asked, "you or her?"

"She does. I'm just your interpreter. Isn't that what you got me in on
this trip for?"

"I'm glad it's her," said Guy. "I didn't want to have to leave you here
too."

"I don't know. Spezia's a lovely place."

"Spezia," the lady said. "You are talking about Spezia."

"Lovely place," I said.

"It is my country," she said. "Spezia is my home and Italy is my
country."

"She says that Italy is her country."

"Tell her it looks like her country," Guy said.

"What have you for dessert?" I asked.

"Fruit," she said. "We have bananas."

"Bananas are all right," Guy said. "They've got skins on."

"Oh, he takes bananas," the lady said. She embraced Guy.

"What does she say?" he asked, keeping his face out of the way.

"She is pleased because you take bananas."

"Tell her I don't take bananas."

"The Signor does not take bananas."

"Ah," said the lady, crestfallen, "he doesn't take bananas."

"Tell her I take a cold bath every morning," Guy said.

"The Signor takes a cold bath every morning."

"No understand," the lady said.

Across from us, the property sailor had not moved. No one in the place
paid any attention to him.

"We want the bill," I said.

"Oh, no. You must stay."

"Listen," the clean-cut young man said from the table where he was
writing, "let them go. These two are worth nothing."

The lady took my hand. "You won't stay? You won't ask him to stay?"

"We have to go," I said. "We have to get to Pisa, or if possible,
Firenze, to-night. We can amuse ourselves in those cities at the end of
the day. It is now the day. In the day we must cover distance."

"To stay a little while is nice."

"To travel is necessary during the light of day."

"Listen," the clean-cut young man said. "Don't bother to talk with these
two. I tell you they are worth nothing and I know."

"Bring us the bill," I said. She brought the bill from the old woman and
went back and sat at the table. Another girl came in from the kitchen.
She walked the length of the room and stood in the doorway.

"Don't bother with these two," the clean-cut young man said in a wearied
voice. "Come and eat. They are worth nothing."

We paid the bill and stood up. All the girls, the old woman, and the
clean-cut young man sat down at table together. The property sailor sat
with his head in his hands. No one had spoken to him all the time we
were at lunch. The girl brought us our change that the old woman counted
out for her and went back to her place at the table. We left a tip on
the table and went out. When we were seated in the car ready to start,
the girl came out and stood in the door. We started and I waved to her.
She did not wave, but stood there looking after us.

    AFTER THE RAIN

It was raining hard when we passed through the suburbs of Genoa and,
even going very slowly behind the tram-cars and the motor trucks, liquid
mud splashed on to the sidewalks, so that people stepped into doorways
as they saw us coming. In San Pier d'Arena, the industrial suburb
outside of Genoa, there is a wide street with two car-tracks and we
drove down the centre to avoid sending the mud on to the men going home
from work. On our left was the Mediterranean. There was a big sea
running and waves broke and the wind blew the spray against the car. A
river-bed that, when we had passed, going into Italy, had been wide,
stony and dry, was running brown, and up to the banks. The brown water
discolored the sea and as the waves thinned and cleared in breaking, the
light came through the yellow water and the crests, detached by the
wind, blew across the road.

A big car passed us, going fast, and a sheet of muddy water rose up and
over our wind-shield and radiator. The automatic wind-shield cleaner
moved back and forth, spreading the film over the glass. We stopped and
ate lunch at Sestri. There was no heat in the restaurant and we kept our
hats and coats on. We could see the car outside, through the window. It
was covered with mud and was stopped beside some boats that had been
pulled up beyond the waves. In the restaurant you could see your breath.

The _pasta asciuta_ was good; the wine tasted of alum, and we poured
water in it. Afterward the waiter brought beefsteak and fried potatoes.
A man and a woman sat at the far end of the restaurant. He was
middle-aged and she was young and wore black. All during the meal she
would blow out her breath in the cold damp air. The man would look at it
and shake his head. They ate without talking and the man held her hand
under the table. She was good-looking and they seemed very sad. They had
a travelling-bag with them.

We had the papers and I read the account of the Shanghai fighting aloud
to Guy. After the meal, he left with the waiter in search for a place
which did not exist in the restaurant, and I cleaned off the
wind-shield, the lights and the license plates with a rag. Guy came back
and we backed the car out and started. The waiter had taken him across
the road and into an old house. The people in the house were suspicious
and the waiter had remained with Guy to see nothing was stolen.

"Although I don't know how, me not being a plumber, they expected me to
steal anything," Guy said.

As we came up on a headland beyond the town, the wind struck the car and
nearly tipped it over.

"It's good it blows us away from the sea," Guy said.

"Well," I said, "they drowned Shelley somewhere along here."

"That was down by Viareggio," Guy said. "Do you remember what we came to
this country for?"

"Yes," I said, "but we didn't get it."

"We'll be out of it to-night."

"If we can get past Ventimiglia."

"We'll see. I don't like to drive this coast at night." It was early
afternoon and the sun was out. Below, the sea was blue with whitecaps
running toward Savona. Back, beyond the cape, the brown and blue waters
joined. Out ahead of us, a tramp steamer was going up the coast.

"Can you still see Genoa?" Guy asked.

"Oh, yes."

"That next big cape ought to put it out of sight."

"We'll see it a long time yet. I can still see Portofino Cape behind
it."

Finally we could not see Genoa. I looked back as we came out and there
was only the sea, and below in the bay, a line of beach with
fishing-boats and above, on the side of the hill, a town and then capes
far down the coast.

"It's gone now," I said to Guy.

"Oh, it's been gone a long time now."

"But we couldn't be sure till we got way out."

There was a sign with a picture of an S-turn and Svolta Pericolosa. The
road curved around the headland and the wind blew through the crack in
the wind-shield. Below the cape was a flat stretch beside the sea. The
wind had dried the mud and the wheels were beginning to lift dust. On
the flat road we passed a Fascist riding a bicycle, a heavy revolver in
a holster on his back. He held the middle of the road on his bicycle and
we turned out for him. He looked up at us as we passed. Ahead there was
a railway crossing, and as we came toward it the gates went down.

As we waited, the Fascist came up on his bicycle. The train went by and
Guy started the engine.

"Wait," the bicycle man shouted from behind the car. "Your number's
dirty."

I got out with a rag. The number had been cleaned at lunch.

"You can read it," I said.

"You think so?"

"Read it."

"I cannot read it. It is dirty."

I wiped it off with the rag.

"How's that?"

"Twenty-five lire."

"What?" I said. "You could have read it. It's only dirty from the state
of the roads."

"You don't like Italian roads?"

"They are dirty."

"Fifty lire." He spat in the road. "Your car is dirty and you are dirty
too."

"Good. And give me a receipt with your name."

He took out a receipt-book, made in duplicate, and perforated, so one
side could be given to the customer, and the other side filled in and
kept as a stub. There was no carbon to record what the customer's ticket
said.

"Give me fifty lire."

He wrote in indelible pencil, tore out the slip and handed it to me. I
read it.

"This is for twenty-five lire."

"A mistake," he said, and changed the twenty-five to fifty.

"And now the other side. Make it fifty in the part you keep."

He smiled a beautiful Italian smile and wrote something on the receipt
stub, holding it so I could not see.

"Go on," he said, "before your number gets dirty again."

We drove for two hours after it was dark and slept in Mentone that
night. It seemed very cheerful and clean and sane and lovely. We had
driven from Ventimiglia to Pisa and Florence, across the Romagna to
Rimini, back through Forli, Imola, Bologna, Parma, Piacenza and Genoa,
to Ventimiglia again. The whole trip had only taken ten days. Naturally,
in such a short trip, we had no opportunity to see how things were with
the country or the people.




     FIFTY GRAND


"How are you going yourself, Jack?" I asked him.

"You seen this, Walcott?" he says.

"Just in the gym."

"Well," Jack says, "I'm going to need a lot of luck with that boy."

"He can't hit you, Jack," Soldier said.

"I wish to hell he couldn't."

"He couldn't hit you with a handful of bird-shot."

"Bird-shot'd be all right," Jack says. "I wouldn't mind bird-shot any."

"He looks easy to hit," I said.

"Sure," Jack says, "he ain't going to last long. He ain't going to last
like you and me, Jerry. But right now he's got everything."

"You'll left-hand him to death."

"Maybe," Jack says. "Sure. I got a chance to."

"Handle him like you handled Kid Lewis."

"Kid Lewis," Jack said. "That kike!"

The three of us, Jack Brennan, Soldier Bartlett, and I were in
Handley's. There were a couple of broads sitting at the next table to
us. They had been drinking.

"What do you mean, kike?" one of the broads says. "What do you mean,
kike, you big Irish bum?"

"Sure," Jack says. "That's it."

"Kikes," this broad goes on. "They're always talking about kikes, these
big Irishmen. What do you mean, kikes?"

"Come on. Let's get out of here."

"Kikes," this broad goes on. "Whoever saw you ever buy a drink? Your
wife sews your pockets up every morning. These Irishmen and their kikes!
Ted Lewis could lick you too."

"Sure," Jack says. "And you give away a lot of things free too, don't
you?"

We went out. That was Jack. He could say what he wanted to when he
wanted to say it.

Jack started training out at Danny Hogan's health-farm over in Jersey.
It was nice out there but Jack didn't like it much. He didn't like being
away from his wife and the kids, and he was sore and grouchy most of the
time. He liked me and we got along fine together; and he liked Hogan,
but after a while Soldier Bartlett commenced to get on his nerves. A
kidder gets to be an awful thing around a camp if his stuff goes sort of
sour. Soldier was always kidding Jack, just sort of kidding him all the
time. It wasn't very funny and it wasn't very good, and it began to get
to Jack. It was sort of stuff like this. Jack would finish up with the
weights and the bag and pull on the gloves.

"You want to work?" he'd say to Soldier.

"Sure. How you want me to work?" Soldier would ask. "Want me to treat
you rough like Walcott? Want me to knock you down a few times?"

"That's it," Jack would say. He didn't like it any, though.

One morning we were all out on the road. We'd been out quite a way and
now we were coming back. We'd go along fast for three minutes and then
walk a minute, and then go fast for three minutes again. Jack wasn't
ever what you would call a sprinter. He'd move around fast enough in the
ring if he had to, but he wasn't any too fast on the road. All the time
we were walking Soldier was kidding him. We came up the hill to the
farmhouse.

"Well," says Jack, "you better go back to town, Soldier."

"What do you mean?"

"You better go back to town and stay there."

"What's the matter?"

"I'm sick of hearing you talk."

"Yes?" says Soldier.

"Yes," says Jack.

"You'll be a damn sight sicker when Walcott gets through with you."

"Sure," says Jack, "maybe I will. But I know I'm sick of you."

So Soldier went off on the train to town that same morning. I went down
with him to the train. He was good and sore.

"I was just kidding him," he said. We were waiting on the platform. "He
can't pull that stuff with me, Jerry."

"He's nervous and crabby," I said. "He's a good fellow, Soldier."

"The hell he is. The hell he's ever been a good fellow."

"Well," I said, "so long, Soldier."

The train had come in. He climbed up with his bag.

"So long, Jerry," he says. "You be in town before the fight?"

"I don't think so."

"See you then."

He went in and the conductor swung up and the train went out. I rode
back to the farm in the cart. Jack was on the porch writing a letter to
his wife. The mail had come and I got the papers and went over on the
other side of the porch and sat down to read. Hogan came out the door
and walked over to me.

"Did he have a jam with Soldier?"

"Not a jam," I said. "He just told him to go back to town."

"I could see it coming," Hogan said. "He never liked Soldier much."

"No. He don't like many people."

"He's a pretty cold one," Hogan said.

"Well, he's always been fine to me."

"Me too," Hogan said. "I got no kick on him. He's a cold one, though."

Hogan went in through the screen door and I sat there on the porch and
read the papers. It was just starting to get fall weather and it's nice
country there in Jersey, up in the hills, and after I read the paper
through I sat there and looked out at the country and the road down
below against the woods with cars going along it, lifting the dust up.
It was fine weather and pretty nice-looking country. Hogan came to the
door and I said, "Say, Hogan, haven't you got anything to shoot out
here?"

"No," Hogan said. "Only sparrows."

"Seen the paper?" I said to Hogan.

"What's in it?"

"Sande booted three of them in yesterday."

"I got that on the telephone last night."

"You follow them pretty close, Hogan?" I asked.

"Oh, I keep in touch with them," Hogan said.

"How about Jack?" I says. "Does he still play them?"

"Him?" said Hogan. "Can you see him doing it?"

Just then Jack came around the corner with the letter in his hand. He's
wearing a sweater and an old pair of pants and boxing shoes.

"Got a stamp, Hogan?" he asks.

"Give me the letter," Hogan said. "I'll mail it for you."

"Say, Jack," I said, "didn't you used to play the ponies?"

"Sure."

"I knew you did. I knew I used to see you out at Sheepshead."

"What did you lay off them for?" Hogan asked.

"Lost money."

Jack sat down on the porch by me. He leaned back against a post. He shut
his eyes in the sun.

"Want a chair?" Hogan asked.

"No," said Jack. "This is fine."

"It's a nice day," I said. "It's pretty nice out in the country."

"I'd a damn sight rather be in town with the wife."

"Well, you only got another week."

"Yes," Jack says. "That's so."

We sat there on the porch. Hogan was inside at the office.

"What do you think about the shape I'm in?" Jack asked me.

"Well, you can't tell," I said. "You got a week to get around into
form."

"Don't stall me."

"Well," I said, "you're not right."

"I'm not sleeping," Jack said.

"You'll be all right in a couple of days."

"No," says Jack, "I got the insomnia."

"What's on your mind?"

"I miss the wife."

"Have her come out."

"No. I'm too old for that."

"We'll take a long walk before you turn in and get you good and tired."

"Tired!" Jack says. "I'm tired all the time."

He was that way all week. He wouldn't sleep at night and he'd get up in
the morning feeling that way, you know, when you can't shut your hands.

"He's stale as poorhouse cake," Hogan said. "He's nothing."

"I never seen Walcott," I said.

"He'll kill him," said Hogan. "He'll tear him in two."

"Well," I said, "everybody's got to get it sometime."

"Not like this, though," Hogan said. "They'll think he never trained. It
gives the farm a black eye."

"You hear what the reporters said about him?"

"Didn't I! They said he was awful. They said they oughtn't to let him
fight."

"Well," I said, "they're always wrong, ain't they?"

"Yes," said Hogan. "But this time they're right."

"What the hell do they know about whether a man's right or not?"

"Well," said Hogan, "they're not such fools."

"All they did was pick Willard at Toledo. This Lardner, he's so wise
now, ask him about when he picked Willard at Toledo."

"Aw, he wasn't out," Hogan said. "He only writes the big fights."

"I don't care who they are," I said. "What the hell do they know? They
can write maybe, but what the hell do they know?"

"You don't think Jack's in any shape, do you?" Hogan asked.

"No. He's through. All he needs is to have Corbett pick him to win for
it to be all over."

"Well, Corbett'll pick him," Hogan says.

"Sure. He'll pick him."

That night Jack didn't sleep any either. The next morning was the last
day before the fight. After breakfast we were out on the porch again.

"What do you think about, Jack, when you can't sleep?" I said.

"Oh, I worry," Jack says. "I worry about property I got up in the Bronx,
I worry about property I got in Florida. I worry about the kids. I worry
about the wife. Sometimes I think about fights. I think about that kike
Ted Lewis and I get sore. I got some stocks and I worry about them. What
the hell don't I think about?"

"Well," I said, "to-morrow night it'll all be over."

"Sure," said Jack. "That always helps a lot, don't it? That just fixes
everything all up, I suppose. Sure."

He was sore all day. We didn't do any work. Jack just moved around a
little to loosen up. He shadow-boxed a few rounds. He didn't even look
good doing that. He skipped the rope a little while. He couldn't sweat.

"He'd be better not to do any work at all," Hogan said. We were standing
watching him skip rope. "Don't he ever sweat at all any more?"

"He can't sweat."

"Do you suppose he's got the con? He never had any trouble making
weight, did he?"

"No, he hasn't got any con. He just hasn't got anything inside any
more."

"He ought to sweat," said Hogan.

Jack came over, skipping the rope. He was skipping up and down in front
of us, forward and back, crossing his arms every third time.

"Well," he says. "What are you buzzards talking about?"

"I don't think you ought to work any more," Hogan says. "You'll be
stale."

"Wouldn't that be awful?" Jack says and skips away down the floor,
slapping the rope hard.

That afternoon John Collins showed up out at the farm. Jack was up in
his room. John, came out in a car from town. He had a couple of friends
with him. The car stopped and they all got out.

"Where's Jack?" John asked me.

"Up in his room, lying down."

"Lying down?"

"Yes," I said.

"How is he?"

I looked at the two fellows that were with John.

"They're friends of his," John said.

"He's pretty bad," I said.

"What's the matter with him?"

"He don't sleep."

"Hell," said John. "That Irishman could never sleep."

"He isn't right," I said.

"Hell," John said. "He's never right. I've had him for ten years and
he's never been right yet."

The fellows who were with him laughed.

"I want you to shake hands with Mr. Morgan and Mr. Steinfelt," John
said. "This is Mr. Doyle. He's been training Jack."

"Glad to meet you," I said.

"Let's go up and see the boy," the fellow called Morgan said.

"Let's have a look at him," Steinfelt said.

We all went upstairs.

"Where's Hogan?" John asked.

"He's out in the barn with a couple of his customers," I said.

"He got many people out here now?" John asked.

"Just two."

"Pretty quiet, ain't it?" Morgan said.

"Yes," I said. "It's pretty quiet."

We were outside Jack's room. John knocked on the door. There wasn't any
answer.

"Maybe he's asleep," I said.

"What the hell's he sleeping in the daytime for?"

John turned the handle and we all went in. Jack was lying asleep on the
bed. He was face down and his face was in the pillow. Both his arms were
around the pillow.

"Hey, Jack!" John said to him.

Jack's head moved a little on the pillow. "Jack!" John says, leaning
over him. Jack just dug a little deeper in the pillow. John touched him
on the shoulder. Jack sat up and looked at us. He hadn't shaved and he
was wearing an old sweater.

"Christ! Why can't you let me sleep?" he says to John.

"Don't be sore," John says. "I didn't mean to wake you up."

"Oh no," Jack says. "Of course not."

"You know Morgan and Steinfelt," John said.

"Glad to see you," Jack says.

"How do you feel, Jack," Morgan asks him.

"Fine," Jack says. "How the hell would I feel?"

"You look fine," Steinfelt says.

"Yes, don't I," says Jack. "Say," he says to John. "You're my manager.
You get a big enough cut. Why the hell don't you come out here when the
reporters was out! You want Jerry and me to talk to them?"

"I had Lew fighting in Philadelphia," John said.

"What the hell's that to me?" Jack says. "You're my manager. You get a
big enough cut, don't you? You aren't making me any money in
Philadelphia, are you? Why the hell aren't you out here when I ought to
have you?"

"Hogan was here."

"Hogan," Jack says. "Hogan's as dumb as I am."

"Soldier Bathlett was out here wukking with you for a while, wasn't he?"
Steinfelt said to change the subject.

"Yes, he was out here," Jack says. "He was out here all right."

"Say, Jerry," John said to me. "Would you go and find Hogan and tell him
we want to see him in about half an hour?"

"Sure," I said.

"Why the hell can't he stick around?" Jack says. "Stick around, Jerry."

Morgan and Steinfelt looked at each other.

"Quiet down, Jack," John said to him.

"I better go find Hogan," I said.

"All right, if you want to go," Jack says. "None of these guys are going
to send you away, though."

"I'll go find Hogan," I said.

Hogan was out in the gym in the barn. He had a couple of his health-farm
patients with the gloves on. They neither one wanted to hit the other,
for fear the other would come back and hit him.

"That'll do," Hogan said when he saw me come in. "You can stop the
slaughter. You gentlemen take a shower and Bruce will rub you down."

They climbed out through the ropes and Hogan came over to me.

"John Collins is out with a couple of friends to see Jack," I said.

"I saw them come up in the car."

"Who are the two fellows with John?"

"They're what you call wise boys," Hogan said. "Don't you know them
two?"

"No," I said.

"That's Happy Steinfelt and Lew Morgan. They got a pool-room."

"I been away a long time," I said.

"Sure," said Hogan. "That Happy Steinfelt's a big operator."

"I've heard his name," I said.

"He's a pretty smooth boy," Hogan said. "They're a couple of
sharpshooters."

"Well," I said. "They want to see us in half an hour."

"You mean they don't want to see us until a half an hour?"

"That's it."

"Come on in the office," Hogan said. "To hell with those sharpshooters."

After about thirty minutes or so Hogan and I went upstairs. We knocked
on Jack's door. They were talking inside the room.

"Wait a minute," somebody said.

"To hell with that stuff," Hogan said. "When you want to see me I'm down
in the office."

We heard the door unlock. Steinfelt opened it.

"Come on in, Hogan," he says. "We're all going to have a drink."

"Well," says Hogan. "That's something."

We went in. Jack was sitting on the bed. John and Morgan were sitting on
a couple of chairs. Steinfelt was standing up.

"You're a pretty mysterious lot of boys," Hogan said.

"Hello, Danny," John says.

"Hello, Danny," Morgan says and shakes hands.

Jack doesn't say anything. He just sits there on the bed. He ain't with
the others. He's all by himself. He was wearing an old blue jersey and
pants and had on boxing shoes. He needed a shave. Steinfelt and Morgan
were dressers. John was quite a dresser too. Jack sat there looking
Irish and tough.

Steinfelt brought out a bottle and Hogan brought in some glasses and
everybody had a drink. Jack and I took one and the rest of them went on
and had two or three each.

"Better save some for your ride back," Hogan said.

"Don't you worry. We got plenty," Morgan said.

Jack hadn't drunk anything since the one drink. He was standing up and
looking at them. Morgan was sitting on the bed where Jack had sat.

"Have a drink, Jack," John said and handed him the glass and the bottle.

"No," Jack said, "I never liked to go to these wakes."

They all laughed. Jack didn't laugh.

They were all feeling pretty good when they left. Jack stood on the
porch when they got into the car. They waved to him.

"So long," Jack said.

We had supper. Jack didn't say anything all during the meal except,
"Will you pass me this?" or "Will you pass me that?" The two health-farm
patients ate at the same table with us. They were pretty nice fellows.
After we finished eating we went out on the porch. It was dark early.

"Like to take a walk, Jerry?" Jack asked.

"Sure," I said.

We put on our coats and started out. It was quite a way down to the main
road and then we walked along the main road about a mile and a half.
Cars kept going by and we would pull out to the side until they were
past. Jack didn't say anything. After we had stepped out into the bushes
to let a big car go by Jack said, "To hell with this walking. Come on
back to Hogan's."

We went along a side road that cut up over the hill and cut across the
fields back to Hogan's. We could see the lights of the house up on the
hill. We came around to the front of the house and there standing in the
doorway was Hogan.

"Have a good walk?" Hogan asked.

"Oh, fine," Jack said. "Listen, Hogan. Have you got any liquor?"

"Sure," says Hogan. "What's the idea?"

"Send it up to the room," Jack says. "I'm going to sleep to-night."

"You're the doctor," Hogan says.

"Come on up to the room, Jerry," Jack says.

Upstairs Jack sat on the bed with his head in his hands.

"Ain't it a life?" Jack says.

Hogan brought in a quart of liquor and two glasses.

"Want some ginger-ale?"

"What do you think I want to do, get sick?"

"I just asked you," said Hogan.

"Have a drink?" said Jack.

"No, thanks," said Hogan. He went out.

"How about you, Jerry?"

"I'll have one with you," I said.

Jack poured out a couple of drinks. "Now," he said, "I want to take it
slow and easy."

"Put some water in it," I said.

"Yes," Jack said. "I guess that's better."

We had a couple of drinks without saying anything. Jack started to pour
me another.

"No," I said, "that's all I want."

"All right," Jack said. He poured himself out another big shot and put
water in it. He was lighting up a little.

"That was a fine bunch out here this afternoon," he said. "They don't
take any chances, those two."

Then a little later, "Well," he says, "they're right. What the hell's
the good in taking chances?"

"Don't you want another, Jerry?" he said. "Come on, drink along with
me."

"I don't need it, Jack," I said. "I feel all right."

"Just have one more," Jack said. It was softening him up.

"All right," I said.

Jack poured one for me and another big one for himself.

"You know," he said, "I like liquor pretty well. If I hadn't been boxing
I would have drunk quite a lot."

"Sure," I said.

"You know," he said, "I missed a lot, boxing."

"You made plenty of money."

"Sure, that's what I'm after. You know I miss a lot, Jerry."

"How do you mean?"

"Well," he says, "like about the wife. And being away from home so much.
It don't do my girls any good. 'Whose your old man?' some of those
society kids'll say to them. 'My old man's Jack Brennan.' That don't do
them any good."

"Hell," I said, "all that makes a difference is if they got dough."

"Well," says Jack, "I got the dough for them all right."

He poured out another drink. The bottle was about empty.

"Put some water in it," I said. Jack poured in some water.

"You know," he says, "you ain't got any idea how I miss the wife."

"Sure."

"You ain't got any idea. You can't have an idea what it's like."

"It ought to be better out in the country than in town."

"With me now," Jack said, "it don't make any difference where I am. You
can't have an idea what it's like."

"Have another drink."

"Am I getting soused? Do I talk funny?"

"You're coming on all right."

"You can't have an idea what it's like. They ain't anybody can have an
idea what it's like."

"Except the wife," I said.

"She knows," Jack said. "She knows all right. She knows. You bet she
knows."

"Put some water in that," I said.

"Jerry," says Jack, "you can't have an idea what it gets to be like."

He was good and drunk. He was looking at me steady. His eyes were sort
of too steady.

"You'll sleep all right," I said.

"Listen, Jerry," Jack says. "You want to make some money? Get some money
down on Walcott."

"Yes?"

"Listen, Jerry," Jack put down the glass. "I'm not drunk now, see? You
know what I'm betting on him? Fifty grand."

"That's a lot of dough."

"Fifty grand," Jack says, "at two to one. I'll get twenty-five thousand
bucks. Get some money on him, Jerry."

"It sounds good," I said.

"How can I beat him?" Jack says. "It ain't crooked. How can I beat him?
Why not make money on it?"

"Put some water in that," I said.

"I'm through after this fight," Jack says. "I'm through with it. I got
to take a beating. Why shouldn't I make money on it?"

"Sure."

"I ain't slept for a week," Jack says. "All night I lay awake and worry
my can off. I can't sleep, Jerry. You ain't got an idea what it's like
when you can't sleep."

"Sure."

"I can't sleep. That's all. I just can't sleep. What's the use of taking
care of yourself all these years when you can't sleep?"

"It's bad."

"You ain't got an idea what it's like, Jerry, when you can't sleep."

"Put some water in that," I said.

Well, about eleven o'clock Jack passes out and I put him to bed. Finally
he's so he can't keep from sleeping. I helped him get his clothes off
and got him into bed.

"You'll sleep all right, Jack," I said.

"Sure," Jack says, "I'll sleep now."

"Good-night, Jack," I said.

"Good-night, Jerry," Jack says. "You're the only friend I got."

"Oh, hell," I said.

"You're the only friend I got," Jack says, "the only friend I got."

"Go to sleep," I said.

"I'll sleep," Jack says.

Downstairs Hogan was sitting at the desk in the office reading the
papers. He looked up. "Well, you get your boy friend to sleep?" he asks.

"He's off."

"It's better for him than not sleeping," Hogan said.

"Sure."

"You'd have a hell of a time explaining that to these sport writers
though," Hogan said.

"Well, I'm going to bed myself," I said.

"Good-night," said Hogan.

In the morning I came downstairs about eight o'clock and got some
breakfast. Hogan had his two customers out in the barn doing exercises.
I went out and watched them.

"One! Two! Three! Four!" Hogan was counting for them. "Hello, Jerry," he
said. "Is Jack up yet?"

"No. He's still sleeping."

I went back to my room and packed up to go in to town. About nine-thirty
I heard Jack getting up in the next room. When I heard him go downstairs
I went down after him. Jack was sitting at the breakfast table. Hogan
had come in and was standing beside the table.

"How do you feel, Jack?" I asked him.

"Not so bad."

"Sleep well?" Hogan asked.

"I slept all right," Jack said. "I got a thick tongue but I ain't got a
head."

"Good," said Hogan. "That was good liquor."

"Put it on the bill," Jack says.

"What time you want to go into town?" Hogan asked.

"Before lunch," Jack says. "The eleven o'clock train."

"Sit down, Jerry," Jack said. Hogan went out.

I sat down at the table. Jack was eating a grape-fruit. When he'd find a
seed he'd spit it out in the spoon and dump it on the plate.

"I guess I was pretty stewed last night," he started.

"You drank some liquor."

"I guess I said a lot of fool things."

"You weren't bad."

"Where's Hogan?" he asked. He was through with the grape-fruit.

"He's out in front in the office."

"What did I say about betting on the fight?" Jack asked. He was holding
the spoon and sort of poking at the grape-fruit with it.

The girl came in with some ham and eggs and took away the grape-fruit.

"Bring me another glass of milk," Jack said to her. She went out.

"You said you had fifty grand on Walcott," I said.

"That's right," Jack said.

"That's a lot of money."

"I don't feel too good about it," Jack said.

"Something might happen."

"No," Jack said. "He wants the title bad. They'll be shooting with him
all right."

"You can't ever tell."

"No. He wants the title. It's worth a lot of money to him."

"Fifty grand is a lot of money," I said.

"It's business," said Jack. "I can't win. You know I can't win anyway."

"As long as you're in there you got a chance."

"No," Jack says. "I'm all through. It's just business."

"How do you feel?"

"Pretty good," Jack said. "The sleep was what I needed."

"You might go good."

"I'll give them a good show," Jack said.

After breakfast Jack called up his wife on the long-distance. He was
inside the booth telephoning.

"That's the first time he's called her up since he's out here," Hogan
said.

"He writes her every day."

"Sure," Hogan says, "a letter only costs two cents."

Hogan said good-by to us and Bruce, the nigger rubber, drove us down to
the train in the cart.

"Good-by, Mr. Brennan," Bruce said at the train, "I sure hope you knock
his can off."

"So long," Jack said. He gave Bruce two dollars. Bruce had worked on him
a lot. He looked kind of disappointed. Jack saw me looking at Bruce
holding the two dollars.

"It's all in the bill," he said. "Hogan charged me for the rubbing."

On the train going into town Jack didn't talk. He sat in the corner of
the seat with his ticket in his hat-band and looked out of the window.
Once he turned and spoke to me.

"I told the wife I'd take a room at the Shelby to-night," he said. "It's
just around the corner from the Garden. I can go up to the house
to-morrow morning."

"That's a good idea," I said. "Your wife ever see you fight, Jack?"

"No," Jack says. "She never seen me fight."

I thought he must be figuring on taking an awful beating if he doesn't
want to go home afterward. In town we took a taxi up to the Shelby. A
boy came out and took our bags and we went in to the desk.

"How much are the rooms?" Jack asked.

"We only have double rooms," the clerk says. "I can give you a nice
double room for ten dollars."

"That's too steep."

"I can give you a double room for seven dollars."

"With a bath?"

"Certainly."

"You might as well bunk with me, Jerry," Jack says.

"Oh," I said, "I'll sleep down at my brother-in-law's."

"I don't mean for you to pay it," Jack says. "I just want to get my
money's worth."

"Will you register, please?" the clerk says. He looked at the names.
"Number 238, Mister Brennan."

We went up in the elevator. It was a nice big room with two beds and a
door opening into a bath-room.

"This is pretty good," Jack says.

The boy who brought us up pulled up the curtains and brought in our
bags. Jack didn't make any move, so I gave the boy a quarter. We washed
up and Jack said we better go out and get something to eat.

We ate a lunch at Jimmey Handley's place. Quite a lot of the boys were
there. When we were about half through eating, John came in and sat down
with us. Jack didn't talk much.

"How are you on the weight, Jack?" John asked him. Jack was putting away
a pretty good lunch.

"I could make it with my clothes on," Jack said. He never had to worry
about taking off weight. He was a natural welter-weight and he'd never
gotten fat. He'd lost weight out at Hogan's.

"Well, that's one thing you never had to worry about," John said.

"That's one thing," Jack says.

We went around to the garden to weigh in after lunch. The match was made
at a hundred forty-seven pounds at three o'clock. Jack stepped on the
scales with a towel around him. The bar didn't move. Walcott had just
weighed and was standing with a lot of people around him.

"Let's see what you weigh, Jack," Freedman, Walcott's manager said.

"All right, weigh _him_ then," Jack jerked his head toward Walcott.

"Drop the towel," Freedman said.

"What do you make it?" Jack asked the fellows who were weighing.

"One hundred and forty-three pounds," the fat man who was weighing said.

"You're down fine, Jack," Freedman says.

"Weigh _him_," Jack says.

Walcott came over. He was a blond with wide shoulders and arms like a
heavyweight. He didn't have much legs. Jack stood about half a head
taller than he did.

"Hello, Jack," he said. His face was plenty marked up.

"Hello," said Jack. "How you feel?"

"Good," Walcott says. He dropped the towel from around his waist and
stood on the scales. He had the widest shoulders and back you ever saw.

"One hundred and forty-six pounds and twelve ounces."

Walcott stepped off and grinned at Jack.

"Well," John says to him, "Jack's spotting you about four pounds."

"More than that when I come in, kid," Walcott says. "I'm going to go and
eat now."

We went back and Jack got dressed. "He's a pretty tough-looking boy,"
Jack says to me.

"He looks as though he'd been hit plenty of times."

"Oh, yes," Jack says. "He ain't hard to hit."

"Where are you going?" John asked when Jack was dressed.

"Back to the hotel," Jack says. "You looked after everything?"

"Yes," John says. "It's all looked after."

"I'm going to lie down a while," Jack says.

"I'll come around for you about a quarter to seven and we'll go and
eat."

"All right."

Up at the hotel Jack took off his shoes and his coat and lay down for a
while. I wrote a letter. I looked over a couple of times and Jack wasn't
sleeping. He was lying perfectly still but every once in a while his
eyes would open. Finally he sits up.

"Want to play some cribbage, Jerry?" he says.

"Sure," I said.

He went over to his suitcase and got out the cards and the cribbage
board. We played cribbage and he won three dollars off me. John knocked
at the door and came in.

"Want to play some cribbage, John?" Jack asked him.

John put his kelly down on the table. It was all wet. His coat was wet
too.

"Is it raining?" Jack asks.

"It's pouring," John says. "The taxi I had, got tied up in the traffic
and I got out and walked."

"Come on, play some cribbage," Jack says.

"You ought to go and eat."

"No," says Jack. "I don't want to eat yet."

So they played cribbage for about half an hour and Jack won a dollar and
a half off him.

"Well, I suppose we got to go eat," Jack says. He went to the window and
looked out.

"Is it still raining?"

"Yes."

"Let's eat in the hotel," John says.

"All right," Jack says, "I'll play you once more to see who pays for the
meal."

After a little while Jack gets up and says, "You buy the meal, John,"
and we went downstairs and ate in the big dining-room.

After we ate we went upstairs and Jack played cribbage with John again
and won two dollars and a half off him. Jack was feeling pretty good.
John had a bag with him with all his stuff in it. Jack took off his
shirt and collar and put on a jersey and a sweater, so he wouldn't catch
cold when he came out, and put his ring clothes and his bathrobe in a
bag.

"You all ready?" John asks him. "I'll call up and have them get a taxi."

Pretty soon the telephone rang and they said the taxi was waiting.

We rode down in the elevator and went out through the lobby, and got in
a taxi and rode around to the Garden. It was raining hard but there was
a lot of people outside on the streets. The Garden was sold out. As we
came in on our way to the dressing-room I saw how full it was. It looked
like half a mile down to the ring. It was all dark. Just the lights over
the ring.

"It's a good thing, with this rain, they didn't try and pull this fight
in the ball park," John said.

"They got a good crowd," Jack says.

"This is a fight that would draw a lot more than the Garden could hold."

"You can't tell about the weather," Jack says.

John came to the door of the dressing-room and poked his head in. Jack
was sitting there with his bathrobe on, he had his arms folded and was
looking at the floor. John had a couple of handlers with him. They
looked over his shoulder. Jack looked up.

"Is he in?" he asked.

"He's just gone down," John said.

We started down. Walcott was just getting into the ring. The crowd gave
him a big hand. He climbed through between the ropes and put his two
fists together and smiled, and shook them at the crowd, first at one
side of the ring, then at the other, and then sat down. Jack got a good
hand coming down through the crowd. Jack is Irish and the Irish always
get a pretty good hand. An Irishman don't draw in New York like a Jew or
an Italian but they always get a good hand. Jack climbed up and bent
down to go through the ropes and Walcott came over from his corner and
pushed the rope down for Jack to go through. The crowd thought that was
wonderful. Walcott put his hand on Jack's shoulder and they stood there
just for a second.

"So you're going to be one of these popular champions," Jack says to
him. "Take your goddam hand off my shoulder."

"Be yourself," Walcott says.

This is all great for the crowd. How gentlemanly the boys are before the
fight! How they wish each other luck!

Solly Freedman came over to our corner while Jack is bandaging his hands
and John is over in Walcott's corner. Jack puts his thumb through the
slit in the bandage and then wrapped his hand nice and smooth. I taped
it around the wrist and twice across the knuckles.

"Hey," Freedman says. "Where do you get all that tape?"

"Feel of it," Jack says. "It's soft, ain't it? Don't be a hick."

Freedman stands there all the time while Jack bandages the other hand,
and one of the boys that's going to handle him brings the gloves and I
pull them on and work them around.

"Say, Freedman," Jack asks, "what nationality is this Walcott?"

"I don't know," Solly says. "He's some sort of a Dane."

"He's a Bohemian," the lad who brought the gloves said.

The referee called them out to the centre of the ring and Jack walks
out. Walcott comes out smiling. They met and the referee put his arm on
each of their shoulders.

"Hello, popularity," Jack says to Walcott.

"Be yourself."

"What do you call yourself 'Walcott' for?" Jack says. "Didn't you know
he was a nigger?"

"Listen--" says the referee, and he gives them the same old line. Once
Walcott interrupts him. He grabs Jack's arm and says, "Can I hit when
he's got me like this?"

"Keep your hands off me," Jack says. "There ain't no moving-pictures of
this."

They went back to their corners. I lifted the bathrobe off Jack and he
leaned on the ropes and flexed his knees a couple of times and scuffed
his shoes in the rosin. The gong rang and Jack turned quick and went
out. Walcott came toward him and they touched gloves and as soon as
Walcott dropped his hands Jack jumped his left into his face twice.
There wasn't anybody ever boxed better than Jack. Walcott was after him,
going forward all the time with his chin on his chest. He's a hooker and
he carries his hands pretty low. All he knows is to get in there and
sock. But every time he gets in there close, Jack has the left hand in
his face. It's just as though it's automatic. Jack just raises the left
hand up and it's in Walcott's face. Three or four times Jack brings the
right over but Walcott gets it on the shoulder or high up on the head.
He's just like all these hookers. The only thing he's afraid of is
another one of the same kind. He's covered everywhere you can hurt him.
He don't care about a left-hand in his face.

After about four rounds Jack has him bleeding bad and his face all cut
up, but every time Walcott's got in close he's socked so hard he's got
two big red patches on both sides just below Jack's ribs. Every time he
gets in close, Jack ties him up, then gets one hand loose and uppercuts
him, but when Walcott gets his hands loose he socks Jack in the body so
they can hear it outside in the street. He's a socker.

It goes along like that for three rounds more. They don't talk any.
They're working all the time. We worked over Jack plenty too, in between
the rounds. He don't look good at all but he never does much work in the
ring. He don't move around much and that left-hand is just automatic.
It's just like it was connected with Walcott's face and Jack just had to
wish it in every time. Jack is always calm in close and he doesn't waste
any juice. He knows everything about working in close too and he's
getting away with a lot of stuff. While they were in our corner I
watched him tie Walcott up, get his right hand loose, turn it and come
up with an uppercut that got Walcott's nose with the heel of the glove.
Walcott was bleeding bad and leaned his nose on Jack's shoulder so as to
give Jack some of it too, and Jack sort of lifted his shoulder sharp and
caught him against the nose, and then brought down the right hand and
did the same thing again.

Walcott was sore as hell. By the time they'd gone five rounds he hated
Jack's guts. Jack wasn't sore; that is, he wasn't any sorer than he
always was. He certainly did used to make the fellows he fought hate
boxing. That was why he hated Kid Lewis so. He never got the Kid's goat.
Kid Lewis always had about three new dirty things Jack couldn't do. Jack
was as safe as a church all the time he was in there, as long as he was
strong. He certainly was treating Walcott rough. The funny thing was it
looked as though Jack was an open classic boxer. That was because he had
all that stuff too.

After the seventh round Jack says, "My left's getting heavy."

From then he started to take a beating. It didn't show at first. But
instead of him running the fight it was Walcott was running it, instead
of being safe all the time now he was in trouble. He couldn't keep him
out with the left hand now. It looked as though it was the same as ever,
only now instead of Walcott's punches just missing him they were just
hitting him. He took an awful beating in the body.

"What's the round?" Jack asked.

"The eleventh."

"I can't stay," Jack says. "My legs are going bad."

Walcott had been just hitting him for a long time. It was like a
baseball catcher pulls the ball and takes some of the shock off. From
now on Walcott commenced to land solid. He certainly was a
socking-machine. Jack was just trying to block everything now. It didn't
show what an awful beating he was taking. In between the rounds I worked
on his legs. The muscles would flutter under my hands all the time I was
rubbing them. He was sick as hell.

"How's it go?" he asked John, turning around, his face all swollen.

"It's his fight."

"I think I can last," Jack says. "I don't want this bohunk to stop me."

It was going just the way he thought it would. He knew he couldn't beat
Walcott. He wasn't strong any more. He was all right though. His money
was all right and now he wanted to finish it off right to please
himself. He didn't want to be knocked out.

The gong rang and we pushed him out. He went out slow. Walcott came
right out after him. Jack put the left in his face and Walcott took it,
came in under it and started working on Jack's body. Jack tried to tie
him up and it was just like trying to hold on to a buzz-saw. Jack broke
away from it and missed with the right. Walcott clipped him with a
left-hook and Jack went down. He went down on his hands and knees and
looked at us. The referee started counting. Jack was watching us and
shaking his head. At eight John motioned to him. You couldn't hear on
account of the crowd. Jack got up. The referee had been holding Walcott
back with one arm while he counted.

When Jack was on his feet Walcott started toward him.

"Watch yourself, Jimmy," I heard Solly Freedman yell to him.

Walcott came up to Jack looking at him. Jack stuck the left hand at him.
Walcott just shook his head. He backed Jack up against the ropes,
measured him and then hooked the left very light to the side of Jack's
head and socked the right into the body as hard as he could sock, just
as low as he could get it. He must have hit him five inches below the
belt. I thought the eyes would come out of Jack's head. They stuck way
out. His mouth come open.

The referee grabbed Walcott. Jack stepped forward. If he went down there
went fifty thousand bucks. He walked as though all his insides were
going to fall out.

"It wasn't low," he said. "It was a accident."

The crowd were yelling so you couldn't hear anything.

"I'm all right," Jack says. They were right in front of us. The referee
looks at John and then he shakes his head.

"Come on, you polak son-of-a-bitch," Jack says to Walcott.

John was hanging onto the ropes. He had the towel ready to chuck in.
Jack was standing just a little way out from the ropes. He took a step
forward. I saw the sweat come out on his face like somebody had squeezed
it and a big drop went down his nose.

"Come on and fight," Jack says to Walcott.

The referee looked at John and waved Walcott on.

"Go in there, you slob," he says.

Walcott went in. He didn't know what to do either. He never thought Jack
could have stood it. Jack put the left in his face. There was such a
hell of a lot of yelling going on. They were right in front of us.
Walcott hit him twice. Jack's face was the worst thing I ever saw,--the
look on it! He was holding himself and all his body together and it all
showed on his face. All the time he was thinking and holding his body in
where it was busted.

Then he started to sock. His face looked awful all the time. He started
to sock with his hands low down by his side, swinging at Walcott.
Walcott covered up and Jack was swinging wild at Walcott's head. Then he
swung the left and it hit Walcott in the groin and the right hit Walcott
right bang where he'd hit Jack. Way low below the belt. Walcott went
down and grabbed himself there and rolled and twisted around.

The referee grabbed Jack and pushed him toward his corner. John jumps
into the ring. There was all this yelling going on. The referee was
talking with the judges and then the announcer got into the ring with
the megaphone and says, "Walcott on a foul."

The referee is talking to John and he says, "What could I do? Jack
wouldn't take the foul. Then when he's groggy he fouls him."

"He'd lost it anyway," John says.

Jack's sitting on the chair. I've got his gloves off and he's holding
himself in down there with both hands. When he's got something
supporting it his face doesn't look so bad.

"Go over and say you're sorry," John says into his ear. "It'll look
good."

Jack stands up and the sweat comes out all over his face. I put the
bathrobe around him and he holds himself in with one hand under the
bathrobe and goes across the ring. They've picked Walcott up and they're
working on him. There're a lot of people in Walcott's corner. Nobody
speaks to Jack. He leans over Walcott.

"I'm sorry," Jack says. "I didn't mean to foul you."

Walcott doesn't say anything. He looks too damned sick.

"Well, you're the champion now," Jack says to him. "I hope you get a
hell of a lot of fun out of it."

"Leave the kid alone," Solly Freedman says.

"Hello, Solly," Jack says. "I'm sorry I fouled your boy."

Freedman just looks at him.

Jack went to his corner walking that funny jerky way and we got him down
through the ropes and through the reporters' tables and out down the
aisle. A lot of people want to slap Jack on the back. He goes out
through all that mob in his bathrobe to the dressing-room. It's a
popular win for Walcott. That's the way the money was bet in the Garden.

Once we got inside the dressing-room Jack lay down and shut his eyes.

"We want to get to the hotel and get a doctor," John says.

"I'm all busted inside," Jack says.

"I'm sorry as hell, Jack," John says.

"It's all right," Jack says.

He lies there with his eyes shut.

"They certainly tried a nice double-cross," John said.

"Your friends Morgan and Steinfelt," Jack said. "You got nice friends."

He lies there, his eyes are open now. His face has still got that awful
drawn look.

"It's funny how fast you can think when it means that much money," Jack
says.

"You're some boy, Jack," John says.

"No," Jack says. "It was nothing."




   A SIMPLE ENQUIRY


Outside, the snow was higher than the window. The sunlight came in
through the window and shone on a map on the pine-board wall of the hut.
The sun was high and the light came in over the top of the snow. A
trench had been cut along the open side of the hut, and each clear day
the sun, shining on the wall, reflected heat against the snow and
widened the trench. It was late March. The major sat at a table against
the wall. His adjutant sat at another table.

Around the major's eyes were two white circles where his snow-glasses
had protected his face from the sun on the snow. The rest of his face
had been burned and then tanned and then burned through the tan. His
nose was swollen and there were edges of loose skin where blisters had
been. While he worked at the papers he put the fingers of his left hand
into a saucer of oil and then spread the oil over his face, touching it
very gently with the tips of his fingers. He was very careful to drain
his fingers on the edge of the saucer so there was only a film of oil on
them, and after he had stroked his forehead and his cheeks, he stroked
his nose very delicately between his fingers. When he had finished he
stood up, took the saucer of oil and went into the small room of the hut
where he slept. "I'm going to take a little sleep," he said to the
adjutant. In that army an adjutant is not a commissioned officer. "You
will finish up."

"Yes, signor maggiore," the adjutant answered. He leaned back in his
chair and yawned. He took a paper-covered book out of the pocket of his
coat and opened it; then laid it down on the table and lit his pipe. He
leaned forward on the table to read and puffed at his pipe. Then he
closed the book and put it back in his pocket. He had too much
paper-work to get through. He could not enjoy reading until it was done.
Outside, the sun went behind a mountain and there was no more light on
the wall of the hut. A soldier came in and put some pine branches,
chopped into irregular lengths, into the stove. "Be soft, Pinin," the
adjutant said to him. "The major is sleeping."

Pinin was the major's orderly. He was a dark-faced boy, and he fixed the
stove, putting the pine wood in carefully, shut the door, and went into
the back of the hut again. The adjutant went on with his papers.

"Tonani," the major called.

"Signor maggiore?"

"Send Pinin in to me."

"Pinin!" the adjutant called. Pinin came into the room. "The major wants
you," the adjutant said.

Pinin walked across the main room of the hut toward the major's door. He
knocked on the half-opened door. "Signor maggiore?"

"Come in," the adjutant heard the major say, "and shut the door."

Inside the room the major lay on his bunk. Pinin stood beside the bunk.
The major lay with his head on the rucksack that he had stuffed with
spare clothing to make a pillow. His long, burned, oiled face looked at
Pinin. His hands lay on the blankets.

"You are nineteen?" he asked.

"Yes, signor maggiore."

"You have ever been in love?"

"How do you mean, signor maggiore?"

"In love--with a girl?"

"I have been with girls."

"I did not ask that. I asked if you had been in love--with a girl."

"Yes, signor maggiore."

"You are in love with this girl now? You don't write her. I read all
your letters."

"I am in love with her," Pinin said, "but I do not write her."

"You are sure of this?"

"I am sure."

"Tonani," the major said in the same tone of voice, "can you hear me
talking?"

There was no answer from the next room.

"He can not hear," the major said. "And you are quite sure that you love
a girl?"

"I am sure."

"And," the major looked at him quickly, "that you are not corrupt?"

"I don't know what you mean, corrupt."

"All right," the major said. "You needn't be superior."

Pinin looked at the floor. The major looked at his brown face, down and
up him, and at his hands. Then he went on, not smiling, "And you don't
really want--" the major paused. Pinin looked at the floor. "That your
great desire isn't really--" Pinin looked at the floor. The major leaned
his head back on the rucksack and smiled. He was really relieved: life
in the army was too complicated. "You're a good boy," he said. "You're a
good boy, Pinin. But don't be superior and be careful some one else
doesn't come along and take you."

Pinin stood still beside the bunk.

"Don't be afraid," the major said. His hands were folded on the
blankets. "I won't touch you. You can go back to your platoon if you
like. But you had better stay on as my servant. You've less chance of
being killed."

"Do you want anything of me, signor maggiore?"

"No," the major said. "Go on and get on with whatever you were doing.
Leave the door open when you go out."

Pinin went out, leaving the door open. The adjutant looked up at him as
he walked awkwardly across the room and out the door. Pinin was flushed
and moved differently than he had moved when he brought in the wood for
the fire. The adjutant looked after him and smiled. Pinin came in with
more wood for the stove. The major, lying on his bunk, looking at his
cloth-covered helmet and his snow-glasses that hung from a nail on the
wall, heard him walk across the floor. The little devil, he thought, I
wonder if he lied to me.




     TEN INDIANS


After one Fourth of July, Nick, driving home late from town in the big
wagon with Joe Garner and his family, passed nine drunken Indians along
the road. He remembered there were nine because Joe Garner, driving
along in the dusk, pulled up the horses, jumped down into the road and
dragged an Indian out of the wheel rut. The Indian had been asleep, face
down in the sand. Joe dragged him into the bushes and got back up on the
wagon-box.

"That makes nine of them," Joe said, "just between here and the edge of
town."

"Them Indians," said Mrs. Garner.

Nick was on the back seat with the two Garner boys. He was looking out
from the back seat to see the Indian where Joe had dragged him alongside
of the road.

"Was it Billy Tabeshaw?" Carl asked.

"No."

"His pants looked mighty like Billy."

"All Indians wear the same kind of pants."

"I didn't see him at all," Frank said. "Pa was down into the road and
back up again before I seen a thing. I thought he was killing a snake."

"Plenty of Indians'll kill snakes to-night, I guess," Joe Garner said.

"Them Indians," said Mrs. Garner.

They drove along. The road turned off from the main highway and went up
into the hills. It was hard pulling for the horses and the boys got down
and walked. The road was sandy. Nick looked back from the top of the
hill by the schoolhouse. He saw the lights of Petoskey and, off across
Little Traverse Bay, the lights of Harbour Springs. They climbed back in
the wagon again.

"They ought to put some gravel on that stretch," Joe Garner said. The
wagon went along the road through the woods. Joe and Mrs. Garner sat
close together on the front seat. Nick sat between the two boys. The
road came out into a clearing.

"Right here was where Pa ran over the skunk."

"It was further on."

"It don't make no difference where it was," Joe said without turning his
head. "One place is just as good as another to run over a skunk."

"I saw two skunks last night," Nick said.

"Where?"

"Down by the lake. They were looking for dead fish along the beach."

"They were coons probably," Carl said.

"They were skunks. I guess I know skunks."

"You ought to," Carl said. "You got an Indian girl."

"Stop talking that way, Carl," said Mrs. Garner.

"Well, they smell about the same."

Joe Garner laughed.

"You stop laughing, Joe," Mrs. Garner said. "I won't have Carl talk that
way."

"Have you got an Indian girl, Nickie?" Joe asked.

"No."

"He has too, Pa," Frank said. "Prudence Mitchell's his girl."

"She's not."

"He goes to see her every day."

"I don't." Nick, sitting between the two boys in the dark, felt hollow
and happy inside himself to be teased about Prudence Mitchell. "She
ain't my girl," he said.

"Listen to him," said Carl. "I see them together every day."

"Carl can't get a girl," his mother said, "not even a squaw."

Carl was quiet.

"Carl ain't no good with girls," Frank said.

"You shut up."

"You're all right, Carl," Joe Garner said. "Girls never got a man
anywhere. Look at your pa."

"Yes, that's what you would say," Mrs. Garner moved close to Joe as the
wagon jolted. "Well, you had plenty of girls in your time."

"I'll bet Pa wouldn't ever have had a squaw for a girl."

"Don't you think it," Joe said. "You better watch out to keep Prudie,
Nick."

His wife whispered to him and Joe laughed.

"What you laughing at?" asked Frank.

"Don't you say it, Garner," his wife warned. Joe laughed again.

"Nickie can have Prudence," Joe Garner said. "I got a good girl."

"That's the way to talk," Mrs. Garner said.

The horses were pulling heavily in the sand. Joe reached out in the dark
with the whip.

"Come on, pull into it. You'll have to pull harder than this to-morrow."

They trotted down the long hill, the wagon jolting. At the farmhouse
everybody got down. Mrs. Garner unlocked the door, went inside, and came
out with a lamp in her hand. Carl and Nick unloaded the things from the
back of the wagon. Frank sat on the front seat to drive to the barn and
put up the horses. Nick went up the steps and opened the kitchen door.
Mrs. Garner was building a fire in the stove. She turned from pouring
kerosene on the wood.

"Good-by, Mrs. Garner," Nick said. "Thanks for taking me."

"Oh shucks, Nickie."

"I had a wonderful time."

"We like to have you. Won't you stay and eat some supper?"

"I better go. I think Dad probably waited for me."

"Well, get along then. Send Carl up to the house, will you?"

"All right."

"Good-night, Nickie."

"Good-night, Mrs. Garner."

Nick went out the farmyard and down to the barn. Joe and Frank were
milking.

"Good-night," Nick said. "I had a swell time."

"Good-night, Nick," Joe Garner called. "Aren't you going to stay and
eat?"

"No, I can't. Will you tell Carl his mother wants him?"

"All right. Good-night, Nickie."

Nick walked barefoot along the path through the meadow below the barn.
The path was smooth and the dew was cool on his bare feet. He climbed a
fence at the end of the meadow, went down through a ravine, his feet wet
in the swamp mud, and then climbed up through the dry beech woods until
he saw the lights of the cottage. He climbed over the fence and walked
around to the front porch. Through the window he saw his father sitting
by the table, reading in the light from the big lamp. Nick opened the
door and went in.

"Well, Nickie," his father said, "was it a good day?"

"I had a swell time, Dad. It was a swell Fourth of July."

"Are you hungry?"

"You bet."

"What did you do with your shoes?"

"I left them in the wagon at Garner's."

"Come on out to the kitchen."

Nick's father went ahead with the lamp. He stopped and lifted the lid of
the ice-box. Nick went on into the kitchen. His father brought in a
piece of cold chicken on a plate and a pitcher of milk and put them on
the table before Nick. He put down the lamp.

"There's some pie too," he said. "Will that hold you?"

"It's grand."

His father sat down in a chair beside the oilcloth-covered table. He
made a big shadow on the kitchen wall.

"Who won the ball game?"

"Petoskey. Five to three."

His father sat watching him eat and filled his glass from the
milk-pitcher. Nick drank and wiped his mouth on his napkin. His father
reached over to the shelf for the pie. He cut Nick a big piece. It was
huckleberry pie.

"What did you do, Dad?"

"I went out fishing in the morning."

"What did you get?"

"Only perch."

His father sat watching Nick eat the pie.

"What did you do this afternoon?" Nick asked.

"I went for a walk up by the Indian camp."

"Did you see anybody?"

"The Indians were all in town getting drunk."

"Didn't you see anybody at all?"

"I saw your friend, Prudie."

"Where was she?"

"She was in the woods with Frank Washburn. I ran onto them. They were
having quite a time."

His father was not looking at him.

"What were they doing?"

"I didn't stay to find out."

"Tell me what they were doing."

"I don't know," his father said. "I just heard them threshing around."

"How did you know it was them?"

"I saw them."

"I thought you said you didn't see them."

"Oh, yes, I saw them."

"Who was it with her?" Nick asked.

"Frank Washburn."

"Were they--were they----"

"Were they what?"

"Were they happy?"

"I guess so."

His father got up from the table and went out the kitchen screen door.
When he came back Nick was looking at his plate. He had been crying.

"Have some more?" His father picked up the knife to cut the pie.

"No," said Nick.

"You better have another piece."

"No, I don't want any."

His father cleared off the table.

"Where were they in the woods?" Nick asked.

"Up back of the camp." Nick looked at his plate. His father said, "You
better go to bed, Nick."

"All right."

Nick went into his room, undressed, and got into bed. He heard his
father moving around in the living-room. Nick lay in the bed with his
face in the pillow.

"My heart's broken," he thought. "If I feel this way my heart must be
broken."

After a while he heard his father blow out the lamp and go into his own
room. He heard a wind come up in the trees outside and felt it come in
cool through the screen. He lay for a long time with his face in the
pillow, and after a while he forgot to think about Prudence and finally
he went to sleep. When he awoke in the night he heard the wind in the
hemlock trees outside the cottage and the waves of the lake coming in on
the shore, and he went back to sleep. In the morning there was a big
wind blowing and the waves were running high up on the beach and he was
awake a long time before he remembered that his heart was broken.




   A CANARY FOR ONE


The train passed very quickly a long, red stone house with a garden and
four thick palm-trees with tables under them in the shade. On the other
side was the sea. Then there was a cutting through red stone and clay,
and the sea was only occasionally and far below against rocks.

"I bought him in Palermo," the American lady said. "We only had an hour
ashore and it was Sunday morning. The man wanted to be paid in dollars
and I gave him a dollar and a half. He really sings very beautifully."

It was very hot in the train and it was very hot in the _lit salon_
compartment. There was no breeze came through the open window. The
American lady pulled the window-blind down and there was no more sea,
even occasionally. On the other side there was glass, then the corridor,
then an open window, and outside the window were dusty trees and an
oiled road and flat fields of grapes, with gray-stone hills behind them.

There was smoke from many tall chimneys--coming into Marseilles, and the
train slowed down and followed one track through many others into the
station. The train stayed twenty-five minutes in the station at
Marseilles and the American lady bought a copy of _The Daily Mail_ and a
half-bottle of Evian water. She walked a little way along the station
platform, but she stayed near the steps of the car because at Cannes,
where it stopped for twelve minutes, the train had left with no signal
of departure and she had only gotten on just in time. The American lady
was a little deaf and she was afraid that perhaps signals of departure
were given and that she did not hear them.

The train left the station in Marseilles and there was not only the
switch-yards and the factory smoke but, looking back, the town of
Marseilles and the harbor with stone hills behind it and the last of the
sun on the water. As it was getting dark the train passed a farmhouse
burning in a field. Motor-cars were stopped along the road and bedding
and things from inside the farmhouse were spread in the field. Many
people were watching the house burn. After it was dark the train was in
Avignon. People got on and off. At the news-stand Frenchmen, returning
to Paris, bought that day's French papers. On the station platform were
negro soldiers. They wore brown uniforms and were tall and their faces
shone, close under the electric light. Their faces were very black and
they were too tall to stare. The train left Avignon station with the
negroes standing there. A short white sergeant was with them.

Inside the _lit salon_ compartment the porter had pulled down the three
beds from inside the wall and prepared them for sleeping. In the night
the American lady lay without sleeping because the train was a _rapide_
and went very fast and she was afraid of the speed in the night. The
American lady's bed was the one next to the window. The canary from
Palermo, a cloth spread over his cage, was out of the draft in the
corridor that went into the compartment wash-room. There was a blue
light outside the compartment, and all night the train went very fast
and the American lady lay awake and waited for a wreck.

In the morning the train was near Paris, and after the American lady had
come out from the wash-room, looking very wholesome and middle-aged and
American in spite of not having slept, and had taken the cloth off the
birdcage and hung the cage in the sun, she went back to the
restaurant-car for breakfast. When she came back to the _lit salon_
compartment again, the beds had been pushed back into the wall and made
into seats, the canary was shaking his feathers in the sunlight that
came through the open window, and the train was much nearer Paris.

"He loves the sun," the American lady said. "He'll sing now in a little
while."

The canary shook his feathers and pecked into them. "I've always loved
birds," the American lady said. "I'm taking him home to my little girl.
There--he's singing now."

The canary chirped and the feathers on his throat stood out, then he
dropped his bill and pecked into his feathers again. The train crossed a
river and passed through a very carefully tended forest. The train
passed through many outside of Paris towns. There were tram-cars in the
towns and big advertisements for the Belle Jardinière and Dubonnet and
Pernod on the walls toward the train. All that the train passed through
looked as though it were before breakfast. For several minutes I had not
listened to the American lady, who was talking to my wife.

"Is your husband American too?" asked the lady.

"Yes," said my wife. "We're both Americans."

"I thought you were English."

"Oh, no."

"Perhaps that was because I wore braces," I said. I had started to say
suspenders and changed it to braces in the mouth, to keep my English
character. The American lady did not hear. She was really quite deaf;
she read lips, and I had not looked toward her. I had looked out of the
window. She went on talking to my wife.

"I'm so glad you're Americans. American men make the best husbands," the
American lady was saying. "That was why we left the Continent, you know.
My daughter fell in love with a man in Vevey." She stopped. "They were
simply madly in love." She stopped again. "I took her away, of course."

"Did she get over it?" asked my wife.

"I don't think so," said the American lady. "She wouldn't eat anything
and she wouldn't sleep at all. I've tried so very hard, but she doesn't
seem to take an interest in anything. She doesn't care about things. I
couldn't have her marrying a foreigner." She paused. "Some one, a very
good friend, told me once, 'No foreigner can make an American girl a
good husband.'"

"No," said my wife, "I suppose not."

The American lady admired my wife's travelling-coat, and it turned out
that the American lady had bought her own clothes for twenty years now
from the same maison de couturier in the Rue Saint Honoré. They had her
measurements, and a vendeuse who knew her and her tastes picked the
dresses out for her and they were sent to America. They came to the
post-office near where she lived up-town in New York, and the duty was
never exorbitant because they opened the dresses there in the
post-office to appraise them and they were always very simple-looking
and with no gold lace nor ornaments that would make the dresses look
expensive. Before the present vendeuse, named Thérèse, there had been
another vendeuse, named Amélie. Altogether there had only been these two
in the twenty years. It had always been the same couturier. Prices,
however, had gone up. The exchange, though, equalized that. They had her
daughter's measurements now too. She was grown up and there was not much
chance of their changing now.

The train was now coming into Paris. The fortifications were levelled
but grass had not grown. There were many cars standing on tracks--brown
wooden restaurant-cars and brown wooden sleeping-cars that would go to
Italy at five o'clock that night, if that train still left at five; the
cars were marked Paris-Rome, and cars, with seats on the roofs, that
went back and forth to the suburbs with, at certain hours, people in all
the seats and on the roofs, if that were the way it were still done, and
passing were the white walls and many windows of houses. Nothing had
eaten any breakfast.

"Americans make the best husbands," the American lady said to my wife. I
was getting down the bags. "American men are the only men in the world
to marry."

"How long ago did you leave Vevey?" asked my wife.

"Two years ago this fall. It's her, you know, that I'm taking the canary
to."

"Was the man your daughter was in love with a Swiss?"

"Yes," said the American lady. "He was from a very good family in Vevey.
He was going to be an engineer. They met there in Vevey. They used to go
on long walks together."

"I know Vevey," said my wife. "We were there on our honeymoon."

"Were you really? That must have been lovely. I had no idea, of course,
that she'd fall in love with him."

"It was a very lovely place," said my wife.

"Yes," said the American lady. "Isn't it lovely? Where did you stop
there?"

"We stayed at the Trois Couronnes," said my wife.

"It's such a fine old hotel," said the American lady.

"Yes," said my wife. "We had a very fine room and in the fall the
country was lovely."

"Were you there in the fall?"

"Yes," said my wife.

We were passing three cars that had been in a wreck. They were
splintered open and the roofs sagged in.

"Look," I said. "There's been a wreck."

The American lady looked and saw the last car. "I was afraid of just
that all night," she said. "I have terrific presentiments about things
sometimes. I'll never travel on a _rapide_ again at night. There must be
other comfortable trains that don't go so fast."

Then the train was in the dark of the Gare de Lyons, and then stopped
and porters came up to the windows. I handed bags through the windows,
and we were out on the dim longness of the platform, and the American
lady put herself in charge of one of three men from Cook's who said:
"Just a moment, madame, and I'll look for your name."

The porter brought a truck and piled on the baggage, and my wife said
good-by and I said good-by to the American lady, whose name had been
found by the man from Cook's on a typewritten page in a sheaf of
typewritten pages which he replaced in his pocket.

We followed the porter with the truck down the long cement platform
beside the train. At the end was a gate and a man took the tickets.

We were returning to Paris to set up separate residences.




   AN ALPINE IDYLL


It was hot coming down into the valley even in the early morning. The
sun melted the snow from the skis we were carrying and dried the wood.
It was spring in the valley but the sun was very hot. We came along the
road into Galtur carrying our skis and rucksacks. As we passed the
churchyard a burial was just over. I said, "Grüss Gott," to the priest
as he walked past us coming out of the churchyard. The priest bowed.

"It's funny a priest never speaks to you," John said.

"You'd think they'd like to say 'Grüss Gott.'"

"They never answer," John said.

We stopped in the road and watched the sexton shovelling in the new
earth. A peasant with a black beard and high leather boots stood beside
the grave. The sexton stopped shovelling and straightened his back. The
peasant in the high boots took the spade from the sexton and went on
filling in the grave--spreading the earth evenly as a man spreading
manure in a garden. In the bright May morning the grave-filling looked
unreal. I could not imagine any one being dead.

"Imagine being buried on a day like this," I said to John.

"I wouldn't like it."

"Well," I said, "we don't have to do it."

We went on up the road past the houses of the town to the inn. We had
been skiing in the Silvretta for a month, and it was good to be down in
the valley. In the Silvretta the skiing had been all right, but it was
spring skiing, the snow was good only in the early morning and again in
the evening. The rest of the time it was spoiled by the sun. We were
both tired of the sun. You could not get away from the sun. The only
shadows were made by rocks or by the hut that was built under the
protection of a rock beside a glacier, and in the shade the sweat froze
in your underclothing. You could not sit outside the hut without dark
glasses. It was pleasant to be burned black but the sun had been very
tiring. You could not rest in it. I was glad to be down away from snow.
It was too late in the spring to be up in the Silvretta. I was a little
tired of skiing. We had stayed too long. I could taste the snow water we
had been drinking melted off the tin roof of the hut. The taste was a
part of the way I felt about skiing. I was glad there were other things
beside skiing, and I was glad to be down, away from the unnatural high
mountain spring, into this May morning in the valley.

The innkeeper sat on the porch of the inn, his chair tipped back against
the wall. Beside him sat the cook.

"Ski-heil!" said the innkeeper.

"Heil!" we said and leaned the skis against the wall and took off our
packs.

"How was it up above?" asked the innkeeper.

"Schön. A little too much sun."

"Yes. There's too much sun this time of year."

The cook sat on in his chair. The innkeeper went in with us and unlocked
his office and brought out our mail. There was a bundle of letters and
some papers.

"Let's get some beer," John said.

"Good. We'll drink it inside."

The proprietor brought two bottles and we drank them while we read the
letters.

"We better have some more beer," John said. A girl brought it this time.
She smiled as she opened the bottles.

"Many letters," she said.

"Yes. Many."

"Prosit," she said and went out, taking the empty bottles.

"I'd forgotten what beer tasted like."

"I hadn't," John said. "Up in the hut I used to think about it a lot."

"Well," I said, "we've got it now."

"You oughtn't to ever do anything too long."

"No. We were up there too long."

"Too damn long," John said. "It's no good doing a thing too long."

The sun came through the open window and shone through the beer bottles
on the table. The bottles were half full. There was a little froth on
the beer in the bottles, not much because it was very cold. It collared
up when you poured it into the tall glasses. I looked out of the open
window at the white road. The trees beside the road were dusty. Beyond
was a green field and a stream. There were trees along the stream and a
mill with a water wheel. Through the open side of the mill I saw a long
log and a saw in it rising and falling. No one seemed to be tending it.
There were four crows walking in the green field. One crow sat in a tree
watching. Outside on the porch the cook got off his chair and passed
into the hall that led back into the kitchen. Inside, the sunlight shone
through the empty glasses on the table. John was leaning forward with
his head on his arms.

Through the window I saw two men come up the front steps. They came into
the drinking room. One was the bearded peasant in the high boots. The
other was the sexton. They sat down at the table under the window. The
girl came in and stood by their table. The peasant did not seem to see
her. He sat with his hands on the table. He wore his old army clothes.
There were patches on the elbows.

"What will it be?" asked the sexton. The peasant did not pay any
attention.

"What will you drink?"

"Schnapps," the peasant said.

"And a quarter litre of red wine," the sexton told the girl.

The girl brought the drinks and the peasant drank the schnapps. He
looked out of the window. The sexton watched him. John had his head
forward on the table. He was asleep.

The innkeeper came in and went over to the table. He spoke in dialect
and the sexton answered him. The peasant looked out of the window. The
innkeeper went out of the room. The peasant stood up. He took a folded
ten-thousand kronen note out of a leather pocket-book and unfolded it.
The girl came up.

"Alles?" she asked.

"Alles," he said.

"Let me buy the wine," the sexton said.

"Alles," the peasant repeated to the girl. She put her hand in the
pocket of her apron, brought it out full of coins and counted out the
change. The peasant went out the door. As soon as he was gone the
innkeeper came into the room again and spoke to the sexton. He sat down
at the table. They talked in dialect. The sexton was amused. The
innkeeper was disgusted. The sexton stood up from the table. He was a
little man with a mustache. He leaned out of the window and looked up
the road.

"There he goes in," he said.

"In the Löwen?"

"Ja."

They talked again and then the innkeeper came over to our table. The
innkeeper was a tall man and old. He looked at John asleep.

"He's pretty tired."

"Yes, we were up early."

"Will you want to eat soon?"

"Any time," I said. "What is there to eat?"

"Anything you want. The girl will bring the eating-card."

The girl brought the menu. John woke up. The menu was written in ink on
a card and the card slipped into a wooden paddle.

"There's the speise-karte," I said to John. He looked at it. He was
still sleepy.

"Won't you have a drink with us?" I asked the innkeeper. He sat down.
"Those peasants are beasts," said the innkeeper.

"We saw that one at a funeral coming into town."

"That was his wife."

"Oh."

"He's a beast. All these peasants are beasts."

"How do you mean?"

"You wouldn't believe it. You wouldn't believe what just happened about
that one."

"Tell me."

"You wouldn't believe it." The innkeeper spoke to the sexton. "Franz,
come over here." The sexton came, bringing his little bottle of wine and
his glass.

"The gentlemen are just come down from the Wiesbadenerhütte," the
innkeeper said. We shook hands.

"What will you drink?" I asked.

"Nothing," Franz shook his finger.

"Another quarter litre?"

"All right."

"Do you understand dialect?" the innkeeper asked.

"No."

"What's it all about?" John asked.

"He's going to tell us about the peasant we saw filling the grave,
coming into town."

"I can't understand it, anyway," John said. "It goes too fast for me."

"That peasant," the innkeeper said, "to-day he brought his wife in to be
buried. She died last November."

"December," said the sexton.

"That makes nothing. She died last December then, and he notified the
commune."

"December eighteenth," said the sexton.

"Anyway, he couldn't bring her over to be buried until the snow was
gone."

"He lives on the other side of the Paznaun," said the sexton. "But he
belongs to this parish."

"He couldn't bring her out at all?" I asked.

"No. He can only come, from where he lives, on skis until the snow
melts. So to-day he brought her in to be buried and the priest, when he
looked at her face, didn't want to bury her. You go on and tell it," he
said to the sexton. "Speak German, not dialect."

"It was very funny with the priest," said the sexton. "In the report to
the commune she died of heart trouble. We knew she had heart trouble
here. She used to faint in church sometimes. She did not come for a long
time. She wasn't strong to climb. When the priest uncovered her face he
asked Olz, 'Did your wife suffer much?' 'No,' said Olz. 'When I came in
the house she was dead across the bed.'

"The priest looked at her again. He didn't like it.

"'How did her face get that way?'

"'I don't know,' Olz said.

"'You'd better find out,' the priest said, and put the blanket back. Olz
didn't say anything. The priest looked at him. Olz looked back at the
priest. 'You want to know?'

"'I must know,' the priest said."

"This is where it's good," the innkeeper said. "Listen to this. Go on
Franz."

"'Well,' said Olz, 'when she died I made the report to the commune and I
put her in the shed across the top of the big wood. When I started to
use the big wood she was stiff and I put her up against the wall. Her
mouth was open and when I came into the shed at night to cut up the big
wood, I hung the lantern from it.'

"'Why did you do that?' asked the priest.

"'I don't know,' said Olz.

"'Did you do that many times?'

"'Every time I went to work in the shed at night.'

"'It was very wrong,' said the priest. 'Did you love your wife?'

"'Ja, I loved her,' Olz said. 'I loved her fine.'"

"Did you understand it all?" asked the innkeeper. "You understand it all
about his wife?"

"I heard it."

"How about eating?" John asked.

"You order," I said. "Do you think it's true?" I asked the innkeeper.

"Sure it's true," he said. "These peasants are beasts."

"Where did he go now?"

"He's gone to drink at my colleague's, the Löwen."

"He didn't want to drink with me," said the sexton.

"He didn't want to drink with me, after he knew about his wife," said
the innkeeper.

"Say," said John. "How about eating?"

"All right," I said.




    A PURSUIT RACE


William Campbell had been in a pursuit race with a burlesque show ever
since Pittsburgh. In a pursuit race, in bicycle racing, riders start at
equal intervals to ride after one another. They ride very fast because
the race is usually limited to a short distance and if they slow their
riding another rider who maintains his pace will make up the space that
separated them equally at the start. As soon as a rider is caught and
passed he is out of the race and must get down from his bicycle and
leave the track. If none of the riders are caught the winner of the race
is the one who has gained the most distance. In most pursuit races, if
there are only two riders, one of the riders is caught inside of six
miles. The burlesque show caught William Campbell at Kansas City.

William Campbell had hoped to hold a slight lead over the burlesque show
until they reached the Pacific coast. As long as he preceded the
burlesque show as advance man he was being paid. When the burlesque show
caught up with him he was in bed. He was in bed when the manager of the
burlesque troupe came into his room and after the manager had gone out
he decided that he might as well stay in bed. It was very cold in Kansas
City and he was in no hurry to go out. He did not like Kansas City. He
reached under the bed for a bottle and drank. It made his stomach feel
better. Mr. Turner, the manager of the burlesque show, had refused a
drink.

William Campbell's interview with Mr. Turner had been a little strange.
Mr. Turner had knocked on the door. Campbell had said: "Come in!" When
Mr. Turner came into the room he saw clothing on a chair, an open
suitcase, the bottle on a chair beside the bed, and some one lying in
the bed completely covered by the bed-clothes.

"Mister Campbell," Mr. Turner said.

"You can't fire me," William Campbell said from underneath the covers.
It was warm and white and close under the covers. "You can't fire me
because I've got down off my bicycle."

"You're drunk," Mr. Turner said.

"Oh, yes," William Campbell said, speaking directly against the sheet
and feeling the texture with his lips.

"You're a fool," Mr. Turner said. He turned off the electric light. The
electric light had been burning all night. It was now ten o'clock in the
morning. "You're a drunken fool. When did you get into this town?"

"I got into this town last night," William Campbell said, speaking
against the sheet. He found he liked to talk through a sheet. "Did you
ever talk through a sheet?"

"Don't try to be funny. You aren't funny."

"I'm not being funny. I'm just talking through a sheet."

"You're talking through a sheet all right."

"You can go now, Mr. Turner," Campbell said. "I don't work for you any
more."

"You know that anyway."

"I know a lot," William Campbell said. He pulled down the sheet and
looked at Mr. Turner. "I know enough so I don't mind looking at you at
all. Do you want to hear what I know?"

"No."

"Good," said William Campbell. "Because really I don't know anything at
all. I was just talking." He pulled the sheet up over his face again. "I
love it under a sheet," he said. Mr. Turner stood beside the bed. He was
a middle-aged man with a large stomach and a bald head and he had many
things to do. "You ought to stop off here, Billy, and take a cure," he
said. "I'll fix it up if you want to do it."

"I don't want to take a cure," William Campbell said. "I don't want to
take a cure at all. I am perfectly happy. All my life I have been
perfectly happy."

"How long have you been this way?"

"What a question!" William Campbell breathed in and out through the
sheet.

"How long have you been stewed, Billy?"

"Haven't I done my work?"

"Sure. I just asked you how long you've been stewed, Billy."

"I don't know. But I've got my wolf back," he touched the sheet with his
tongue. "I've had him for a week."

"The hell you have."

"Oh, yes. My dear wolf. Every time I take a drink he goes outside the
room. He can't stand alcohol. The poor little fellow." He moved his
tongue round and round on the sheet. "He's a lovely wolf. He's just like
he always was." William Campbell shut his eyes and took a deep breath.

"You got to take a cure, Billy," Mr. Turner said. "You won't mind the
Keeley. It isn't bad."

"The Keeley," William Campbell said. "It isn't far from London." He shut
his eyes and opened them, moving the eyelashes against the sheet. "I
just love sheets," he said. He looked at Mr. Turner.

"Listen, you think I'm drunk."

"You _are_ drunk."

"No, I'm not."

"You're drunk and you've had dt's."

"No." William Campbell held the sheet around his head. "Dear sheet," he
said. He breathed against it gently. "Pretty sheet. You love me, don't
you, sheet? It's all in the price of the room. Just like in Japan. No,"
he said. "Listen Billy, dear Sliding Billy, I have a surprise for you.
I'm not drunk. I'm hopped to the eyes."

"No," said Mr. Turner.

"Take a look." William Campbell pulled up the right sleeve of his pyjama
jacket under the sheet, then shoved the right forearm out. "Look at
that." On the forearm, from just above the wrist to the elbow, were
small blue circles around tiny dark blue punctures. The circles almost
touched one another. "That's the new development," William Campbell
said. "I drink a little now once in a while, just to drive the wolf out
of the room."

"They got a cure for that, 'Sliding Billy'" Turner said.

"No," William Campbell said. "They haven't got a cure for anything."

"You can't just quit like that, Billy," Turner said. He sat on the bed.

"Be careful of my sheet," William Campbell said.

"You can't just quit at your age and take to pumping yourself full of
that stuff just because you got in a jam."

"There's a law against it. If that's what you mean."

"No, I mean you got to fight it out."

Billy Campbell caressed the sheet with his lips and his tongue. "Dear
sheet," he said. "I can kiss this sheet and see right through it at the
same time."

"Cut it out about the sheet. You can't just take to that stuff, Billy."

William Campbell shut his eyes. He was beginning to feel a slight
nausea. He knew that this nausea would increase steadily, without there
ever being the relief of sickness, until something were done against it.
It was at this point that he suggested that Mr. Turner have a drink. Mr.
Turner declined. William Campbell took a drink from the bottle. It was a
temporary measure. Mr. Turner watched him. Mr. Turner had been in this
room much longer than he should have been, he had many things to do;
although living in daily association with people who used drugs, he had
a horror of drugs, and he was very fond of William Campbell; he did not
wish to leave him. He was very sorry for him and he felt a cure might
help. He knew there were good cures in Kansas City. But he had to go. He
stood up.

"Listen, Billy," William Campbell said, "I want to tell you something.
You're called 'Sliding Billy.' That's because you can slide. I'm called
just Billy. That's because I never could slide at all. I can't slide,
Billy. I can't slide. It just catches. Every time I try it, it catches."
He shut his eyes. "I can't slide, Billy. It's awful when you can't
slide."

"Yes," said "Sliding Billy" Turner.

"Yes, what?" William Campbell looked at him.

"You were saying."

"No," said William Campbell. "I wasn't saying. It must have been a
mistake."

"You were saying about sliding."

"No. It couldn't have been about sliding. But listen, Billy, and I'll
tell you a secret. Stick to sheets, Billy. Keep away from women and
horses and, and--" he stopped "--eagles, Billy. If you love horses
you'll get horse-s--, and if you love eagles you'll get eagle-s--." He
stopped and put his head under the sheet.

"I got to go," said "Sliding Billy" Turner.

"If you love women you'll get a dose," William Campbell said. "If you
love horses----"

"Yes, you said that."

"Said what?"

"About horses and eagles."

"Oh, yes. And if you love sheets." He breathed on the sheet and stroked
his nose against it. "I don't know about sheets," he said. "I just
started to love this sheet."

"I have to go," Mr. Turner said. "I got a lot to do."

"That's all right," William Campbell said. "Everybody's got to go."

"I better go."

"All right, you go."

"Are you all right, Billy?"

"I was never so happy in my life."

"And you're all right?"

"I'm fine. You go along. I'll just lie here for a little while. Around
noon I'll get up."

But when Mr. Turner came up to William Campbell's room at noon William
Campbell was sleeping and as Mr. Turner was a man who knew what things
in life were very valuable he did not wake him.




   TO-DAY IS FRIDAY


_Three Roman soldiers are in a drinking-place at eleven o'clock
at night. There are barrels around the wall. Behind the wooden
counter is a Hebrew wine-seller. The three Roman soldiers are a
little cock-eyed._

_1st Roman Soldier_--You tried the red?

_2d Soldier_--No, I ain't tried it.

_1st Soldier_--You better try it.

_2d Soldier_--All right, George, we'll have a round of the red.

_Hebrew Wine-seller_--Here you are, gentlemen. You'll like that. [_He
sets down an earthenware pitcher that he has filled from one of the
casks._] That's a nice little wine.

_1st Soldier_--Have a drink of it yourself. [_He turns to the third
Roman soldier who is leaning on a barrel._] What's the matter with you?

_3d Roman Soldier_--I got a gut-ache.

_2d Soldier_--You've been drinking water.

_1st Soldier_--Try some of the red.

_3d Soldier_--I can't drink the damn stuff. It makes my gut sour.

_1st Soldier_--You been out here too long.

_3d Soldier_--Hell, don't I know it?

_1st Soldier_--Say, George, can't you give this gentleman something to
fix up his stomach?

_Hebrew Wine-seller_--I got it right here.

[_The third Roman soldier tastes the cup that the wine-seller
has mixed for him._]

_3d Soldier_--Hey, what you put in that, camel chips?

_Wine-seller_--You drink that right down, Lootenant. That'll fix you up
right.

_3d Soldier_--Well, I couldn't feel any worse.

_1st Soldier_--Take a chance on it. George fixed me up fine the other
day.

_Wine-seller_--You were in bad shape, Lootenant. I know what fixes up a
bad stomach.

[_The third Roman soldier drinks the cup down._]

_3d Roman Soldier_--Jesus Christ. [_He makes a face._]

_2d Soldier_--That false alarm!

_1st Soldier_--Oh, I don't know. He was pretty good in there to-day.

_2d Soldier_--Why didn't he come down off the cross?

_1st Soldier_--He didn't want to come down off the cross. That's not his
play.

_2d Soldier_--Show me a guy that doesn't want to come down off the
cross.

_1st Soldier_--Aw, hell, you don't know anything about it. Ask George
there. Did he want to come down off the cross, George?

_Wine-seller_--I'll tell you, gentlemen, I wasn't out there. It's a
thing I haven't taken any interest in.

_2d Soldier_--Listen, I seen a lot of them--here and plenty of other
places. Any time you show me one that doesn't want to get down off the
cross when the time comes--when the time comes, I mean--I'll climb right
up with him.

_1st Soldier_--I thought he was pretty good in there to-day.

_3d Soldier_--He was all right.

_2d Roman Soldier_--You guys don't know what I'm talking about. I'm not
saying whether he was good or not. What I mean is, when the time comes.
When they first start nailing him, there isn't none of them wouldn't
stop it if they could.

_1st Soldier_--Didn't you follow it, George?

_Wine-seller_--No, I didn't take any interest in it, Lootenant.

_1st Soldier_--I was surprised how he acted.

_3d Soldier_--The part I don't like is the nailing them on. You know,
that must get to you pretty bad.

_2d Soldier_--It isn't that that's so bad, as when they first lift 'em
up. [_He makes a lifting gesture with his two palms together._] When the
weight starts to pull on 'em. That's when it gets 'em.

_3d Roman Soldier_--It takes some of them pretty bad.

_1st Soldier_--Ain't I seen 'em? I seen plenty of them. I tell you, he
was pretty good in there to-day.

[_The second Roman soldier smiles at the Hebrew wine-seller._]

_2d Soldier_--You're a regular Christer, big boy.

_1st Soldier_--Sure, go on and kid him. But listen while I tell you
something. He was pretty good in there to-day.

_2d Soldier_--What about some more wine?

[_The wine-seller looks up expectantly. The third Roman soldier
is sitting with his head down. He does not look well._]

_3d Soldier_--I don't want any more.

_2d Soldier_--Just for two, George.

[_The wine-seller puts out a pitcher of wine, a size smaller
than the last one. He leans forward on the wooden counter._]

_1st Roman Soldier_--You see his girl?

_2d Soldier_--Wasn't I standing right by her?

_1st Soldier_--She's a nice-looker.

_2d Soldier_--I knew her before he did. [_He winks at the wine-seller._]

_1st Soldier_--I used to see her around the town.

_2d Soldier_--She used to have a lot of stuff. He never brought _her_ no
good luck.

_1st Soldier_--Oh, he ain't lucky. But he looked pretty good to me in
there to-day.

_2d Soldier_--What become of his gang?

_1st Soldier_--Oh, they faded out. Just the women stuck by him.

_2d Roman Soldier_--They were a pretty yellow crowd. When they seen him
go up there they didn't want any of it.

_1st Soldier_--The women stuck all right.

_2d Soldier_--Sure, they stuck all right.

_1st Roman Soldier_--You see me slip the old spear into him?

_2d Roman Soldier_--You'll get into trouble doing that some day.

_1st Soldier_--It was the least I could do for him. I'll tell you he
looked pretty good to me in there to-day.

_Hebrew Wine-seller_--Gentlemen, you know I got to close.

_1st Roman Soldier_--We'll have one more round.

_2d Roman Soldier_--What's the use? This stuff don't get you anywhere.
Come on, let's go.

_1st Soldier_--Just another round.

_3d Roman Soldier_--[_Getting up from the barrel._] No, come on. Let's
go. I feel like hell to-night.

_1st Soldier_--Just one more.

_2d Soldier_--No, come on. We're going to go. Good-night, George. Put it
on the bill.

_Wine-seller_--Good-night, gentlemen. [_He looks a little worried._] You
couldn't let me have a little something on account, Lootenant?

_2d Roman Soldier_--What the hell, George! Wednesday's pay-day.

_Wine-seller_--It's all right, Lootenant. Good-night, gentlemen.

[_The three Roman soldiers go out the door into the street._]

[_Outside in the street._]

_2d Roman Soldier_--George is a kike just like all the rest of them.

_1st Roman Soldier_--Oh, George is a nice fella.

_2d Soldier_--Everybody's a nice fella to you to-night.

_3d Roman Soldier_--Come on, let's go up to the barracks. I feel like
hell to-night.

_2d Soldier_--You been out here too long.

_3d Roman Soldier_--No, it ain't just that. I feel like hell.

_2d Soldier_--You been out here too long. That's all.

       CURTAIN.




     BANAL STORY


So he ate an orange, slowly spitting out the seeds. Outside, the snow
was turning to rain. Inside, the electric stove seemed to give no heat
and rising from his writing-table, he sat down upon the stove. How good
it felt! Here, at last, was life.

He reached for another orange. Far away in Paris, Mascart had knocked
Danny Frush cuckoo in the second round. Far off in Mesopotamia,
twenty-one feet of snow had fallen. Across the world in distant
Australia, the English cricketers were sharpening up their wickets.
_There_ was Romance.

Patrons of the arts and letters have discovered _The Forum_, he read. It
is the guide, philosopher, and friend of the thinking minority. Prize
short-stories--will their authors write our best-sellers of to-morrow?

You will enjoy these warm, homespun, American tales, bits of real life
on the open ranch, in crowded tenement or comfortable home, and all with
a healthy undercurrent of humor.

I must read them, he thought.

He read on. Our children's children--what of them? Who of them? New
means must be discovered to find room for us under the sun. Shall this
be done by war or can it be done by peaceful methods?

Or will we all have to move to Canada?

Our deepest convictions--will Science upset them? Our civilization--is
it inferior to older orders of things?

And meanwhile, in the far-off dripping jungles of Yucatan, sounded the
chopping of the axes of the gum-choppers.

Do we want big men--or do we want them cultured? Take Joyce. Take
President Coolidge. What star must our college students aim at? There is
Jack Britton. There is Dr. Henry Van Dyke. Can we reconcile the two?
Take the case of Young Stribling.

And what of our daughters who must make their own Soundings? Nancy
Hawthorne is obliged to make her own Soundings in the sea of life.
Bravely and sensibly she faces the problems which come to every girl of
eighteen.

It was a splendid booklet.

Are you a girl of eighteen? Take the case of Joan of Arc. Take the case
of Bernard Shaw. Take the case of Betsy Ross.

Think of these things in 1925--Was there a risqué page in Puritan
history? Were there two sides to Pocahontas? Did he have a fourth
dimension?

Are modern paintings--and poetry--Art? Yes and No. Take Picasso.

Have tramps codes of conduct? Send your mind adventuring.

There is Romance everywhere. _Forum_ writers talk to the point, are
possessed of humor and wit. But they do not try to be smart and are
never long-winded.

Live the full life of the mind, exhilarated by new ideas, intoxicated by
the Romance of the unusual. He laid down the booklet.

And meanwhile, stretched flat on a bed in a darkened room in his house
in Triana, Manuel Garcia Maera lay with a tube in each lung, drowning
with the pneumonia. All the papers in Andalucia devoted special
supplements to his death, which had been expected for some days. Men and
boys bought full-length colored pictures of him to remember him by, and
lost the picture they had of him in their memories by looking at the
lithographs. Bull-fighters were very relieved he was dead, because he
did always in the bull-ring the things they could only do sometimes.
They all marched in the rain behind his coffin and there were one
hundred and forty-seven bull-fighters followed him out to the cemetery,
where they buried him in the tomb next to Joselito. After the funeral
every one sat in the cafés out of the rain, and many colored pictures of
Maera were sold to men who rolled them up and put them away in their
pockets.




     NOW I LAY ME


That night we lay on the floor in the room and I listened to the
silk-worms eating. The silk-worms fed in racks of mulberry leaves and
all night you could hear them eating and a dropping sound in the leaves.
I myself did not want to sleep because I had been living for a long time
with the knowledge that if I ever shut my eyes in the dark and let
myself go, my soul would go out of my body. I had been that way for a
long time, ever since I had been blown up at night and felt it go out of
me and go off and then come back. I tried never to think about it, but
it had started to go since, in the nights, just at the moment of going
off to sleep, and I could only stop it by a very great effort. So while
now I am fairly sure that it would not really have gone out, yet then,
that summer, I was unwilling to make the experiment.

I had different ways of occupying myself while I lay awake. I would
think of a trout stream I had fished along when I was a boy and fish its
whole length very carefully in my mind; fishing very carefully under all
the logs, all the turns of the bank, the deep holes and the clear
shallow stretches, sometimes catching trout and sometimes losing them. I
would stop fishing at noon to eat my lunch; sometimes on a log over the
stream; sometimes on a high bank under a tree, and I always ate my lunch
very slowly and watched the stream below me while I ate. Often I ran out
of bait because I would take only ten worms with me in a tobacco tin
when I started. When I had used them all I had to find more worms, and
sometimes it was very difficult digging in the bank of the stream where
the cedar trees kept out the sun and there was no grass but only the
bare moist earth and often I could find no worms. Always though I found
some kind of bait, but one time in the swamp I could find no bait at all
and had to cut up one of the trout I had caught and use him for bait.

Sometimes I found insects in the swamp meadows, in the grass or under
ferns, and used them. There were beetles and insects with legs like
grass stems, and grubs in old rotten logs; white grubs with brown
pinching heads that would not stay on the hook and emptied into nothing
in the cold water, and wood ticks under logs where sometimes I found
angle-worms that slipped into the ground as soon as the log was raised.
Once I used a salamander from under an old log. The salamander was very
small and neat and agile and a lovely color. He had tiny feet that tried
to hold on to the hook, and after that one time I never used a
salamander, although I found them very often. Nor did I use crickets,
because of the way they acted about the hook.

Sometimes the stream ran through an open meadow, and in the dry grass I
would catch grasshoppers and use them for bait and sometimes I would
catch grasshoppers and toss them into the stream and watch them float
along swimming on the stream and circling on the surface as the current
took them and then disappear as a trout rose. Sometimes I would fish
four or five different streams in the night; starting as near as I could
get to their source and fishing them down stream. When I had finished
too quickly and the time did not go, I would fish the stream over again,
starting where it emptied into the lake and fishing back up stream,
trying for all the trout I had missed coming down. Some nights too I
made up streams, and some of them were very exciting, and it was like
being awake and dreaming. Some of those streams I still remember and
think that I have fished in them, and they are confused with streams I
really know. I gave them all names and went to them on the train and
sometimes walked for miles to get to them.

But some nights I could not fish, and on those nights I was cold-awake
and said my prayers over and over and tried to pray for all the people I
had ever known. That took up a great amount of time, for if you try to
remember all the people you have ever known, going back to the earliest
thing you remember--which was, with me, the attic of the house where I
was born and my mother and father's wedding-cake in a tin box hanging
from one of the rafters, and, in the attic, jars of snakes and other
specimens that my father had collected as a boy and preserved in
alcohol, the alcohol sunken in the jars so the backs of some of the
snakes and specimens were exposed and had turned white--if you thought
back that far, you remembered a great many people. If you prayed for all
of them, saying a Hail Mary and an Our Father for each one, it took a
long time and finally it would be light, and then you could go to sleep,
if you were in a place where you could sleep in the daylight.

On those nights I tried to remember everything that had ever happened to
me, starting with just before I went to the war and remembering back
from one thing to another. I found I could only remember back to that
attic in my grandfather's house. Then I would start there and remember
this way again, until I reached the war.

I remembered, after my grandfather died we moved away from that house
and to a new house designed and built by my mother. Many things that
were not to be moved were burned in the back-yard and I remember those
jars from the attic being thrown in the fire, and how they popped in the
heat and the fire flamed up from the alcohol. I remember the snakes
burning in the fire in the back-yard. But there were no people in that,
only things. I could not remember who burned the things even, and I
would go on until I came to people and then stop and pray for them.

About the new house I remembered how my mother was always cleaning
things out and making a good clearance. One time when my father was away
on a hunting trip she made a good thorough cleaning out in the basement
and burned everything that should not have been there. When my father
came home and got down from his buggy and hitched the horse, the fire
was still burning in the road beside the house. I went out to meet him.
He handed me his shotgun and looked at the fire. "What's this?" he
asked.

"I've been cleaning out the basement, dear," my mother said from the
porch. She was standing there smiling, to meet him. My father looked at
the fire and kicked at something. Then he leaned over and picked
something out of the ashes. "Get a rake, Nick," he said to me. I went to
the basement and brought a rake and my father raked very carefully in
the ashes. He raked out stone axes and stone skinning knives and tools
for making arrow-heads and pieces of pottery and many arrow-heads. They
had all been blackened and chipped by the fire. My father raked them all
out very carefully and spread them on the grass by the road. His shotgun
in its leather case and his game-bags were on the grass where he had
left them when he stepped down from the buggy.

"Take the gun and the bags in the house, Nick, and bring me a paper," he
said. My mother had gone inside the house. I took the shotgun, which was
heavy to carry and banged against my legs, and the two game-bags and
started toward the house. "Take them one at a time," my father said.
"Don't try and carry too much at once." I put down the game-bags and
took in the shotgun and brought out a newspaper from the pile in my
father's office. My father spread all the blackened, chipped stone
implements on the paper and then wrapped them up. "The best arrow-heads
went all to pieces," he said. He walked into the house with the paper
package and I stayed outside on the grass with the two game-bags. After
a while I took them in. In remembering that, there were only two people,
so I would pray for them both.

Some nights, though, I could not remember my prayers even. I could only
get as far as "On earth as it is in heaven" and then have to start all
over and be absolutely unable to get past that. Then I would have to
recognize that I could not remember and give up saying my prayers that
night and try something else. So on some nights I would try to remember
all the animals in the world by name and then the birds and then fishes
and then countries and cities and then kinds of food and the names of
all the streets I could remember in Chicago, and when I could not
remember anything at all any more I would just listen. And I do not
remember a night on which you could not hear things. If I could have a
light I was not afraid to sleep, because I knew my soul would only go
out of me if it were dark. So, of course, many nights I was where I
could have a light and then I slept because I was nearly always tired
and often very sleepy. And I am sure many times too that I slept without
knowing it--but I never slept knowing it, and on this night I listened
to the silk-worms. You can hear silk-worms eating very clearly in the
night and I lay with my eyes open and listened to them.

There was only one other person in the room and he was awake too. I
listened to him being awake, for a long time. He could not lie as
quietly as I could because, perhaps, he had not had as much practice
being awake. We were lying on blankets spread over straw and when he
moved the straw was noisy, but the silk-worms were not frightened by any
noise we made and ate on steadily. There were the noises of night seven
kilometres behind the lines outside but they were different from the
small noises inside the room in the dark. The other man in the room
tried lying quietly. Then he moved again. I moved too, so he would know
I was awake. He had lived ten years in Chicago. They had taken him for a
soldier in nineteen fourteen when he had come back to visit his family,
and they had given him to me for an orderly because he spoke English. I
heard him listening, so I moved again in the blankets.

"Can't you sleep, Signor Tenente?" he asked.

"No."

"I can't sleep, either."

"What's the matter?"

"I don't know. I can't sleep."

"You feel all right?"

"Sure. I feel good. I just can't sleep."

"You want to talk a while?" I asked.

"Sure. What can you talk about in this damn place."

"This place is pretty good," I said.

"Sure," he said. "It's all right."

"Tell me about out in Chicago," I said.

"Oh," he said, "I told you all that once."

"Tell me about how you got married."

"I told you that."

"Was the letter you got Monday--from her?"

"Sure. She writes me all the time. She's making good money with the
place."

"You'll have a nice place when you go back."

"Sure. She runs it fine. She's making a lot of money."

"Don't you think we'll wake them up, talking?" I asked.

"No. They can't hear. Anyway, they sleep like pigs. I'm different," he
said. "I'm nervous."

"Talk quiet," I said. "Want a smoke?"

We smoked skilfully in the dark.

"You don't smoke much, Signor Tenente."

"No. I've just about cut it out."

"Well," he said, "it don't do you any good and I suppose you get so you
don't miss it. Did you ever hear a blind man won't smoke because he
can't see the smoke come out?"

"I don't believe it."

"I think it's all bull, myself," he said. "I just heard it somewhere.
You know how you hear things."

We were both quiet and I listened to the silk-worms.

"You hear those damn silk-worms?" he asked. "You can hear them chew."

"It's funny," I said.

"Say, Signor Tenente, is there something really the matter that you
can't sleep? I never see you sleep. You haven't slept nights ever since
I been with you."

"I don't know, John," I said. "I got in pretty bad shape along early
last spring and at night it bothers me."

"Just like I am," he said. "I shouldn't have ever got in this war. I'm
too nervous."

"Maybe it will get better."

"Say, Signor Tenente, what did you get in this war for, anyway?"

"I don't know, John. I wanted to, then."

"Wanted to," he said. "That's a hell of a reason."

"We oughtn't to talk out loud," I said.

"They sleep just like pigs," he said. "They can't understand the English
language, anyway. They don't know a damn thing. What are you going to do
when it's over and we go back to the States?"

"I'll get a job on a paper."

"In Chicago?"

"Maybe."

"Do you ever read what this fellow Brisbane writes? My wife cuts it out
for me and sends it to me."

"Sure."

"Did you ever meet him?"

"No, but I've seen him."

"I'd like to meet that fellow. He's a fine writer. My wife don't read
English but she takes the paper just like when I was home and she cuts
out the editorials and the sport page and sends them to me."

"How are your kids?"

"They're fine. One of the girls is in the fourth grade now. You know,
Signor Tenente, if I didn't have the kids I wouldn't be your orderly
now. They'd have made me stay in the line all the time."

"I'm glad you've got them."

"So am I. They're fine kids but I want a boy. Three girls and no boy.
That's a hell of a note."

"Why don't you try and go to sleep."

"No, I can't sleep now. I'm wide awake now, Signor Tenente. Say, I'm
worried about you not sleeping though."

"It'll be all right, John."

"Imagine a young fellow like you not to sleep."

"I'll get all right. It just takes a while."

"You got to get all right. A man can't get along that don't sleep. Do
you worry about anything? You got anything on your mind?"

"No, John, I don't think so."

"You ought to get married, Signor Tenente. Then you wouldn't worry."

"I don't know."

"You ought to get married. Why don't you pick out some nice Italian girl
with plenty of money. You could get any one you want. You're young and
you got good decorations and you look nice. You been wounded a couple of
times."

"I can't talk the language well enough."

"You talk it fine. To hell with talking the language. You don't have to
talk to them. Marry them."

"I'll think about it."

"You know some girls, don't you?"

"Sure."

"Well, you marry the one with the most money. Over here, the way they're
brought up, they'll all make you a good wife."

"I'll think about it."

"Don't think about it, Signor Tenente. Do it."

"All right."

"A man ought to be married. You'll never regret it. Every man ought to
be married."

"All right," I said. "Let's try and sleep a while."

"All right, Signor Tenente. I'll try it again. But you remember what I
said."

"I'll remember it," I said. "Now let's sleep a while, John."

"All right," he said. "I hope you sleep, Signor Tenente."

I heard him roll in his blankets on the straw and then he was very quiet
and I listened to him breathing regularly. Then he started to snore. I
listened to him snore for a long time and then I stopped listening to
him snore and listened to the silk-worms eating. They ate steadily,
making a dropping in the leaves. I had a new thing to think about and I
lay in the dark with my eyes open and thought of all the girls I had
ever known and what kind of wives they would make. It was a very
interesting thing to think about and for a while it killed off
trout-fishing and interfered with my prayers. Finally, though, I went
back to trout-fishing, because I found that I could remember all the
streams and there was always something new about them, while the girls,
after I had thought about them a few times, blurred and I could not call
them into my mind and finally they all blurred and all became rather the
same and I gave up thinking about them almost altogether. But I kept on
with my prayers and I prayed very often for John in the nights and his
class was removed from active service before the October offensive. I
was glad he was not there, because he would have been a great worry to
me. He came to the hospital in Milan to see me several months after and
was very disappointed that I had not yet married, and I know he would
feel very badly if he knew that, so far, I have never married. He was
going back to America and he was very certain about marriage and knew it
would fix up everything.
"Unlike all other forms of lutte or combat the conditions are
that the winner shall take nothing; neither his ease, nor his
pleasure, nor any notions of glory; nor, if he win far enough,
shall there be any reward within himself."






"The Gambler, the Nun, and the Radio"
was first published under the title,
"Give Us A Prescription, Doctor"





To A. MacLeish





     CONTENTS

         AFTER THE STORM
         A CLEAN, WELL-LIGHTED PLACE
         THE LIGHT OF THE WORLD
         GOD REST YOU MERRY, GENTLEMEN
         THE SEA CHANGE
         A WAY YOU'LL NEVER BE
         THE MOTHER OF A QUEEN
         ONE READER WRITES
         HOMAGE TO SWITZERLAND
         A DAY'S WAIT
         A NATURAL HISTORY OF THE DEAD
         WINE OF WYOMING
         THE GAMBLER, THE NUN, AND THE RADIO
         FATHERS AND SONS





                            AFTER THE STORM


It wasn't about anything, something about making punch, and then we
started fighting and I slipped and he had me down kneeling on my chest
and choking me with both hands like he was trying to kill me and all the
time I was trying to get the knife out of my pocket to cut him loose.
Everybody was too drunk to pull him off me. He was choking me and
hammering my head on the floor and I got the knife out and opened it up;
and I cut the muscle right across his arm and he let go of me. He
couldn't have held on if he wanted to. Then he rolled and hung onto that
arm and started to cry and I said:

"What the hell you want to choke me for?"

I'd have killed him. I couldn't swallow for a week. He hurt my throat
bad.

Well, I went out of there and there were plenty of them with him and
some come out after me and I made a turn and was down by the docks and I
met a fellow and he said somebody killed a man up the street. I said
"Who killed him?" and he said "I don't know who killed him but he's dead
all right," and it was dark and there was water standing in the street
and no lights and windows broke and boats all up in the town and trees
blown down and everything all blown and I got a skiff and went out and
found my boat where I had her inside of Mango Key and she was all right
only she was full of water. So I bailed her out and pumped her out and
there was a moon but plenty of clouds and still plenty rough and I took
it down along; and when it was daylight I was off Eastern Harbor.

Brother, that was some storm. I was the first boat out and you never saw
water like that was. It was just as white as a lye barrel and coming
from Eastern Harbor to Sou'west Key you couldn't recognize the shore.
There was a big channel blown right out through the middle of the beach.
Trees and all blown out and a channel cut through and all the water
white as chalk and everything on it; branches and whole trees and dead
birds, and all floating. Inside the keys were all the pelicans in the
world and all kinds of birds flying. They must have gone inside there
when they knew it was coming.

I lay at Sou'west Key a day and nobody came after me. I was the first
boat out and I seen a spar floating and I knew there must be a wreck and
I started out to look for her. I found her. She was a three-masted
schooner and I could just see the stumps of her spars out of water. She
was in too deep water and I didn't get anything off of her. So I went on
looking for something else. I had the start on all of them and I knew I
ought to get whatever there was. I went on down over the sand-bars from
where I left that three-masted schooner and I didn't find anything and I
went on a long way. I was way out toward the quicksands and I didn't
find anything so I went on. Then when I was in sight of the Rebecca
Light I saw all kinds of birds making over something and I headed over
for them to see what it was and there was a cloud of birds all right.

I could see something looked like a spar up out of water and when I got
over close the birds all went up in the air and stayed all around me.
The water was clear out there and there was a spar of some kind sticking
out just above the water and when I come up close to it I saw it was all
dark under water like a long shadow and I came right over it and there
under water was a liner; just lying there all under water as big as the
whole world. I drifted over her in the boat. She lay on her side and the
stern was deep down. The port holes were all shut tight and I could see
the glass shine in the water and the whole of her; the biggest boat I
ever saw in my life laying there and I went along the whole length of
her and then I went over and anchored and I had the skiff on the deck
forward and I shoved it down into the water and sculled over with the
birds all around me.

I had a water glass like we use sponging and my hand shook so I could
hardly hold it. All the port holes were shut that you could see going
along over her but way down below near the bottom something must have
been open because there were pieces of things floating out all the time.
You couldn't tell what they were. Just pieces. That's what the birds
were after. You never saw so many birds. They were all around me; crazy
yelling.

I could see everything sharp and clear. I could see her rounded over and
she looked a mile long under the water. She was lying on a clear white
bank of sand and the spar was a sort of foremast or some sort of tackle
that slanted out of water the way she was laying on her side. Her bow
wasn't very far under. I could stand on the letters of her name on her
bow and my head was just out of water. But the nearest port hole was
twelve feet down. I could just reach it with the grains pole and I tried
to break it with that but I couldn't. The glass was too stout. So I
sculled back to the boat and got a wrench and lashed it to the end of
the grains pole and I couldn't break it. There I was looking down
through the glass at that liner with everything in her and I was the
first one to her and I couldn't get into her. She must have had five
million dollars worth in her.

It made me shaky to think how much she must have in her. Inside the port
hole that was closest I could see something but I couldn't make it out
through the water glass. I couldn't do any good with the grains pole and
I took off my clothes and stood and took a couple of deep breaths and
dove over off the stern with the wrench in my hand and swam down. I
could hold on for a second to the edge of the port hole and I could see
in and there was a woman inside with her hair floating all out. I could
see her floating plain and I hit the glass twice with the wrench hard
and I heard the noise clink in my ears but it wouldn't break and I had
to come up.

I hung onto the dinghy and got my breath and then I climbed in and took
a couple of breaths and dove again. I swam down and took hold of the
edge of the port hole with my fingers and held it and hit the glass as
hard as I could with the wrench. I could see the woman floated in the
water through the glass. Her hair was tied once close to her head and it
floated all out in the water. I could see the rings on one of her hands.
She was right up close to the port hole and I hit the glass twice and I
didn't even crack it. When I came up I thought I wouldn't make it to the
top before I'd have to breathe.

I went down once more and I cracked the glass, only cracked it, and when
I came up my nose was bleeding and I stood on the bow of the liner with
my bare feet on the letters of her name and my head just out and rested
there and then I swam over to the skiff and pulled up into it and sat
there waiting for my head to stop aching and looking down into the water
glass, but I bled so I had to wash out the water glass. Then I lay back
in the skiff and held my hand under my nose to stop it and I lay there
with my head back looking up and there was a million birds above and all
around.

When I quit bleeding I took another look through the glass and then I
sculled over to the boat to try and find something heavier than the
wrench but I couldn't find a thing; not even a sponge hook. I went back
and the water was clearer all the time and you could see everything that
floated out over that white bank of sand. I looked for sharks but there
weren't any. You could have seen a shark a long way away. The water was
so clear and the sand white. There was a grapple for an anchor on the
skiff and I cut it off and went overboard and down with it. It carried
me right down and past the port hole and I grabbed and couldn't hold
anything and went on down and down, sliding along the curved side of
her. I had to let go of the grapple. I heard it bump once and it seemed
like a year before I came up through to the top of the water. The skiff
was floated away with the tide and I swam over to her with my nose
bleeding in the water while I swam and I was plenty glad there weren't
sharks; but I was tired.

My head felt cracked open and I lay in the skiff and rested and then I
sculled back. It was getting along in the afternoon. I went down once
more with the wrench and it didn't do any good. That wrench was too
light. It wasn't any good diving unless you had a big hammer or
something heavy enough to do good. Then I lashed the wrench to the
grains pole again and I watched through the water glass and pounded on
the glass and hammered until the wrench came off and I saw it in the
glass, clear and sharp, go sliding down along her and then off and down
to the quicksand and go in. Then I couldn't do a thing. The wrench was
gone and I'd lost the grapple so I sculled back to the boat. I was too
tired to get the skiff aboard and the sun was pretty low. The birds were
all pulling out and leaving her and I headed for Sou'west Key towing the
skiff and the birds going on ahead of me and behind me. I was plenty
tired.

That night it came on to blow and it blew for a week. You couldn't get
out to her. They come out from town and told me the fellow I'd had to
cut was all right except for his arm and I went back to town and they
put me under five hundred dollar bond. It came out all right because
some of them, friends of mine, swore he was after me with an ax, but by
the time we got back out to her the Greeks had blown her open and
cleaned her out. They got the safe out with dynamite. Nobody ever knows
how much they got. She carried gold and they got it all. They stripped
her clean. I found her and I never got a nickel out of her.

It was a hell of a thing all right. They say she was just outside of
Havana harbor when the hurricane hit and she couldn't get in or the
owners wouldn't let the captain chance coming in; they say he wanted to
try; so she had to go with it and in the dark they were running with it
trying to go through the gulf between Rebecca and Tortugas when she
struck on the quicksands. Maybe her rudder was carried away. Maybe they
weren't even steering. But anyway they couldn't have known they were
quicksands and when she struck the captain must have ordered them to
open up the ballast tanks so she'd lay solid. But it was quicksand she'd
hit and when they opened the tanks she went in stern first and then over
on her beam ends. There were four hundred and fifty passengers and the
crew on board of her and they must all have been aboard of her when I
found her. They must have opened the tanks as soon as she struck and the
minute she settled on it the quicksands took her down. Then her boilers
must have burst and that must have been what made those pieces that came
out. It was funny there weren't any sharks though. There wasn't a fish.
I could have seen them on that clear white sand.

Plenty of fish now though; jewfish, the biggest kind. The biggest part
of her's under the sand now but they live inside of her; the biggest
kind of jewfish. Some weigh three to four hundred pounds. Sometime we'll
go out and get some. You can see the Rebecca light from where she is.
They've got a buoy on her now. She's right at the end of the quicksand
right at the edge of the gulf. She only missed going through by about a
hundred yards. In the dark in the storm they just missed it; raining the
way it was they couldn't have seen the Rebecca. Then they're not used to
that sort of thing. The captain of a liner isn't used to scudding that
way. They have a course and they tell me they set some sort of a compass
and it steers itself. They probably didn't know where they were when
they ran with that blow but they come close to making it. Maybe they'd
lost the rudder though. Anyway there wasn't another thing for them to
hit till they'd get to Mexico once they were in that gulf. Must have
been something though when they struck in that rain and wind and he told
them to open her tanks. Nobody could have been on deck in that blow and
rain. Everybody must have been below. They couldn't have lived on deck.
There must have been some scenes inside all right because you know she
settled fast. I saw that wrench go into the sand. The captain couldn't
have known it was quicksand when she struck unless he knew these waters.
He just knew it wasn't rock. He must have seen it all up in the bridge.
He must have known what it was about when she settled. I wonder how fast
she made it. I wonder if the mate was there with him. Do you think they
stayed inside the bridge or do you think they took it outside? They
never found any bodies. Not a one. Nobody floating. They float a long
way with life belts too. They must have took it inside. Well, the Greeks
got it all. Everything. They must have come fast all right. They picked
her clean. First there was the birds, then me, then the Greeks, and even
the birds got more out of her than I did.




                      A CLEAN, WELL-LIGHTED PLACE


It was late and every one had left the café except an old man who sat in
the shadow the leaves of the tree made against the electric light. In
the daytime the street was dusty, but at night the dew settled the dust
and the old man liked to sit late because he was deaf and now at night
it was quiet and he felt the difference. The two waiters inside the café
knew that the old man was a little drunk, and while he was a good client
they knew that if he became too drunk he would leave without paying, so
they kept watch on him.

"Last week he tried to commit suicide," one waiter said.

"Why?"

"He was in despair."

"What about?"

"Nothing."

"How do you know it was nothing?"

"He has plenty of money."

They sat together at a table that was close against the wall near the
door of the café and looked at the terrace where the tables were all
empty except where the old man sat in the shadow of the leaves of the
tree that moved slightly in the wind. A girl and a soldier went by in
the street. The street light shone on the brass number on his collar.
The girl wore no head covering and hurried beside him.

"The guard will pick him up," one waiter said.

"What does it matter if he gets what he's after?"

"He had better get off the street now. The guard will get him. They went
by five minutes ago."

The old man sitting in the shadow rapped on his saucer with his glass.
The younger waiter went over to him.

"What do you want?"

The old man looked at him. "Another brandy," he said.

"You'll be drunk," the waiter said. The old man looked at him. The
waiter went away.

"He'll stay all night," he said to his colleague. "I'm sleepy now. I
never get into bed before three o'clock. He should have killed himself
last week."

The waiter took the brandy bottle and another saucer from the counter
inside the café and marched out to the old man's table. He put down the
saucer and poured the glass full of brandy.

"You should have killed yourself last week," he said to the deaf man.
The old man motioned with his finger. "A little more," he said. The
waiter poured on into the glass so that the brandy slopped over and ran
down the stem into the top saucer of the pile. "Thank you," the old man
said. The waiter took the bottle back inside the café. He sat down at
the table with his colleague again.

"He's drunk now," he said.

"He's drunk every night."

"What did he want to kill himself for?"

"How should I know."

"How did he do it?"

"He hung himself with a rope."

"Who cut him down?"

"His niece."

"Why did they do it?"

"Fear for his soul."

"How much money has he got?"

"He's got plenty."

"He must be eighty years old."

"Anyway I should say he was eighty."

"I wish he would go home. I never get to bed before three o'clock. What
kind of hour is that to go to bed?"

"He stays up because he likes it."

"He's lonely. I'm not lonely. I have a wife waiting in bed for me."

"He had a wife once too."

"A wife would be no good to him now."

"You can't tell. He might be better with a wife."

"His niece looks after him."

"I know. You said she cut him down."

"I wouldn't want to be that old. An old man is a nasty thing."

"Not always. This old man is clean. He drinks without spilling. Even
now, drunk. Look at him."

"I don't want to look at him. I wish he would go home. He has no regard
for those who must work."

The old man looked from his glass across the square, then over at the
waiters.

"Another brandy," he said, pointing to his glass. The waiter who was in
a hurry came over.

"Finished," he said, speaking with that omission of syntax stupid people
employ when talking to drunken people or foreigners. "No more tonight.
Close now."

"Another," said the old man.

"No. Finished." The waiter wiped the edge of the table with a towel and
shook his head.

The old man stood up, slowly counted the saucers, took a leather coin
purse from his pocket and paid for the drinks, leaving half a peseta
tip.

The waiter watched him go down the street, a very old man walking
unsteadily but with dignity.

"Why didn't you let him stay and drink?" the unhurried waiter asked.
They were putting up the shutters. "It is not half-past two."

"I want to go home to bed."

"What is an hour?"

"More to me than to him."

"An hour is the same."

"You talk like an old man yourself. He can buy a bottle and drink at
home."

"It's not the same."

"No, it is not," agreed the waiter with a wife. He did not wish to be
unjust. He was only in a hurry.

"And you? You have no fear of going home before your usual hour?"

"Are you trying to insult me?"

"No, hombre, only to make a joke."

"No," the waiter who was in a hurry said, rising from pulling down the
metal shutters. "I have confidence. I am all confidence."

"You have youth, confidence, and a job," the older waiter said. "You
have everything."

"And what do you lack?"

"Everything but work."

"You have everything I have."

"No. I have never had confidence and I am not young."

"Come on. Stop talking nonsense and lock up."

"I am of those who like to stay late at the café," the older waiter
said. "With all those who do not want to go to bed. With all those who
need a light for the night."

"I want to go home and into bed."

"We are of two different kinds," the older waiter said. He was now
dressed to go home. "It is not only a question of youth and confidence
although those things are very beautiful. Each night I am reluctant to
close up because there may be some one who needs the café."

"Hombre, there are bodegas open all night long."

"You do not understand. This is a clean and pleasant café. It is well
lighted. The light is very good and also, now, there are shadows of the
leaves."

"Good night," said the younger waiter.

"Good night," the other said. Turning off the electric light he
continued the conversation with himself. It is the light of course but
it is necessary that the place be clean and pleasant. You do not want
music. Certainly you do not want music. Nor can you stand before a bar
with dignity although that is all that is provided for these hours. What
did he fear? It was not fear or dread. It was a nothing that he knew too
well. It was all a nothing and a man was nothing too. It was only that
and light was all it needed and a certain cleanness and order. Some
lived in it and never felt it but he knew it all was nada y pues nada y
nada y pues nada. Our nada who art in nada, nada be thy name thy kingdom
nada thy will be nada in nada as it is in nada. Give us this nada our
daily nada and nada us our nada as we nada our nadas and nada us not
into nada but deliver us from nada; pues nada. Hail nothing full of
nothing, nothing is with thee. He smiled and stood before a bar with a
shining steam pressure coffee machine.

"What's yours?" asked the barman.

"Nada."

"Otro loco mas," said the barman and turned away.

"A little cup," said the waiter.

The barman poured it for him.

"The light is very bright and pleasant but the bar is unpolished," the
waiter said.

The barman looked at him but did not answer. It was too late at night
for conversation.

"You want another copita?" the barman asked.

"No, thank you," said the waiter and went out. He disliked bars and
bodegas. A clean, well-lighted café was a very different thing. Now,
without thinking further, he would go home to his room. He would lie in
the bed and finally, with daylight, he would go to sleep. After all, he
said to himself, it is probably only insomnia. Many must have it.




                         THE LIGHT OF THE WORLD


When he saw us come in the door the bartender looked up and then reached
over and put the glass covers on the two free-lunch bowls.

"Give me a beer," I said. He drew it, cut the top off with the spatula
and then held the glass in his hand. I put the nickel on the wood and he
slid the beer toward me.

"What's yours?" he said to Tom.

"Beer."

He drew that beer and cut it off and when he saw the money he pushed the
beer across to Tom.

"What's the matter?" Tom asked.

The bartender didn't answer him. He just looked over our heads and said,
"What's yours?" to a man who'd come in.

"Rye," the man said. The bartender put out the bottle and glass and a
glass of water.

Tom reached over and took the glass off the free-lunch bowl. It was a
bowl of pickled pig's feet and there was a wooden thing that worked like
a scissors, with two wooden forks at the end to pick them up with.

"No," said the bartender and put the glass cover back on the bowl. Tom
held the wooden scissors fork in his hand. "Put it back," said the
bartender.

"You know where," said Tom.

The bartender reached a hand forward under the bar, watching us both. I
put fifty cents on the wood and he straightened up.

"What was yours?" he said.

"Beer," I said, and before he drew the beer he uncovered both the bowls.

"Your goddam pig's feet stink," Tom said, and spit what he had in his
mouth on the floor. The bartender didn't say anything. The man who had
drunk the rye paid and went out without looking back.

"You stink yourself," the bartender said. "All you punks stink."

"He says we're punks," Tommy said to me.

"Listen," I said. "Let's get out."

"You punks clear the hell out of here," the bartender said.

"I said we were going out," I said. "It wasn't your idea."

"We'll be back," Tommy said.

"No you won't," the bartender told him.

"Tell him how wrong he is," Tom turned to me.

"Come on," I said.

Outside it was good and dark.

"What the hell kind of place is this?" Tommy said.

"I don't know," I said. "Let's go down to the station."

We'd come in that town at one end and we were going out the other. It
smelled of hides and tan bark and the big piles of sawdust. It was
getting dark as we came in, and now that it was dark it was cold and the
puddles of water in the road were freezing at the edges.

Down at the station there were five whores waiting for the train to come
in, and six white men and four Indians. It was crowded and hot from the
stove and full of stale smoke. As we came in nobody was talking and the
ticket window was down.

"Shut the door, can't you?" somebody said.

I looked to see who said it. It was one of the white men. He wore
stagged trousers and lumbermen's rubbers and a mackinaw shirt like the
others, but he had no cap and his face was white and his hands were
white and thin.

"Aren't you going to shut it?"

"Sure," I said, and shut it.

"Thank you," he said. One of the other men snickered.

"Ever interfere with a cook?" he said to me.

"No."

"You interfere with this one," he looked at the cook. "He likes it."

The cook looked away from him holding his lips tight together.

"He puts lemon juice on his hands," the man said. "He wouldn't get them
in dishwater for anything. Look how white they are."

One of the whores laughed out loud. She was the biggest whore I ever saw
in my life and the biggest woman. And she had on one of those silk
dresses that change colors. There were two other whores that were nearly
as big but the big one must have weighed three hundred and fifty pounds.
You couldn't believe she was real when you looked at her. All three had
those changeable silk dresses. They sat side by side on the bench. They
were huge. The other two were just ordinary looking whores, peroxide
blondes.

"Look at his hands," the man said and nodded his head at the cook. The
whore laughed again and shook all over.

The cook turned and said to her quickly, "You big disgusting mountain of
flesh."

She just kept on laughing and shaking.

"Oh, my Christ," she said. She had a nice voice. "Oh, my sweet Christ."

The two other whores, the big ones, acted very quiet and placid as
though they didn't have much sense, but they were big, nearly as big as
the biggest one. They'd have both gone well over two hundred and fifty
pounds. The other two were dignified.

Of the men, besides the cook and the one who talked, there were two
other lumberjacks, one that listened, interested but bashful, and the
other that seemed getting ready to say something, and two Swedes. Two
Indians were sitting down at the end of the bench and one standing up
against the wall.

The man who was getting ready to say something spoke to me very low,
"Must be like getting on top of a hay mow."

I laughed and said it to Tommy.

"I swear to Christ I've never been anywhere like this," he said. "Look
at the three of them." Then the cook spoke up.

"How old are you boys?"

"I'm ninety-six and he's sixty-nine," Tommy said.

"Ho! Ho! Ho!" the big whore shook with laughing. She had a really pretty
voice. The other whores didn't smile.

"Oh, can't you be decent?" the cook said. "I asked just to be friendly."

"We're seventeen and nineteen," I said.

"What's the matter with you?" Tommy turned to me.

"That's all right."

"You can call me Alice," the big whore said and then she began to shake
again.

"Is that your name?" Tommy asked.

"Sure," she said. "Alice. Isn't it?" she turned to the man who sat by
the cook.

"Alice. That's right."

"That's the sort of name you'd have," the cook said.

"It's my real name," Alice said.

"What's the other girls' names?" Tom asked.

"Hazel and Ethel," Alice said. Hazel and Ethel smiled. They weren't very
bright.

"What's your name?" I said to one of the blondes.

"Frances," she said.

"Frances what?"

"Frances Wilson. What's it to you?"

"What's yours?" I asked the other one.

"Oh, don't be fresh," she said.

"He just wants us all to be friends," the man who talked said. "Don't
you want to be friends?"

"No," the peroxide one said. "Not with you."

"She's just a spitfire," the man said. "A regular little spitfire."

The one blonde looked at the other and shook her head.

"Goddamned mossbacks," she said.

Alice commenced to laugh again and to shake all over.

"There's nothing funny," the cook said. "You all laugh but there's
nothing funny. You two young lads; where are you bound for?"

"Where are you going yourself?" Tom asked him.

"I want to go to Cadillac," the cook said. "Have you ever been there? My
sister lives there."

"He's a sister himself," the man in the stagged trousers said.

"Can't you stop that sort of thing?" the cook asked. "Can't we speak
decently?"

"Cadillac is where Steve Ketchel came from and where Ad Wolgast is
from," the shy man said.

"Steve Ketchel," one of the blondes said in a high voice as though the
name had pulled a trigger in her. "His own father shot and killed him.
Yes, by Christ, his own father. There aren't any more men like Steve
Ketchel."

"Wasn't his name Stanley Ketchel?" asked the cook.

"Oh, shut up," said the blonde. "What do you know about Steve? Stanley.
He was no Stanley. Steve Ketchel was the finest and most beautiful man
that ever lived. I never saw a man as clean and as white and as
beautiful as Steve Ketchel. There never was a man like that. He moved
just like a tiger and he was the finest, free-est, spender that ever
lived."

"Did you know him?" one of the men asked.

"Did I know him? Did I know him? Did I love him? You ask me that? I knew
him like you know nobody in the world and I loved him like you love God.
He was the greatest, finest, whitest, most beautiful man that ever
lived, Steve Ketchel, and his own father shot him down like a dog."

"Were you out on the coast with him?"

"No. I knew him before that. He was the only man I ever loved."

Every one was very respectful to the peroxide blonde, who said all this
in a high stagey way, but Alice was beginning to shake again. I felt it
sitting by her.

"You should have married him," the cook said.

"I wouldn't hurt his career," the peroxide blonde said. "I wouldn't be a
drawback to him. A wife wasn't what he needed. Oh, my God, what a man he
was."

"That was a fine way to look at it," the cook said. "Didn't Jack Johnson
knock him out though?"

"It was a trick," Peroxide said. "That big dinge took him by surprise.
He'd just knocked Jack Johnson down, the big black bastard. That nigger
beat him by a fluke."

The ticket window went up and the three Indians went over to it.

"Steve knocked him down," Peroxide said. "He turned to smile at me."

"I thought you said you weren't on the coast," some one said.

"I went out just for that fight. Steve turned to smile at me and that
black son of a bitch from hell jumped up and hit him by surprise. Steve
could lick a hundred like that black bastard."

"He was a great fighter," the lumberjack said.

"I hope to God he was," Peroxide said. "I hope to God they don't have
fighters like that now. He was like a god, he was. So white and clean
and beautiful and smooth and fast and like a tiger or like lightning."

"I saw him in the moving pictures of the fight," Tom said. We were all
very moved. Alice was shaking all over and I looked and saw she was
crying. The Indians had gone outside on the platform.

"He was more than any husband could ever be," Peroxide said. "We were
married in the eyes of God and I belong to him right now and always will
and all of me is his. I don't care about my body. They can take my body.
My soul belongs to Steve Ketchel. By God, he was a man."

Everybody felt terribly. It was sad and embarrassing. Then Alice, who
was still shaking, spoke. "You're a dirty liar," she said in that low
voice. "You never layed Steve Ketchel in your life and you know it."

"How can you say that?" Peroxide said proudly.

"I say it because it's true," Alice said. "I'm the only one here that
ever knew Steve Ketchel and I come from Mancelona and I knew him there
and it's true and you know it's true and God can strike me dead if it
isn't true."

"He can strike me too," Peroxide said.

"This is true, true, true, and you know it. Not just made up and I know
exactly what he said to me."

"What did he say?" Peroxide asked, complacently.

Alice was crying so she could hardly speak from shaking so.

"He said 'You're a lovely piece, Alice.' That's exactly what he said."

"It's a lie," Peroxide said.

"It's true," Alice said. "That's truly what he said."

"It's a lie," Peroxide said proudly.

"No, it's true, true, true, to Jesus and Mary true."

"Steve couldn't have said that. It wasn't the way he talked," Peroxide
said happily.

"It's true," Alice said in her nice voice. "And it doesn't make any
difference to me whether you believe it or not." She wasn't crying any
more and she was calm.

"It would be impossible for Steve to have said that," Peroxide declared.

"He said it," Alice said and smiled. "And I remember when he said it and
I was a lovely piece then exactly as he said, and right now I'm a better
piece than you, you dried up old hot-water bottle."

"You can't insult me," said Peroxide. "You big mountain of pus. I have
my memories."

"No," Alice said in that sweet lovely voice, "you haven't got any real
memories except having your tubes out and when you started C. and M.
Everything else you just read in the papers. I'm clean and you know it
and men like me, even though I'm big, and you know it, and I never lie
and you know it."

"Leave me with my memories," Peroxide said. "With my true, wonderful
memories."

Alice looked at her and then at us and her face lost that hurt look and
she smiled and she had about the prettiest face I ever saw. She had a
pretty face and a nice smooth skin and a lovely voice and she was nice
all right and really friendly. But my God she was big. She was as big as
three women. Tom saw me looking at her and he said, "Come on. Let's go."

"Good-bye," said Alice. She certainly had a nice voice.

"Good-bye," I said.

"Which way are you boys going?" asked the cook.

"The other way from you," Tom told him.




                     GOD REST YOU MERRY, GENTLEMEN


In those days the distances were all very different, the dirt blew off
the hills that now have been cut down, and Kansas City was very like
Constantinople. You may not believe this. No one believes this; but it
is true. On this afternoon it was snowing and inside an automobile
dealer's show window, lighted against the early dark, there was a racing
motor car finished entirely in silver with Dans Argent lettered on the
hood. This I believed to mean the silver dance or the silver dancer,
and, slightly puzzled which it meant but happy in the sight of the car
and pleased by my knowledge of a foreign language, I went along the
street in the snow. I was walking from the Woolf Brothers' saloon where,
on Christmas and Thanksgiving Day, a free turkey dinner was served,
toward the city hospital which was on a high hill that overlooked the
smoke, the buildings and the streets of the town. In the reception room
of the hospital were the two ambulance surgeons Doc Fischer and Doctor
Wilcox, sitting, the one before a desk, the other in a chair against the
wall.

Doc Fischer was thin, sand-blond, with a thin mouth, amused eyes and
gambler's hands. Doctor Wilcox was short, dark and carried an indexed
book, _The Young Doctor's Friend and Guide_, which, being consulted on
any given subject, told symptoms and treatment. It was also
cross-indexed so that being consulted on symptoms it gave diagnoses. Doc
Fischer had suggested that any future editions should be further
cross-indexed so that if consulted as to the treatments being given, it
would reveal ailments and symptoms. "As an aid to memory," he said.

Doctor Wilcox was sensitive about this book but could not get along
without it. It was bound in limp leather and fitted his coat pocket and
he had bought it at the advice of one of his professors who had said,
"Wilcox, you have no business being a physician and I have done
everything in my power to prevent you from being certified as one. Since
you are now a member of this learned profession I advise you, in the
name of humanity, to obtain a copy of _The Young Doctor's Friend and
Guide_ and use it, Doctor Wilcox. Learn to use it."

Doctor Wilcox had said nothing but he had bought the leather-bound guide
that same day.

"Well, Horace," Doc Fischer said as I came in the receiving room which
smelt of cigarettes, iodoform, carbolic and an over-heated radiator.

"Gentlemen," I said.

"What news along the rialto?" Doc Fischer asked. He affected a certain
extravagance of speech which seemed to me to be of the utmost elegance.

"The free turkey at Woolf's," I answered.

"You partook?"

"Copiously."

"Many of the confrères present?"

"All of them. The whole staff."

"Much Yuletide cheer?"

"Not much."

"Doctor Wilcox here has partaken slightly," Doc Fischer said. Doctor
Wilcox looked up at him, then at me.

"Want a drink?" he asked.

"No, thanks," I said.

"That's all right," Doctor Wilcox said.

"Horace," Doc Fischer said, "you don't mind me calling you Horace, do
you?"

"No."

"Good old Horace. We've had an extremely interesting case."

"I'll say," said Doctor Wilcox.

"You know the lad who was in here yesterday?"

"Which one?"

"The lad who sought eunuch-hood."

"Yes." I had been there when he came in. He was a boy about sixteen. He
came in with no hat on and was very excited and frightened but
determined. He was curly haired and well built and his lips were
prominent.

"What's the matter with you, son?" Doctor Wilcox asked him.

"I want to be castrated," the boy said.

"Why?" Doc Fischer asked.

"I've prayed and I've done everything and nothing helps."

"Helps what?"

"That awful lust."

"What awful lust?"

"The way I get. The way I can't stop getting. I pray all night about
it."

"Just what happens?" Doc Fischer asked.

The boy told him. "Listen, boy," Doc Fischer said. "There's nothing
wrong with you. That's the way you're supposed to be. There's nothing
wrong with that."

"It is wrong," said the boy. "It's a sin against purity. It's a sin
against our Lord and Saviour."

"No," said Doc Fischer. "It's a natural thing. It's the way you are
supposed to be and later on you will think you are very fortunate."

"Oh, you don't understand," the boy said.

"Listen," Doc Fischer said and he told the boy certain things.

"No. I won't listen. You can't make me listen."

"Please listen," Doc Fischer said.

"You're just a goddamned fool," Doctor Wilcox said to the boy.

"Then you won't do it?" the boy asked.

"Do what?"

"Castrate me."

"Listen," Doc Fischer said. "No one will castrate you. There is nothing
wrong with your body. You have a fine body and you must not think about
that. If you are religious remember that what you complain of is no
sinful state but the means of consummating a sacrament."

"I can't stop it happening," the boy said. "I pray all night and I pray
in the daytime. It is a sin, a constant sin against purity."

"Oh, go and ----" Doctor Wilcox said.

"When you talk like that I don't hear you," the boy said with dignity to
Doctor Wilcox. "Won't you please do it?" he asked Doc Fischer.

"No," said Doc Fischer. "I've told you, boy."

"Get him out of here," Doctor Wilcox said.

"I'll get out," the boy said. "Don't touch me. I'll get out."

That was about five o'clock on the day before.

"So what happened?" I asked.

"So at one o'clock this morning," Doc Fischer said, "we received the
youth self-mutilated with a razor."

"Castrated?"

"No," said Doc Fischer. "He didn't know what castrate meant."

"He may die," Doctor Wilcox said.

"Why?"

"Loss of blood."

"The good physician here, Doctor Wilcox, my colleague, was on call and
he was unable to find this emergency listed in his book."

"The hell with you talking that way," Doctor Wilcox said.

"I only mean it in the friendliest way, Doctor," Doc Fischer said,
looking at his hands, at his hands that had, with his willingness to
oblige and his lack of respect for Federal statutes, made him his
trouble. "Horace here will bear me out that I only speak of it in the
very friendliest way. It was an amputation the young man performed,
Horace."

"Well, I wish you wouldn't ride me about it," Doctor Wilcox said. "There
isn't any need to ride me."

"Ride you, Doctor, on the day, the very anniversary, of our Saviour's
birth?"

"_Our_ Saviour? Ain't you a Jew?" Doctor Wilcox said.

"So I am. So I am. It always is slipping my mind. I've never given it
its proper importance. So good of you to remind me. _Your_ Saviour.
That's right. _Your_ Saviour, undoubtedly _your_ Saviour--and the ride
for Palm Sunday."

"You're too damned smart," Doctor Wilcox said.

"An excellent diagnosis, Doctor. I was always too damned smart. Too
damned smart on the coast certainly. Avoid it, Horace. You haven't much
tendency but sometimes I see a gleam. But what a diagnosis--and without
the book."

"The hell with you," Doctor Wilcox said.

"All in good time, Doctor," Doc Fischer said. "All in good time. If
there is such a place I shall certainly visit it. I have even had a very
small look into it. No more than a peek, really. I looked away almost at
once. And do you know what the young man said, Horace, when the good
Doctor here brought him in? He said, 'Oh, I asked you to do it. I asked
you so many times to do it'."

"On Christmas Day, too," Doctor Wilcox said.

"The significance of the particular day is not important," Doc Fischer
said.

"Maybe not to you," said Doctor Wilcox.

"You hear him, Horace?" Doc Fischer said. "You hear him? Having
discovered my vulnerable point, my achilles tendon so to speak, the
doctor pursues his advantage."

"You're too damned smart," Doctor Wilcox said.




                             THE SEA CHANGE


"All right," said the man. "What about it?"

"No," said the girl, "I can't."

"You mean you won't."

"I can't," said the girl. "That's all that I mean."

"You mean that you won't."

"All right," said the girl. "You have it your own way."

"I don't have it my own way. I wish to God I did."

"You did for a long time," the girl said.

It was early, and there was no one in the café except the barman and
these two who sat together at a table in the corner. It was the end of
the summer and they were both tanned, so that they looked out of place
in Paris. The girl wore a tweed suit, her skin was a smooth golden
brown, her blonde hair was cut short and grew beautifully away from her
forehead. The man looked at her.

"I'll kill her," he said.

"Please don't," the girl said. She had very fine hands and the man
looked at them. They were slim and brown and very beautiful.

"I will. I swear to God I will."

"It won't make you happy."

"Couldn't you have gotten into something else? Couldn't you have gotten
into some other jam?"

"It seems not," the girl said. "What are you going to do about it?"

"I told you."

"No; I mean really."

"I don't know," he said. She looked at him and put out her hand. "Poor
old Phil," she said. He looked at her hands, but he did not touch her
hand with his.

"No, thanks," he said.

"It doesn't do any good to say I'm sorry?"

"No."

"Nor to tell you how it is?"

"I'd rather not hear."

"I love you very much."

"Yes, this proves it."

"I'm sorry," she said, "if you don't understand."

"I understand. That's the trouble. I understand."

"You do," she said. "That makes it worse, of course."

"Sure," he said, looking at her. "I'll understand all the time. All day
and all night. Especially all night. I'll understand. You don't have to
worry about that."

"I'm sorry," she said.

"If it was a man----"

"Don't say that. It wouldn't be a man. You know that. Don't you trust
me?"

"That's funny," he said. "Trust you. That's really funny."

"I'm sorry," she said. "That's all I seem to say. But when we do
understand each other there's no use to pretend we don't."

"No," he said. "I suppose not."

"I'll come back if you want me."

"No. I don't want you."

Then they did not say anything for a while.

"You don't believe I love you, do you?" the girl asked.

"Let's not talk rot," the man said.

"Don't you really believe I love you?"

"Why don't you prove it?"

"You didn't use to be that way. You never asked me to prove anything.
That isn't polite."

"You're a funny girl."

"You're not. You're a fine man and it breaks my heart to go off and
leave you----"

"You have to, of course."

"Yes," she said. "I have to and you know it."

He did not say anything and she looked at him and put her hand out
again. The barman was at the far end of the bar. His face was white and
so was his jacket. He knew these two and thought them a handsome young
couple. He had seen many handsome young couples break up and new couples
form that were never so handsome long. He was not thinking about this,
but about a horse. In half an hour he could send across the street to
find if the horse had won.

"Couldn't you just be good to me and let me go?" the girl asked.

"What do you think I'm going to do?"

Two people came in the door and went up to the bar.

"Yes, sir," the barman took the orders.

"You can't forgive me? When you know about it?" the girl asked.

"No."

"You don't think things we've had and done should make any difference in
understanding?"

"'Vice is a monster of such fearful mien,'" the young man said bitterly,
"that to be something or other needs but to be seen. Then we something,
something, then embrace." He could not remember the words. "I can't
quote," he said.

"Let's not say vice," she said. "That's not very polite."

"Perversion," he said.

"James," one of the clients addressed the barman, "you're looking very
well."

"You're looking very well yourself," the barman said.

"Old James," the other client said. "You're fatter, James."

"It's terrible," the barman said, "the way I put it on."

"Don't neglect to insert the brandy, James," the first client said.

"No, sir," said the barman. "Trust me."

The two at the bar looked over at the two at the table, then looked back
at the barman again. Towards the barman was the comfortable direction.

"I'd like it better if you didn't use words like that," the girl said.
"There's no necessity to use a word like that."

"What do you want me to call it?"

"You don't have to call it. You don't have to put any name to it."

"That's the name for it."

"No," she said. "We're made up of all sorts of things. You've known
that. You've used it well enough."

"You don't have to say that again."

"Because that explains it to you."

"All right," he said. "All right."

"You mean all wrong. I know. It's all wrong. But I'll come back. I told
you I'd come back. I'll come back right away."

"No, you won't."

"I'll come back."

"No, you won't. Not to me."

"You'll see."

"Yes," he said. "That's the hell of it. You probably will."

"Of course I will."

"Go on, then."

"Really?" She could not believe him, but her voice was happy.

"Go on," his voice sounded strange to him. He was looking at her, at the
way her mouth went and the curve of her cheek bones, at her eyes and at
the way her hair grew on her forehead and at the edge of her ear and at
her neck.

"Not really. Oh, you're too sweet," she said. "You're too good to me."

"And when you come back tell me all about it." His voice sounded very
strange. He did not recognize it. She looked at him quickly. He was
settled into something.

"You want me to go?" she asked seriously.

"Yes," he said seriously. "Right away." His voice was not the same, and
his mouth was very dry. "Now," he said.

She stood up and went out quickly. She did not look back at him. He
watched her go. He was not the same looking man as he had been before he
had told her to go. He got up from the table, picked up the two checks
and went over to the bar with them.

"I'm a different man, James," he said to the barman. "You see in me
quite a different man."

"Yes, sir?" said James.

"Vice," said the brown young man, "is a very strange thing, James." He
looked out the door. He saw her going down the street. As he looked in
the glass, he saw he was really quite a different looking man. The other
two at the bar moved down to make room for him.

"You're right there, sir," James said.

The other two moved down a little more, so that he would be quite
comfortable. The young man saw himself in the mirror behind the bar. "I
said I was a different man, James," he said. Looking into the mirror he
saw that this was quite true.

"You look very well, sir," James said. "You must have had a very good
summer."




                         A WAY YOU'LL NEVER BE


The attack had gone across the field, been held up by machine-gun fire
from the sunken road and from the group of farm houses, encountered no
resistance in the town, and reached the bank of the river. Coming along
the road on a bicycle, getting off to push the machine when the surface
of the road became too broken, Nicholas Adams saw what had happened by
the position of the dead.

They lay alone or in clumps in the high grass of the field and along the
road, their pockets out, and over them were flies and around each body
or group of bodies were the scattered papers.

In the grass and the grain, beside the road, and in some places
scattered over the road, there was much material: a field kitchen, it
must have come over when things were going well; many of the
calf-skin-covered haversacks, stick bombs, helmets, rifles, sometimes
one butt up, the bayonet stuck in the dirt, they had dug quite a little
at the last; stick bombs, helmets, rifles, intrenching tools, ammunition
boxes, star-shell pistols, their shells scattered about, medical kits,
gas masks, empty gas-mask cans, a squat, tripodded machine gun in a nest
of empty shells, full belts protruding from the boxes, the water-cooling
can empty and on its side, the breech block gone, the crew in odd
positions, and around them, in the grass, more of the typical papers.

There were mass prayer books, group postcards showing the machine-gun
unit standing in ranked and ruddy cheerfulness as in a football picture
for a college annual; now they were humped and swollen in the grass;
propaganda postcards showing a soldier in Austrian uniform bending a
woman backward over a bed; the figures were impressionistically drawn;
very attractively depicted and had nothing in common with actual rape in
which the woman's skirts are pulled over her head to smother her, one
comrade sometimes sitting upon the head. There were many of these
inciting cards which had evidently been issued just before the
offensive. Now they were scattered with the smutty postcards,
photographic; the small photographs of village girls by village
photographers, the occasional pictures of children, and the letters,
letters, letters. There was always much paper about the dead and the
débris of this attack was no exception.

These were new dead and no one had bothered with anything but their
pockets. Our own dead, or what he thought of, still, as our own dead,
were surprisingly few, Nick noticed. Their coats had been opened too and
their pockets were out, and they showed, by their positions, the manner
and the skill of the attack. The hot weather had swollen them all alike
regardless of nationality.

The town had evidently been defended, at the last, from the line of the
sunken road and there had been few or no Austrians to fall back into it.
There were only three bodies in the street and they looked to have been
killed running. The houses of the town were broken by the shelling and
the street had much rubble of plaster and mortar and there were broken
beams, broken tiles, and many holes, some of them yellow-edged from the
mustard gas. There were many pieces of shell, and shrapnel balls were
scattered in the rubble. There was no one in the town at all.

Nick Adams had seen no one since he had left Fornaci, although, riding
along the road through the over-foliaged country, he had seen guns
hidden under screens of mulberry leaves to the left of the road,
noticing them by the heatwaves in the air above the leaves where the sun
hit the metal. Now he went on through the town, surprised to find it
deserted, and came out on the low road beneath the bank of the river.
Leaving the town there was a bare open space where the road slanted down
and he could see the placid reach of the river and the low curve of the
opposite bank and the whitened, sun-baked mud where the Austrians had
dug. It was all very lush and over-green since he had seen it last and
becoming historical had made no change in this, the lower river.

The battalion was along the bank to the left. There was a series of
holes in the top of the bank with a few men in them. Nick noticed where
the machine guns were posted and the signal rockets in their racks. The
men in the holes in the side of the bank were sleeping. No one
challenged. He went on and as he came around a turn in the mud bank a
young second lieutenant with a stubble of beard and red-rimmed, very
blood-shot eyes pointed a pistol at him.

"Who are you?"

Nick told him.

"How do I know this?"

Nick showed him the tessera with photograph and identification and the
seal of the third army. He took hold of it.

"I will keep this."

"You will not," Nick said. "Give me back the card and put your gun away.
There. In the holster."

"How am I to know who you are?"

"The tessera tells you."

"And if the tessera is false? Give me that card."

"Don't be a fool," Nick said cheerfully. "Take me to your company
commander."

"I should send you to battalion headquarters."

"All right," said Nick. "Listen, do you know the Captain Paravicini? The
tall one with the small mustache who was an architect and speaks
English?"

"You know him?"

"A little."

"What company does he command?"

"The second."

"He is commanding the battalion."

"Good," said Nick. He was relieved to know that Para was all right. "Let
us go to the battalion."

As Nick had left the edge of the town three shrapnel had burst high and
to the right over one of the wrecked houses and since then there had
been no shelling. But the face of this officer looked like the face of a
man during a bombardment. There was the same tightness and the voice did
not sound natural. His pistol made Nick nervous.

"Put it away," he said. "There's the whole river between them and you."

"If I thought you were a spy I would shoot you now," the second
lieutenant said.

"Come on," said Nick. "Let us go to the battalion." This officer made
him very nervous.

The Captain Paravicini, acting major, thinner and more English looking
than ever, rose when Nick saluted from behind the table in the dugout
that was battalion headquarters.

"Hello," he said. "I didn't know you. What are you doing in that
uniform?"

"They've put me in it."

"I am very glad to see you, Nicolo."

"Right. You look well. How was the show?"

"We made a very fine attack. Truly. A very fine attack. I will show you.
Look."

He showed on the map how the attack had gone.

"I came from Fornaci," Nick said. "I could see how it had been. It was
very good."

"It was extraordinary. Altogether extraordinary. Are you attached to the
regiment?"

"No. I am supposed to move around and let them see the uniform."

"How odd."

"If they see one American uniform that is supposed to make them believe
others are coming."

"But how will they know it is an American uniform?"

"You will tell them."

"Oh. Yes, I see. I will send a corporal with you to show you about and
you will make a tour of the lines."

"Like a bloody politician," Nick said.

"You would be much more distinguished in civilian clothes. They are what
is really distinguished."

"With a homburg hat," said Nick.

"Or with a very furry fedora."

"I'm supposed to have my pockets full of cigarettes and postal cards and
such things," Nick said. "I should have a musette full of chocolate.
These I should distribute with a kind word and a pat on the back. But
there weren't any cigarettes and postcards and no chocolate. So they
said to circulate around anyway."

"I'm sure your appearance will be very heartening to the troops."

"I wish you wouldn't," Nick said. "I feel badly enough about it as it
is. In principle, I would have brought you a bottle of brandy."

"In principle," Para said and smiled, for the first time, showing
yellowed teeth. "Such a beautiful expression. Would you like some
Grappa?"

"No, thank you," Nick said.

"It hasn't any ether in it."

"I can taste that still," Nick remembered suddenly and completely.

"You know I never knew you were drunk until you started talking coming
back in the camions."

"I was stinking in every attack," Nick said.

"I can't do it," Para said. "I took it in the first show, the very first
show, and it only made me very upset and then frightfully thirsty."

"You don't need it."

"You're much braver in an attack than I am."

"No," Nick said. "I know how I am and I prefer to get stinking. I'm not
ashamed of it."

"I've never seen you drunk."

"No?" said Nick. "Never? Not when we rode from Mestre to Portogrande
that night and I wanted to go to sleep and used the bicycle for a
blanket and pulled it up under my chin?"

"That wasn't in the lines."

"Let's not talk about how I am," Nick said. "It's a subject I know too
much about to want to think about it any more."

"You might as well stay here a while," Paravicini said. "You can take a
nap if you like. They didn't do much to this in the bombardment. It's
too hot to go out yet."

"I suppose there is no hurry."

"How are you really?"

"I'm fine. I'm perfectly all right."

"No. I mean really."

"I'm all right. I can't sleep without a light of some sort. That's all I
have now."

"I said it should have been trepanned. I'm no doctor but I know that."

"Well, they thought it was better to have it absorb, and that's what I
got. What's the matter? I don't seem crazy to you, do I?"

"You seem in top-hole shape."

"It's a hell of a nuisance once they've had you certified as nutty,"
Nick said. "No one ever has any confidence in you again."

"I would take a nap, Nicolo," Paravicini said. "This isn't battalion
headquarters as we used to know it. We're just waiting to be pulled out.
You oughtn't to go out in the heat now--it's silly. Use that bunk."

"I might just lie down," Nick said.

Nick lay on the bunk. He was very disappointed that he felt this way and
more disappointed, even, that it was so obvious to Captain Paravicini.
This was not as large a dugout as the one where that platoon of the
class of 1899, just out at the front, got hysterics during the
bombardment before the attack, and Para had had him walk them two at a
time outside to show them nothing would happen, he wearing his own chin
strap tight across his mouth to keep his lips quiet. Knowing they could
not hold it when they took it. Knowing it was all a bloody balls--If he
can't stop crying, break his nose to give him something else to think
about. I'd shoot one but it's too late now. They'd all be worse. Break
his nose. They've put it back to five-twenty. We've only got four
minutes more. Break that other silly bugger's nose and kick his silly
ass out of here. Do you think they'll go over? If they don't, shoot two
and try to scoop the others out some way. Keep behind them, sergeant.
It's no use to walk ahead and find there's nothing coming behind you.
Bail them out as you go. What a bloody balls. All right. That's right.
Then, looking at the watch, in that quiet tone, that valuable quiet
tone, "Savoia." Making it cold, no time to get it, he couldn't find his
own after the cave-in, one whole end had caved in; it was that started
them; making it cold up that slope the only time he hadn't done it
stinking. And after they came back the teleferica house burned, it
seemed, and some of the wounded got down four days later and some did
not get down, but we went up and we went back and we came down--we
always came down. And there was Gaby Delys, oddly enough, with feathers
on; you called me baby doll a year ago tadada you said that I was rather
nice to know tadada with feathers on, with feathers off, the great Gaby,
and my name's Harry Pilcer, too, we used to step out of the far side of
the taxis when it got steep going up the hill and he could see that hill
every night when he dreamed with Sacré Coeur, blown white, like a soap
bubble. Sometimes his girl was there and sometimes she was with some one
else and he could not understand that, but those were the nights the
river ran so much wider and stiller than it should and outside of
Fossalta there was a low house painted yellow with willows all around it
and a low stable and there was a canal, and he had been there a thousand
times and never seen it, but there it was every night as plain as the
hill, only it frightened him. That house meant more than anything and
every night he had it. That was what he needed but it frightened him
especially when the boat lay there quietly in the willows on the canal,
but the banks weren't like this river. It was all lower, as it was at
Portogrande, where they had seen them come wallowing across the flooded
ground holding the rifles high until they fell with them in the water.
Who ordered that one? If it didn't get so damned mixed up he could
follow it all right. That was why he noticed everything in such detail
to keep it all straight so he would know just where he was, but suddenly
it confused without reason as now, he lying in a bunk at battalion
headquarters, with Para commanding a battalion and he in a bloody
American uniform. He sat up and looked around; they all watching him.
Para was gone out. He lay down again.

The Paris part came earlier and he was not frightened of it except when
she had gone off with some one else and the fear that they might take
the same driver twice. That was what frightened about that. Never about
the front. He never dreamed about the front now any more but what
frightened him so that he could not get rid of it was that long yellow
house and the different width of the river. Now he was back here at the
river, he had gone through that same town, and there was no house. Nor
was the river that way. Then where did he go each night and what was the
peril, and why would he wake, soaking wet, more frightened than he had
ever been in a bombardment, because of a house and a long stable and a
canal?

He sat up, swung his legs carefully down; they stiffened any time they
were out straight for long; returned the stares of the adjutant, the
signallers and the two runners by the door and put on his cloth-covered
trench helmet.

"I regret the absence of the chocolate, the postal-cards and
cigarettes," he said. "I am, however, wearing the uniform."

"The major is coming back at once," the adjutant said. In that army an
adjutant is not a commissioned officer.

"The uniform is not very correct," Nick told them. "But it gives you the
idea. There will be several millions of Americans here shortly."

"Do you think they will send Americans down here?" asked the adjutant.

"Oh, absolutely. Americans twice as large as myself, healthy, with clean
hearts, sleep at night, never been wounded, never been blown up, never
had their heads caved in, never been scared, don't drink, faithful to
the girls they left behind them, many of them never had crabs, wonderful
chaps. You'll see."

"Are you an Italian?" asked the adjutant.

"No, American. Look at the uniform. Spagnolini made it but it's not
quite correct."

"A North or South American?"

"North," said Nick. He felt it coming on now. He would quiet down.

"But you speak Italian."

"Why not? Do you mind if I speak Italian? Haven't I a right to speak
Italian?"

"You have Italian medals."

"Just the ribbons and the papers. The medals come later. Or you give
them to people to keep and the people go away; or they are lost with
your baggage. You can purchase others in Milan. It is the papers that
are of importance. You must not feel badly about them. You will have
some yourself if you stay at the front long enough."

"I am a veteran of the Iritrea campaign," said the adjutant stiffly. "I
fought in Tripoli."

"It's quite something to have met you," Nick put out his hand. "Those
must have been trying days. I noticed the ribbons. Were you, by any
chance, on the Carso?"

"I have just been called up for this war. My class was too old."

"At one time I was under the age limit," Nick said. "But now I am
reformed out of the war."

"But why are you here now?"

"I am demonstrating the American uniform," Nick said. "Don't you think
it is very significant? It is a little tight in the collar but soon you
will see untold millions wearing this uniform swarming like locusts. The
grasshopper, you know, what we call the grasshopper in America, is
really a locust. The true grasshopper is small and green and
comparatively feeble. You must not, however, make a confusion with the
seven-year locust or cicada which emits a peculiar sustained sound which
at the moment I cannot recall. I try to recall it but I cannot. I can
almost hear it and then it is quite gone. You will pardon me if I break
off our conversation?"

"See if you can find the major," the adjutant said to one of the two
runners. "I can see you have been wounded," he said to Nick.

"In various places," Nick said. "If you are interested in scars I can
show you some very interesting ones but I would rather talk about
grasshoppers. What we call grasshoppers that is; and what are, really,
locusts. These insects at one time played a very important part in my
life. It might interest you and you can look at the uniform while I am
talking."

The adjutant made a motion with his hand to the second runner who went
out.

"Fix your eyes on the uniform. Spagnolini made it, you know. You might
as well look, too," Nick said to the signallers. "I really have no rank.
We're under the American consul. It's perfectly all right for you to
look. You can stare, if you like. I will tell you about the American
locust. We always preferred one that we called the medium-brown. They
last the best in the water and fish prefer them. The larger ones that
fly making a noise somewhat similar to that produced by a rattlesnake
rattling his rattlers, a very dry sound, have vivid colored wings, some
are bright red, others yellow barred with black, but their wings go to
pieces in the water and they make a very blowsy bait, while the
medium-brown is a plump, compact, succulent hopper that I can recommend
as far as one may well recommend something you gentlemen will probably
never encounter. But I must insist that you will never gather a
sufficient supply of these insects for a day's fishing by pursuing them
with your hands or trying to hit them with a hat. That is sheer nonsense
and a useless waste of time. I repeat, gentlemen, that you will get
nowhere at it. The correct procedure, and one which should be taught all
young officers at every small-arms course if I had anything to say about
it, and who knows but what I will have, is the employment of a seine or
net made of common mosquito netting. Two officers holding this length of
netting at alternate ends, or let us say one at each end, stoop, hold
the bottom extremity of the net in one hand and the top extremity in the
other and run into the wind. The hoppers, flying with the wind, fly
against the length of netting and are imprisoned in its folds. It is no
trick at all to catch a very great quantity indeed, and no officer, in
my opinion, should be without a length of mosquito netting suitable for
the improvisation of one of these grasshopper seines. I hope I have made
myself clear, gentlemen. Are there any questions? If there is anything
in the course you do not understand please ask questions. Speak up.
None? Then I would like to close on this note. In the words of that
great soldier and gentleman, Sir Henry Wilson: Gentlemen, either you
must govern or you must be governed. Let me repeat it. Gentlemen, there
is one thing I would like to have you remember. One thing I would like
you to take with you as you leave this room. Gentlemen, either you must
govern--or you must be governed. That is all, gentlemen. Good-day."

He removed his cloth-covered helmet, put it on again and, stooping, went
out the low entrance of the dugout. Para, accompanied by the two
runners, was coming down the line of the sunken road. It was very hot in
the sun and Nick removed the helmet.

"There ought to be a system for wetting these things," he said. "I shall
wet this one in the river." He started up the bank.

"Nicolo," Paravicini called. "Nicolo. Where are you going?"

"I don't really have to go." Nick came down the slope, holding the
helmet in his hands. "They're a damned nuisance wet or dry. Do you wear
yours all the time?"

"All the time," said Para. "It's making me bald. Come inside."

Inside Para told him to sit down.

"You know they're absolutely no damned good," Nick said. "I remember
when they were a comfort when we first had them, but I've seen them full
of brains too many times."

"Nicolo," Para said. "I think you should go back. I think it would be
better if you didn't come up to the line until you had those supplies.
There's nothing here for you to do. If you move around, even with
something worth giving away, the men will group and that invites
shelling. I won't have it."

"I know it's silly," Nick said. "It wasn't my idea. I heard the brigade
was here so I thought I would see you or some one else I knew. I could
have gone to Zenzon or to San Dona. I'd like to go to San Dona to see
the bridge again."

"I won't have you circulating around to no purpose," Captain Paravicini
said.

"All right," said Nick. He felt it coming on again.

"You understand?"

"Of course," said Nick. He was trying to hold it in.

"Anything of that sort should be done at night."

"Naturally," said Nick. He knew he could not stop it now.

"You see, I am commanding the battalion," Para said.

"And why shouldn't you be?" Nick said. Here it came. "You can read and
write, can't you?"

"Yes," said Para gently.

"The trouble is you have a damned small battalion to command. As soon as
it gets to strength again they'll give you back your company. Why don't
they bury the dead? I've seen them now. I don't care about seeing them
again. They can bury them any time as far as I'm concerned and it would
be much better for you. You'll all get bloody sick."

"Where did you leave your bicycle?"

"Inside the last house."

"Do you think it will be all right?"

"Don't worry," Nick said. "I'll go in a little while."

"Lie down a little while, Nicolo."

"All right."

He shut his eyes, and in place of the man with the beard who looked at
him over the sights of the rifle, quite calmly before squeezing off, the
white flash and clublike impact, on his knees, hot-sweet choking,
coughing it onto the rock while they went past him, he saw a long,
yellow house with a low stable and the river much wider than it was and
stiller. "Christ," he said, "I might as well go."

He stood up.

"I'm going, Para," he said. "I'll ride back now in the afternoon. If any
supplies have come I'll bring them down tonight. If not I'll come at
night when I have something to bring."

"It is still hot to ride," Captain Paravicini said.

"You don't need to worry," Nick said. "I'm all right now for quite a
while. I had one then but it was easy. They're getting much better. I
can tell when I'm going to have one because I talk so much."

"I'll send a runner with you."

"I'd rather you didn't. I know the way."

"You'll be back soon?"

"Absolutely."

"Let me send----"

"No," said Nick. "As a mark of confidence."

"Well, Ciaou then."

"Ciaou," said Nick. He started back along the sunken road toward where
he had left the bicycle. In the afternoon the road would be shady once
he had passed the canal. Beyond that there were trees on both sides that
had not been shelled at all. It was on that stretch that, marching, they
had once passed the Terza Savoia cavalry regiment riding in the snow
with their lances. The horses' breath made plumes in the cold air. No,
that was somewhere else. Where was that?

"I'd better get to that damned bicycle," Nick said to himself. "I don't
want to lose the way to Fornaci."




                         THE MOTHER OF A QUEEN


When his father died he was only a kid and his manager buried him
perpetually. That is, so he would have the plot permanently. But when
his mother died his manager thought they might not always be so hot on
each other. They were sweethearts; sure he's a queen, didn't you know
that, of course he is. So he just buried her for five years.

Well, when he came back to Mexico from Spain he got the first notice. It
said it was the first notice that the five years were up and would he
make arrangements for the continuing of his mother's grave. It was only
twenty dollars for perpetual. I had the cash box then and I said let me
attend to it, Paco. But he said no, he would look after it. He'd look
after it right away. It was his mother and he wanted to do it himself.

Then in a week he got the second notice. I read it to him and I said I
thought he had looked after it.

No, he said, he hadn't.

"Let me do it," I said. "It's right here in the cash box."

No, he said. Nobody could tell him what to do. He'd do it himself when
he got around to it. "What's the sense in spending money sooner than
necessary?"

"All right," I said, "but see you look after it." At this time he had a
contract for six fights at four thousand pesos a fight besides his
benefit fight. He made over fifteen thousand dollars there in the
capital alone. He was just tight, that's all.

The third notice came in another week and I read it to him. It said that
if he did not make the payment by the following Saturday his mother's
grave would be opened and her remains dumped on the common boneheap. He
said he would go attend to it that afternoon when he went to town.

"Why not have me do it?" I asked him.

"Keep out of my business," he said. "It's my business and I'm going to
do it."

"All right, if that's the way you feel about it," I said. "Do your own
business."

He got the money out of the cash box, although then he always carried a
hundred or more pesos with him all the time, and he said he would look
after it. He went out with the money and so of course I thought he had
attended to it.

A week later the notice came that they had no response to the final
warning and so his mother's body had been dumped on the boneheap; on the
public boneheap.

"Jesus Christ," I said to him, "you said you'd pay that and you took
money out of the cash box to do it and now what's happened to your
mother? My God, think of it! The public boneheap and your own mother.
Why didn't you let me look after it? I would have sent it when the first
notice came."

"It's none of your business. It's _my_ mother."

"It's none of _my_ business, yes, but it was _your_ business. What kind
of blood is it in a man that will let that be done to his mother? You
don't deserve to have a mother."

"It is my mother," he said. "Now she is so much dearer to me. Now I
don't have to think of her buried in one place and be sad. Now she is
all about me in the air, like the birds and the flowers. Now she will
always be with me."

"Jesus Christ," I said, "what kind of blood have you anyway? I don't
want you to even speak to me."

"She is all around me," he said. "Now I will never be sad."

At that time he was spending all kinds of money around women trying to
make himself seem a man and fool people, but it didn't have any effect
on people that knew anything about him. He owed me over six hundred
pesos and he wouldn't pay me. "Why do you want it now?" he'd say. "Don't
you trust me? Aren't we friends?"

"It isn't friends or trusting you. It's that I paid the accounts out of
my own money while you were away and now I need the money back and you
have it to pay me."

"I haven't got it."

"You have it," I said. "It's in the cash box now and you can pay me."

"I need that money for something," he said. "You don't know all the
needs I have for money."

"I stayed here all the time you were in Spain and you authorized me to
pay these things as they came up, all these things of the house, and you
didn't send any money while you were gone and I paid over six hundred
pesos in my own money and now I need it and you can pay me."

"I'll pay you soon," he said. "Right now I need the money badly."

"For what?"

"For my own business."

"Why don't you pay me some on account?"

"I can't," he said. "I need that money too badly. But I will pay you."

He had only fought twice in Spain, they couldn't stand him there, they
saw through him quick enough, and he had seven new fighting suits made
and this is the kind of thing he was: he had them packed so badly that
four of them were ruined by sea water on the trip back and he couldn't
even wear them.

"My God," I said to him, "you go to Spain. You stay there the whole
season and only fight two times. You spend all the money you took with
you on suits and then have them spoiled by salt water so you can't wear
them. That is the kind of season you have and then you talk to me about
running your own business. Why don't you pay me the money you owe me so
I can leave?"

"I want you here," he said, "and I will pay you. But now I need the
money."

"You need it too badly to pay for your own mother's grave to keep your
mother buried. Don't you?" I said.

"I am happy about what has happened to my mother," he said. "You cannot
understand."

"Thank Christ I can't," I said. "You pay me what you owe me or I will
take it out of the cash box."

"I will keep the cash box myself," he said.

"No, you won't," I said.

That very afternoon he came to me with a punk, some fellow from his own
town who was broke, and said, "Here is a paesano who needs money to go
home because his mother is very sick." This fellow was just a punk, you
understand, a nobody he'd never seen before, but from his home town, and
he wanted to be the big, generous matador with a fellow townsman.

"Give him fifty pesos from the cash box," he told me.

"You just told me you had no money to pay me," I said. "And now you want
to give fifty pesos to this punk."

"He is a fellow townsman," he said, "and he is in distress."

"You bitch," I said. I gave him the key of the cash box. "Get it
yourself. I'm going to town."

"Don't be angry," he said. "I'm going to pay you."

I got the car out to go to town. It was his car but he knew I drove it
better than he did. Everything he did I could do better. He knew it. He
couldn't even read and write. I was going to see somebody and see what I
could do about making him pay me. He came out and said, "I'm coming with
you and I'm going to pay you. We are good friends. There is no need to
quarrel."

We drove into the city and I was driving. Just before we came into the
town he pulled out twenty pesos.

"Here's the money," he said.

"You motherless bitch," I said to him and told him what he could do with
the money. "You give fifty pesos to that punk and then offer me twenty
when you owe me six hundred. I wouldn't take a nickel from you. You know
what you can do with it."

I got out of the car without a peso in my pocket and I didn't know where
I was going to sleep that night. Later I went out with a friend and got
my things from his place. I never spoke to him again until this year. I
met him walking with three friends in the evening on the way to the
Callao cinema in the Gran Via in Madrid. He put his hand out to me.

"Hello Roger, old friend," he said to me. "How are you? People say you
are talking against me. That you say all sorts of unjust things about
me."

"All I say is you never had a mother," I said to him. That's the worst
thing you can say to insult a man in Spanish.

"That's true," he said. "My poor mother died when I was so young it
seems as though I never had a mother. It's very sad."

There's a queen for you. You can't touch them. Nothing, nothing can
touch them. They spend money on themselves or for vanity, but they never
pay. Try to get one to pay. I told him what I thought of him right there
on the Gran Via, in front of three friends, but he speaks to me now when
I meet him as though we were friends. What kind of blood is it that
makes a man like that?




                           ONE READER WRITES


She sat at the table in her bedroom with a newspaper folded open before
her and only stopping to look out of the window at the snow which was
falling and melting on the roof as it fell. She wrote this letter,
writing it steadily with no necessity to cross out or rewrite anything.

                                                   Roanoke, Virginia
                                                    February 6, 1933
    Dear Doctor--

    May I write you for some very important advice--I have a
    decision to make and don't know just whom to trust most I dare
    not ask my parents--and so I come to you--and only because I
    need not see you, can I confide in you even. Now here is the
    situation--I married a man in U. S. service in 1929 and that
    same year he was sent to China, Shanghai--he staid three
    years--and came home--he was discharged from the service some
    few months ago--and went to his mother's home in Helena,
    Arkansas. He wrote for me to come home--I went, and found he is
    taking a course of injections and I naturally ask, and found he
    is being treated for I don't know how to spell the word but it
    sound like this "sifilus"--Do you know what I mean--now tell me
    will it ever be safe for me to live with him again--I did not
    come in close contact with him at any time since his return from
    China. He assures me he will be O K after this doctor finishes
    with him--Do you think it right--I often heard my Father say one
    could well wish themselves dead if once they become a victim of
    that malady--I believe my Father but want to believe my Husband
    most--Please, please tell me what to do--I have a daughter born
    while her Father was in China--

    Thanking you and trusting wholly in your advice I am

and signed her name.

Maybe he can tell me what's right to do, she said to herself. Maybe he
can tell me. In the picture in the paper he looks like he'd know. He
looks smart, all right. Every day he tells somebody what to do. He ought
to know. I want to do whatever is right. It's such a long time though.
It's a long time. And it's been a long time. My Christ, it's been a long
time. He had to go wherever they sent him, I know, but I don't know what
he had to get it for. Oh, I wish to Christ he wouldn't have got it. I
don't care what he did to get it. But I wish to Christ he hadn't ever
got it. It does seem like he didn't have to have got it. I don't know
what to do. I wish to Christ he hadn't got any kind of malady. I don't
know why he had to get a malady.




                         HOMAGE TO SWITZERLAND


                                 PART I

                  PORTRAIT OF MR. WHEELER IN MONTREUX

Inside the station café it was warm and light. The wood of the tables
shone from wiping and there were baskets of pretzels in glazed paper
sacks. The chairs were carved, but the seats were worn and comfortable.
There was a carved wooden clock on the wall and a bar at the far end of
the room. Outside the window it was snowing.

Two of the station porters sat drinking new wine at the table under the
clock. Another porter came in and said the Simplon-Orient Express was an
hour late at Saint Maurice. He went out. The waitress came over to Mr.
Wheeler's table.

"The Express is an hour late, sir," she said. "Can I bring you some
coffee?"

"If you think it won't keep me awake."

"Please?" asked the waitress.

"Bring me some," said Mr. Wheeler.

"Thank you."

She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Wheeler looked out the
window at the snow falling in the light from the station platform.

"Do you speak other languages besides English?" he asked the waitress.

"Oh, yes, sir. I speak German and French and the dialects."

"Would you like a drink of something?"

"Oh, no, sir. It is not permitted to drink in the café with the
clients."

"You won't take a cigar?"

"Oh, no, sir. I don't smoke, sir."

"That is all right," said Mr. Wheeler. He looked out of the window
again, drank the coffee, and lit a cigarette.

"Fräulein," he called. The waitress came over.

"What would you like, sir?"

"You," he said.

"You must not joke me like that."

"I'm not joking."

"Then you must not say it."

"I haven't time to argue," Mr. Wheeler said. "The train comes in forty
minutes. If you'll go upstairs with me I'll give you a hundred francs."

"You should not say such things, sir. I will ask the porter to speak
with you."

"I don't want a porter," Mr. Wheeler said. "Nor a policeman nor one of
those boys that sell cigarettes. I want you."

"If you talk like that you must go out. You cannot stay here and talk
like that."

"Why don't you go away, then? If you go away I can't talk to you."

The waitress went away. Mr. Wheeler watched to see if she spoke to the
porters. She did not.

"Mademoiselle!" he called. The waitress came over. "Bring me a bottle of
Sion, please."

"Yes, sir."

Mr. Wheeler watched her go out, then come in with the wine and bring it
to his table. He looked toward the clock.

"I'll give you two hundred francs," he said.

"Please do not say such things."

"Two hundred francs is a great deal of money."

"You will not say such things!" the waitress said. She was losing her
English. Mr. Wheeler looked at her interestedly.

"Two hundred francs."

"You are hateful."

"Why don't you go away, then? I can't talk to you if you're not here."

The waitress left the table and went over to the bar. Mr. Wheeler drank
the wine and smiled to himself for some time.

"Mademoiselle," he called. The waitress pretended not to hear him.
"Mademoiselle," he called again. The waitress came over.

"You wish something?"

"Very much. I'll give you three hundred francs."

"You are hateful."

"Three hundred francs Swiss."

She went away and Mr. Wheeler looked after her. A porter opened the
door. He was the one who had Mr. Wheeler's bags in his charge.

"The train is coming, sir," he said in French. Mr. Wheeler stood up.

"Mademoiselle," he called. The waitress came toward the table. "How much
is the wine?"

"Seven francs."

Mr. Wheeler counted out eight francs and left them on the table. He put
on his coat and followed the porter onto the platform where the snow was
falling.

"Au revoir, mademoiselle," he said. The waitress watched him go. He's
ugly, she thought, ugly and hateful. Three hundred francs for a thing
that is nothing to do. How many times have I done that for nothing. And
no place to go here. If he had sense he would know there was no place.
No time and no place to go. Three hundred francs to do that. What people
those Americans.

Standing on the cement platform beside his bags, looking down the rails
toward the headlight of the train coming through the snow, Mr. Wheeler
was thinking that it was very inexpensive sport. He had only spent,
actually, aside from the dinner, seven francs for a bottle of wine and a
franc for the tip. Seventy-five centimes would have been better. He
would have felt better now if the tip had been seventy-five centimes.
One franc Swiss is five francs French. Mr. Wheeler was headed for Paris.
He was very careful about money and did not care for women. He had been
in that station before and he knew there was no upstairs to go to. Mr.
Wheeler never took chances.


                                PART II

                  MR. JOHNSON TALKS ABOUT IT AT VEVEY

Inside the station café it was warm and light; the tables were shiny
from wiping and on some there were red and white striped table cloths;
and there were blue and white striped table cloths on the others and on
all of them baskets with pretzels in glazed paper sacks. The chairs were
carved but the wood seats were worn and comfortable. There was a clock
on the wall, a zinc bar at the far end of the room, and outside the
window it was snowing. Two of the station porters sat drinking new wine
at the table under the clock.

Another porter came in and said the Simplon-Orient Express was an hour
late at Saint Maurice. The waitress came over to Mr. Johnson's table.

"The Express is an hour late, sir," she said. "Can I bring you some
coffee?"

"If it's not too much trouble."

"Please?" asked the waitress.

"I'll take some."

"Thank you."

She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Johnson looked out the
window at the snow falling in the light from the station platform.

"Do you speak other languages besides English?" he asked the waitress.

"Oh, yes, I speak German and French and the dialects."

"Would you like a drink of something?"

"Oh, no, sir, it is not permitted to drink in the café with the
clients."

"Have a cigar?"

"Oh, no, sir," she laughed. "I don't smoke, sir."

"Neither do I," said Johnson. "It's a dirty habit."

The waitress went away and Johnson lit a cigarette and drank the coffee.
The clock on the wall marked a quarter to ten. His watch was a little
fast. The train was due at ten-thirty--an hour late meant eleven-thirty.
Johnson called to the waitress.

"Signorina!"

"What would you like, sir?"

"You wouldn't like to play with me?" Johnson asked. The waitress
blushed.

"No, sir."

"I don't mean anything violent. You wouldn't like to make up a party and
see the night life of Vevey? Bring a girl friend if you like."

"I must work" the waitress said. "I have my duty here."

"I know," said Johnson. "But couldn't you get a substitute? They used to
do that in the Civil War."

"Oh, no, sir. I must be here myself in the person."

"Where did you learn your English?"

"At the Berlitz school, sir."

"Tell me about it," Johnson said. "Were the Berlitz undergraduates a
wild lot? What about all this necking and petting? Were there many
smoothies? Did you ever run into Scott Fitzgerald?"

"Please?"

"I mean were your college days the happiest days of your life? What sort
of team did Berlitz have last fall?"

"You are joking, sir?"

"Only feebly," said Johnson. "You're an awfully good girl. And you don't
want to play with me?"

"Oh, no, sir," said the waitress. "Would you like me to bring you
something?"

"Yes," said Johnson. "Would you bring me the wine list?"

"Yes, sir."

Johnson walked over with the wine list to the table where the three
porters sat. They looked up at him. They were old men.

"Wollen Sie trinken?" he asked. One of them nodded and smiled.

"Oui, monsieur."

"You speak French?"

"Oui, monsieur."

"What shall we drink? Connais vous des champagnes?"

"Non, monsieur."

"Faut les connaître," said Johnson. "Fräulein," he called the waitress.
"We will drink champagne."

"Which champagne would you prefer, sir?"

"The best," said Johnson. "Laquelle est le best?" he asked the porters.

"Le meillieur?" asked the porter who had spoken first.

"By all means."

The porter took out a pair of gold-rimmed glasses from his coat pocket
and looked over the list. He ran his finger down the four typewritten
names and prices.

"Sportsman," he said. "Sportsman is the best."

"You agree, gentlemen?" Johnson asked the other porters. The one porter
nodded. The other said in French, "I don't know them personally but I've
often heard speak of Sportsman. It's good."

"A bottle of Sportsman," Johnson said to the waitress. He looked at the
price on the wine card: eleven francs Swiss. "Make it two Sportsmen. Do
you mind if I sit here with you?" he asked the porter who had suggested
Sportsman.

"Sit down. Put yourself here, please." The porter smiled at him. He was
folding his spectacles and putting them away in their case. "Is it the
gentleman's birthday?"

"No," said Johnson. "It's not a fête. My wife has decided to divorce
me."

"So," said the porter. "I hope not." The other porter shook his head.
The third porter seemed a little deaf.

"It is doubtless a common experience," said Johnson, "like the first
visit to the dentist or the first time a girl is unwell, but I have been
upset."

"It is understandable," said the oldest porter. "I understand it."

"None of you gentlemen is divorced?" Johnson asked. He had stopped
clowning with the language and was speaking good French now and had been
for some time.

"No," said the porter who had ordered Sportsman. "They don't divorce
much here. There are gentlemen who are divorced but not many."

"With us," said Johnson, "it's different. Practically every one is
divorced."

"That's true," the porter confirmed. "I've read it in the paper."

"I myself am somewhat in retard," Johnson went on. "This is the first
time I have been divorced. I am thirty-five."

"Mais vous êtes encore jeune," said the porter. He explained to the two
others. "Monsieur n'a que trente-cinq ans." The other porters nodded.
"He's very young," said one.

"And it is really the first time you've been divorced?" asked the
porter.

"Absolutely," said Johnson. "Please open the wine, mademoiselle."

"And is it very expensive?"

"Ten thousand francs."

"Swiss money?"

"No, French money."

"Oh, yes. Two thousand francs Swiss. All the same it's not cheap."

"No."

"And why does one do it?"

"One is asked to."

"But why do they ask that?"

"To marry some one else."

"But it's idiotic."

"I agree with you," said Johnson. The waitress filled the four glasses.
They all raised them.

"Prosit," said Johnson.

"A votre santé, monsieur," said the porter. The other two porters said
"Salut." The champagne tasted like sweet pink cider.

"Is it a system always to respond in a different language in
Switzerland?" Johnson asked.

"No," said the porter. "French is more cultivated. Besides, this is la
Suisse Romande."

"But you speak German?"

"Yes. Where I come from they speak German."

"I see," said Johnson, "and you say you have never been divorced?"

"No. It would be too expensive. Besides I have never married."

"Ah," said Johnson. "And these other gentlemen?"

"They are married."

"You like being married?" Johnson asked one of the porters.

"What?"

"You like the married state?"

"Oui. C'est normale."

"Exactly," said Johnson. "Et vous, monsieur?"

"Ça va," said the other porter.

"Pour moi," said Johnson, "ça ne va pas."

"Monsieur is going to divorce," the first porter explained.

"Oh," said the second porter.

"Ah ha," the third porter said.

"Well," said Johnson, "the subject seems to be exhausted. You're not
interested in my troubles," he addressed the first porter.

"But, yes," said the porter.

"Well, let's talk about something else."

"As you wish."

"What can we talk about?"

"You do the sport?"

"No," said Johnson. "My wife does, though."

"What do you do for amusement?"

"I am a writer."

"Does that make much money?"

"No. But later on when you get known it does."

"It is interesting."

"No," said Johnson, "it is not interesting. I am sorry, gentlemen, but I
have to leave you. Will you please drink the other bottle?"

"But the train does not come for three quarters of an hour."

"I know," said Johnson. The waitress came and he paid for the wine and
his dinner.

"You're going out, sir?" she asked.

"Yes," said Johnson, "just for a little walk. I'll leave my bags here."

He put on his muffler, his coat, and his hat. Outside the snow was
falling heavily. He looked back through the window at the three porters
sitting at the table. The waitress was filling their glasses from the
last wine of the opened bottle. She took the unopened bottle back to the
bar. That makes them three francs something apiece, Johnson thought. He
turned and walked down the platform. Inside the café he had thought that
talking about it would blunt it; but it had not blunted it; it had only
made him feel nasty.


                                PART III

                 THE SON OF A FELLOW MEMBER AT TERRITET

In the station café at Territet it was a little too warm; the lights
were bright and the tables shiny from polishing. There were baskets with
pretzels in glazed paper sacks on the tables and cardboard pads for beer
glasses in order that the moist glasses would not make rings on the
wood. The chairs were carved but the wooden seats were worn and quite
comfortable. There was a clock on the wall, a bar at the far end of the
room, and outside the window it was snowing. There was an old man
drinking coffee at a table under the clock and reading the evening
paper. A porter came in and said the Simplon-Orient Express was an hour
late at Saint Maurice. The waitress came over to Mr. Harris's table. Mr.
Harris had just finished dinner.

"The Express is an hour late, sir. Can I bring you some coffee?"

"If you like."

"Please?" asked the waitress.

"All right," said Mr. Harris.

"Thank you, sir," said the waitress.

She brought the coffee from the kitchen and Mr. Harris put sugar in it,
crunched the lumps with his spoon, and looked out the window at the snow
falling in the light from the station platform.

"Do you speak other languages besides English?" he asked the waitress.

"Oh, yes, sir. I speak German and French and the dialects."

"Which do you like best?"

"They are all very much the same, sir. I can't say I like one better
than another."

"Would you like a drink of something or a coffee?"

"Oh, no, sir, it is not permitted to drink in the café with the
clients."

"You wouldn't take a cigar?"

"Oh, no, sir," she laughed. "I don't smoke, sir."

"Neither do I," said Harris, "I don't agree with David Belasco."

"Please?"

"Belasco. David Belasco. You can always tell him because he has his
collar on backwards. But I don't agree with him. Then, too, he's dead
now."

"Will you excuse me, sir?" asked the waitress.

"Absolutely," said Harris. He sat forward in the chair and looked out of
the window. Across the room the old man had folded his paper. He looked
at Mr. Harris and then picked up his coffee cup and saucer and walked to
Harris's table.

"I beg your pardon if I intrude," he said in English, "but it has just
occurred to me that you might be a member of the National Geographic
Society."

"Please sit down," Harris said. The gentleman sat down.

"Won't you have another coffee or a liqueur?"

"Thank you," said the gentleman.

"Won't you have a kirsch with me?"

"Perhaps. But you must have it with me."

"No, I insist." Harris called the waitress. The old gentleman took out
from an inside pocket of his coat a leather pocketbook. He took off a
wide rubber band and drew out several papers, selected one, and handed
it to Harris.

"That is my certificate of membership," he said. "Do you know Frederick
J. Roussel in America?"

"I'm afraid I don't."

"I believe he is very prominent."

"Where does he come from? Do you know what part of the States?"

"From Washington, of course. Isn't that the headquarters of the
Society?"

"I believe it is."

"You believe it is. Aren't you sure?"

"I've been away a long time," Harris said.

"You're not a member, then?"

"No. But my father is. He's been a member for a great many years."

"Then he would know Frederick J. Roussel. He is one of the officers of
the society. You will observe that it is by Mr. Roussel that I was
nominated for membership."

"I'm awfully glad."

"I am sorry you are not a member. But you could obtain nomination
through your father?"

"I think so," said Harris. "I must when I go back."

"I would advise you to," said the gentleman. "You see the magazine, of
course?"

"Absolutely."

"Have you seen the number with the colored plates of the North American
fauna?"

"Yes. I have it in Paris."

"And the number containing the panorama of the volcanoes of Alaska?"

"That was a wonder."

"I enjoyed very much, too, the wild animal photographs of George Shiras
three."

"They were damned fine."

"I beg your pardon?"

"They were excellent. That fellow Shiras----"

"You call him that fellow?"

"We're old friends," said Harris.

"I see. You know George Shiras three. He must be very interesting."

"He is. He's about the most interesting man I know."

"And do you know George Shiras two? Is he interesting too?"

"Oh, he's not so interesting."

"I should imagine he would be very interesting."

"You know, a funny thing. He's not so interesting. I've often wondered
why."

"H'm," said the gentleman. "I should have thought any one in that family
would be interesting."

"Do you remember the panorama of the Sahara Desert?" Harris asked.

"The Sahara Desert? That was nearly fifteen years ago."

"That's right. That was one of my father's favorites."

"He doesn't prefer the newer numbers?"

"He probably does. But he was very fond of the Sahara panorama."

"It was excellent. But to me its artistic value far exceeded its
scientific interest."

"I don't know," said Harris. "The wind blowing all that sand and that
Arab with his camel kneeling toward Mecca."

"As I recall, the Arab was standing holding the camel."

"You're quite right," said Harris. "I was thinking of Colonel Lawrence's
book."

"Lawrence's book deals with Arabia, I believe."

"Absolutely," said Harris. "It was the Arab reminded me of it."

"He must be a very interesting young man."

"I believe he is."

"Do you know what he is doing now?"

"He's in the Royal Air Force."

"And why does he do that?"

"He likes it."

"Do you know if he belongs to the National Geographic Society?"

"I wonder if he does."

"He would make a very good member. He is the sort of person they want as
a member. I would be very happy to nominate him if you think they would
like to have him."

"I think they would."

"I have nominated a scientist from Vevey and a colleague of mine from
Lauzanne and they were both elected. I believe they would be very
pleased if I nominated Colonel Lawrence."

"It's a splendid idea," said Harris. "Do you come here to the café
often?"

"I come here for coffee after dinner."

"Are you in the University?"

"I am not active any longer."

"I'm just waiting for the train," said Harris. "I'm going up to Paris
and sail from Havre for the States."

"I have never been to America. But I would like to go very much. Perhaps
I shall attend a meeting of the society some time. I would be very happy
to meet your father."

"I'm sure he would have liked to meet you but he died last year. Shot
himself, oddly enough."

"I am very truly sorry. I am sure his loss was a blow to science as well
as to his family."

"Science took it awfully well."

"This is my card," Harris said. "His initials were E. J. instead of E.
D. I know he would have liked to know you."

"It would have been a great pleasure." The gentleman took out a card
from the pocketbook and gave it to Harris. It read:

                       DR. SIGISMUND WYER, PH. D.

                   Member of the National Geographic
                  Society, Washington, D. C., U. S. A.

"I will keep it very carefully," Harris said.




                              A DAY'S WAIT


He came into the room to shut the windows while we were still in bed and
I saw he looked ill. He was shivering, his face was white, and he walked
slowly as though it ached to move.

"What's the matter, Schatz?"

"I've got a headache."

"You better go back to bed."

"No. I'm all right."

"You go to bed. I'll see you when I'm dressed."

But when I came downstairs he was dressed, sitting by the fire, looking
a very sick and miserable boy of nine years. When I put my hand on his
forehead I knew he had a fever.

"You go up to bed," I said, "you're sick."

"I'm all right," he said.

When the doctor came he took the boy's temperature.

"What is it?" I asked him.

"One hundred and two."

Downstairs, the doctor left three different medicines in different
colored capsules with instructions for giving them. One was to bring
down the fever, another a purgative, the third to overcome an acid
condition. The germs of influenza can only exist in an acid condition,
he explained. He seemed to know all about influenza and said there was
nothing to worry about if the fever did not go above one hundred and
four degrees. This was a light epidemic of flu and there was no danger
if you avoided pneumonia.

Back in the room I wrote the boy's temperature down and made a note of
the time to give the various capsules.

"Do you want me to read to you?"

"All right. If you want to," said the boy. His face was very white and
there were dark areas under his eyes. He lay still in the bed and seemed
very detached from what was going on.

I read aloud from Howard Pyle's _Book of Pirates_; but I could see he
was not following what I was reading.

"How do you feel, Schatz?" I asked him.

"Just the same, so far," he said.

I sat at the foot of the bed and read to myself while I waited for it to
be time to give another capsule. It would have been natural for him to
go to sleep, but when I looked up he was looking at the foot of the bed,
looking very strangely.

"Why don't you try to go to sleep? I'll wake you up for the medicine."

"I'd rather stay awake."

After a while he said to me, "You don't have to stay in here with me,
Papa, if it bothers you."

"It doesn't bother me."

"No, I mean you don't have to stay if it's going to bother you."

I thought perhaps he was a little lightheaded and after giving him the
prescribed capsules at eleven o'clock I went out for a while. It was a
bright, cold day, the ground covered with a sleet that had frozen so
that it seemed as if all the bare trees, the bushes, the cut brush and
all the grass and the bare ground had been varnished with ice. I took
the young Irish setter for a little walk up the road and along a frozen
creek, but it was difficult to stand or walk on the glassy surface and
the red dog slipped and slithered and I fell twice, hard, once dropping
my gun and having it slide away over the ice.

We flushed a covey of quail under a high clay bank with overhanging
brush and I killed two as they went out of sight over the top of the
bank. Some of the covey lit in trees, but most of them scattered into
brush piles and it was necessary to jump on the ice-coated mounds of
brush several times before they would flush. Coming out while you were
poised unsteadily on the icy, springy brush they made difficult shooting
and I killed two, missed five, and started back pleased to have found a
covey close to the house and happy there were so many left to find on
another day.

At the house they said the boy had refused to let any one come into the
room.

"You can't come in," he said. "You mustn't get what I have."

I went up to him and found him in exactly the position I had left him,
white-faced, but with the tops of his cheeks flushed by the fever,
staring still, as he had stared, at the foot of the bed.

I took his temperature.

"What is it?"

"Something like a hundred," I said. It was one hundred and two and four
tenths.

"It was a hundred and two," he said.

"Who said so?"

"The doctor."

"Your temperature is all right," I said. "It's nothing to worry about."

"I don't worry," he said, "but I can't keep from thinking."

"Don't think," I said. "Just take it easy."

"I'm taking it easy," he said and looked straight ahead. He was
evidently holding tight onto himself about something.

"Take this with water."

"Do you think it will do any good?"

"Of course it will."

I sat down and opened the _Pirate_ book and commenced to read, but I
could see he was not following, so I stopped.

"About what time do you think I'm going to die?" he asked.

"What?"

"About how long will it be before I die?"

"You aren't going to die. What's the matter with you?"

"Oh, yes, I am. I heard him say a hundred and two."

"People don't die with a fever of one hundred and two. That's a silly
way to talk."

"I know they do. At school in France the boys told me you can't live
with forty-four degrees. I've got a hundred and two."

He had been waiting to die all day, ever since nine o'clock in the
morning.

"You poor Schatz," I said. "Poor old Schatz. It's like miles and
kilometers. You aren't going to die. That's a different thermometer. On
that thermometer thirty-seven is normal. On this kind it's
ninety-eight."

"Are you sure?"

"Absolutely," I said. "It's like miles and kilometers. You know, like
how many kilometers we make when we do seventy miles in the car?"

"Oh," he said.

But his gaze at the foot of the bed relaxed slowly. The hold over
himself relaxed too, finally, and the next day it was very slack and he
cried very easily at little things that were of no importance.




                    A NATURAL HISTORY OF THE DEAD[1]


It has always seemed to me that the war has been omitted as a field for
the observations of the naturalist. We have charming and sound accounts
of the flora and fauna of Patagonia by the late W. H. Hudson, the
Reverend Gilbert White has written most interestingly of the Hoopoe on
its occasional and not at all common visits to Selborne, and Bishop
Stanley has given us a valuable, although popular, _Familiar History of
Birds_. Can we not hope to furnish the reader with a few rational and
interesting facts about the dead? I hope so.

When that persevering traveller, Mungo Park, was at one period of his
course fainting in the vast wilderness of an African desert, naked and
alone, considering his days as numbered and nothing appearing to remain
for him to do but to lie down and die, a small moss-flower of
extraordinary beauty caught his eye. "Though the whole plant," says he,
"was no larger than one of my fingers, I could not contemplate the
delicate conformation of its roots, leaves and capsules without
admiration. Can that Being who planted, watered and brought to
perfection, in this obscure part of the world, a thing which appears of
so small importance, look with unconcern upon the situation and
suffering of creatures formed after his own image? Surely not.
Reflections like these would not allow me to despair; I started up and,
disregarding both hunger and fatigue, travelled forward, assured that
relief was at hand; and I was not disappointed."

With a disposition to wonder and adore in like manner, as Bishop Stanley
says, can any branch of Natural History be studied without increasing
that faith, love and hope which we also, every one of us, need in our
journey through the wilderness of life? Let us therefore see what
inspiration we may derive from the dead.

In war the dead are usually the male of the human species although this
does not hold true with animals, and I have frequently seen dead mares
among the horses. An interesting aspect of war, too, is that it is only
there that the naturalist has an opportunity to observe the dead of
mules. In twenty years of observation in civil life I had never seen a
dead mule and had begun to entertain doubts as to whether these animals
were really mortal. On rare occasions I had seen what I took to be dead
mules, but on close approach these always proved to be living creatures
who seemed to be dead through their quality of complete repose. But in
war these animals succumb in much the same manner as the more common and
less hardy horse.

Most of those mules that I saw dead were along mountain roads or lying
at the foot of steep declivities whence they had been pushed to rid the
road of their encumbrance. They seemed a fitting enough sight in the
mountains where one was accustomed to their presence and looked less
incongruous there than they did later, at Smyrna, where the Greeks broke
the legs of all their baggage animals and pushed them off the quay into
the shallow water to drown. The numbers of broken-legged mules and
horses drowning in the shallow water called for a Goya to depict them.
Although, speaking literally, one can hardly say that they called for a
Goya since there has only been one Goya, long dead, and it is extremely
doubtful if these animals, were they able to call, would call for
pictorial representation of their plight but, more likely, would, if
they were articulate, call for some one to alleviate their condition.

Regarding the sex of the dead it is a fact that one becomes so
accustomed to the sight of all the dead being men that the sight of a
dead woman is quite shocking. I first saw inversion of the usual sex of
the dead after the explosion of a munition factory which had been
situated in the countryside near Milan, Italy. We drove to the scene of
the disaster in trucks along poplar-shaded roads, bordered with ditches
containing much minute animal life, which I could not clearly observe
because of the great clouds of dust raised by the trucks. Arriving where
the munition plant had been, some of us were put to patrolling about
those large stocks of munitions which for some reason had not exploded,
while others were put at extinguishing a fire which had gotten into the
grass of an adjacent field; which task being concluded, we were ordered
to search the immediate vicinity and surrounding fields for bodies. We
found and carried to an improvised mortuary a good number of these and,
I must admit, frankly, the shock it was to find that these dead were
women rather than men. In those days women had not yet commenced to wear
their hair cut short, as they did later for several years in Europe and
America, and the most disturbing thing, perhaps because it was the most
unaccustomed, was the presence and, even more disturbing, the occasional
absence of this long hair. I remember that after we had searched quite
thoroughly for the complete dead we collected fragments. Many of these
were detached from a heavy, barbed-wire fence which had surrounded the
position of the factory and from the still existent portions of which we
picked many of these detached bits which illustrated only too well the
tremendous energy of high explosive. Many fragments we found a
considerable distance away in the fields, they being carried farther by
their own weight.

On our return to Milan I recall one or two of us discussing the
occurrence and agreeing that the quality of unreality and the fact that
there were no wounded did much to rob the disaster of a horror which
might have been much greater. Also the fact that it had been so
immediate and that the dead were in consequence still as little
unpleasant as possible to carry and deal with made it quite removed from
the usual battlefield experience. The pleasant, though dusty, ride
through the beautiful Lombard countryside also was a compensation for
the unpleasantness of the duty and on our return, while we exchanged
impressions, we all agreed that it was indeed fortunate that the fire
which broke out just before we arrived had been brought under control as
rapidly as it had and before it had attained any of the seemingly huge
stocks of unexploded munitions. We agreed too that the picking up of the
fragments had been an extraordinary business; it being amazing that the
human body should be blown into pieces which exploded along no
anatomical lines, but rather divided as capriciously as the
fragmentation in the burst of a high explosive shell.

A naturalist, to obtain accuracy of observation, may confine himself in
his observations to one limited period and I will take first that
following the Austrian offensive of June, 1918, in Italy as one in which
the dead were present in their greatest numbers, a withdrawal having
been forced and an advance later made to recover the ground lost so that
the positions after the battle were the same as before except for the
presence of the dead. Until the dead are buried they change somewhat in
appearance each day. The color change in Caucasian races is from white
to yellow, to yellow-green, to black. If left long enough in the heat
the flesh comes to resemble coal-tar, especially where it has been
broken or torn, and it has quite a visible tarlike iridescence. The dead
grow larger each day until sometimes they become quite too big for their
uniforms, filling these until they seem blown tight enough to burst. The
individual members may increase in girth to an unbelievable extent and
faces fill as taut and globular as balloons. The surprising thing, next
to their progressive corpulence, is the amount of paper that is
scattered about the dead. Their ultimate position, before there is any
question of burial, depends on the location of the pockets in the
uniform. In the Austrian army these pockets were in the back of the
breeches and the dead, after a short time, all consequently lay on their
faces, the two hip pockets pulled out and, scattered around them in the
grass, all those papers their pockets had contained. The heat, the
flies, the indicative positions of the bodies in the grass, and the
amount of paper scattered are the impressions one retains. The smell of
a battlefield in hot weather one cannot recall. You can remember that
there was such a smell, but nothing ever happens to you to bring it
back. It is unlike the smell of a regiment, which may come to you
suddenly while riding in the street car and you will look across and see
the man who has brought it to you. But the other thing is gone as
completely as when you have been in love; you remember things that
happened, but the sensation cannot be recalled.

One wonders what that persevering traveller, Mungo Park, would have seen
on a battlefield in hot weather to restore his confidence. There were
always poppies in the wheat in the end of June and in July, and the
mulberry trees were in full leaf and one could see the heat waves rise
from the barrels of the guns where the sun struck them through the
screens of leaves; the earth was turned a bright yellow at the edge of
holes where mustard gas shells had been and the average broken house is
finer to see than one that has never been shelled, but few travellers
would take a good full breath of that early summer air and have any such
thoughts as Mungo Park about those formed in His own image.

The first thing that you found about the dead was that, hit badly
enough, they died like animals. Some quickly from a little wound you
would not think would kill a rabbit. They died from little wounds as
rabbits die sometimes from three or four small grains of shot that
hardly seem to break the skin. Others would die like cats; a skull
broken in and iron in the brain, they lie alive two days like cats that
crawl into the coal bin with a bullet in the brain and will not die
until you cut their heads off. Maybe cats do not die then, they say they
have nine lives, I do not know, but most men die like animals, not men.
I'd never seen a natural death, so called, and so I blamed it on the war
and like the persevering traveller, Mungo Park, knew that there was
something else, that always absent something else, and then I saw one.

The only natural death I've ever seen, outside of loss of blood, which
isn't bad, was death from Spanish influenza. In this you drown in mucus,
choking, and how you know the patient's dead is: at the end he turns to
be a little child again, though with his manly force, and fills the
sheets as full as any diaper with one vast, final, yellow cataract that
flows and dribbles on after he's gone. So now I want to see the death of
any self-called Humanist[2] because a persevering traveller like Mungo
Park or me lives on and maybe yet will live to see the actual death of
members of this literary sect and watch the noble exits that they make.
In my musings as a naturalist it has occurred to me that while decorum
is an excellent thing some must be indecorous if the race is to be
carried on since the position prescribed for procreation is indecorous,
highly indecorous, and it occurred to me that perhaps that is what these
people are, or were: the children of decorous cohabitation. But
regardless of how they started I hope to see the finish of a few, and
speculate how worms will try that long preserved sterility; with their
quaint pamphlets gone to bust and into foot-notes all their lust.

While it is, perhaps, legitimate to deal with these self-designated
citizens in a natural history of the dead, even though the designation
may mean nothing by the time this work is published, yet it is unfair to
the other dead, who were not dead in their youth of choice, who owned no
magazines, many of whom had doubtless never even read a review, that one
has seen in the hot weather with a half-pint of maggots working where
their mouths have been. It was not always hot weather for the dead, much
of the time it was the rain that washed them clean when they lay in it
and made the earth soft when they were buried in it and sometimes then
kept on until the earth was mud and washed them out and you had to bury
them again. Or in the winter in the mountains you had to put them in the
snow and when the snow melted in the spring some one else had to bury
them. They had beautiful burying grounds in the mountains, war in the
mountains is the most beautiful of all war, and in one of them, at a
place called Pocol, they buried a general who was shot through the head
by a sniper. This is where those writers are mistaken who write books
called _Generals Die in Bed_, because this general died in a trench dug
in snow, high in the mountains, wearing an Alpini hat with an eagle
feather in it and a hole in front you couldn't put your little finger in
and a hole in back you could put your fist in, if it were a small fist
and you wanted to put it there, and much blood in the snow. He was a
damned fine general, and so was General von Behr who commanded the
Bavarian Alpenkorps troops at the battle of Caporetto and was killed in
his staff car by the Italian rearguard as he drove into Udine ahead of
his troops, and the titles of all such books should be _Generals Usually
Die in Bed_, if we are to have any sort of accuracy in such things.

In the mountains too, sometimes, the snow fell on the dead outside the
dressing station on the side that was protected by the mountain from any
shelling. They carried them into a cave that had been dug into the
mountainside before the earth froze. It was in this cave that a man
whose head was broken as a flower-pot may be broken, although it was all
held together by membranes and a skillfully applied bandage now soaked
and hardened, with the structure of his brain disturbed by a piece of
broken steel in it, lay a day, a night, and a day. The stretcher-bearers
asked the doctor to go in and have a look at him. They saw him each time
they made a trip and even when they did not look at him they heard him
breathing. The doctor's eyes were red and the lids swollen, almost shut
from tear gas. He looked at the man twice; once in daylight, once with a
flashlight. That too would have made a good etching for Goya, the visit
with the flashlight, I mean. After looking at him the second time the
doctor believed the stretcher-bearers when they said the soldier was
still alive.

"What do you want me to do about it?" he asked.

There was nothing they wanted done. But after a while they asked
permission to carry him out and lay him with the badly wounded.

"No. No. No!" said the doctor, who was busy. "What's the matter? Are you
afraid of him?"

"We don't like to hear him in there with the dead."

"Don't listen to him. If you take him out of there you will have to
carry him right back in."

"We wouldn't mind that, Captain Doctor."

"No," said the doctor. "No. Didn't you hear me say no?"

"Why don't you give him an overdose of morphine?" asked an artillery
officer who was waiting to have a wound in his arm dressed.

"Do you think that is the only use I have for morphine? Would you like
me to have to operate without morphine? You have a pistol, go out and
shoot him yourself."

"He's been shot already," said the officer. "If some of you doctors were
shot you'd be different."

"Thank you very much," said the doctor waving a forceps in the air.
"Thank you a thousand times. What about these eyes?" He pointed the
forceps at them. "How would you like these?"

"Tear gas. We call it lucky if it's tear gas."

"Because you leave the line," said the doctor. "Because you come running
here with your tear gas to be evacuated. You rub onions in your eyes."

"You are beside yourself. I do not notice your insults. You are crazy."

The stretcher-bearers came in.

"Captain Doctor," one of them said.

"Get out of here!" said the doctor.

They went out.

"I will shoot the poor fellow," the artillery officer said. "I am a
humane man. I will not let him suffer."

"Shoot him then," said the doctor. "Shoot him. Assume the
responsibility. I will make a report. Wounded shot by lieutenant of
artillery in first curing post. Shoot him. Go ahead shoot him."

"You are not a human being."

"My business is to care for the wounded, not to kill them. That is for
gentlemen of the artillery."

"Why don't you care for him then?"

"I have done so. I have done all that can be done."

"Why don't you send him down on the cable railway?"

"Who are you to ask me questions? Are you my superior officer? Are you
in command of this dressing post? Do me the courtesy to answer."

The lieutenant of artillery said nothing. The others in the room were
all soldiers and there were no other officers present.

"Answer me," said the doctor holding a needle up in his forceps. "Give
me a response."

"F---- yourself," said the artillery officer.

"So," said the doctor. "So, you said that. All right. All right. We
shall see."

The lieutenant of artillery stood up and walked toward him.

"F---- yourself," he said. "F---- yourself. F---- your mother. F----
your sister. . . ."

The doctor tossed the saucer full of iodine in his face. As he came
toward him, blinded, the lieutenant fumbled for his pistol. The doctor
skipped quickly behind him, tripped him and, as he fell to the floor,
kicked him several times and picked up the pistol in his rubber gloves.
The lieutenant sat on the floor holding his good hand to his eyes.

"I'll kill you!" he said. "I'll kill you as soon as I can see."

"I am the boss," said the doctor. "All is forgiven since you know I am
the boss. You cannot kill me because I have your pistol. Sergeant!
Adjutant! Adjutant!"

"The adjutant is at the cable railway," said the sergeant.

"Wipe out this officer's eyes with alcohol and water. He has got iodine
in them. Bring me the basin to wash my hands. I will take this officer
next."

"You won't touch me."

"Hold him tight. He is a little delirious."

One of the stretcher-bearers came in.

"Captain Doctor."

"What do you want?"

"The man in the dead-house----"

"Get out of here."

"Is dead, Captain Doctor. I thought you would be glad to know."

"See, my poor lieutenant? We dispute about nothing. In time of war we
dispute about nothing."

"F---- you," said the lieutenant of artillery. He still could not see.
"You've blinded me."

"It is nothing," said the doctor. "Your eyes will be all right. It is
nothing. A dispute about nothing."

"Ayee! Ayee! Ayee!" suddenly screamed the lieutenant. "You have blinded
me! You have blinded me!"

"Hold him tight," said the doctor. "He is in much pain. Hold him very
tight."

                 *        *        *        *        *

[1] This story was published in a rather technical book called _Death in
the Afternoon_, which sold, or rather was offered for sale, at $3.50. It
is reprinted here in case any one not caring to spend that appreciable
sum for a rather technical book should care to read it.

[2] The reader's indulgence is requested for this mention of an extinct
phenomenon. The reference, like all references to fashions, dates the
story but it is retained because of its mild historical interest and
because its omission would spoil the rhythm.




                            WINE OF WYOMING


It was a hot afternoon in Wyoming; the mountains were a long way away
and you could see snow on their tops, but they made no shadow, and in
the valley the grain-fields were yellow, the road was dusty with cars
passing, and all the small wooden houses at the edge of town were baking
in the sun. There was a tree made shade over Fontan's back porch and I
sat there at a table and Madame Fontan brought up cold beer from the
cellar. A motor-car turned off the main road and came up the side road,
and stopped beside the house. Two men got out and came in through the
gate. I put the bottles under the table. Madame Fontan stood up.

"Where's Sam?" one of the men asked at the screen door.

"He ain't here. He's at the mines."

"You got some beer?"

"No. Ain't got any beer. That's a last bottle. All gone."

"What's he drinking?"

"That's a last bottle. All gone."

"Go on, give us some beer. You know me."

"Ain't got any beer. That's a last bottle. All gone."

"Come on, let's go some place where we can get some real beer," one of
them said, and they went out to the car. One of them walked unsteadily.
The motor-car jerked in starting, whirled on the road, and went on and
away.

"Put the beer on the table," Madame Fontan said. "What's the matter,
yes, all right. What's the matter? Don't drink off the floor."

"I didn't know who they were," I said.

"They're drunk," she said. "That's what makes the trouble. Then they go
somewhere else and say they got it here. Maybe they don't even
remember." She spoke French, but it was only French occasionally, and
there were many English words and some English constructions.

"Where's Fontan?"

"Il fait de la vendange. Oh, my God, il est crazy pour le vin."

"But you like the beer?"

"Oui, j'aime la bière, mais Fontan, il est crazy pour le vin."

She was a plump old woman with a lovely ruddy complexion and white hair.
She was very clean and the house was very clean and neat. She came from
Lens.

"Where did you eat?"

"At the hotel."

"Mangez ici. Il ne faut pas manger à l'hôtel ou au restaurant. Mangez
ici!"

"I don't want to make you trouble. And besides they eat all right at the
hotel."

"I never eat at the hotel. Maybe they eat all right there. Only once in
my life I ate at a restaurant in America. You know what they gave me?
They gave me pork that was raw!"

"Really?"

"I don't lie to you. It was pork that wasn't cooked! Et mon fils il est
marié avec une américaine, et tout le temps il a mangé les _beans_ en
_can_."

"How long has he been married?"

"Oh, my God, I don't know. His wife weighs two hundred twenty-five
pounds. She don't work. She don't cook. She gives him beans en can."

"What does she do?"

"All the time she reads. Rien que des books. Tout le temps elle stay in
the bed and read books. Already she can't have another baby. She's too
fat. There ain't any room."

"What's the matter with her?"

"She reads books all the time. He's a good boy. He works hard. He worked
in the mines; now he works on a ranch. He never worked on a ranch
before, and the man that owns the ranch said to Fontan that he never saw
anybody work better on that ranch than that boy. Then he comes home and
she feeds him nothing."

"Why doesn't he get a divorce?"

"He ain't got no money to get a divorce. Besides, il est _crazy_ pour
elle."

"Is she beautiful?"

"He thinks _so_. When he brought her home I thought I would die. He's
such a good boy and works hard all the time and never run around or make
any trouble. Then he goes away to work in the oil-fields and brings home
this Indienne that weighs right then one hundred eighty-five pounds."

"Elle est Indienne?"

"She's Indian all right. My God, yes. All the time she says sonofabitsh
goddam. She don't work."

"Where is she now?"

"Au show."

"Where's that?"

"_Au show. Moving_ pictures. All she does is read and go to the show."

"Have you got any more beer?"

"My God, yes. Sure. You come and eat with us tonight."

"All right. What should I bring?"

"Don't bring anything. Nothing at all. Maybe Fontan will have some of
the wine."

                 *        *        *        *        *

That night I had dinner at Fontan's. We ate in the dining-room and there
was a clean tablecloth. We tried the new wine. It was very light and
clear and good, and still tasted of the grapes. At the table there were
Fontan and Madame and the little boy, André.

"What did you do today?" Fontan asked. He was an old man with small
mine-tired body, a drooping gray mustache, and bright eyes, and was from
the Centre near Saint-Etienne.

"I worked on my book."

"Were your books all right?" asked Madame.

"He means he writes a book like a writer. Un roman," Fontan explained.

"Pa, can I go to the show?" André asked.

"Sure," said Fontan. André turned to me.

"How old do you think I am? Do you think I look fourteen years old?" He
was a thin little boy, but his face looked sixteen.

"Yes. You look fourteen."

"When I go to the show I crouch down like this and try to look small."
His voice was very high and breaking. "If I give them a quarter they
keep it all but if I give them only fifteen cents they let me in all
right."

"I only give you fifteen cents, then," said Fontan.

"No. Give me the whole quarter. I'll get it changed on the way."

"Il faut revenir tout de suite après le show," Madame Fontan said.

"I come right back." André went out the door. The night was cooling
outside. He left the door open and a cool breeze came in.

"Mangez!" said Madame Fontan. "You haven't eaten anything." I had eaten
two helpings of chicken and French fried potatoes, three ears of sweet
corn, some sliced cucumbers, and two helpings of salad.

"Perhaps he wants some kek," Fontan said.

"I should have gotten some kek for him," Madame Fontan said. "Mangez du
fromage. Mangez du crimcheez. Vous n'avez rien mangé. I ought have
gotten kek. Americans always eat kek."

"Mais j'ai rudement bien mangé."

"Mangez! Vous n'avez rien mangé. Eat it all. We don't save anything. Eat
it all up."

"Eat some more salad," Fontan said.

"I'll get some more beer," Madame Fontan said. "If you work all day in a
book-factory you get hungry."

"Elle ne comprend pas que vous êtes écrivain," Fontan said. He was a
delicate old man who used the slang and knew the popular songs of his
period of military service in the end of the 1890's. "He writes the
books himself," he explained to Madame.

"You write the books yourself?" Madame asked.

"Sometimes."

"Oh!" she said. "Oh! You write them yourself. Oh! Well, you get hungry
if you do that too. Mangez! Je vais chercher de la bière."

We heard her walking on the stairs to the cellar. Fontan smiled at me.
He was very tolerant of people who had not his experience and worldly
knowledge.

When André came home from the show we were still sitting in the kitchen
and were talking about hunting.

"Labor _day_ we all went to Clear Creek," Madame said. "Oh, my God, you
ought to have been there all right. We all went in the truck. Tout le
monde est allé dans le truck. Nous sommes partis le dimanche. C'est le
truck de Charley."

"On a mangé, on a bu du vin, de la bière, et il y avait aussi un
français qui a apporté de l'absinthe," Fontan said. "Un français de la
Californie!"

"My God, nous avons chanté. There's a farmer comes to see what's the
matter, and we give him something to drink, and he stayed with us
awhile. There was some Italians come too, and they want to stay with us
too. We sung a song about the Italians and they don't understand it.
They didn't know we didn't want them, but we didn't have nothing to do
with them, and after a while they went away."

"How many fish did you catch?"

"Très peu. We went to fish a little while, but then we came back to sing
again. Nous avons chanté, vous savez."

"In the night," said Madame, "toutes les femmes dort dans le truck. Les
hommes à côté du feu. In the night I hear Fontan come to get some more
wine, and I tell him, Fontan, my God, leave some for tomorrow. Tomorrow
they won't have anything to drink, and then they'll be sorry."

"Mais nous avons tout bu," Fontan said. "Et le lendemain il ne reste
rien."

"What did you do?"

"Nous avons pêché sérieusement."

"Good trout, all right, too. My God, yes. All the same; half-pound one
ounce."

"How big?"

"Half-pound one ounce. Just right to eat. All the same size; half-pound
one ounce."

"How do you like America?" Fontan asked me.

"It's my country, you see. So I like it, because it's my country. Mais
on ne mange pas très bien. D'antan, oui. Mais maintenant, no."

"No," said Madame. "On ne mange pas bien." She shook her head. "Et
aussi, il y a trop de Polack. Quand j'étais petite ma mère m'a dit,
'vous mangez comme les Polacks.' Je n'ai jamais compris ce que c'est
qu'un Polack. Mais maintenant en Amérique je comprends. Il y a trop de
Polack. Et, my God, ils sont sales, les Polacks."

"It is fine for hunting and fishing," I said.

"Oui. Ça, c'est le meilleur. La chasse et la pêche," Fontan said.
"Qu'est-ce que vous avez comme fusil?"

"A twelve-gauge pump."

"Il est bon, le pump," Fontan nodded his head.

"Je veux aller à la chasse moi-même," André said in his high, little
boy's voice.

"Tu ne peux pas," Fontan said. He turned to me.

"Ils sont des sauvages, les boys, vous savez. Ils sont des sauvages. Ils
veulent shooter les uns les autres."

"Je veux aller tout seul," André said, very shrill and excited.

"You can't go," Madame Fontan said. "You are too young."

"Je veux aller tout seul," André said shrilly. "Je veux shooter les rats
d'eau."

"What are rats d'eau?" I asked.

"You don't know them? Sure you know them. What they call the muskrats."

André had brought the twenty-two-calibre rifle out from the cupboard and
was holding it in his hands under the light.

"Ils sont des sauvages," Fontan explained. "Ils veulent shooter les uns
les autres."

"Je veux aller tout seul," André shrilled. He looked desperately along
the barrel of the gun. "Je veux shooter les rats d'eau. Je connais
beaucoup de rats d'eau."

"Give me the gun," Fontan said. He explained again to me. "They're
savages. They would shoot one another."

André held tight on to the gun.

"On peut looker. On ne fait pas de mal. On peut looker."

"Il est crazy pour le shooting," Madame Fontan said. "Mais il est trop
jeune."

André put the twenty-two-calibre rifle back in the cupboard.

"When I'm bigger I'll shoot the muskrats and the jack-rabbits too," he
said in English. "One time I went out with papa and he shot a
jack-rabbit just a little bit and I shot it and hit it."

"C'est vrai," Fontan nodded. "Il a tué un jack."

"But he hit it first," André said. "I want to go all by myself and shoot
all by myself. Next year I can do it." He went over in a corner and sat
down to read a book. I had picked it up when we came into the kitchen to
sit after supper. It was a library book--_Frank on a Gunboat_.

"Il aime les books," Madame Fontan said. "But it's better than to run
around at night with the other boys and steal things."

"Books are all right," Fontan said. "Monsieur il fait les books."

"Yes, that's so, all right. But too many books are bad," Madame Fontan
said. "Ici, c'est une maladie, les books. C'est comme les churches. Ici
il y a trop de churches. En France il y a seulement les catholiques et
les protestants--et très peu de protestants. Mais ici rien que de
churches. Quand j'étais venu ici je disais, oh, my God, what are all the
churches?"

"C'est vrai," Fontan said. "Il y a trop de churches."

"The other day," Madame Fontan said, "there was a little French girl
here with her mother, the cousin of Fontan, and she said to me, 'En
Amérique il ne faut pas être catholique. It's not good to be catholique.
The Americans don't like you to be catholique. It's like the dry law.' I
said to her, 'What you going to be? Heh? It's better to be catholique if
you're catholique.' But she said, 'No, it isn't any good to be
catholique in America.' But I think it's better to be catholique if you
are. Ce n'est pas bon de changer sa religion. My God, no."

"You go to the mass here?"

"No. I don't go in America, only sometimes in a long while. Mais je
reste catholique. It's no good to change the religion."

"On dit que Schmidt est catholique," Fontan said.

"On dit, mais on ne sait jamais," Madame Fontan said. "I don't think
Schmidt is catholique. There's not many catholique in America."

"We are catholique," I said.

"Sure, but you live in France," Madame Fontan said. "Je ne crois pas que
Schmidt est catholique. Did he ever live in France?"

"Les Polacks sont catholiques," Fontan said.

"That's true," Madame Fontan said. "They go to church, then they fight
with knives all the way home and kill each other all day Sunday. But
they're not real catholiques. They're Polack catholiques."

"All catholiques are the same," Fontan said. "One catholique is like
another."

"I don't believe Schmidt is catholique," Madame Fontan said. "That's
awful funny if he's catholique. Moi, je ne crois pas."

"Il est catholique," I said.

"Schmidt is catholique," Madame Fontan mused. "I wouldn't have believed
it. My God, il est catholique."

"Marie va chercher de la bière," Fontan said. "Monsieur a soif--moi
aussi."

"Yes, all right," Madame Fontan said from the next room. She went
downstairs and we heard the stairs creaking. André sat reading in the
corner. Fontan and I sat at the table, and he poured the beer from the
last bottle into our two glasses, leaving a little in the bottom.

"C'est un bon pays pour la chasse," Fontan said. "J'aime beaucoup
shooter les canards."

"Mais il y a très bonne chasse aussi en France," I said.

"C'est vrai," Fontan said. "Nous avons beaucoup de gibier là-bas."

Madame Fontan came up the stairs with the beer bottles in her hands. "Il
est catholique," she said. "My God, Schmidt est catholique."

"You think he'll be the President?" Fontan asked.

"No," I said.

                 *        *        *        *        *

The next afternoon I drove out to Fontan's, through the shade of the
town, then along the dusty road, turning up the side road and leaving
the car beside the fence. It was another hot day. Madame Fontan came to
the back door. She looked like Mrs. Santa Claus, clean and rosy-faced
and white-haired, and waddling when she walked.

"My God, hello," she said. "It's hot, my God." She went back into the
house to get some beer. I sat on the back porch and looked through the
screen and the leaves of the tree at the heat and, away off, the
mountains. There were furrowed brown mountains, and above them three
peaks and a glacier with snow that you could see through the trees. The
snow looked very white and pure and unreal. Madame Fontan came out and
put down the bottles on the table.

"What you see out there?"

"The snow."

"C'est joli, la neige."

"Have a glass, too."

"All right."

She sat down on a chair beside me. "Schmidt," she said. "If he's the
President, you think we get the wine and beer all right?"

"Sure," I said. "Trust Schmidt."

"Already we paid seven hundred fifty-five dollars in fines when they
arrested Fontan. Twice the police arrested us and once the governments.
All the money we made all the time Fontan worked in the mines and I did
washing. We paid it all. They put Fontan in jail. Il n'a jamais fait de
mal à personne."

"He's a good man," I said. "It's a crime."

"We don't charge too much money. The wine one dollar a litre. The beer
ten cents a bottle. We never sell the beer before it's good. Lots of
places they sell the beer right away when they make it, and then it
gives everybody a headache. What's the matter with that? They put Fontan
in jail and they take seven hundred fifty-five dollars."

"It's wicked," I said. "Where is Fontan?"

"He stays with the wine. He has to watch it now to catch it just right,"
she smiled. She did not think about the money any more. "Vous savez, il
est crazy pour le vin. Last night he brought a little bit home with him,
what you drank, and a little bit of the new. The last new. It ain't
ready yet, but he drank a little bit, and this morning he put a little
bit in his coffee. Dans son café, vous savez! Il est crazy pour le vin!
Il est comme ça. Son pays est comme ça. Where I live in the north they
don't drink any wine. Everybody drinks beer. By where we lived there was
a big brewery right near us. When I was a little girl I didn't like the
smell of the hops in the carts. Nor in the fields. Je n'aime pas les
houblons. No, my God, not a bit. The man that owns the brewery said to
me and my sister to go to the brewery and drink the beer, and then we'd
like the hops. That's true. Then we liked them all right. He had them
give us the beer. We liked them all right then. But Fontan, il est crazy
pour le vin. One time he killed a jack-rabbit and he wanted me to cook
it with a sauce with wine, make a black sauce with wine and butter and
mushrooms and onion and everything in it, for the jack. My God, I make
the sauce all right, and he eat it all and said, 'La sauce est meilleure
que le jack.' Dans son pays c'est comme ça. Il y a beaucoup de gibier et
de vin. Moi, j'aime les pommes de terre, le saucisson, et la bière.
C'est bon, la bière. C'est très bon pour la santé."

"It's good," I said. "It and wine too."

"You're like Fontan. But there was a thing here that I never saw. I
don't think you've ever seen it either. There were Americans came here
and they put whiskey in the beer."

"No," I said.

"Oui. My God, yes, that's true. Et aussi une femme qui a vomis sur la
table!"

"Comment?"

"C'est vrai. Elle a vomis sur la table. Et après elle a vomis dans ses
shoes. And afterward they come back and say they want to come again and
have another party the next Saturday, and I say no, my God, no! When
they came I locked the door."

"They're bad when they're drunk."

"In the winter-time when the boys go to the dance they come in the cars
and wait outside and say to Fontan, 'Hey, Sam, sell us a bottle wine,'
or they buy the beer, and then they take the moonshine out of their
pockets in a bottle and pour it in the beer and drink it. My God, that's
the first time I ever saw that in my life. They put whiskey in the beer.
My God, I don't understand _that_!"

"They want to get sick, so they'll know they're drunk."

"One time a fellow comes here came to me and said he wanted me to cook
them a big supper and they drink one two bottles of wine, and their
girls come too, and then they go to the dance. All right, I said. So I
made a big supper, and when they come already they drank a lot. Then
they put whiskey in the wine. My God, yes. I said to Fontan, 'On va être
malade!' 'Oui,' il dit. Then these girls were sick, nice girls too,
all-right girls. They were sick right at the table. Fontan tried to take
them by the arm and show them where they could be sick all right in the
cabinet, but the fellows said no, they were all right right there at the
table."

Fontan had come in. "When they come again I locked the door. 'No,' I
said. 'Not for hundred fifty dollars.' My God, no."

"There is a word for such people when they do like that, in French,"
Fontan said. He stood looking very old and tired from the heat.

"What?"

"Cochon," he said delicately, hesitating to use such a strong word.
"They were like the cochon. C'est un mot très fort," he apologized,
"mais vomir sur la table--" he shook his head sadly.

"Cochons," I said. "That's what they are--cochons. Salauds."

The grossness of the words was distasteful to Fontan. He was glad to
speak of something else.

"Il y a des gens très gentils, très sensibles, qui viennent aussi," he
said. "There are officers from the fort. Very nice men. Good fellas.
Everybody that was ever in France they want to come and drink wine. They
like wine all right."

"There was one man," Madame Fontan said, "and his wife never lets him
get out. So he tells her he's tired, and goes to bed, and when she goes
to the show he comes straight down here, sometimes in his pyjamas just
with a coat over them. 'Maria, some beer,' he says, 'for God's sake.' He
sits in his pyjamas and drinks the beer, and then he goes up to the fort
and gets back in bed before his wife comes home from the show."

"C'est un original," Fontan said, "mais vraiment gentil. He's a nice
fella."

"My God, yes, nice fella all right," Madame Fontan said. "He's always in
bed when his wife gets back from the show."

"I have to go away tomorrow," I said. "To the Crow Reservation. We go
there for the opening of the prairie-chicken season."

"Yes? You come back here before you go away. You come back here all
right?"

"Absolutely."

"Then the wine will be done," Fontan said. "We'll drink a bottle
together."

"Three bottles," Madame Fontan said.

"I'll be back," I said.

"We count on you," Fontan said.

"Good night," I said.

                 *        *        *        *        *

We got in early in the afternoon from the shooting-trip. We had been up
that morning since five o'clock. The day before we had had good
shooting, but that morning we had not seen a prairie-chicken. Riding in
the open car, we were very hot and we stopped to eat our lunch out of
the sun, under a tree beside the road. The sun was high and the patch of
shade was very small. We ate sandwiches and crackers with sandwich
filling on them, and were thirsty and tired, and glad when we finally
were out and on the main road back to town. We came up behind a
prairie-dog town and stopped the car to shoot at the prairie-dogs with
the pistol. We shot two, but then stopped, because the bullets that
missed glanced off the rocks and the dirt, and sung off across the
fields, and beyond the fields there were some trees along a watercourse,
with a house, and we did not want to get in trouble from stray bullets
going toward the house. So we drove on, and finally were on the road
coming down-hill toward the outlying houses of the town. Across the
plain we could see the mountains. They were blue that day, and the snow
on the high mountains shone like glass. The summer was ending, but the
new snow had not yet come to stay on the high mountains; there was only
the old sun-melted snow and the ice, and from a long way away it shone
very brightly.

We wanted something cool and some shade. We were sunburned and our lips
blistered from the sun and alkali dust. We turned up the side road to
Fontan's, stopped the car outside the house, and went in. It was cool
inside the dining-room. Madame Fontan was alone.

"Only two bottles beer," she said. "It's all gone. The new is no good
yet."

I gave her some birds. "That's good," she said. "All right. Thanks.
That's good." She went out to put the birds away where it was cooler.
When we finished the beer I stood up. "We have to go," I said.

"You come back tonight all right? Fontan he's going to have the wine."

"We'll come back before we go away."

"You go away?"

"Yes. We have to leave in the morning."

"That's too bad you go away. You come tonight. Fontan will have the
wine. We'll make a fête before you go."

"We'll come before we go."

But that afternoon there were telegrams to send, the car to be gone
over,--a tire had been cut by a stone and needed vulcanizing,--and,
without the car, I walked into the town, doing things that had to be
done before we could go. When it was supper-time I was too tired to go
out. We did not want a foreign language. All we wanted was to go early
to bed.

As I lay in bed before I went to sleep, with all the things of the
summer piled around ready to be packed, the windows open and the air
coming in cool from the mountains, I thought it was a shame not to have
gone to Fontan's--but in a little while I was asleep. The next day we
were busy all morning packing and ending the summer. We had lunch and
were ready to start by two o'clock.

"We must go and say good-by to the Fontans," I said.

"Yes, we must."

"I'm afraid they expected us last night."

"I suppose we could have gone."

"I wish we'd gone."

We said good-by to the man at the desk at the hotel, and to Larry and
our other friends in the town, and then drove out to Fontan's. Both
Monsieur and Madame were there. They were glad to see us. Fontan looked
old and tired.

"We thought you would come last night," Madame Fontan said. "Fontan had
three bottles of wine. When you did not come he drank it all up."

"We can only stay a minute," I said. "We just came to say good-by. We
wanted to come last night. We intended to come, but we were too tired
after the trip."

"Go get some wine," Fontan said.

"There is no wine. You drank it all up."

Fontan looked very upset.

"I'll go get some," he said. "I'll just be gone a few minutes. I drank
it up last night. We had it for you."

"I knew you were tired. 'My God,' I said, 'they're too tired all right
to come,'" Madame Fontan said. "Go get some wine, Fontan."

"I'll take you in the car," I said.

"All right," Fontan said. "That way we'll go faster."

We drove down the road in the motor-car and turned up a side road about
a mile away.

"You'll like that wine," Fontan said. "It's come out well. You can drink
it for supper tonight."

We stopped in front of a frame house. Fontan knocked on the door. There
was no answer. We went around to the back. The back door was locked too.
There were empty tin cans around the back door. We looked in the window.
There was nobody inside. The kitchen was dirty and sloppy, but all the
doors and windows were tight shut.

"That son of a bitch. Where is she gone out?" Fontan said. He was
desperate.

"I know where I can get a key," he said. "You stay here." I watched him
go down to the next house down the road, knock on the door, talk to the
woman who came out, and finally come back. He had a key. We tried it on
the front door and the back, but it wouldn't work.

"That son of a bitch," Fontan said. "She's gone away somewhere."

Looking through the window I could see where the wine was stored. Close
to the window you could smell the inside of the house. It smelled sweet
and sickish like an Indian house. Suddenly Fontan took a loose board and
commenced digging at the earth beside the back door.

"I can get in," he said. "Son of a bitch, I can get in."

There was a man in the back yard of the next house doing something to
one of the front wheels of an old Ford.

"You better not," I said. "That man will see you. He's watching."

Fontan straightened up. "We'll try the key once more," he said. We tried
the key and it did not work. It turned half-way in either direction.

"We can't get in," I said. "We better go back."

"I'll dig up the back," Fontan offered.

"No, I wouldn't let you take the chance."

"I'll do it."

"No," I said. "That man would see. Then they would seize it."

We went out to the car and drove back to Fontan's, stopping on the way
to leave the key. Fontan did not say anything but swear in English. He
was incoherent and crushed. We went in the house.

"That son of a bitch!" he said. "We couldn't get the wine. My own wine
that I made."

All the happiness went from Madame Fontan's face. Fontan sat down in a
corner with his head in his hands.

"We must go," I said. "It doesn't make any difference about the wine.
You drink to us when we're gone."

"Where did that crazy go?" Madame Fontan asked.

"I don't know," Fontan said. "I don't know where she go. Now you go away
without any wine."

"That's all right," I said.

"That's no good," Madame Fontan said. She shook her head.

"We have to go," I said. "Good-by and good luck. Thank you for the fine
times."

Fontan shook his head. He was disgraced. Madame Fontan looked sad.

"Don't feel bad about the wine," I said.

"He wanted you to drink his wine," Madame Fontan said. "You can come
back next year?"

"No. Maybe the year after."

"You see?" Fontan said to her.

"Good-by," I said. "Don't think about the wine. Drink some for us when
we're gone." Fontan shook his head. He did not smile. He knew when he
was ruined.

"That son of a bitch," Fontan said to himself.

"Last night he had three bottles," Madame Fontan said to comfort him. He
shook his head.

"Good-by," he said.

Madame Fontan had tears in her eyes.

"Good-by," she said. She felt badly for Fontan.

"Good-by," we said. We all felt very badly. They stood in the doorway
and we got in, and I started the motor. We waved. They stood together
sadly on the porch. Fontan looked very old, and Madame Fontan looked
sad. She waved to us and Fontan went in the house. We turned up the
road.

"They felt so badly. Fontan felt terribly."

"We ought to have gone last night."

"Yes, we ought to have."

We were through the town and out on the smooth road beyond, with the
stubble of grain-fields on each side and the mountains off to the right.
It looked like Spain, but it was Wyoming.

"I hope they have a lot of good luck."

"They won't," I said, "and Schmidt won't be President either."

The cement road stopped. The road was gravelled now and we left the
plain and started up between two foot-hills; the road in a curve and
commencing to climb. The soil of the hills was red, the sage grew in
gray clumps, and as the road rose we could see across the hills and away
across the plain of the valley to the mountains. They were farther away
now and they looked more like Spain than ever. The road curved and
climbed again, and ahead there were some grouse dusting in the road.
They flew as we came toward them, their wings beating fast, then sailing
in long slants, and lit on the hillside below.

"They are so big and lovely. They're bigger than European partridges."

"It's a fine country for la chasse, Fontan says."

"And when the chasse is gone?"

"They'll be dead then."

"The boy won't."

"There's nothing to prove he won't be," I said.

"We ought to have gone last night."

"Oh, yes," I said. "We ought to have gone."




                  THE GAMBLER, THE NUN, AND THE RADIO


They brought them in around midnight and then, all night long, every one
along the corridor heard the Russian.

"Where is he shot?" Mr. Frazer asked the night nurse.

"In the thigh, I think."

"What about the other one?"

"Oh, he's going to die, I'm afraid."

"Where is he shot?"

"Twice in the abdomen. They only found one of the bullets."

They were both beet workers, a Mexican and a Russian, and they were
sitting drinking coffee in an all-night restaurant when some one came in
the door and started shooting at the Mexican. The Russian crawled under
a table and was hit, finally, by a stray shot fired at the Mexican as he
lay on the floor with two bullets in his abdomen. That was what the
paper said.

The Mexican told the police he had no idea who shot him. He believed it
to be an accident.

"An accident that he fired eight shots at you and hit you twice, there?"

"Si, señor," said the Mexican, who was named Cayetano Ruiz.

"An accident that he hit me at all, the cabron," he said to the
interpreter.

"What does he say?" asked the detective sergeant, looking across the bed
at the interpreter.

"He says it was an accident."

"Tell him to tell the truth, that he is going to die," the detective
said.

"Na," said Cayetano. "But tell him that I feel very sick and would
prefer not to talk so much."

"He says that he is telling the truth," the interpreter said. Then,
speaking confidently, to the detective, "He don't know who shot him.
They shot him in the back."

"Yes," said the detective. "I understand that, but why did the bullets
all go in the front?"

"Maybe he is spinning around," said the interpreter.

"Listen," said the detective, shaking his finger almost at Cayetano's
nose, which projected, waxen yellow, from his dead-man's face in which
his eyes were alive as a hawk's. "I don't give a damn who shot you, but
I've got to clear this thing up. Don't you want the man who shot you to
be punished? Tell him that," he said to the interpreter.

"He says to tell who shot you."

"Mandarlo al carajo," said Cayetano, who was very tired.

"He says he never saw the fellow at all," the interpreter said. "I tell
you straight they shot him in the back."

"Ask him who shot the Russian."

"Poor Russian," said Cayetano. "He was on the floor with his head
enveloped in his arms. He started to give cries when they shoot him and
he is giving cries ever since. Poor Russian."

"He says some fellow that he doesn't know. Maybe the same fellow that
shot him."

"Listen," the detective said. "This isn't Chicago. You're not a
gangster. You don't have to act like a moving picture. It's all right to
tell who shot you. Anybody would tell who shot them. That's all right to
do. Suppose you don't tell who he is and he shoots somebody else.
Suppose he shoots a woman or a child. You can't let him get away with
that. You tell him," he said to Mr. Frazer. "I don't trust that damn
interpreter."

"I am very reliable," the interpreter said. Cayetano looked at Mr.
Frazer.

"Listen, amigo," said Mr. Frazer. "The policeman says that we are not in
Chicago but in Hailey, Montana. You are not a bandit and this has
nothing to do with the cinema."

"I believe him," said Cayetano softly. "Ya lo creo."

"One can, with honor, denounce one's assailant. Every one does it here,
he says. He says what happens if after shooting you, this man shoots a
woman or a child?"

"I am not married," Cayetano said.

"He says any woman, any child."

"The man is not crazy," Cayetano said.

"He says you should denounce him," Mr. Frazer finished.

"Thank you," Cayetano said. "You are of the great translators. I speak
English, but badly. I understand it all right. How did you break your
leg?"

"A fall off a horse."

"What bad luck. I am very sorry. Does it hurt much?"

"Not now. At first, yes."

"Listen, amigo," Cayetano began, "I am very weak. You will pardon me.
Also I have much pain; enough pain. It is very possible that I die.
Please get this policeman out of here because I am very tired." He made
as though to roll to one side; then held himself still.

"I told him everything exactly as you said and he said to tell you,
truly, that he doesn't know who shot him and that he is very weak and
wishes you would question him later on," Mr. Frazer said.

"He'll probably be dead later on."

"That's quite possible."

"That's why I want to question him now."

"Somebody shot him in the back, I tell you," the interpreter said.

"Oh, for Chrisake," the detective sergeant said, and put his notebook in
his pocket.

                 *        *        *        *        *

Outside in the corridor the detective sergeant stood with the
interpreter beside Mr. Frazer's wheeled chair.

"I suppose you think somebody shot him in the back too?"

"Yes," Frazer said. "Somebody shot him in the back. What's it to you?"

"Don't get sore," the sergeant said. "I wish I could talk spik."

"Why don't you learn?"

"You don't have to get sore. I don't get any fun out of asking that spik
questions. If I could talk spik it would be different."

"You don't need to talk Spanish," the interpreter said. "I am a very
reliable interpreter."

"Oh, for Chrisake," the sergeant said. "Well, so long. I'll come up and
see you."

"Thanks. I'm always in."

"I guess you are all right. That was bad luck all right. Plenty bad
luck."

"It's coming along good now since he spliced the bone."

"Yes, but it's a long time. A long, long time."

"Don't let anybody shoot you in the back."

"That's right," he said. "That's right. Well, I'm glad you're not sore."

"So long," said Mr. Frazer.

                 *        *        *        *        *

Mr. Frazer did not see Cayetano again for a long time, but each morning
Sister Cecilia brought news of him. He was so uncomplaining she said and
he was very bad now. He had peritonitis and they thought he could not
live. Poor Cayetano, she said. He had such beautiful hands and such a
fine face and he never complains. The odor, now, was really terrific. He
would point toward his nose with one finger and smile and shake his
head, she said. He felt badly about the odor. It embarrassed him, Sister
Cecilia said. Oh, he was such a fine patient. He always smiled. He
wouldn't go to confession to Father but he promised to say his prayers,
and not a Mexican had been to see him since he had been brought in. The
Russian was going out at the end of the week. I could never feel
anything about the Russian, Sister Cecilia said. Poor fellow, he
suffered too. It was a greased bullet and dirty and the wound infected,
but he made so much noise and then I always like the bad ones. That
Cayetano, he's a bad one. Oh, he must really be a bad one, a thoroughly
bad one, he's so fine and delicately made and he's never done any work
with his hands. He's not a beet worker. I know he's not a beet worker.
His hands are as smooth and not a callous on them. I know he's a bad one
of some sort. I'm going down and pray for him now. Poor Cayetano, he's
having a dreadful time and he doesn't make a sound. What did they have
to shoot him for? Oh, that poor Cayetano! I'm going right down and pray
for him.

She went right down and prayed for him.

                 *        *        *        *        *

In that hospital a radio did not work very well until it was dusk. They
said it was because there was so much ore in the ground or something
about the mountains, but anyway it did not work well at all until it
began to get dark outside; but all night it worked beautifully and when
one station stopped you could go farther west and pick up another. The
last one that you could get was Seattle, Washington, and due to the
difference in time, when they signed off at four o'clock in the morning
it was five o'clock in the morning in the hospital; and at six o'clock
you could get the morning revellers in Minneapolis. That was on account
of the difference in time, too, and Mr. Frazer used to like to think of
the morning revellers arriving at the studio and picture how they would
look getting off a street car before daylight in the morning carrying
their instruments. Maybe that was wrong and they kept their instruments
at the place they revelled, but he always pictured them with their
instruments. He had never been in Minneapolis and believed he probably
would never go there, but he knew what it looked like that early in the
morning.

Out of the window of the hospital you could see a field with tumbleweed
coming out of the snow, and a bare clay butte. One morning the doctor
wanted to show Mr. Frazer two pheasants that were out there in the snow,
and pulling the bed toward the window, the reading light fell off the
iron bedstead and hit Mr. Frazer on the head. This does not sound so
funny now but it was very funny then. Every one was looking out the
window, and the doctor, who was a most excellent doctor, was pointing at
the pheasants and pulling the bed toward the window, and then, just as
in a comic section, Mr. Frazer was knocked out by the leaded base of the
lamp hitting the top of his head. It seemed the antithesis of healing or
whatever people were in the hospital for, and every one thought it was
very funny, as a joke on Mr. Frazer and on the doctor. Everything is
much simpler in a hospital, including the jokes.

From the other window, if the bed was turned, you could see the town,
with a little smoke above it, and the Dawson mountains looking like real
mountains with the winter snow on them. Those were the two views since
the wheeled chair had proved to be premature. It is really best to be in
bed if you are in a hospital; since two views, with time to observe
them, from a room the temperature of which you control, are much better
than any number of views seen for a few minutes from hot, empty rooms
that are waiting for some one else, or just abandoned, which you are
wheeled in and out of. If you stay long enough in a room the view,
whatever it is, acquires a great value and becomes very important and
you would not change it, not even by a different angle. Just as, with
the radio, there are certain things that you become fond of, and you
welcome them and resent the new things. The best tunes they had that
winter were "Sing Something Simple," "Singsong Girl," and "Little White
Lies." No other tunes were as satisfactory, Mr. Frazer felt. "Betty
Co-ed" was a good tune too, but the parody of the words which came
unavoidably into Mr. Frazer's mind, grew so steadily and increasingly
obscene that there being no one to appreciate it, he finally abandoned
it and let the song go back to football.

About nine o'clock in the morning they would start using the X-ray
machine, and then the radio, which, by then, was only getting Hailey,
became useless. Many people in Hailey who owned radios protested about
the hospital's X-ray machine which ruined their morning reception, but
there was never any action taken, although many felt it was a shame the
hospital could not use their machine at a time when people were not
using their radios.

                 *        *        *        *        *

About the time when it became necessary to turn off the radio Sister
Cecilia came in.

"How's Cayetano, Sister Cecilia?" Mr. Frazer asked.

"Oh, he's very bad."

"Is he out of his head?"

"No, but I'm afraid he's going to die."

"How are you?"

"I'm very worried about him, and do you know that absolutely no one has
come to see him? He could die just like a dog for all those Mexicans
care. They're really dreadful."

"Do you want to come up and hear the game this afternoon?"

"Oh, no," she said. "I'd be too excited. I'll be in the chapel praying."

"We ought to be able to hear it pretty well," Mr. Frazer said. "They're
playing out on the coast and the difference in time will bring it late
enough so we can get it all right."

"Oh, no. I couldn't do it. The world series nearly finished me. When the
Athletics were at bat I was praying right out loud: 'Oh, Lord, direct
their batting eyes! Oh, Lord, may he hit one! Oh, Lord, may he hit
safely!' Then when they filled the bases in the third game, you
remember, it was too much for me. 'Oh, Lord, may he hit it out of the
lot! Oh, Lord, may he drive it clean over the fence!' Then you know when
the Cardinals would come to bat it was simply dreadful. 'Oh, Lord, may
they not see it! Oh, Lord, don't let them even catch a glimpse of it!
Oh, Lord, may they fan!' And this game is even worse. It's Notre Dame.
Our Lady. No, I'll be in the chapel. For Our Lady. They're playing for
Our Lady. I wish you'd write something sometime for Our Lady. You could
do it. You know you could do it, Mr. Frazer."

"I don't know anything about her that I could write. It's mostly been
written already," Mr. Frazer said. "You wouldn't like the way I write.
She wouldn't care for it either."

"You'll write about her sometime," Sister said. "I know you will. You
must write about Our Lady."

"You'd better come up and hear the game."

"It would be too much for me. No, I'll be in the chapel doing what I
can."

That afternoon they had been playing about five minutes when a
probationer came into the room and said, "Sister Cecilia wants to know
how the game is going?"

"Tell her they have a touchdown already."

In a little while the probationer came into the room again.

"Tell her they're playing them off their feet," Mr. Frazer said.

A little later he rang the bell for the nurse who was on floor duty.
"Would you mind going down to the chapel or sending word down to Sister
Cecilia that Notre Dame has them fourteen to nothing at the end of the
first quarter and that it's all right. She can stop praying."

In a few minutes Sister Cecilia came into the room. She was very
excited. "What does fourteen to nothing mean? I don't know anything
about this game. That's a nice safe lead in baseball. But I don't know
anything about football. It may not mean a thing. I'm going right back
down to the chapel and pray until it's finished."

"They have them beaten," Frazer said. "I promise you. Stay and listen
with me."

"No. No. No. No. No. No. No," she said. "I'm going right down to the
chapel to pray."

Mr. Frazer sent down word whenever Notre Dame scored, and finally, when
it had been dark a long time, the final result.

"How's Sister Cecilia?"

"They're all at chapel," she said.

The next morning Sister Cecilia came in. She was very pleased and
confident.

"I knew they couldn't beat Our Lady," she said. "They couldn't.
Cayetano's better too. He's much better. He's going to have visitors. He
can't see them yet, but they are going to come and that will make him
feel better and know he's not forgotten by his own people. I went down
and saw that O'Brien boy at Police Headquarters and told him that he's
got to send some Mexicans up to see poor Cayetano. He's going to send
some this afternoon. Then that poor man will feel better. It's wicked
the way no one has come to see him."

That afternoon about five o'clock three Mexicans came into the room.

"Can one?" asked the biggest one, who had very thick lips and was quite
fat.

"Why not?" Mr. Frazer answered. "Sit down, gentlemen. Will you take
something?"

"Many thanks," said the big one.

"Thanks," said the darkest and smallest one.

"Thanks, no," said the thin one. "It mounts to my head." He tapped his
head.

The nurse brought some glasses. "Please give them the bottle," Frazer
said. "It is from Red Lodge," he explained.

"That of Red Lodge is the best," said the big one. "Much better than
that of Big Timber."

"Clearly," said the smallest one, "and costs more too."

"In Red Lodge it is of all prices," said the big one.

"How many tubes has the radio?" asked the one who did not drink.

"Seven."

"Very beautiful," he said. "What does it cost?"

"I don't know," Mr. Frazer said. "It is rented."

"You gentlemen are friends of Cayetano?"

"No," said the big one. "We are friends of he who wounded him."

"We were sent here by the police," the smallest one said.

"We have a little place," the big one said. "He and I," indicating the
one who did not drink. "He has a little place too," indicating the
small, dark one. "The police tell us we have to come--so we come."

"I am very happy you have come."

"Equally," said the big one.

"Will you have another little cup?"

"Why not?" said the big one.

"With your permission," said the smallest one.

"Not me," said the thin one. "It mounts to my head."

"It is very good," said the smallest one.

"Why not try some," Mr. Frazer asked the thin one. "Let a little mount
to your head."

"Afterwards comes the headache," said the thin one.

"Could you not send friends of Cayetano to see him?" Frazer asked.

"He has no friends."

"Every man has friends."

"This one, no."

"What does he do?"

"He is a card-player."

"Is he good?"

"I believe it."

"From me," said the smallest one, "he won one hundred and eighty
dollars. Now there is no longer one hundred and eighty dollars in the
world."

"From me," said the thin one, "he won two hundred and eleven dollars.
Fix yourself on that figure."

"I never played with him," said the fat one.

"He must be very rich," Mr. Frazer suggested.

"He is poorer than we," said the little Mexican.

"He has no more than the shirt on his back."

"And that shirt is of little value now," Mr. Frazer said. "Perforated as
it is."

"Clearly."

"The one who wounded him was a card-player?"

"No, a beet worker. He has had to leave town."

"Fix yourself on this," said the smallest one. "He was the best guitar
player ever in this town. The finest."

"What a shame."

"I believe it," said the biggest one. "How he could touch the guitar."

"There are no good guitar players left?"

"Not the shadow of a guitar player."

"There is an accordion player who is worth something," the thin man
said.

"There are a few who touch various instruments," the big one said. "You
like music?"

"How would I not?"

"We will come one night with music? You think the sister would allow it?
She seems very amiable."

"I am sure she would permit it when Cayetano is able to hear it."

"Is she a little crazy?" asked the thin one.

"Who?"

"That sister?"

"No," Mr. Frazer said. "She is a fine woman of great intelligence and
sympathy."

"I distrust all priests, monks, and sisters," said the thin one.

"He had bad experiences when a boy," the smallest one said.

"I was acolyte," the thin one said proudly. "Now I believe in nothing.
Neither do I go to mass."

"Why? Does it mount to your head?"

"No," said the thin one. "It is alcohol that mounts to my head. Religion
is the opium of the poor."

"I thought mariajuana was the opium of the poor," Frazer said.

"Did you ever smoke opium?" the big one asked.

"No."

"Nor I," he said. "It seems it is very bad. One commences and cannot
stop. It is a vice."

"Like religion," said the thin one.

"This one," said the smallest Mexican, "is very strong against
religion."

"It is necessary to be very strong against something," Mr. Frazer said
politely.

"I respect those who have faith even though they are ignorant," the thin
one said.

"Good," said Mr. Frazer.

"What can we bring you?" asked the big Mexican. "Do you lack for
anything?"

"I would be glad to buy some beer if there is good beer."

"We will bring beer."

"Another copita before you go?"

"It is very good."

"We are robbing you."

"I can't take it. It goes to my head. Then I have a bad headache and
sick at the stomach."

"Good-by, gentlemen."

"Good-by and thanks."

They went out and there was supper and then the radio, turned to be as
quiet as possible and still be heard, and the stations finally signing
off in this order: Denver, Salt Lake City, Los Angeles, and Seattle. Mr.
Frazer received no picture of Denver from the radio. He could see Denver
from the _Denver Post_, and correct the picture from _The Rocky Mountain
News_. Nor did he ever have any feel of Salt Lake City or Los Angeles
from what he heard from those places. All he felt about Salt Lake City
was that it was clean, but dull, and there were too many ballrooms
mentioned in too many big hotels for him to see Los Angeles. He could
not feel it for the ballrooms. But Seattle he came to know very well,
the taxicab company with the big white cabs (each cab equipped with
radio itself) he rode in every night out to the roadhouse on the
Canadian side where he followed the course of parties by the musical
selections they phoned for. He lived in Seattle from two o'clock on,
each night, hearing the pieces that all the different people asked for,
and it was as real as Minneapolis, where the revellers left their beds
each morning to make that trip down to the studio. Mr. Frazer grew very
fond of Seattle, Washington.

                 *        *        *        *        *

The Mexicans came and brought beer but it was not good beer. Mr. Frazer
saw them but he did not feel like talking, and when they went he knew
they would not come again. His nerves had become tricky and he disliked
seeing people while he was in this condition. His nerves went bad at the
end of five weeks, and while he was pleased they lasted that long yet he
resented being forced to make the same experiment when he already knew
the answer. Mr. Frazer had been through this all before. The only thing
which was new to him was the radio. He played it all night long, turned
so low he could barely hear it, and he was learning to listen to it
without thinking.

                 *        *        *        *        *

Sister Cecilia came into the room about ten o'clock in the morning on
that day and brought the mail. She was very handsome, and Mr. Frazer
liked to see her and to hear her talk, but the mail, supposedly coming
from a different world, was more important. However, there was nothing
in the mail of any interest.

"You look _so_ much better," she said. "You'll be leaving us soon."

"Yes," Mr. Frazer said. "You look very happy this morning."

"Oh, I am. This morning I feel as though I might be a saint."

Mr. Frazer was a little taken aback at this.

"Yes," Sister Cecila went on. "That's what I want to be. A saint. Ever
since I was a little girl I've wanted to be a saint. When I was a girl I
thought if I renounced the world and went into the convent I would be a
saint. That was what I wanted to be and that was what I thought I had to
do to be one. I expected I would be a saint. I was absolutely sure I
would be one. For just a moment I thought I was one. I was so happy and
it seemed so simple and easy. When I awoke in the morning I expected I
would be a saint, but I wasn't. I've never become one. I want so to be
one. All I want is to be a saint. That is all I've ever wanted. And this
morning I feel as though I might be one. Oh, I hope I will get to be
one."

"You'll be one. Everybody gets what they want. That's what they always
tell me."

"I don't know now. When I was a girl it seemed so simple. I knew I would
be a saint. Only I believed it took time when I found it did not happen
suddenly. Now it seems almost impossible."

"I'd say you had a good chance."

"Do you really think so? No, I don't want just to be encouraged. Don't
just encourage me. I want to be a saint. I want so to be a saint."

"Of course you'll be a saint," Mr. Frazer said.

"No, probably I won't be. But, oh, if I could only be a saint! I'd be
perfectly happy."

"You're three to one to be a saint."

"No, don't encourage me. But, oh, if I could only be a saint! If I could
only be a saint!"

"How's your friend Cayetano?"

"He's going to get well but he's paralyzed. One of the bullets hit the
big nerve that goes down through his thigh and that leg is paralyzed.
They only found it out when he got well enough so that he could move."

"Maybe the nerve will regenerate."

"I'm praying that it will," Sister Cecilia said. "You ought to see him."

"I don't feel like seeing anybody."

"You know you'd like to see him. They could wheel him in here."

"All right."

                 *        *        *        *        *

They wheeled him in, thin, his skin transparent, his hair black and
needing to be cut, his eyes very laughing, his teeth bad when he smiled.

"Hola, amigo! Que tal?"

"As you see," said Mr. Frazer. "And thou?"

"Alive and with the leg paralyzed."

"Bad," Mr. Frazer said. "But the nerve can regenerate and be as good as
new."

"So they tell me."

"What about the pain?"

"Not now. For a while I was crazy with it in the belly. I thought the
pain alone would kill me."

Sister Cecilia was observing them happily.

"She tells me you never made a sound," Mr. Frazer said.

"So many people in the ward," the Mexican said deprecatingly. "What
class of pain do you have?"

"Big enough. Clearly not as bad as yours. When the nurse goes out I cry
an hour, two hours. It rests me. My nerves are bad now."

"You have the radio. If I had a private room and a radio I would be
crying and yelling all night long."

"I doubt it."

"Hombre, si. It's very healthy. But you cannot do it with so many
people."

"At least," Mr. Frazer said, "the hands are still good. They tell me you
make your living with the hands."

"And the head," he said, tapping his forehead. "But the head isn't worth
as much."

"Three of your countrymen were here."

"Sent by the police to see me."

"They brought some beer."

"It probably was bad."

"It was bad."

"Tonight, sent by the police, they come to serenade me." He laughed,
then tapped his stomach. "I cannot laugh yet. As musicians they are
fatal."

"And the one who shot you?"

"Another fool. I won thirty-eight dollars from him at cards. That is not
to kill about."

"The three told me you win much money."

"And am poorer than the birds."

"How?"

"I am a poor idealist. I am the victim of illusions." He laughed, then
grinned and tapped his stomach. "I am a professional gambler but I like
to gamble. To really gamble. Little gambling is all crooked. For real
gambling you need luck. I have no luck."

"Never?"

"Never. I am completely without luck. Look, this cabron who shoots me
just now. Can he shoot? No. The first shot he fires into nothing. The
second is intercepted by a poor Russian. That would seem to be luck.
What happens? He shoots me twice in the belly. He is a lucky man. I have
no luck. He could not hit a horse if he were holding the stirrup. All
luck."

"I thought he shot you first and the Russian after."

"No, the Russian first, me after. The paper was mistaken."

"Why didn't you shoot him?"

"I never carry a gun. With my luck, if I carried a gun I would be hanged
ten times a year. I am a cheap card player, only that." He stopped, then
continued. "When I make a sum of money I gamble and when I gamble I
lose. I have passed at dice for three thousand dollars and crapped out
for the six. With good dice. More than once."

"Why continue?"

"If I live long enough the luck will change. I have bad luck now for
fifteen years. If I ever get any good luck I will be rich." He grinned.
"I am a good gambler, really I would enjoy being rich."

"Do you have bad luck with all games?"

"With everything and with women." He smiled again, showing his bad
teeth.

"Truly?"

"Truly."

"And what is there to do?"

"Continue, slowly, and wait for luck to change."

"But with women?"

"No gambler has luck with women. He is too concentrated. He works
nights. When he should be with the woman. No man who works nights can
hold a woman if the woman is worth anything."

"You are a philosopher."

"No, hombre. A gambler of the small towns. One small town, then another,
another, then a big town, then start over again."

"Then shot in the belly."

"The first time," he said. "That has only happened once."

"I tire you talking?" Mr. Frazer suggested.

"No," he said. "I must tire you."

"And the leg?"

"I have no great use for the leg. I am all right with the leg or not. I
will be able to circulate."

"I wish you luck, truly, and with all my heart," Mr. Frazer said.

"Equally," he said. "And that the pain stops."

"It will not last, certainly. It is passing. It is of no importance."

"That it passes quickly."

"Equally."

                 *        *        *        *        *

That night the Mexicans played the accordion and other instruments in
the ward and it was cheerful and the noise of the inhalations and
exhalations of the accordion, and of the bells, the traps, and the drum
came down the corridor. In that ward there was a rodeo rider who had
come out of the chutes on Midnight on a hot dusty afternoon with a big
crowd watching, and now, with a broken back, was going to learn to work
in leather and to cane chairs when he got well enough to leave the
hospital. There was a carpenter who had fallen with a scaffolding and
broken both ankles and both wrists. He had lit like a cat but without a
cat's resiliency. They could fix him up so that he could work again but
it would take a long time. There was a boy from a farm, about sixteen
years old, with a broken leg that had been badly set and was to be
rebroken. There was Cayetano Ruiz, a small-town gambler with a paralyzed
leg. Down the corridor Mr. Frazer could hear them all laughing and merry
with the music made by the Mexicans who had been sent by the police. The
Mexicans were having a good time. They came in, very excited, to see Mr.
Frazer and wanted to know if there was anything he wanted them to play,
and they came twice more to play at night of their own accord.

The last time they played Mr. Frazer lay in his room with the door open
and listened to the noisy, bad music and could not keep from thinking.
When they wanted to know what he wished played, he asked for the
Cucaracha, which has the sinister lightness and deftness of so many of
the tunes men have gone to die to. They played noisily and with emotion.
The tune was better than most of such tunes, to Mr. Frazer's mind, but
the effect was all the same.

In spite of this introduction of emotion, Mr. Frazer went on thinking.
Usually he avoided thinking all he could, except when he was writing,
but now he was thinking about those who were playing and what the little
one had said.

Religion is the opium of the people. He believed that, that dyspeptic
little joint-keeper. Yes, and music is the opium of the people. Old
mount-to-the-head hadn't thought of that. And now economics is the opium
of the people; along with patriotism the opium of the people in Italy
and Germany. What about sexual intercourse; was that an opium of the
people? Of some of the people. Of some of the best of the people. But
drink was a sovereign opium of the people, oh, an excellent opium.
Although some prefer the radio, another opium of the people, a cheap one
he had just been using. Along with these went gambling, an opium of the
people if there ever was one, one of the oldest. Ambition was another,
an opium of the people, along with a belief in any new form of
government. What you wanted was the minimum of government, always less
government. Liberty, what we believed in, now the name of a MacFadden
publication. We believed in that although they had not found a new name
for it yet. But what was the real one? What was the real, the actual,
opium of the people? He knew it very well. It was gone just a little way
around the corner in that well-lighted part of his mind that was there
after two or more drinks in the evening; that he knew was there (it was
not really there of course). What was it? He knew very well. What was
it? Of course; bread was the opium of the people. Would he remember that
and would it make sense in the daylight? Bread is the opium of the
people.

"Listen," Mr. Frazer said to the nurse when she came. "Get that little
thin Mexican in here, will you, please?"

"How did you like it?" the Mexican said at the door.

"Very much."

"It is a historic tune," the Mexican said. "It is the tune of the real
revolution."

"Listen," said Mr. Frazer. "Why should the people be operated on without
an anæsthetic?"

"I do not understand."

"Why are not all the opiums of the people, good? What do you want to do
with the people?"

"They should be rescued from ignorance."

"Don't talk nonsense. Education is an opium of the people. You ought to
know that. You've had a little."

"You do not believe in education?"

"No," said Mr. Frazer. "In knowledge, yes."

"I do not follow you."

"Many times I do not follow myself with pleasure."

"You want to hear the Cucaracha another time?" asked the Mexican
worriedly.

"Yes," said Mr. Frazer. "Play the Cucaracha another time. It's better
than the radio."

Revolution, Mr. Frazer thought, is no opium. Revolution is a catharsis;
an ecstasy which can only be prolonged by tyranny. The opiums are for
before and for after. He was thinking well, a little too well.

They would go now in a little while, he thought, and they would take the
Cucaracha with them. Then he would have a little spot of the giant
killer and play the radio, you could play the radio so that you could
hardly hear it.




                            FATHERS AND SONS


There had been a sign to detour in the centre of the main street of this
town, but cars had obviously gone through, so, believing it was some
repair which had been completed, Nicholas Adams drove on through the
town along the empty, brick-paved street, stopped by traffic lights that
flashed on and off on this traffic-less Sunday, and would be gone next
year when the payments on the system were not met; on under the heavy
trees of the small town that are a part of your heart if it is your town
and you have walked under them, but that are only too heavy, that shut
out the sun and that dampen the houses for a stranger; out past the last
house and onto the highway that rose and fell straight away ahead with
banks of red dirt sliced cleanly away and the second-growth timber on
both sides. It was not his country but it was the middle of fall and all
of this country was good to drive through and to see. The cotton was
picked and in the clearings there were patches of corn, some cut with
streaks of red sorghum, and, driving easily, his son asleep on the seat
by his side, the day's run made, knowing the town he would reach for the
night, Nick noticed which corn fields had soy beans or peas in them, how
the thickets and the cut-over land lay, where the cabins and houses were
in relation to the fields and the thickets; hunting the country in his
mind as he went by; sizing up each clearing as to feed and cover and
figuring where you would find a covey and which way they would fly.

In shooting quail you must not get between them and their habitual
cover, once the dogs have found them, or when they flush they will come
pouring at you, some rising steep, some skimming by your ears, whirring
into a size you have never seen them in the air as they pass, the only
way being to turn and take them over your shoulder as they go, before
they set their wings and angle down into the thicket. Hunting this
country for quail as his father had taught him, Nicholas Adams started
thinking about his father. When he first thought about him it was always
the eyes. The big frame, the quick movements, the wide shoulders, the
hooked, hawk nose, the beard that covered the weak chin, you never
thought about--it was always the eyes. They were protected in his head
by the formation of the brows; set deep as though a special protection
had been devised for some very valuable instrument. They saw much
farther and much quicker than the human eye sees and they were the great
gift his father had. His father saw as a big-horn ram or as an eagle
sees, literally.

He would be standing with his father on one shore of the lake, his own
eyes were very good then, and his father would say, "They've run up the
flag." Nick could not see the flag or the flag pole. "There," his father
would say, "it's your sister Dorothy. She's got the flag up and she's
walking out onto the dock."

Nick would look across the lake and he could see the long wooded
shore-line, the higher timber behind, the point that guarded the bay,
the clear hills of the farm and the white of their cottage in the trees
but he could not see any flag pole, or any dock, only the white of the
beach and the curve of the shore.

"Can you see the sheep on the hillside toward the point?"

"Yes."

They were a whitish patch on the gray-green of the hill.

"I can count them," his father said.

Like all men with a faculty that surpasses human requirements, his
father was very nervous. Then, too, he was sentimental, and, like most
sentimental people, he was both cruel and abused. Also, he had much bad
luck, and it was not all of it his own. He had died in a trap that he
had helped only a little to set, and they had all betrayed him in their
various ways before he died. All sentimental people are betrayed so many
times. Nick could not write about him yet, although he would, later, but
the quail country made him remember him as he was when Nick was a boy
and he was very grateful to him for two things; fishing and shooting.
His father was as sound on those two things as he was unsound on sex,
for instance, and Nick was glad that it had been that way; for some one
has to give you your first gun or the opportunity to get it and use it,
and you have to live where there is game or fish if you are to learn
about them, and now, at thirty-eight, he loved to fish and to shoot
exactly as much as when he first had gone with his father. It was a
passion that had never slackened and he was very grateful to his father
for bringing him to know it.

While for the other, that his father was not sound about, all the
equipment you will ever have is provided and each man learns all there
is for him to know about it without advice; and it makes no difference
where you live. He remembered very clearly the only two pieces of
information his father had given him about that. Once when they were out
shooting together Nick shot a red squirrel out of a hemlock tree. The
squirrel fell, wounded, and when Nick picked him up bit the boy clean
through the ball of the thumb.

"The dirty little bugger," Nick said and smacked the squirrel's head
against the tree. "Look how he bit me."

His father looked and said, "Suck it out clean and put some iodine on
when you get home."

"The little bugger," Nick said.

"Do you know what a bugger is?" his father asked him.

"We call anything a bugger," Nick said.

"A bugger is a man who has intercourse with animals."

"Why?" Nick said.

"I don't know," his father said. "But it is a heinous crime."

Nick's imagination was both stirred and horrified by this and he thought
of various animals but none seemed attractive or practical and that was
the sum total of direct sexual knowledge bequeathed him by his father
except on one other subject. One morning he read in the paper that
Enrico Caruso had been arrested for mashing.

"What is mashing?"

"It is one of the most heinous of crimes," his father answered. Nick's
imagination pictured the great tenor doing something strange, bizarre,
and heinous with a potato masher to a beautiful lady who looked like the
pictures of Anna Held on the inside of cigar boxes. He resolved, with
considerable horror, that when he was old enough he would try mashing at
least once.

His father had summed up the whole matter by stating that masturbation
produced blindness, insanity, and death, while a man who went with
prostitutes would contract hideous venereal diseases and that the thing
to do was to keep your hands off of people. On the other hand his father
had the finest pair of eyes he had ever seen and Nick had loved him very
much and for a long time. Now, knowing how it had all been, even
remembering the earliest times before things had gone badly was not good
remembering. If he wrote it he could get rid of it. He had gotten rid of
many things by writing them. But it was still too early for that. There
were still too many people. So he decided to think of something else.
There was nothing to do about his father and he had thought it all
through many times. The handsome job the undertaker had done on his
father's face had not blurred in his mind and all the rest of it was
quite clear, including the responsibilities. He had complimented the
undertaker. The undertaker had been both proud and smugly pleased. But
it was not the undertaker that had given him that last face. The
undertaker had only made certain dashingly executed repairs of doubtful
artistic merit. The face had been making itself and being made for a
long time. It had modelled fast in the last three years. It was a good
story but there were still too many people alive for him to write it.

Nick's own education in those earlier matters had been acquired in the
hemlock woods behind the Indian camp. This was reached by a trail which
ran from the cottage through the woods to the farm and then by a road
which wound through the slashings to the camp. Now he could still feel
all of that trail with bare feet. First there was the pine needle loam
through the hemlock woods behind the cottage where the fallen logs
crumbled into wood dust and long splintered pieces of wood hung like
javelins in the tree that had been struck by lightning. You crossed the
creek on a log and if you stepped off there was the black muck of the
swamp. You climbed a fence out of the woods and the trail was hard in
the sun across the field with cropped grass and sheep sorrel and mullen
growing and to the left the quaky bog of the creek bottom where the
killdeer plover fed. The spring house was in that creek. Below the barn
there was fresh warm manure and the other older manure that was caked
dry on top. Then there was another fence and the hard, hot trail from
the barn to the house and the hot sandy road that ran down to the woods,
crossing the creek, on a bridge this time, where the cat-tails grew that
you soaked in kerosene to make jack-lights with for spearing fish at
night.

Then the main road went off to the left, skirting the woods and climbing
the hill, while you went into the woods on the wide clay and shale road,
cool under the trees, and broadened for them to skid out the hemlock
bark the Indians cut. The hemlock bark was piled in long rows of stacks,
roofed over with more bark, like houses, and the peeled logs lay huge
and yellow where the trees had been felled. They left the logs in the
woods to rot, they did not even clear away or burn the tops. It was only
the bark they wanted for the tannery at Boyne City; hauling it across
the lake on the ice in winter, and each year there was less forest and
more open, hot, shadeless, weed-grown slashing.

But there was still much forest then, virgin forest where the trees grew
high before there were any branches and you walked on the brown, clean,
springy-needled ground with no undergrowth and it was cool on the
hottest days and they three lay against the trunk of a hemlock wider
than two beds are long, with the breeze high in the tops and the cool
light that came in patches, and Billy said:

"You want Trudy again?"

"You want to?"

"Un Huh."

"Come on."

"No, here."

"But Billy----"

"I no mind Billy. He my brother."

                 *        *        *        *        *

Then afterwards they sat, the three of them, listening for a black
squirrel that was in the top branches where they could not see him. They
were waiting for him to bark again because when he barked he would jerk
his tail and Nick would shoot where he saw any movement. His father gave
him only three cartridges a day to hunt with and he had a single-barrel
twenty-gauge shotgun with a very long barrel.

"Son of a bitch never move," Billy said.

"You shoot, Nickie. Scare him. We see him jump. Shoot him again," Trudy
said. It was a long speech for her.

"I've only got two shells," Nick said.

"Son of a bitch," said Billy.

They sat against the tree and were quiet. Nick was feeling hollow and
happy.

"Eddie says he going to come some night sleep in bed with you sister
Dorothy."

"What?"

"He said."

Trudy nodded.

"That's all he want do," she said. Eddie was their older half-brother.
He was seventeen.

"If Eddie Gilby ever comes at night and even speaks to Dorothy you know
what I'd do to him? I'd kill him like this." Nick cocked the gun and
hardly taking aim pulled the trigger, blowing a hole as big as your hand
in the head or belly of that half-breed bastard Eddie Gilby. "Like that.
I'd kill him like that."

"He better not come then," Trudy said. She put her hand in Nick's
pocket.

"He better watch out plenty," said Billy.

"He's big bluff," Trudy was exploring with her hand in Nick's pocket.
"But don't you kill him. You get plenty trouble."

"I'd kill him like that," Nick said. Eddie Gilby lay on the ground with
all his chest shot away. Nick put his foot on him proudly.

"I'd scalp him," he said happily.

"No," said Trudy. "That's dirty."

"I'd scalp him and send it to his mother."

"His mother dead," Trudy said. "Don't you kill him, Nickie. Don't you
kill him for me."

"After I scalped him I'd throw him to the dogs."

Billy was very depressed. "He better watch out," he said gloomily.

"They'd tear him to pieces," Nick said, pleased with the picture. Then,
having scalped that half-breed renegade and standing, watching the dogs
tear him, his face unchanging, he fell backward against the tree, held
tight around the neck, Trudy holding, choking him, and crying, "No kill
him! No kill him! No kill him! No. No. No. Nickie. Nickie. Nickie!"

"What's the matter with you?"

"No kill him."

"I got to kill him."

"He just a big bluff."

"All right," Nickie said. "I won't kill him unless he comes around the
house. Let go of me."

"That's good," Trudy said. "You want to do anything now? I feel good
now."

"If Billy goes away." Nick had killed Eddie Gilby, then pardoned him his
life, and he was a man now.

"You go, Billy. You hang around all the time. Go on."

"Son a bitch," Billy said. "I get tired this. What we come? Hunt or
what?"

"You can take the gun. There's one shell."

"All right. I get a big black one all right."

"I'll holler," Nick said.

                 *        *        *        *        *

Then, later, it was a long time after and Billy was still away.

"You think we make a baby?" Trudy folded her brown legs together happily
and rubbed against him. Something inside Nick had gone a long way away.

"I don't think so," he said.

"Make plenty baby what the hell."

They heard Billy shoot.

"I wonder if he got one."

"Don't care," said Trudy.

Billy came through the trees. He had the gun over his shoulder and he
held a black squirrel by the front paws.

"Look," he said. "Bigger than a cat. You all through?"

"Where'd you get him?"

"Over there. Saw him jump first."

"Got to go home," Nick said.

"No," said Trudy.

"I got to get there for supper."

"All right."

"Want to hunt tomorrow?"

"All right."

"You can have the squirrel."

"All right."

"Come out after supper?"

"No."

"How you feel?"

"Good."

"All right."

"Give me kiss on the face," said Trudy.

Now, as he rode along the highway in the car and it was getting dark,
Nick was all through thinking about his father. The end of the day never
made him think of him. The end of the day had always belonged to Nick
alone and he never felt right unless he was alone at it. His father came
back to him in the fall of the year, or in the early spring when there
had been jack-snipe on the prairie, or when he saw shocks of corn, or
when he saw a lake, or if he ever saw a horse and buggy, or when he saw,
or heard, wild geese, or in a duck blind; remembering the time an eagle
dropped through the whirling snow to strike a canvas-covered decoy,
rising, his wings beating, the talons caught in the canvas. His father
was with him, suddenly, in deserted orchards and in new-plowed fields,
in thickets, on small hills, or when going through dead grass, whenever
splitting wood or hauling water, by grist mills, cider mills and dams
and always with open fires. The towns he lived in were not towns his
father knew. After he was fifteen he had shared nothing with him.

His father had frost in his beard in cold weather and in hot weather he
sweated very much. He liked to work in the sun on the farm because he
did not have to and he loved manual work, which Nick did not. Nick loved
his father but hated the smell of him and once when he had to wear a
suit of his father's underwear that had gotten too small for his father
it made him feel sick and he took it off and put it under two stones in
the creek and said that he had lost it. He had told his father how it
was when his father had made him put it on but his father had said it
was freshly washed. It had been, too. When Nick had asked him to smell
of it his father sniffed at it indignantly and said that it was clean
and fresh. When Nick came home from fishing without it and said he lost
it he was whipped for lying.

Afterwards he had sat inside the woodshed with the door open, his
shotgun loaded and cocked, looking across at his father sitting on the
screen porch reading the paper, and thought, "I can blow him to hell. I
can kill him." Finally he felt his anger go out of him and he felt a
little sick about it being the gun that his father had given him. Then
he had gone to the Indian camp, walking there in the dark, to get rid of
the smell. There was only one person in his family that he liked the
smell of; one sister. All the others he avoided all contact with. That
sense blunted when he started to smoke. It was a good thing. It was good
for a bird dog but it did not help a man.

"What was it like, Papa, when you were a little boy and used to hunt
with the Indians?"

"I don't know," Nick was startled. He had not even noticed the boy was
awake. He looked at him sitting beside him on the seat. He had felt
quite alone but this boy had been with him. He wondered for how long.
"We used to go all day to hunt black squirrels," he said. "My father
only gave me three shells a day because he said that would teach me to
hunt and it wasn't good for a boy to go banging around. I went with a
boy named Billy Gilby and his sister Trudy. We used to go out nearly
every day all one summer."

"Those are funny names for Indians."

"Yes, aren't they," Nick said.

"But tell me what they were like."

"They were Ojibways," Nick said. "And they were very nice."

"But what were they like to be with?"

"It's hard to say," Nick Adams said. Could you say she did first what no
one has ever done better and mention plump brown legs, flat belly, hard
little breasts, well holding arms, quick searching tongue, the flat
eyes, the good taste of mouth, then uncomfortably, tightly, sweetly,
moistly, lovely, tightly, achingly, fully, finally, unendingly,
never-endingly, never-to-endingly, suddenly ended, the great bird flown
like an owl in the twilight, only it daylight in the woods and hemlock
needles stuck against your belly. So that when you go in a place where
Indians have lived you smell them gone and all the empty pain killer
bottles and the flies that buzz do not kill the sweetgrass smell, the
smoke smell and that other like a fresh cased marten skin. Nor any jokes
about them nor old squaws take that away. Nor the sick sweet smell they
get to have. Nor what they did finally. It wasn't how they ended. They
all ended the same. Long time ago good. Now no good.

And about the other. When you have shot one bird flying you have shot
all birds flying. They are all different and they fly in different ways
but the sensation is the same and the last one is as good as the first.
He could thank his father for that.

"You might not like them," Nick said to the boy. "But I think you
would."

"And my grandfather lived with them too when he was a boy, didn't he?"

"Yes. When I asked him what they were like he said that he had many
friends among them."

"Will I ever live with them?"

"I don't know," Nick said. "That's up to you."

"How old will I be when I get a shotgun and can hunt by myself."

"Twelve years old if I see you are careful."

"I wish I was twelve now."

"You will be, soon enough."

"What was my grandfather like? I can't remember him except that he gave
me an air rifle and an American flag when I came over from France that
time. What was he like?"

"He's hard to describe. He was a great hunter and fisherman and he had
wonderful eyes."

"Was he greater than you?"

"He was a much better shot and his father was a great wing shot too."

"I'll bet he wasn't better than you."

"Oh, yes he was. He shot very quickly and beautifully. I'd rather see
him shoot than any man I ever knew. He was always very disappointed in
the way I shot."

"Why do we never go to pray at the tomb of my grandfather?"

"We live in a different part of the country. It's a long way from here."

"In France that wouldn't make any difference. In France we'd go. I think
I ought to go to pray at the tomb of my grandfather."

"Sometime we'll go."

"I hope we won't live somewhere so that I can never go to pray at your
tomb when you are dead."

"We'll have to arrange it."

"Don't you think we might all be buried at a convenient place? We could
all be buried in France. That would be fine."

"I don't want to be buried in France," Nick said.

"Well, then, we'll have to get some convenient place in America.
Couldn't we all be buried out at the ranch?"

"That's an idea."

"Then I could stop and pray at the tomb of my grandfather on the way to
the ranch."

"You're awfully practical."

"Well, I don't feel good never to have even visited the tomb of my
grandfather."

"We'll have to go," Nick said. "I can see we'll have to go."
We were sitting in the blind that Wanderobo hunters had built of twigs
and branches at the edge of the salt-lick when we heard the motor-lorry
coming. At first it was far away and no one could tell what the noise
was. Then it was stopped and we hoped it had been nothing or perhaps
only the wind. Then it moved slowly nearer, unmistakable now, louder and
louder until, agonizing in a clank of loud irregular explosions, it
passed close behind us to go on up the road. The theatrical one of the
two trackers stood up.

'It is finished,' he said.

I put my hand to my mouth and motioned him down.

'It is finished,' he said again and spread his arms wide. I had never
liked him and I liked him less now.

'After,' I whispered. M'Cola shook his head. I looked at his bald black
skull and he turned his face a little so that I saw the thin Chinese
hairs at the corners of his mouth.

'No good,' he said. '_Hapana m'uzuri._'

'Wait a little,' I told him. He bent his head down again so that it
would not show above the dead branches and we sat there in the dust of
the hole until it was too dark to see the front sight on my rifle; but
nothing more came. The theatrical tracker was impatient and restless. A
little before the last of the light was gone he whispered to M'Cola that
it was now too dark to shoot.

'Shut up, you,' M'Cola told him. 'The Bwana can shoot after you cannot
see.'

The other tracker, the educated one, gave another demonstration of his
education by scratching his name, Abdullah, on the black skin of his leg
with a sharp twig. I watched without admiration and M'Cola looked at the
word without a shadow of expression on his face. After a while the
tracker scratched it out.

Finally I made a last sight against what was left of the light and saw
it was no use, even with the large aperture.

M'Cola was watching.

'No good,' I said.

'Yes,' he agreed, in Swahili. 'Go to camp?'

'Yes.'

We stood up and made our way out of the blind and out through the trees,
walking on the sandy loam, feeling our way between trees and under
branches, back to the road. A mile along the road was the car. As we
came alongside, Kamau, the driver, put the lights on.

The lorry had spoiled it. That afternoon we had left the car up the road
and approached the salt-lick very carefully. There had been a little
rain, the day before, though not enough to flood the lick, which was
simply an opening in the trees with a patch of earth worn into deep
circles and grooved at the edges with hollows where the animals had
licked the dirt for salt, and we had seen long, heart-shaped, fresh
tracks of four greater kudu bulls that had been on the salt the night
before, as well as many newly pressed tracks of lesser kudu. There was
also a rhino who, from the tracks and the kicked-up mound of strawy
dung, came there each night. The blind had been built at close
arrow-shot of the lick, and sitting, leaning back, knees high, heads
low, in a hollow half full of ashes and dust, watching through the dried
leaves and thin branches I had seen a lesser kudu bull come out of the
brush to the edge of the opening where the salt was and stand there,
heavy-necked, grey, and handsome, the horns spiralled against the sun
while I sighted on his chest and then refused the shot, wanting not to
frighten the greater kudu that should surely come at dusk. But before we
ever heard the lorry the bull had heard it and run off into the trees,
and everything else that had been moving, in the bush on the flats, or
coming down from the small hills through the trees, coming toward the
salt, had halted at that exploding, clanking sound. They would come,
later, in the dark; but then it would be too late.

So now, going along the sandy track of the road in the car, the lights
picking out the eyes of night birds that squatted close on the sand
until the bulk of the car was on them and they rose in soft panic;
passing the fires of the travellers that all moved to the westward by
day along this road, abandoning the famine country that was ahead of us;
me sitting, the butt of my rifle on my foot, the barrel in the crook of
my left arm, a flask of whisky between my knees, pouring the whisky into
a tin cup and passing it over my shoulder in the dark for M'Cola to pour
water into it from the canteen, drinking this, the first one of the
day, the finest one there is, and looking at the thick bush we passed in
the dark, feeling the cool wind of the night and smelling the good smell
of Africa, I was altogether happy.

Then ahead we saw a big fire and as we came up and passed, I made out a
lorry beside the road. I told Kamau to stop and go back and as we backed
into the firelight there was a short, bandy-legged man with a Tyrolese
hat, leather shorts, and an open shirt standing before an unhooded
engine in a crowd of natives.

'Can we help?' I asked him.

'No,' he said. 'Unless you are a mechanic. It has taken a dislike to me.
All engines dislike me.'

'Do you think it could be the timer? It sounded as though it might be a
timing knock when you went past us.'

'I think it is much worse than that. It sounds to be something very
bad.'

'If you can get to our camp we have a mechanic.'

'How far is it?'

'About twenty miles.'

'In the morning I will try it. Now I am afraid to make it go farther
with that noise of death inside. It is trying to die because it dislikes
me. Well, I dislike it too. But if I die it would not annoy it.'

'Will you have a drink?' I held out the flask. 'Hemingway is my name.'

'Kandisky,' he said and bowed. 'Hemingway is a name I have heard. Where?
Where have I heard it? Oh, yes. The _dichter_. You know Hemingway the
poet?'

'Where did you read him?'

'In the _Querschnitt_.'

'That is me,' I said, very pleased. The _Querschnitt_ was a German
magazine I had written some rather obscene poems for, and published a
long story in, years before I could sell anything in America.

'This is very strange,' the man in the Tyrolese hat said. 'Tell me, what
do you think of Ringelnatz?'

'He is splendid.'

'So. You like Ringelnatz. Good. What do you think of Heinrich Mann?'

'He is no good.'

'You believe it?'

'All I know is that I cannot read him.'

'He is no good at all. I see we have things in common. What are you
doing here?'

'Shooting.'

'Not ivory, I hope.'

'No. For kudu.'

'Why should any man shoot a kudu? You, an intelligent man, a poet, to
shoot kudu.'

'I haven't shot any yet,' I said. 'But we've been hunting them hard now
for ten days. We would have got one to-night if it hadn't been for your
lorry.'

'That poor lorry. But you should hunt for a year. At the end of that
time you have shot everything and you are sorry for it. To hunt for one
special animal is nonsense. Why do you do it?'

'I like to do it.'

'Of course, if you _like_ to do it. Tell me, what do you really think of
Rilke?'

'I have read only the one thing.'

'Which?'

'The Cornet.'

'You liked it?'

'Yes.'

'I have no patience with it. It is snobbery. Valéry, yes. I see the
point of Valéry; although there is much snobbery too. Well at least you
do not kill elephants.'

'I'd kill a big enough one.'

'How big?'

'A seventy-pounder. Maybe smaller.'

'I see there are things we do not agree on. But it is a pleasure to meet
one of the great old _Querschnitt_ group. Tell me what is Joyce like? I
have not the money to buy it. Sinclair Lewis is nothing. I bought it.
No. No. Tell me to-morrow. You do not mind if I am camped near? You are
with friends? You have a white hunter?'

'With my wife. We would be delighted. Yes, a white hunter.'

'Why is he not out with you?'

'He believes you should hunt kudu alone.'

'It is better not to hunt them at all. What is he? English?'

'Yes.'

'Bloody English?'

'No. Very nice. You will like him.'

'You must go. I must not keep you. Perhaps I will see you to-morrow. It
was very strange that we should meet.'

'Yes,' I said. 'Have them look at the lorry to-morrow. Anything we can
do?'

'Good night,' he said. 'Good trip.'

'Good night,' I said. We started off and I saw him walking toward the
fire waving an arm at the natives. I had not asked him why he had twenty
up-country natives with him, nor where he was going. Looking back, I had
asked him nothing. I do not like to ask questions, and where I was
brought up it was not polite. But here we had not seen a white man for
two weeks, not since we had left Babati to go south, and then to run
into one on this road where you met only an occasional Indian trader and
the steady migration of the natives out of the famine country, to have
him look like a caricature of Benchley in Tyrolean costume, to have him
know your name, to call you a poet, to have read the _Querschnitt_, to
be an admirer of Joachim Ringelnatz and to want to talk about Rilke, was
too fantastic to deal with. So, just then, to crown this fantasy, the
lights of the car showed three tall, conical, mounds of something
smoking in the road ahead. I motioned to Kamau to stop, and putting on
the brakes we skidded just short of them. They were from two to three
feet high and when I touched one it was quite warm.

'_Tembo_,' M'Cola said.

It was dung from elephants that had just crossed the road, and in the
cold of the evening you could see it steaming. In a little while we were
in camp.

Next morning I was up and away to another salt-lick before daylight.
There was a kudu bull on the lick when we approached through the trees
and he gave a loud bark, like a dog's but higher in pitch and sharply
throaty, and was gone, making no noise at first, then crashing in the
brush when he was well away; and we never saw him. This lick had an
impossible approach. Trees grew around its open area so that it was as
though the game were in the blind and you had to come to them across the
open. The only way to make it would have been for one man to go alone
and crawl and then it would be impossible to get any sort of a close
shot through the interlacing trees until you were within twenty yards.
Of course once you were inside the protecting trees, and in the blind,
you were wonderfully placed, for anything that came to the salt had to
come out in the open twenty-five yards from any cover. But though we
stayed until eleven o'clock nothing came. We smoothed the dust of the
lick carefully with our feet so that any new tracks would show when we
came back again and walked the two miles to the road. Being hunted, the
game had learned to come only at night and leave before daylight. One
bull had stayed and our spooking him that morning would make it even
more difficult now.

This was the tenth day we had been hunting greater kudu and I had not
seen a mature bull yet. We had only three days more because the rains
were moving north each day from Rhodesia and unless we were prepared to
stay where we were through the rains we must be out as far as Handeni
before they came. We had set February 17th as the last safe date to
leave. Every morning now it took the heavy, woolly sky an hour or so
longer to clear and you could feel the rains coming, as they moved
steadily north, as surely as though you watched them on a chart.

Now it is pleasant to hunt something that you want very much over a long
period of time, being outwitted, out-manoeuvred, and failing at the end
of each day, but having the hunt and knowing every time you are out
that, sooner or later, your luck will change and that you will get the
chance that you are seeking. But it is not pleasant to have a time limit
by which you must get your kudu or perhaps never get it, nor even see
one. It is not the way hunting should be. It is too much like those boys
who used to be sent to Paris with two years in which to make good as
writers or painters, after which, if they had not made good, they could
go home and into their fathers' businesses. The way to hunt is for as
long as you live against as long as there is such and such an animal;
just as the way to paint is as long as there is you and colours and
canvas, and to write as long as you can live and there is pencil and
paper or ink or any machine to do it with, or anything you care to write
about, and you feel a fool, and you are a fool, to do it any other way.
But here we were, now, caught by time, by the season, and by the running
out of our money, so that what should have been as much fun to do each
day whether you killed or not was being forced into that most exciting
perversion of life; the necessity of accomplishing something in less
time than should truly be allowed for its doing. So, coming in at noon,
up since two hours before daylight, with only three days left, I was
starting to be nervous about it, and there, at the table under the
dining tent fly, talking away, was Kandisky of the Tyrolese pants. I had
forgotten all about him.

'Hello. Hello,' he said. 'No success? Nothing doing? Where is the kudu?'

'He coughed once and went away,' I said. 'Hello, girl.'

She smiled. She was worried too. The two of them had been listening
since daylight for a shot. Listening all the time, even when our guest
had arrived; listening while writing letters, listening while reading,
listening when Kandisky came back and talked.

'You did not shoot him?'

'No. Nor see him.' I saw that Pop was worried too, and a little nervous.
There had evidently been considerable talking going on.

'Have a beer, Colonel,' he said to me.

'We spooked one,' I reported. 'No chance of a shot. There were plenty of
tracks. Nothing more came. The wind was blowing around. Ask the boys
about it.'

'As I was telling Colonel Phillips,' Kandisky began, shifting his
leather-breeched behind and crossing one heavy-calved, well-haired, bare
leg over the other, 'you must not stay here too long. You must realize
the rains are coming. There is one stretch of twelve miles beyond here
you can never get through if it rains. It is impossible.'

'So he's been telling me,' Pop said. 'I'm a Mister, by the way. We use
these military titles as nicknames. No offence if you're a colonel
yourself.' Then to me, 'Damn these salt-licks. If you'd leave them
alone you'd get one.'

'They ball it all up,' I agreed. 'You're so sure of a shot sooner or
later on the lick.'

'Hunt the hills too.'

'I'll hunt them, Pop.'

'What is killing a kudu, anyway?' Kandisky asked. 'You should not take
it so seriously. It is nothing. In a year you kill twenty.'

'Best not say anything about that to the game department, though,' Pop
said.

'You misunderstand,' Kandisky said. 'I mean in a year a man could. Of
course no man would wish to.'

'Absolutely,' Pop said. 'If he lived in kudu country, he could. They're
the commonest big antelope in this bush country. It's just that when you
want to see them you don't.'

'I kill nothing, you understand,' Kandisky told us. 'Why are you not
more interested in the natives?'

'We are,' my wife assured him.

'They are really interesting. Listen ...' Kandisky said, and he spoke on
to her.

'The hell of it is,' I said to Pop, 'when I'm in the hills I'm sure the
bastards are down there on the salt. The cows are in the hills but I
don't believe the bulls are with them now. Then you get there in the
evening and there are the tracks. They _have_ been on the lousy salt. I
think they come any time.'

'Probably they do.'

'I'm sure we get different bulls there. They probably only come to the
salt every couple of days. Some are certainly spooked because Karl shot
that one. If he'd only killed it clean instead of following it through
the whole damn countryside. Christ, if he'd only kill any damn thing
clean. Other new ones will come in. All we have to do is to wait them
out, though. Of course they can't all know about it. But he's spooked
this country to hell.'

'He gets so very excited,' Pop said. 'But he's a good lad. He made a
beautiful shot on that leopard, you know. You don't want them killed any
cleaner than that. Let it quiet down again.'

'Sure. I don't mean anything when I curse him.'

'What about staying in the blind all day?'

'The damned wind started to go round in a circle. It blew our scent
every direction. No use to sit there broadcasting it. If the damn wind
would hold. Abdullah took an ash can to-day.'

'I saw him starting off with it.'

There wasn't a bit of wind when we stalked the salt and there was just
light to shoot. He tried the wind with the ashes all the way. I went
alone with Abdullah and left the others behind and we went quietly. I
had on these crêpe-soled boots and it's soft cotton dirt. The bastard
spooked at fifty yards.

'Did you ever see their ears?'

'Did I ever see their ears? If I can see his ears, the skinner can work
on him.'

'They're bastards,' Pop said. 'I hate this salt-lick business. They're
not as smart as we think. The trouble is you're working on them where
they are smart. They've been shot at there ever since there's been
salt.'

'That's what makes it fun,' I said. 'I'd be glad to do it for a month. I
like to hunt sitting on my tail. No sweat. No nothing. Sit there and
catch flies and feed them to the ant lions in the dust. I like it. But
what about the time?'

'That's it. The time.'

'So,' Kandisky was saying to my wife. 'That is what you should see. The
big _ngomas_. The big native dance festivals. The real ones.'

'Listen,' I said to Pop. 'The other lick, the one I was at last night,
is fool-proof except for being near that _bloody_ road.'

'The trackers say it is really the property of the lesser kudu. It's a
long way too. It's eighty miles there and back.'

'I know. But there were four _big_ bull tracks. It's certain. If it
wasn't for that lorry last night. What about staying there to-night!
Then I'd get the night and the early morning and give this lick a rest.
There's a big rhino there too. Big track, anyway.'

'Good,' Pop said. 'Shoot the rhino too.' He hated to have anything
killed except what we were after, no killing on the side, no ornamental
killing, no killing to kill, only when you wanted it more than you
wanted not to kill it, only when getting it was necessary to his being
first in his trade, and I saw he was offering up the rhino to please me.

'I won't kill him unless he's good,' I promised.

'Shoot the bastard,' Pop said, making a gift of him.

'Ah, Pop,' I said.

'Shoot him,' said Pop. 'You'll enjoy it, being by yourself. You can sell
the horn if you don't want it. You've still one on your licence.'

'So,' said Kandisky. 'You have arranged a plan of campaign? You have
decided on how to outwit the poor animals?'

'Yes,' I said. 'How is the lorry?'

'That lorry is finished,' the Austrian said. 'In a way I am glad. It was
too much of a symbol. It was all that remained of my _shamba_. Now
everything is gone and it is much simpler.'

'What is a shamba?' asked P.O.M., my wife. 'I've been hearing about them
for months. I'm afraid to ask about those words every one uses.'

'A plantation,' he said. 'It is all gone except that lorry. With the
lorry I carry labourers to the shamba of an Indian. It is a very rich
Indian who raises sisal. I am a manager for this Indian. An Indian can
make a profit from a sisal shamba.'

'From anything,' Pop said.

'Yes. Where we fail, where we would starve, he makes money. This Indian
is very intelligent, however. He values me. I represent European
organization. I come now from organizing recruitment of the natives.
This takes time. It is impressive. I have been away from my family for
three months. The organization is organized. You do it in a week as
easily, but it is not so impressive.'

'And your wife?' asked mine.

'She waits at my house, the house of the manager, with my daughter.'

'Does she love you very much?' my wife asked.

'She must, or she would be gone long ago.'

'How old is the daughter?'

'She is thirteen now.'

'It must be very nice to have a daughter.'

'You cannot know how nice it is. It is like a second wife. My wife knows
now all I think, all I say, all I believe, all I can do, all that I
cannot do and cannot be. I know also about my wife--completely. But now
there is always someone you do not know, who does not know you, who
loves you in ignorance and is strange to you both. Some one very
attractive that is yours and not yours and that makes the conversation
more--how shall I say? Yes, it is like--what do you call--having here
with you--with the two of you--yes there--it is the Heinz Tomato Ketchup
on the daily food.'

'That's very good,' I said.

'We have books,' he said. 'I cannot buy new books now but we can always
talk. Ideas and conversation are very interesting. We discuss all
things. Everything. We have a very interesting mental life. Formerly,
with the shamba, we had the _Querschnitt_. That gave you a feeling of
belonging, of being made a part of, to a very brilliant group of people.
The people one would see if one saw whom one wished to see. You know all
of those people? You must know them.'

'Some of them.' I said. 'Some in Paris. Some in Berlin.'

I did not wish to destroy anything this man had, and so I did not go
into those brilliant people in detail.

'They're marvellous,' I said, lying.

'I envy you to know them,' he said. 'And tell me, who is the greatest
writer in America?'

'My husband,' said my wife.

'No. I do not mean for you to speak from family pride. I mean who
really? Certainly not Upton Sinclair. Certainly not Sinclair Lewis. Who
is your Thomas Mann? Who is your Valéry?'

'We do not have great writers,' I said. 'Something happens to our good
writers at a certain age. I can explain but it is quite long and may
bore you.'

'Please explain,' he said. 'This is what I enjoy. This is the best part
of life. The life of the mind. This is not killing kudu.'

'You haven't heard it yet,' I said.

'Ah, but I can see it coming. You must take more beer to loosen your
tongue.'

'It's loose,' I told him. 'It's always too loose. But _you_ don't drink
anything.'

'No, I never drink. It is not good for the mind. It is unnecessary. But
tell me. Please tell me.'

'Well,' I said, 'we have had, in America, skilful writers. Poe is a
skilful writer. It is skilful, marvellously constructed, and it is dead.
We have had writers of rhetoric who had the good fortune to find a
little, in a chronicle of another man and from voyaging, of how things,
actual things, can be, whales for instance, and this knowledge is
wrapped in the rhetoric like plums in a pudding. Occasionally it is
there, alone, unwrapped in pudding, and it is good. This is Melville.
But the people who praise it, praise it for the rhetoric which is not
important. They put a mystery in which is not there.'

'Yes,' he said. 'I see. But it is the mind working, its ability to work,
which makes the rhetoric. Rhetoric is the blue sparks from the dynamo.'

'Sometimes. And sometimes it is only blue sparks, and what is the dynamo
driving?'

'So. Go on.'

'I've forgotten.'

'No. Go on. Do not pretend to be stupid.'

'Did you ever get up before daylight ...'

'Every morning,' he said. 'Go on.'

'All right. There were others who wrote like exiled English colonials
from an England of which they were never a part to a newer England that
they were making. Very good men with the small, dried, and excellent
wisdom of Unitarians; men of letters; Quakers with a sense of humour.'

'Who were these?'

'Emerson, Hawthorne, Whittier, and Company. All our early classics who
did not know that a new classic does not bear any resemblance to the
classics that have preceded it. It can steal from anything that it is
better than, anything that is not a classic, all classics do that. Some
writers are only born to help another writer to write one sentence. But
it cannot derive from or resemble a previous classic. Also all these men
were gentlemen, or wished to be. They were all very respectable. They
did not use the words that people always have used in speech, the words
that survive in language. Nor would you gather that they had bodies.
They had minds, yes. Nice, dry, clean minds. This is all very dull, I
would not state it except that you ask for it.'

'Go on.'

'There is one at that time that is supposed to be really good. Thoreau.
I cannot tell you about it because I have not yet been able to read it.
But that means nothing because I cannot read other naturalists unless
they are being extremely accurate and not literary. Naturalists should
all work alone and some one else should correlate their findings for
them. Writers should work alone. They should see each other only after
their work is done, and not too often then. Otherwise they become like
writers in New York. All angleworms in a bottle, trying to derive
knowledge and nourishment from their own contact and from the bottle.
Sometimes the bottle is shaped art, sometimes economics, sometimes
economic-religion. But once they are in the bottle they stay there. They
are lonesome outside of the bottle. They do not want to be lonesome.
They are afraid to be alone in their beliefs and no woman would love any
of them enough so that they could kill their lonesomeness in that woman,
or pool it with hers, or make something with her that makes the rest
unimportant.'

'But what about Thoreau?'

'You'll have to read him. Maybe I'll be able to later. I can do nearly
everything later.'

'Better have some more beer, Papa.'

'All right.'

'What about the good writers?'

'The good writers are Henry James, Stephen Crane, and Mark Twain. That's
not the order they're good in. There is no order for good writers.'

'Mark Twain is a humorist. The others I do not know.'

'All modern American literature comes from one book by Mark Twain called
_Huckleberry Finn_. If you read it you must stop where the Nigger Jim is
stolen from the boys. That is the real end. The rest is just cheating.
But it's the best book we've had. All American writing comes from that.
There was nothing before. There has been nothing as good since.'

'What about the others?'

'Crane wrote two fine stories. _The Open Boat_ and _The Blue Hotel_. The
last one is the better.'

'And what happened to him?'

'He died. That's simple. He was dying from the start.'

'But the other two?'

'They both lived to be old men but they did not get any wiser as they
got older. I don't know what they really wanted. You see we make our
writers into something very strange.'

'I do not understand.'

'We destroy them in many ways. First, economically. They make money. It
is only by hazard that a writer makes money although good books always
make money eventually. Then our writers when they have made some money
increase their standard of living and they are caught. They have to
write to keep up their establishments, their wives, and so on, and they
write slop. It is slop not on purpose but because it is hurried.
Because they write when there is nothing to say or no water in the well.
Because they are ambitious. Then, once they have betrayed themselves,
they justify it and you get more slop. Or else they read the critics. If
they believe the critics when they say they are great then they must
believe them when they say they are rotten and they lose confidence. At
present we have two good writers who cannot write because they have lost
confidence through reading critics. If they wrote, sometimes it would be
good and sometimes not so good and sometimes it would be quite bad, but
the good would get out. But they have read the critics and they must
write masterpieces. The masterpieces the critics said they wrote. They
weren't masterpieces, of course. They were just quite good books. So now
they cannot write at all. The critics have made them impotent.'

'Who are these writers?'

'Their names would mean nothing to you and by now they may have written,
become frightened, and be impotent again.'

'But what is it that happens to American writers? Be definite.'

'I was not here in the old days so I cannot tell you about them, but now
there are various things. At a certain age the men writers change into
Old Mother Hubbard. The women writers become Joan of Arc without the
fighting. They become leaders. It doesn't matter who they lead. If they
do not have followers they invent them. It is useless for those selected
as followers to protest. They are accused of disloyalty. Oh, hell.
There are too many things happen to them. That is one thing. The others
try to save their souls with what they write. That is an easy way out.
Others are ruined by the first money, the first praise, the first
attack, the first time they find they cannot write, or the first time
they cannot do anything else, or else they get frightened and join
organizations that do their thinking for them. Or they do not know what
they want. Henry James wanted to make money. He never did, of course.'

'And you?'

'I am interested in other things. I have a good life but I must write
because if I do not write a certain amount I do not enjoy the rest of my
life.'

'And what do you want?'

'To write as well as I can and learn as I go along. At the same time I
have my life which I enjoy and which is a damned good life.'

'Hunting kudu?'

'Yes. Hunting kudu and many other things.'

'What other things?'

'Plenty of other things.'

'And you know what you want?'

'Yes.'

'You really like to do this, what you do now, this silliness of kudu?'

'Just as much as I like to be in the Prado.'

'One is not better than the other?'

'One is as necessary as the other. There are other things, too.'

'Naturally. There must be. But this sort of thing means something to
you, really?'

'Truly.'

'And you know what you want?'

'Absolutely, and I get it all the time.'

'But it takes money.'

'I could always make money, and besides I have been very lucky.'

'Then you are happy?'

'Except when I think of other people.'

'Then you think of other people?'

'Oh, yes.'

'But you do nothing for them?'

'No.'

'Nothing?'

'Maybe a little.'

'Do you think your writing is worth doing--as an end in itself?'

'Oh, yes.'

'You are sure?'

'Very sure.'

'That must be very pleasant.'

'It is,' I said. 'It is the one altogether pleasant thing about it.'

'This is getting awfully serious,' my wife said.

'It's a damned serious subject.'

'You see, he is really serious about something,' Kandisky said. 'I knew
he must be serious on something besides kudu.'

'The reason everyone now tries to avoid it, to deny that it is
important, to make it seem vain to try to do it, is because it is so
difficult. Too many factors must combine to make it possible.'

'What is this now?'

'The kind of writing that can be done. How far prose can be carried if
anyone is serious enough and has luck. There is a fourth and fifth
dimension that can be gotten.'

'You believe it?'

'I know it.'

'And if a writer can get this?'

'Then nothing else matters. It is more important than anything he can
do. The chances are, of course, that he will fail. But there is a chance
that he succeeds.'

'But that is poetry you are talking about.'

'No. It is much more difficult than poetry. It is a prose that has never
been written. But it can be written, without tricks and without
cheating. With nothing that will go bad afterwards.'

'And why has it not been written?'

'Because there are too many factors. First, there must be talent, much
talent. Talent such as Kipling had. Then there must be discipline. The
discipline of Flaubert. Then there must be the conception of what it can
be and an absolute conscience as unchanging as the standard meter in
Paris, to prevent faking. Then the writer must be intelligent and
disinterested and above all he must survive. Try to get all these in one
person and have him come through all the influences that press on a
writer. The hardest thing, because time is so short, is for him to
survive and get his work done. But I would like us to have such a writer
and to read what he would write. What do you say? Should we talk about
something else?'

'It is interesting what you say. Naturally I do not agree with
everything.'

'Naturally.'

'What about a gimlet?' Pop asked. 'Don't you think a gimlet might help?'

'Tell me first what are the things, the actual, concrete things that
harm a writer?'

I was tired of the conversation which was becoming an interview. So I
would make it an interview and finish it. The necessity to put a
thousand intangibles into a sentence, now, before lunch, was too bloody.

'Politics, women, drink, money, ambition. And the lack of politics,
women, drink, money and ambition,' I said profoundly.

'He's getting much too easy now,' Pop said.

'But drink. I do not understand about that. That has always seemed silly
to me. I understand it as a weakness.'

'It is a way of ending a day. It has great benefits. Don't you ever want
to change your ideas?'

'Let's have one,' Pop said. 'M'Wendi!'

Pop never drank before lunch except as a mistake and I knew he was
trying to help me out.

'Let's all have a gimlet,' I said.

'I never drink,' Kandisky said. 'I will go to the lorry and fetch some
fresh butter for lunch. It is fresh from Kandoa, unsalted. Very good.
To-night we will have a special dish of Viennese dessert. My cook has
learned to make it very well.'

He went off and my wife said: 'You were getting awfully profound. What
was that about all these women?'

'What women?'

'When you were talking about women.'

'The hell with them,' I said. 'Those are the ones you get involved with
when you're drunk.'

'So that's what you do.'

'No.'

'I don't get involved with people when I'm drunk.'

'Come, come,' said Pop. 'We're none of us ever drunk. My God, that man
can talk.'

'He didn't have a chance to talk after B'wana M'Kumba started.'

'I did have verbal dysentery,' I said.

'What about his lorry? Can we tow it in without ruining ours?'

'I think so,' Pop said. 'When ours comes back from Handeni.'

At lunch under the green fly of the dining-tent, in the shade of a big
tree, the wind blowing, the fresh butter much admired, Grant's gazelle
chops, mashed potatoes, green corn, and then mixed fruit for dessert,
Kandisky told us why the East Indians were taking the country over.

'You see, during the war they sent the Indian troops to fight here. To
keep them out of India because they feared another mutiny. They
promised the Aga Khan that because they fought in Africa, Indians could
come freely to settle and for business afterwards. They cannot break
that promise and now the Indians have taken the country over from the
Europeans. They live on nothing and they send all the money back to
India. When they have made enough to go home they leave, bringing out
their poor relations to take over from them and continue to exploit the
country.'

Pop said nothing. He would not argue with a guest at table.

'It is the Aga Khan,' Kandisky said. 'You are an American. You know
nothing of these combinations.'

'Were you with Von Lettöw?' Pop asked him.

'From the start,' Kandisky said. 'Until the end.'

'He was a great fighter,' Pop said. 'I have great admiration for him.'

'You fought?' Kandisky asked.

'Yes.'

'I do not care for Lettöw,' Kandisky said. 'He fought, yes. No one ever
better. When we wanted quinine he would order it captured. All supplies
the same. But afterwards he cared nothing for his men. After the war I
am in Germany. I go to see about indemnification for my property. "You
are an Austrian," they say. "You must go through Austrian channels." So
I go to Austria. "But why did you fight?" they ask me. "You cannot hold
us responsible. Suppose you go to fight in China. That is your own
affair. We cannot do anything for you."

'"But I went as a patriot," I say, very foolishly. "I fight where I can
because I am an Austrian and I know my duty." "Yes," they say. "That is
very beautiful. But you cannot hold us responsible for your noble
sentiments." So they passed me from one to the other and nothing. Still
I love the country very much. I have lost everything here but I have
more than anyone has in Europe. To me it is always interesting. The
natives and the language. I have many books of notes on them. Then too,
in reality, I am a king here. It is very pleasant. Waking in the morning
I extend one foot and the boy places the sock on it. When I am ready I
extend the other foot and he adjusts the other sock. I step from under
the mosquito bar into my drawers which are held for me. Don't you think
that is very marvellous?'

'It's marvellous.'

'When you come back another time we must take a safari to study the
natives. And shoot nothing, or only to eat. Look, I will show you a
dance and sing a song.'

Crouched, elbows lifting and falling, knees humping, he shuffled around
the table, singing. Undoubtedly it was very fine.

'That is only one of a thousand,' he said. 'Now I must go for a time.
You will be sleeping.'

'There's no hurry. Stay around.'

'No. Surely you will be sleeping. I also. I will take the butter to keep
it cool.'

'We'll see you at supper,' Pop said.

'Now you must sleep. Good-bye.'

After he was gone, Pop said: 'I wouldn't believe all that about the Aga
Khan, you know.'

'It sounded pretty good.'

'Of course he feels badly,' Pop said. 'Who wouldn't. Von Lettöw was a
hell of a man.'

'He's very intelligent,' my wife said. 'He talks wonderfully about the
natives. But he's bitter about American women.'

'So am I,' said Pop. 'He's a good man. You better get some shut-eye.
You'll need to start about three-thirty.'

'Have them call me.'

Molo raised the back of the tent, propping it with sticks, so the wind
blew through and I went to sleep reading, the wind coming in cool and
fresh under the heated canvas.

When I woke it was time to go. There were rain clouds in the sky and it
was very hot. They had packed some tinned fruit, a five-pound piece of
roast meat, bread, tea, a tea pot, and some tinned milk in a whisky box
with four bottles of beer. There was a canvas water bag and a ground
cloth to use as a tent. M'Cola was taking the big gun out to the car.

'There's no hurry about getting back,' Pop said. 'We'll look for you
when we see you.'

'All right.'

'We'll send the lorry to haul that sportsman into Handeni. He's sending
his men ahead walking.'

'You're sure the lorry can stand it? Don't do it because he's a friend
of mine.'

'Have to get him out. The lorry will be in to-night.'

'The Memsahib's still asleep,' I said. 'Maybe she can get out for a walk
and shoot some guineas?'

'I'm here,' she said. 'Don't worry about us. _Oh_, I hope you get them.'

'Don't send out to look for us along the road until day after
to-morrow,' I said. 'If there's a good chance we'll stay.'

'Good luck.'

'Good luck, sweet. Good-bye, Mr. J. P.'




CHAPTER TWO


We were out from under the shade of camp and along the sandy river of a
road, driving into the western sun, the bush thick to the edge of the
sand, solid as a thicket, the little hills rising above it, and all
along the road we passed groups of people making their way to the
westward. Some were naked except for a greasy cloth knotted over one
shoulder, and carried bows and sealed quivers of arrows. Others carried
spears. The wealthy carried umbrellas and wore draped white cloth and
their women walked behind them, with their pots and pans. Bundles and
loads of skins were scattered along ahead on the heads of other natives.
All were travelling away from the famine. And in the heat, my feet out
over the side of the car to keep them away from the heat of the engine,
hat low over the eyes against the sun, watching the road, the people,
and all clearings in the bush for game, we drove to the westward.

Once we saw three lesser kudu cows in an open place of broken bush.
Grey, big bellied, long necked, small headed, and with big ears, they
moved quickly into the woods and were gone. We left the car and tracked
them but there was no bull track.

A little beyond there a flock of guineas quick-legged across the road
running steady-headed with the motion of trotters. As I jumped from the
car and sprinted after them they rocketed up, their legs tucked close
beneath them, heavy-bodied, short wings drumming, cackling, to go over
the trees ahead. I dropped two that thumped hard when they fell and as
they lay, wings beating, Abdullah cut their heads off so they would be
legal eating. He put them in the car where M'Cola sat laughing; his old
man's healthy laugh, his making-fun-of-me laugh, his bird-shooting laugh
that dated from a streak of raging misses one time that had delighted
him. Now when I killed, it was a joke, as when we shot a hyena; the
funniest joke of all. He laughed always to see the birds tumble and when
I missed he roared and shook his head again and again.

'Ask him what the hell he's laughing about?' I asked Pop once.

'At B'wana,' M'Cola said, and shook his head, 'at the little birds.'

'He thinks you're funny,' Pop said.

'Goddam it. I am funny. But the hell with him.'

'He thinks you're very funny,' Pop said. 'Now the Memsahib and I would
never laugh.'

'Shoot them yourself.'

'No, you're the bird shot. The self-confessed bird shot,' she said.

So bird shooting became this marvellous joke. If I killed, the joke was
on the birds and M'Cola would shake his head and laugh and make his
hands go round and round to show how the bird turned over in the air.
And if I missed, I was the clown of the piece and he would look at me
and shake with laughing. Only the hyenas were funnier.

Highly humorous was the hyena obscenely loping, full belly dragging, at
daylight on the plain, who, shot from the stern, skittered on into speed
to tumble end over end. Mirth provoking was the hyena that stopped out
of range by an alkali lake to look back and, hit in the chest, went over
on his back, his four feet and his full belly in the air. Nothing could
be more jolly than the hyena coming suddenly wedge-headed and stinking
out of high grass by a _donga_, hit at ten yards, who raced his tail in
three narrowing, scampering circles until he died.

It was funny to M'Cola to see a hyena shot at close range. There was
that comic slap of the bullet and the hyena's agitated surprise to find
death inside of him. It was funnier to see a hyena shot at a great
distance, in the heat shimmer of the plain, to see him go over
backwards, to see him start that frantic circle, to see that electric
speed that meant that he was racing the little nickeled death inside
him. But the great joke of all, the thing M'Cola waved his hands across
his face about, and turned away and shook his head and laughed, ashamed
even of the hyena; the pinnacle of hyenic humour, was the hyena, the
classic hyena, that hit too far back while running, would circle madly,
snapping and tearing at himself until he pulled his own intestines out,
and then stood there, jerking them out and eating them with relish.

'_Fisi_,' M'Cola would say and shake his head in delighted sorrow at
there being such an awful beast. Fisi, the hyena, hermaphroditic,
self-eating devourer of the dead, trailer of calving cows, ham-stringer,
potential biter-off of your face at night while you slept, sad yowler,
camp-follower, stinking, foul, with jaws that crack the bones the lion
leaves, belly dragging, loping away on the brown plain, looking back,
mongrel dog-smart in the face; whack from the little Mannlicher and then
the horrid circle starting. 'Fisi,' M'Cola laughed, ashamed of him,
shaking his bald black head. 'Fisi. Eats himself. Fisi.'

The hyena was a dirty joke but bird shooting was a clean joke. My whisky
was a clean joke. There were many variations of that joke. Some we come
to later. The Mohammedans and all religions were a joke. A joke on all
the people who had them. Charo, the other gun bearer, was short, very
serious and highly religious. All Ramadan he never swallowed his saliva
until sunset and when the sun was almost down I'd see him watching
nervously. He had a bottle with him of some sort of tea and he would
finger it and watch the sun and I would see M'Cola watching him and
pretending not to see. This was not outrightly funny to him. This was
something that he could not laugh about openly but that he felt superior
to and wondered at the silliness of it. The Mohammedan religion was very
fashionable and all the higher social grades among the boys were
Mohammedans. It was something that gave caste, something to believe in,
something fashionable and god-giving to suffer a little for each year,
something that made you superior to other people, something that gave
you more complicated habits of eating, something that I understood and
M'Cola did not understand, nor care about, and he watched Charo watch
for the sun to set with that blank look on his face that it put on about
all things that he was not a part of. Charo was deadly thirsty and truly
devout and the sun set very slowly. I looked at it, red over the trees,
nudged him and he grinned. M'Cola offered me the water bottle solemnly.
I shook my head and Charo grinned again. M'Cola looked blank. Then the
sun was down and Charo had the bottle tilted up, his Adam's apple rising
and falling greedily and M'Cola looking at him and then looking away.

In the early days, before we became good friends, he did not trust me at
all. When anything came up he went into this blankness. I liked Charo
much better then. We understood each other on the question of religion
and Charo admired my shooting and always shook hands and smiled when we
had killed anything particularly good. This was flattering and pleasing.
M'Cola looked on all this early shooting as a series of lucky accidents.
We were supposed to shoot. We had not yet shot anything that amounted to
anything and he was not really my gun bearer. He was Mr. Jackson
Phillip's gun bearer and he had been loaned to me. I meant nothing to
him. He did not like me nor dislike me. He was politely contemptuous of
Karl. Who he liked was Mama.

The evening we killed the first lion it was dark when we came in sight
of camp. The killing of the lion had been confused and unsatisfactory.
It was agreed beforehand that P.O.M. should have the first shot but
since it was the first lion any of us had ever shot at, and it was very
late in the day, really too late to take the lion on, once he was hit we
were to make a dogfight of it and anyone was free to get him. This was a
good plan as it was nearly sundown and if the lion got into cover,
wounded, it would be too dark to do anything about it without a mess. I
remember seeing the lion looking yellow and heavy-headed and enormous
against a scrubby looking tree in a patch of orchard bush and P.O.M.
kneeling to shoot and wanting to tell her to sit down and make sure of
him. Then there was the short-barrelled explosion of the Mannlicher and
the lion was going to the left on a run, a strange, heavy-shouldered,
foot-swinging, cat run. I hit him with the Springfield and he went down
and spun over and I shot again, too quickly, and threw a cloud of dirt
over him. But there he was, stretched out, on his belly, and, with the
sun just over the top of the trees, and the grass very green, we walked
up on him like a posse, or a gang of Black and Tans, guns ready and
cocked, not knowing whether he was stunned or dead. When we were close
M'Cola threw a stone at him. It hit him in the flank and from the way it
hit you could tell he was a dead animal. I was sure P.O.M. had hit him
but there was only one bullet hole, well back, just below the spine and
ranging forward to come to the surface under the skin of the chest. You
could feel the bullet under the skin and M'Cola made a slit and cut it
out. It was a 220-grain solid bullet from the Springfield and it had
raked him, going through lungs and heart.

I was so surprised by the way he had rolled over dead from the shot
after we had been prepared for a charge, for heroics, and for drama,
that I felt more let down than pleased. It was our first lion and we
were very ignorant and this was not what we had paid to see. Charo and
M'Cola both shook P.O.M.'s hand and then Charo came over and shook hands
with me.

'Good shot, B'wana,' he said in Swahili. '_Piga m'uzuri._'

'Did you shoot, Karl?' I asked.

'No. I was just going to when you shot.'

'You didn't shoot him, Pop?'

'No. You'd have heard it.' He opened the breech and took out the two big
·450 No. 2's.

'I'm sure I missed him,' P.O.M. said.

'I was sure you hit him. I still think you hit him,' I said.

'Mama hit,' M'Cola said.

'Where?' Charo asked.

'Hit,' said M'Cola. 'Hit.'

'You rolled him over,' Pop said to me. 'God, he went over like a
rabbit.'

'I couldn't believe it.'

'Mama _piga_,' M'Cola said. '_Piga Simba._'

As we saw the camp fire in the dark ahead of us, coming in that night,
M'Cola suddenly commenced to shout a stream of high-pitched, rapid,
singing words in Wakamba ending in the word '_Simba_'. Someone at the
camp shouted back one word.

'Mama!' M'Cola shouted. Then another long stream. Then 'Mama! Mama!'

Through the dark came all the porters, the cook, the skinner, the boys,
and the headman.

'Mama!' M'Cola shouted. 'Mama _piga Simba_.'

The boys came dancing, crowing, and beating time and chanting something
from down in their chests that started like a cough and sounded like
'_Hey la Mama! Hay la Mama! Hey la Mama!_'

The rolling-eyed skinner picked P.O.M. up, the big cook and the boys
held her, and the others pressing forward to lift and if not to lift to
touch and hold, they danced and sang through the dark around the fire
and to our tent.

'_Hey la Mama! huh! huh! huh! Hay la Mama! huh! huh! huh!_' they sang
the lion dance with that deep, lion asthmatic cough in it. Then at the
tent they put her down and everyone, very shyly, shook hands, the boys
saying '_m'uzuri, Memsahib_,' and M'Cola and the porters all saying
'_m'uzuri_, Mama' with much feeling in the accenting of the word 'Mama'.

Afterwards in the chairs in front of the fire, sitting with the drinks,
Pop said, 'You shot it. M'Cola would kill anyone who said you didn't.'

'You know, I feel as though I did shoot it,' P.O.M. said. 'I don't
believe I'd be able to stand it if I really had shot it. I'd be too
proud. Isn't triumph marvellous?'

'Good old Mama,' Karl said.

'I believe you did shoot him,' I said.

'Oh, let's not go into that,' P.O.M. said. 'I feel so wonderful about
just being supposed to have killed him. You know people never used to
carry me on their shoulders much at home.'

'No one knows how to behave in America,' Pop said. 'Most uncivilized.'

'We'll carry you in Key West,' Karl said. 'Poor old Mama.'

'Let's not talk about it,' P.O.M. said. 'I like it too much. Shouldn't I
maybe distribute largess?'

'They didn't do it for that,' Pop said. 'But it is all right to give
something to celebrate.'

'Oh, I want to give them all a great deal of money,' P.O.M. said. 'Isn't
triumph simply marvellous?'

'Good old Mama,' I said. 'You killed him.'

'No, I didn't. Don't lie to me. Just let me enjoy my triumph.'

Anyway M'Cola did not trust me for a long time. Until P.O.M.'s licence
ran out, she was his favourite and we were simply a lot of people who
interfered and kept Mama from shooting things. Once her licence was out
and she was no longer shooting, she dropped back into non-combatant
status with him and as we began to hunt kudu and Pop stayed in camp and
sent us out alone with the trackers, Karl with Charo and M'Cola and I
together, M'Cola dropped Pop visibly in his estimation. It was only
temporary of course. He was Pop's man and I believe his working
estimations were only from day to day and required an unbroken series of
events to have any meaning. But something had happened between us.




PART II

PURSUIT REMEMBERED




CHAPTER ONE


It dated back to the time of Droopy, after I had come back from being
ill in Nairobi and we had gone on a foot safari to hunt rhino in the
forest. Droopy was a real savage with lids to his eyes that nearly
covered them, handsome, with a great deal of style, a fine hunter and a
beautiful tracker. He was about thirty-five, I should think, and wore
only a piece of cloth knotted over one shoulder, and a fez that some
hunter had given him. He always carried a spear. M'Cola wore an old U.S.
Army khaki tunic, complete with buttons, that had originally been
brought out for Droopy, who had been away somewhere and had missed
getting it. Twice Pop had brought it out for Droopy and finally M'Cola
had said, 'Give it to me'.

Pop had let him have it and M'Cola had worn it ever since. It, a pair of
shorts, his fuzzy wool curler's cap, and a knitted army sweater he wore
when washing the tunic, were the only garments I ever saw on the old man
until he took my bird-shooting coat. For shoes he used sandals cut from
old motor-car tyres. He had slim, handsome legs with well-turned ankles
on the style of Babe Ruth's and I remember how surprised I was the first
time I saw him with the tunic off and noticed how old his upper body
was. It had that aged look you see in photographs of Jeffries and
Sharkey posing thirty years after, the ugly, old-man biceps and the
fallen pectoral muscles.

'How old is M'Cola?' I asked Pop.

'He must be over fifty,' Pop said. 'He's got a grown-up family in the
native reserve.'

'How are his kids?'

'No good, worthless. He can't handle them. We tried one as a porter. But
he was no good.'

M'Cola was not jealous of Droopy. He simply knew that Droopy was a
better man than he was. More of a hunter, a faster and a cleaner
tracker, and a great stylist in everything he did. He admired Droopy in
the same way we did and being out with him, it made him realize that he
was wearing Droopy's tunic and that he had been a porter before he
became a gun bearer and suddenly he ceased being an old timer and we
were hunting together; he and I hunting together and Droopy in command
of the show.

That had been a fine hunt. The afternoon of the day we came into the
country we walked about four miles from camp along a deep rhino trail
that graded through the grassy hills with their abandoned
orchard-looking trees, as smoothly and evenly as though an engineer had
planned it. The trail was a foot deep in the ground and smoothly worn
and we left it where it slanted down through a divide in the hills like
a dry irrigation ditch and climbed, sweating, the small, steep hill on
the right to sit there with our backs against the hilltop and glass the
country. It was a green, pleasant country, with hills below the forest
that grew thick on the side of a mountain, and it was cut by the valleys
of several watercourses that came down out of the thick timber on the
mountain. Fingers of the forest came down on to the head of some of the
slopes and it was there, at the forest edge, that we watched for rhino
to come out. If you looked away from the forest and the mountain side
you could follow the watercourses and the hilly slope of the land down
until the land flattened and the grass was brown and burned and, away,
across a long sweep of country, was the brown Rift Valley and the shine
of Lake Manyara.

We all lay there on the hillside and watched the country carefully for
rhino. Droopy was on the other side of the hilltop, squatted on his
heels, looking, and M'Cola sat below us. There was a cool breeze from
the east and it blew the grass in waves on the hillsides. There were
many large white clouds and the tall trees of the forest on the mountain
side grew so closely and were so foliaged that it looked as though you
could walk on their tops. Behind this mountain there was a gap and then
another mountain and the far mountain was dark blue with forest in the
distance.

Until five o'clock we did not see anything. Then, without the glasses, I
saw something moving over the shoulder of one of the valleys toward a
strip of the timber. In the glasses it was a rhino, showing very clear
and minute at the distance, red-coloured in the sun, moving with a quick
waterbug-like motion across the hill. Then there were three more of them
that came out of the forest, dark in the shadow, and two that fought,
tinily, in the glasses, pushing head-on, fighting in front of a clump of
bushes while we watched them and the light failed. It was too dark to
get down the hill, across the valley and up the narrow slope of mountain
side to them in time for a shot. So we went back to the camp, down the
hill in the dark, edging down on our shoes and then feeling the trail
smooth under foot, walking along that deep trail, that wound through the
dark hills, until we saw the firelight in the trees.

We were excited that night because we had seen the three rhino and early
the next morning while we were eating breakfast before starting out,
Droopy came in to report a herd of buffalo he had found feeding at the
edge of the forest not two miles from camp. We went there, still tasting
coffee and kippers in the early morning heart-pounding of excitement,
and the native Droopy had left watching them pointed where they had
crossed a deep gulch and gone into an open patch of forest. He said
there were two big bulls in a herd of a dozen or more. We followed them
in, moving very quietly on the game trails, pushing the vines aside and
seeing the tracks and the quantities of fresh dung, but though we went
on into the forest, where it was too thick to shoot and made a wide
circle, we did not see or hear them. Once we heard the tick birds and
saw them flying, but that was all. There were numbers of rhino trails
there in the woods and many strawy piles of dung, but we saw nothing but
the green wood-pigeons and some monkeys, and when we came out we were
wet to our waists from the dew, and the sun was quite high. The day was
very hot, now before the wind had gotten up, and we knew whatever rhino
and buffalo had been out would have gone back deep into the forest to
rest out of the heat.

The others started back to camp with Pop and M'Cola. There was no meat
in camp, and I wanted to hunt back in a circle with Droopy to see if we
could kill a piece. I was beginning to feel strong again after the
dysentery and it was a pleasure to walk in the easy rolling country,
simply to walk, and to be able to hunt, not knowing what we might see
and free to shoot for the meat we needed. Then, too, I liked Droopy and
liked to watch him walk. He strode very loosely and with a slight lift,
and I liked to watch him and to feel the grass under my soft-soled boots
and the pleasant weight of the rifle, held just back of the muzzle, the
barrel resting on my shoulder, and the sun hot enough to sweat you well
as it burned the dew from the grass; with the breeze starting and the
country like an abandoned New England orchard to walk through. I knew
that I was shooting well again and I wanted to make a shot to impress
Droopy.

From the top of one rise we saw two kongoni showing yellow on a hillside
about a mile away and I motioned to Droop that we would go after them.
We started down and in a ravine jumped a waterbuck bull and two cows.
Waterbuck was the one animal we might get that I knew was worthless as
meat and I had shot a better head than this one carried. I had the
sights on the buck as he tore away, remembered about the worthless
meat, and having the head, and did not shoot.

'No shoot kuro?' Droopy asked in Swahili. '_Doumi sana._ A good bull.'

I tried to tell him that I had a better one and that it was no good to
eat.

He grinned.

'_Piga kongoni m'uzuri._'

'Piga' was a fine word. It sounded exactly as the command to fire should
sound or the announcement of a hit. 'M'uzuri', meaning good, well,
better, had sounded too much like the name of a state for a long time,
and walking I used to make up sentences in Swahili with Arkansas and
M'usuri in them, but now it seemed natural, no longer to be italicized,
just as all the words came to seem the proper and natural words and
there was nothing odd or unseemly in the stretching of the ears, in the
tribal scars, or in a man carrying a spear. The tribal marks and the
tattooed places seemed natural and handsome adornments and I regretted
not having any of my own. My own scars were all informal, some irregular
and sprawling, others simply puffy welts. I had one on my forehead that
people still commented on, asking if I had bumped my head; but Droop had
handsome ones beside his cheekbones and others, symmetrical and
decorative, on his chest and belly. I was thinking that I had one good
one, a sort of embossed Christmas tree, on the bottom of my right foot
that only served to wear out socks, when we jumped two reedbuck. They
went off through the trees and then stood at sixty yards, the thin,
graceful buck looking back, and I shot him high and a touch behind the
shoulder. He gave a jump and went off very fast.

'Piga.' Droopy smiled. We had both heard the whunk of the bullet.

'Kufa,' I told him. 'Dead.'

But when we came up to him, lying on his side, his heart was still
beating strongly, although to all appearances he was dead. Droopy had no
skinning knife and I had only a penknife to stick him with. I felt for
the heart behind the foreleg with my fingers and feeling it beating
under the hide slipped the knife in but it was short and pushed the
heart away. I could feel it, hot and rubbery against my fingers, and
feel the knife push it, but I felt around and cut the big artery and the
blood came hot against my fingers. Once bled, I started to open him,
with the little knife, still showing off to Droopy, and emptying him
neatly took out the liver, cut away the gall, and laying the liver on a
hummock of grass, put the kidneys beside it.

Droopy asked for the knife. Now he was going to show me something.
Skilfully he slit open the stomach and turned it inside, tripe side,
out, emptying the grass in it on the ground, shook it, then put the
liver and kidneys inside it and with the knife cut a switch from the
tree the buck lay under and sewed the stomach together with the withe so
that the tripe made a bag to carry the other delicacies in. Then he cut
a pole and put the bag on the end of it, running it through the flaps,
and put it over his shoulder in the way tramps carried their property
in a handkerchief on the end of a stick in Blue Jay corn plaster
advertisements when we were children. It was a good trick and I thought
how I would show it to John Staib in Wyoming some time and he would
smile his deaf man's smile (you had to throw pebbles at him to make him
stop when you heard a bull bugle), and I knew what John would say. He
would say, 'By Godd, Urnust, dot's smardt'.

Droop handed me the stick, then took off his single garment, made a
sling and got the buck up on his back. I tried to help him and suggested
by signs that we cut a pole and sling him, carrying him between us, but
he wanted to carry him alone. So we started for camp, me with the tripe
bag on the end of a stick over my shoulder, my rifle slung, and Droopy
staggering steadily ahead, sweating heavily, under the buck. I tried to
get him to hang him in a tree and leave him until we could send out a
couple of porters, and to that end we put him in the crotch of a tree.
But when Droopy saw that I meant to go off and leave him there rather
than simply allow him to drain he got him down on to his shoulders again
and we went on into camp, the boys, around the cooking fire, all
laughing at the tripe bag over my shoulder as we came in.

This was the kind of hunting that I liked. No riding in cars, the
country broken up instead of the plains, and I was completely happy. I
had been quite ill and had that pleasant feeling of getting stronger
each day. I was underweight, had a great appetite for meat, and could
eat all I wanted without feeling stuffy. Each day I sweated out
whatever we drank sitting at the fire at night, and in the heat of the
day, now, I lay in the shade with a breeze in the trees and read with no
obligation and no compulsion to write, happy in knowing that at four
o'clock we would be starting out to hunt again. I would not even write a
letter. The only person I really cared about, except the children, was
with me, and I had no wish to share this life with anyone who was not
there, only to live it, being completely happy and quite tired. I knew
that I was shooting well and I had that feeling of well-being and
confidence that is so much more pleasant to have than to hear about.

As it turned out, we started soon after three to be on the hill by four.
But it was nearly five before we saw the first rhino come bustling
short-leggedly across the ridge of hill in almost the same place we had
seen the rhino the night before. We sat where he went into the edge of
the forest near where we had seen the two fighting and then took a
course that would lead us down the hill, across the grown-over gully at
the bottom, and up the steep slope to where there was a thorn tree with
yellow blossoms that marked the place where we had seen the rhino go in.

Coming straight up the slope in sight of the thorn tree, the wind
blowing across the hill, I tried to walk as slowly as I could and put a
handkerchief inside the sweatband of my hat to keep the perspiration out
of my glasses. I expected to shoot at any minute and I wanted to slow up
enough so my heart would not be pounding. In shooting large animals
there is no reason ever to miss if you have a clear shot and can shoot
and know where to shoot, unless you are unsteady from a run or a climb
or fog your glasses, break them or run out of cloth or paper to wipe
them clean. The glasses were the biggest hazard and I used to carry four
handkerchiefs and change them from the left to the right pocket when
they were wet.

We came up to the yellow blossomed tree very carefully, like people
walking up to a bevy of quail the dogs have pointed, and the rhino was
not in sight. We went all through the edge of the forest and it was full
of tracks and fresh rhino sign, but there was no rhino. The sun was
setting and it was getting too dark to shoot, but we followed the forest
around the side of the mountain, hoping to see a rhino in the open
glades. When it was almost too dark to shoot, I saw Droopy stop and
crouch. With his head down he motioned us forward. Crawling up, we saw a
large rhino and a small one standing chest deep in brush, facing us
across a little valley.

'Cow and calf,' Pop said softly. 'Can't shoot her. Let me look at her
horn.' He took the glasses from M'Cola.

'Can she see us?' P.O.M. asked.

'No.'

'How far are they?'

'Must be nearly five hundred yards.'

'My God, she looks big,' I whispered.

'She's a big cow,' Pop said. 'Wonder what became of the bull?' He was
pleased and excited by the sight of game. 'Too dark to shoot unless
we're right on him.'

The rhinos had turned and were feeding. They never seemed to move
slowly. They either bustled or stood still.

'What makes them so red?' P.O.M. asked.

'Rolling in the mud,' Pop answered. 'We better get along while there's
light.'

The sun was down when we came out of the forest and looked down the
slope and across to the hill where we had watched from with our glasses.
We should have back-tracked and gone down, crossed the gulch, and
climbed back up the trail the way we had come, but we decided, like
fools, to grade straight across the mountainside below the edge of the
forest. So in the dark, following this ideal line, we descended into
steep ravines that showed only as wooded patches until you were in them,
slid down, clung to vines, stumbled and climbed and slid again, down and
down, then steeply, impossibly, up, hearing the rustle of night things
and the cough of a leopard hunting baboons; me scared of snakes, and
touching each root and branch with snake fear in the dark.

To go down and up two hands-and-knee climbing ravines and then out into
the moonlight and the long, too-steep shoulder of mountain that you
climbed one foot up to the other, one foot after the other, one stride
at a time, leaning forward against the grade and the altitude, dead
tired and gun weary, single file in the moonlight across the slope, on
up and to the top where it was easy, the country spread in the
moonlight, then up and down and on, through the small hills, tired but
now in sight of the fires and on into camp.

So then you sit, bundled against the evening chill, at the fire, with a
whisky and soda, waiting for the announcement that the canvas bath had
been a quarter filled with hot water.

'_Bathi_, B'wana.'

'Goddamn it, I could never hunt sheep again,' you say.

'I never could,' says P.O.M. 'You all made me.'

'You climbed better than any of us.'

'Do you suppose we could hunt sheep again, Pop?'

'I wonder,' Pop said. 'I suppose it's merely condition.'

'It's riding in the damned cars that ruins us.'

'If we did that walk every night we could come back in three nights from
now and never feel it.'

'Yes. But I'd be as scared of snakes if we did it every night for a
year.'

'You'd get over it.'

'No,' I said. 'They scare me stiff. Do you remember that time we touched
hands behind the tree?'

'Rather,' said Pop. 'You jumped two yards. Are you really afraid of
them, or only talking?'

'They scare me sick,' I said. 'They always have.'

'What's the matter with you men?' P.O.M. said. 'Why haven't I heard
anything about the war to-night?'

'We're too tired. Were you in the war, Pop?'

'Not me,' said Pop. 'Where is that boy with the whisky?' Then calling in
that feeble, clowning falsetto, 'Kayti . . . Katy-ay!'

'_Bathi_,' said Molo again softly, but insistently.

'Too tired.'

'Memsahib _bathi_,' Molo said hopefully.

'I'll go,' said P.O.M. 'But you two hurry up with your drinking. I'm
hungry.'

'_Bathi_,' said Kayti severely to Pop.

'_Bathi_ yourself,' said Pop. 'Don't bully me.'

Kayti turned away in fire-lit slanting smile.

'All right. All right,' said Pop. 'Going to have one?' he asked.

'We'll have just one,' I said, 'and then we'll _bathi_.'

'_Bathi_, B'wana M'Kumba,' Molo said. P.O.M. came toward the fire
wearing her blue dressing-gown and mosquito boots.

'Go on,' she said. 'You can have another when you come out. There's
nice, warm, muddy water.'

'They bully us,' Pop said.

'Do you remember the time we were sheep hunting and your hat blew off
and nearly fell on to the ram?' I asked her, the whisky racing my mind
back to Wyoming.

'Go take your _bathi_,' P.O.M. said. 'I'm going to have a gimlet.'

In the morning we were dressed before daylight, ate breakfast, and were
hunting the forest edge and the sunken valleys where Droop had seen the
buffalo before the sun was up. But they were not there. It was a long
hunt and we came back to camp and decided to send the lorries for
porters and move with a foot safari to where there was supposed to be
water in a stream that came down out of the mountain beyond where we had
seen the rhinos the night before. Being camped there we could hunt a
new country along the forest edge and we would be much closer to the
mountain.

The trucks were to bring in Karl from his kudu camp where he seemed to
be getting disgusted, or discouraged, or both, and he could go down to
the Rift Valley the next day and kill some meat and try for an oryx. If
we found good rhino we would send for him. We did not want to fire any
shots where we were going except at rhino in order not to scare them,
and we needed meat. The rhino seemed very shy and I knew from Wyoming
how the shy game will all shift out of a small country, a country being
an area, a valley or range of hills, a man can hunt in, after a shot or
two. We planned this all out, Pop consulting with Droopy, and then sent
the lorries off with Dan to recruit porters.

Late in the afternoon they were back with Karl, his outfit, and forty
M'Bulus, good-looking savages with a pompous headman who wore the only
pair of shorts among them. Karl was thin now, his skin sallow, his eyes
very tired looking and he seemed a little desperate. He had been eight
days in the kudu camp in the hills, hunting hard, with no one with him
who spoke any English, and they had only seen two cows and jumped a bull
out of range. The guides claimed they had seen another bull but Karl had
thought it was kongoni, or that they said it was a kongoni, and had not
shot. He was bitter about this and it was not a happy outfit.

'I never saw his horns. I don't believe it was a bull,' he said. Kudu
hunting was a touchy subject with him now and we let it alone.

'He'll get an oryx down there and he'll feel better,' Pop said. 'It's
gotten on his nerves a little.'

Karl agreed to the plan for us to move ahead into the new country, and
for him to go down for meat.

'Whatever you say,' he said. 'Absolutely whatever you say.'

'It will give him some shooting,' Pop said. 'Then he'll feel better.'

'We'll get one. Then you get one. Whoever gets his first can go on down
after oryx. You'll probably get an oryx to-morrow anyway when you're
hunting meat.'

'Whatever you say,' Karl said. His mind was bitterly revolving eight
blank days of hill climbing in the heat, out before daybreak, back at
dark, hunting an animal whose Swahili name he could not then remember,
with trackers in whom he had no confidence, coming back to eat alone, no
one to whom he could talk, his wife nine thousand miles and three months
away, and how was his dog and how was his job, and god-damn it where
were they and what if he missed one when he got a shot, he wouldn't, you
never missed when it was really important, he was sure of that, that was
one of the tenets of his faith, but what if he got excited and missed,
and why didn't he get any letters, what did the guide say kongoni for
that time, they did, he knew they did, but he said nothing of all that,
only, 'Whatever you say', a little desperately.

'Come on, cheer up, you bastard,' I said.

'I'm cheerful. What's the matter with you?'

'Have a drink.'

'I don't want a drink. I want a kudu.'

Later Pop said, 'I thought he'd do well off by himself with no one to
hurry him or rattle him. He'll be all right. He's a good lad.'

'He wants someone to tell him exactly what to do and still leave him
alone and not rattle him,' I said. 'It's hell for him to shoot in front
of everybody. He's not a damned show-off like me.'

'He made a damned fine shot at that leopard,' Pop said.

'Two of them,' I said. 'The second was as good as the first. Hell, he
can shoot. On the range he'll shoot the pants off of any of us. But he
worries about it and I rattle him trying to get him to speed up.'

'You're a little hard on him sometimes,' Pop said.

'Hell, he knows me. He knows what I think of him. He doesn't mind.'

'I still think he'll find himself off by himself,' Pop said. 'It's just
a question of confidence. He's really a good shot.'

'He's got the best buff, the best waterbuck, and the best lion, now,' I
said. 'He's got nothing to worry about.'

'The Memsahib has the best lion, brother. Don't make any mistake about
that.'

'I'm glad of that. But he's got a damned fine lion and a big leopard.
Everything he has is good. We've got plenty of time. He's got nothing to
worry about. What the hell is he so gloomy about?'

'We'll get an early start in the morning so we can finish it off before
it gets too hot for the little Memsahib.'

'She's in the best shape of any one.'

'She's marvellous. She's like a little terrier.'

We went out that afternoon and glassed the country from the hills and
never saw a thing. That night after supper we were in the tent. P.O.M.
disliked intensely being compared to a little terrier. If she must be
like any dog, and she did not wish to be, she would prefer a wolfhound,
something lean, racy, long-legged and ornamental. Her courage was so
automatic and so much a simple state of being that she never thought of
danger; then, too, danger was in the hands of Pop and for Pop she had a
complete, clear-seeing, absolutely trusting adoration. Pop was her ideal
of how a man should be, brave, gentle, comic, never losing his temper,
never bragging, never complaining except in a joke, tolerant,
understanding, intelligent, drinking a little too much as a good man
should, and, to her eyes, very handsome.

'Don't you think Pop's handsome?'

'No,' I said. 'Droopy's handsome.'

'Droopy's _beautiful_. But don't you _really_ think Pop's handsome?'

'Hell, no. I like him as well as any man I've ever known, but I'm damned
if he's handsome.'

'I think he's lovely looking. But you understand about how I feel about
him, don't you?'

'Sure. I'm as fond of the bastard myself.'

'But _don't_ you think he's handsome, really?'

'Nope.'

Then, a little later:

'Well, who's handsome to you?'

'Belmonte and Pop. And you.'

'Don't be patriotic,' I said. 'Who's a beautiful woman?'

'Garbo.'

'Not any more. Josie is. Margot is.'

'Yes, they are. I know I'm not.'

'You're lovely.'

'Let's talk about Mr. J. P. I don't like you to call him Pop. It's not
dignified.'

'He and I aren't dignified together.'

'Yes, but I'm dignified with him. Don't you think he's wonderful?'

'Yes, and he doesn't have to read books written by some female he's
tried to help get published saying how he's yellow.'

'She's just jealous and malicious. You never should have helped her.
Some people never forgive that.'

'It's a shame, though, with all that talent gone to malice and nonsense
and self-praise. It's a goddamned shame, really. It's a shame you never
knew her before she went to pot. You know a funny thing; she never could
write dialogue. It was terrible. She learned how to do it from my stuff
and used it in that book. She had never written like that before. She
never could forgive learning that and she was afraid people would notice
it, where she'd learned it, so she had to attack me. It's a funny
racket, really. But I swear she was nice before she got ambitious. You
would have liked her then, really.'

'Maybe, but I don't think so,' said P.O.M. 'We have fun though, don't
we? Without all those people.'

'God damn it if we don't. I've had a better time every year since I can
remember.'

'But isn't Mr. J. P. wonderful? Really?'

'Yes. He's wonderful.'

'Oh, you're nice to say it. Poor Karl.'

'Why?'

'Without his wife.'

'Yes,' I said. 'Poor Karl.'




CHAPTER TWO


So in the morning, again, we started ahead of the porters and went down
and across the hills and through a deeply forested valley and then up
and across a long rise of country with high grass that made the walking
difficult, and on and up and across, resting sometimes in the shade of a
tree, and then on and up and down and across, all in high grass now,
that you had to break a trail in, and the sun was very hot. The five of
us in single file, Droop and M'Cola with a big gun apiece, hung with
musettes and water bottles and the cameras, we all sweating in the sun,
Pop and I with guns and the Memsahib trying to walk like Droopy, her
Stetson tilted on one side, happy to be on a trip, pleased about how
comfortable her boots were, we came finally to a thicket of thorn trees
over a ravine that ran down from the side of a ridge to the water and we
leaned the guns against the trees and went in under the close shade and
lay on the ground. P.O.M. got the books out of one of the musettes and
she and Pop read while I followed the ravine down to the little stream
that came out of the mountainside, and found a fresh lion track and many
rhino tunnels in the tall grass that came higher than your head. It was
very hot climbing back up the sandy ravine and I was glad to lean my
back against the tree trunk and read in Tolstoy's _Sevastopol_. It was
a very young book and had one fine description of fighting in it, where
the French take the redoubt, and I thought about Tolstoy and about what
a great advantage an experience of war was to a writer. It was one of
the major subjects and certainly one of the hardest to write truly of,
and those writers who had not seen it were always very jealous and tried
to make it seem unimportant, or abnormal, or a disease as a subject,
while, really, it was just something quite irreplaceable that they had
missed. Then Sevastopol made me think of the Boulevard Sevastopol in
Paris, about riding a bicycle down it in the rain on the way home from
Strassburg and the slipperiness of the rails of the tram cars and the
feeling of riding on greasy, slippery asphalt and cobble stones in
traffic in the rain, and how we had nearly lived on the Boulevard du
Temple that time, and I remembered the look of that apartment, how it
was arranged, and the wall paper, and instead we had taken the upstairs
of the pavilion in Notre Dame des Champs in the courtyard with the
sawmill (_and the sudden whine of the saw, the smell of sawdust and the
chestnut tree over the roof with a mad woman downstairs_), and the year
worrying about money (_all of the stories back in the post that came in
through a slit in the saw-mill door, with notes of rejection that would
never call them stories, but always anecdotes, sketches, contes, etc.
They did not want them, and we lived on poireaux and drank cahors and
water_), and how fine the fountains were at the Place de L'Observatoire
(_water sheen rippling on the bronze of horses' manes, bronze breasts
and shoulders, green under thin-flowing water_), and when they put up
the bust of Flaubert in the Luxembourg on the short cut through the
gardens on the way to the rue Soufflot (_one that we believed in, loved
without criticism, heavy now in stone as an idol should be_). He had not
seen war but he had seen a revolution and the Commune, and a revolution
is much the best if you do not become bigoted because every one speaks
the same language. Just as civil war is the best war for a writer, the
most complete. Stendhal had seen a war and Napoleon taught him to write.
He was teaching everybody then; but no one else learned. Dostoevski was
made by being sent to Siberia. Writers are forged in injustice as a
sword is forged. I wondered if it would make a writer of him, give him
the necessary shock to cut the over-flow of words and give him a sense
of proportion, if they sent Tom Wolfe to Siberia or to the Dry Tortugas.
Maybe it would and maybe it wouldn't. He seemed sad, really, like
Carnera. Tolstoy was a small man. Joyce was of medium height and he wore
his eyes out. And that last night, drunk, with Joyce and the thing he
kept quoting from Edgar Quinet, 'Fraîche et rose comme au jour de la
bataille'. I didn't have it right I knew. And when you saw him he would
take up a conversation interrupted three years before. It was nice to
see a great writer in our time.

What I had to do was work. I did not care, particularly, how it all came
out. I did not take my own life seriously any more, any one else's life,
yes, but not mine. They all wanted something that I did not want and I
would get it without wanting it, if I worked. To work was the only
thing, it was the one thing that always made you feel good, and in the
meantime it was my own damned life and I would lead it where and how I
pleased. And where I had led it now pleased me very much. This was a
better sky than Italy. The hell it was. The best sky was in Italy and
Spain and Northern Michigan in the fall and in the fall in the Gulf off
Cuba. You could beat this sky; but not the country.

All I wanted to do now was get back to Africa. We had not left it, yet,
but when I would wake in the night I would lie, listening, homesick for
it already.

Now, looking out the tunnel of trees over the ravine at the sky with
white clouds moving across in the wind, I loved the country so that I
was happy as you are after you have been with a woman that you really
love, when, empty, you feel it welling up again and there it is and you
can never have it all and yet what there is, now, you can have, and you
want more and more, to have, and be, and live in, to possess now again
for always, for that long, sudden-ended always; making time stand still,
sometimes so very still that afterwards you wait to hear it move, and it
is slow in starting. But you are not alone, because if you have ever
really loved her happy and untragic, she loves you always; no matter
whom she loves nor where she goes she loves you more. So if you have
loved some woman and some country you are very fortunate and, if you die
afterwards, it makes no difference. Now, being in Africa, I was hungry
for more of it, the changes of the seasons, the rains with no need to
travel, the discomforts that you paid to make it real, the names of the
trees, of the small animals, and all the birds, to know the language
and have time to be in it and to move slowly. I have loved country all
my life; the country was always better than the people. I could only
care about people a very few at a time.

P.O.M. was sleeping. She was always lovely to look at asleep, sleeping
quietly, close curled like an animal, with nothing of the being dead
look that Karl had asleep. Pop slept quietly too, you could see his soul
was close in his body. His body no longer housed him fittingly. It had
gone on and changed, thickening here, losing its lines, bloating a
little there, but inside he was young and lean and tall and hard as when
he galloped lion on the plain below Wami, and the pouches under his eyes
were all outside, so that now I saw him asleep the way P.O.M. saw him
always. M'Cola was an old man asleep, without history and without
mystery. Droopy did not sleep. He sat on his heels and watched for the
safari.

We saw them coming a long way off. At first the boxes just showed above
the high grass, then a line of heads, then they were in a hollow, and
there was only the point of a spear in the sun, then they came up a rise
of ground and I could see the strung out line coming towards us. They
had gone a little too far to the left and Droopy waved to signal them
toward us. They made camp, Pop warning them to be quiet, and we sat
under the dining tent and were comfortable in the chairs and talked.
That night we hunted and saw nothing. The next morning we hunted and saw
nothing and the next evening the same. It was very interesting but there
were no results. The wind blew hard from the east and the ground was
broken in short ridges of hills coming down close from the forest so you
could not get above it without sending your scent on ahead of you on the
wind to warn everything. You could not see into the sun in the evening,
nor on the heavy shadowed hillsides to the west, beyond which the sun
was setting at the time the rhino would be coming out of the forest; so
all the country to the westward was a loss in the evening and in the
country we could hunt we found nothing. Meat came in from Karl's camp by
some porters we sent back. They came in carrying quarters of tommy,
grant, and wildebeeste, dusty, the meat seared dry by the sun, and the
porters were happy, crouched around their fires roasting the meat on
sticks. Pop was puzzled why the rhino were all gone. Each day we had
seen less and we discussed whether it could be the full moon, that they
fed out at night and were back in the forest in the morning before it
was light, or that they winded us, or heard the men, and were simply shy
and kept in the forest, or what was it? Me putting out the theories, Pop
pricking them with his wit, sometimes considering them from politeness,
sometimes with interest, like the one about the moon.

We went to bed early and in the night it rained a little, not a real
rain but a shower from the mountains, and in the morning we were up
before daylight and had climbed up to the top of the steep grassy ridge
that looked down on to the camp, on to the ravine of the river bed, and
across to the steep opposite bank of the stream, and from where we could
see all the hilly slopes and the edge of the forest. It was not yet
light when some geese flew overhead and the light was still too grey to
be able to see the edge of the forest clearly in the glasses. We had
scouts out on three different hill tops and we were waiting for it to be
light enough for us to see them if they signalled.

Then Pop said, 'Look at that son of a bitch', and shouted at M'Cola to
bring the rifles. M'Cola went jumping down the hill, and across the
stream, directly opposite us, a rhino was running with a quick trot
along the top of the bank. As we watched he speeded up and came, fast
trotting, angling down across the face of the bank. He was a muddy red,
his horn showed clearly, and there was nothing ponderous in his quick,
purposeful movement. I was very excited at seeing him.

'He'll cross the stream,' Pop said. 'He's shootable.'

M'Cola put the Springfield in my hand and I opened it to make sure I had
solids. The Rhino was out of sight now but I could see the shaking of
the high grass.

'How far would you call it?'

'All of three hundred.'

'I'll bust the son of a bitch.'

I was watching, freezing myself deliberately inside, stopping the
excitement as you close a valve, going into that impersonal state you
shoot from.

He showed, trotting into the shallow, boulder-filled stream. Thinking of
one thing, that the shot was perfectly possible, but that I must lead
him enough, must get ahead, I got on him, then well ahead of him, and
squeezed off. I heard the _whonk_ of the bullet and, from his trot, he
seemed to explode forward. With a whooshing snort he smashed ahead,
splashing water and snorting. I shot again and raised a little column of
water behind him, and shot again as he went into the grass; behind him
again.

'Piga,' M'Cola said. 'Piga!'

Droopy agreed.

'Did you hit him?' Pop said.

'Absolutely,' I said. 'I think I've got him.'

Droopy was running and I re-loaded and ran off after him. Half the camp
was strung out across the hills waving and yelling. The rhino had come
in right below where they were and gone on up the valley towards where
the forest came close down into the head of the valley.

Pop and P.O.M. came up. Pop with his big gun and M'Cola carrying mine.

'Droopy will get the tracks,' Pop said. 'M'Cola swears you hit him.'

'Piga!' M'Cola said.

'He snorted like a steam engine,' P.O.M. said. 'Didn't he look wonderful
going along there?'

'He was late getting home with the milk,' Pop said. 'Are you _sure_ you
hit him? It was a godawful long shot.'

'I _know_ I hit him. I'm _pretty_ sure I've killed him.'

'Don't tell any one if you did,' Pop said. 'They'll never believe you.
Look! Droopy's got blood.'

Below, in the high grass, Droop was holding up a grass blade towards us.
Then, stooped, he went on trailing fast by the blood spoor.

'Piga,' M'Cola said. 'M'uzuri!'

'We'll keep up above where we can see if he makes a break,' Pop said.
'Look at Droopy.'

Droop had removed his fez and held it in his hand.

'That's all the precautions he needs,' Pop said. 'We bring up a couple
of heavy guns and Droopy goes in after him with one article less of
clothing.'

Below us Droopy and his partner who was trailing with him had stopped.
Droopy held up his hand.

'They hear him,' Pop said. 'Come on.'

We started toward them. Droopy came toward us and spoke to Pop.

'He's in there,' Pop whispered. 'They can hear the tick birds. One of
the boys says he heard the faro, too. We'll go in against the wind. You
go ahead with Droopy. Let the Memsahib stay behind me. Take the big gun.
All right.'

The rhino was in high grass, somewhere in there behind some bushes. As
we went forward we heard a deep, moaning sort of groan. Droopy looked
around at me and grinned. The noise came again, ending this time like a
blood-choked sigh. Droopy was laughing. 'Faro,' he whispered and put his
hand palm open on the side of his head in the gesture that means to go
to sleep. Then in a jerky-flighted, sharp-beaked little flock we saw the
tick birds rise and fly away. We knew where he was and, as we went
slowly forward, parting the high grass, we saw him. He was on his side,
dead.

'Better shoot him once to make sure,' Pop said. M'Cola handed me the
Springfield he had been carrying. I noticed it was cocked, looked at
M'Cola, furious with him, kneeled down and shot the rhino in the
sticking place. He never moved. Droopy shook my hand and so did M'Cola.

'He had that damned Springfield cocked,' I said to Pop. The cocked gun,
behind my back, made me black angry.

That meant nothing to M'Cola. He was very happy, stroking the rhino's
horn, measuring it with his fingers spread, looking for the bullet hole.

'It's on the side he's lying on,' I said.

'You should have seen him when he was protecting Mama,' Pop said.
'That's why he had the gun cocked.'

'Can he shoot?'

'No,' Pop said. 'But he would.'

'Shoot me in the pants,' I said. 'Romantic bastard.' When the whole
outfit came up, we rolled the rhino into a sort of kneeling position and
cut away the grass to take some pictures. The bullet hole was fairly
high in the back, a little behind the lungs.

'That was a hell of a shot,' Pop said. 'A hell of a shot. Don't ever
tell any one you made that one.'

'You'll have to give me a certificate.'

'That would just make us both liars. They're a strange beast, aren't
they?'

There he was, long-hulked, heavy-sided, prehistoric looking, the hide
like vulcanized rubber and faintly transparent looking, scarred with a
badly healed horn wound that the birds had pecked at, his tail thick,
round, and pointed, flat many-legged ticks crawling on him, his ears
fringed with hair, tiny pig eyes, moss growing on the base of his horn
that grew out forward from his nose. M'Cola looked at him and shook his
head. I agreed with him. This was the hell of an animal.

'How is his horn?'

'It isn't bad,' Pop said. 'It's nothing extra. That was a hell of a shot
you made on him though, brother.'

'M'Cola's pleased with it,' I said.

'You're pretty pleased with it yourself,' P.O.M. said.

'I'm crazy about it,' I said. 'But don't let me start on it. Don't worry
about how I feel about it. I can wake up and think about that any
night.'

'And you're a good tracker, and a hell of a fine bird shot, too,' Pop
said. 'Tell us the rest of that.'

'Lay off me. I only said that once when I was drunk.'

'Once,' said P.O.M. 'Doesn't he tell us that every night?'

'By God, I _am_ a good bird shot.'

'Amazing,' said Pop. 'I never would have thought it. What else is it you
do?'

'Oh, go to hell.'

'Mustn't ever let him realize what a shot that was or he'll get
unbearable,' Pop said to P.O.M.

'M'Cola and I know,' I said.

M'Cola came up. 'M'uzuri, B'wana,' he said. 'M'uzuri sana.'

'He thinks you did it on purpose,' Pop said.

'Don't you ever tell him different.'

'Piga m'uzuri,' M'Cola said. 'M'uzuri.'

'I believe he feels just the way you do about it,' Pop said.

'He's my pal.'

'I believe he is, you know,' Pop said.

On our way back across country to our main camp I made a fancy shot on a
reedbuck at about two hundred yards, offhand, breaking his neck at the
base of the skull. M'Cola was very pleased and Droopy was delighted.

'We've got to put a stop to him,' Pop said to P.O.M. 'Where did you
shoot for, really?'

'In the neck,' I lied. I had held full on the centre of the shoulder.

'It was awfully pretty,' P.O.M. said. The bullet had made a crack when
it hit like a bat swung against a fast ball and the buck had collapsed
without a move.

'I think he's a damned liar,' Pop said.

'None of us great shots is appreciated. Wait till we're gone.'

'His idea of being appreciated is for us to carry him on our shoulders,'
Pop said. 'That rhino shot has ruined him.'

'All right. You watch from now on. Hell, I've shot well the whole time.'

'I seem to remember a grant of some sort,' Pop was teasing. So did I
remember him. I'd followed a fine one out of the country missing shot
after shot all morning after a series of stalks in the heat, then
crawled up to an ant hill to shoot one that was not nearly as good,
taken a rest on the ant hill, missed the buck at fifty yards, seen him
stand facing me, absolutely still, his nose up, and shot him in the
chest. He went over backwards and as I went up to him he jumped up and
went off, staggering. I sat down and waited for him to stop and when he
did, obviously anchored, I sat there, using the sling, and shot for his
neck, slowly and carefully, missing him eight times straight in a
mounting, stubborn rage, not making a correction but shooting exactly
for the same place in the same way each time, the gun bearers all
laughing, the truck that had come up with the outfit holding more amused
niggers, P.O.M. and Pop saying nothing, me sitting there cold,
crazy-stubborn-furious, determined to break his neck rather than walk up
and perhaps start him off over that heat-hazy, baking, noontime plain.
Nobody said anything. I reached up my hand to M'Cola for more
cartridges, shot again, carefully, and missed, and on the tenth shot
broke his damned neck. I turned away without looking toward him.

'Poor Papa,' P.O.M. said.

'It's the light and the wind,' Pop said. We had not known each other
very well then. 'They were all hitting the same place. I could see them
throw the dust.'

'I was a bloody, stubborn fool,' I said.

Anyway, I could shoot now. So far, and aided by flukes, my luck was
running now.

We came on into sight of camp and shouted. No one came out. Finally Karl
came out of his tent. He went back as soon as he saw us, then came out
again.

'Hey, Karl,' I yelled. He waved and went back in the tent again. Then
came toward us. He was shaky with excitement and I saw he had been
washing blood off his hands.

'What is it?'

'Rhino,' he said.

'Did you get in trouble with him?'

'No. We killed him.'

'Fine. Where is he?'

'Over there behind that tree.'

We went over. There was the newly severed head of a rhino that was a
rhino. He was twice the size of the one I had killed. The little eyes
were shut and a fresh drop of blood stood in the corner of one like a
tear. The head bulked enormous and the horn swept up and back in a fine
curve. The hide was an inch thick where it hung in a cape behind the
head and was as white where it was cut as freshly sliced coco-nut.

'What is he? About thirty inches?'

'Hell, no,' said Pop. 'Not thirty inches.'

'But he iss a very fine one, Mr. Jackson,' Dan said.

'Yes. He's a fine one,' Pop said.

'Where did you get him?'

'Just outside of camp.'

'He wass standing in some bush. We heard him grunt.'

'We thought he was a buffalo,' Karl said.

'He iss a very fine one,' Dan repeated.

'I'm damned glad you got him,' I said.

There we were, the three of us, wanting to congratulate, waiting to be
good sports about this rhino whose smaller horn was longer than our big
one, this huge, tear-eyed marvel of a rhino, this dead, head-severed
dream rhino, and instead we all spoke like people who were about to
become seasick on a boat, or people who had suffered some heavy
financial loss. We were ashamed and could do nothing about it. I wanted
to say something pleasant and hearty, instead, 'How many times did you
shoot him?' I asked.

'I don't know. We didn't count. Five or six, I guess.'

'Five, I think,' said Dan.

Poor Karl, faced by these three sad-faced congratulators, was beginning
to feel his pleasure in the rhino drained away from him.

'We got one too,' said P.O.M.

'That's fine,' said Karl. 'Is he bigger than this one?'

'Hell, no. He's a lousy runt.'

'I'm sorry,' Karl said. He meant it, simply and truly.

'What the hell have you got to be sorry about with a rhino like that?
He's a beauty. Let me get the camera and take some pictures of him.'

I went after the camera. P.O.M. took me by the arm and walked close
beside me.

'Papa, please try to act like a human being,' she said. 'Poor Karl.
You're making him feel dreadfully.'

'I know it,' I said. 'I'm trying not to act that way.'

There was Pop. He shook his head. 'I never felt more of a four-letter
man,' he said. 'But it was like a kick in the stomach. I'm really
delighted, of course.'

'Me too,' I said. 'I'd rather have him beat me. You know that. Truly.
But why couldn't he just get a good one, two or three inches longer? Why
did he have to get one that makes mine ridiculous? It just makes ours
silly.'

'You can always remember that shot.'

'To hell with that shot. That bloody fluke. God, what a beautiful
rhino.'

'Come on, let's pull ourselves together and try to act like white people
with him.'

'We were _awful_,' P.O.M. said.

'I know it,' I said. 'And all the time I was trying to be jolly. You
_know_ I'm delighted he has it.'

'You were certainly jolly. Both of you,' P.O.M. said.

'But did you see M'Cola,' Pop asked. M'Cola had looked at the rhino
dismally, shaken his head and walked away.

'He's a wonderful rhino,' P.O.M. said. 'We must act decently and make
Karl feel good.'

But it was too late. We could not make Karl feel good and for a long
time we could not feel good ourselves. The porters came into camp with
the loads and we could see them all, and all of our outfit, go over to
where the rhino head lay in the shade. They were all very quiet. Only
the skinner was delighted to see such a rhino head in camp.

'M'uzuri sana,' he said to me. And measured the horn with shiftings of
his widespread hand. 'Kubwa sana!'

'N'Dio. M'uzuri sana,' I agreed.

'B'wana Kabor shoot him?'

'Yes.'

'M'uzuri sana.'

'Yes,' I agreed. 'M'uzuri sana.'

The skinner was the only gent in the outfit. We had tried, in all the
shoot, never to be competitive. Karl and I had each tried to give the other
the better chance on everything that came up. I was, truly, very fond of
him and he was entirely unselfish and altogether self-sacrificing. I
knew I could outshoot him and I could always outwalk him and, steadily,
he got trophies that made mine dwarfs in comparison. He had done some of
the worst shooting at game I had ever seen and I had shot badly twice on
the trip, at that grant and at a bustard once on the plain, still he
beat me on all the tangible things we had to show. For a while we had
joked about it and I knew everything would even up. But it didn't even
up. Now, on this rhino hunt, I had taken the first crack at the country.
We had sent him after meat while we had gone into a new country. We had
not treated him badly, but we had not treated him too well, and still he
had beaten me. Not only beaten, beaten was all right. He had made my
rhino look so small that I could never keep him in the same small town
where we lived. He had wiped him out. I had the shot I had made on him
to remember and nothing could take that away except that it was so
bloody marvellous I knew I would wonder, sooner or later, if it was not
really a fluke in spite of my unholy self-confidence. Old Karl had put
it on us all right with that rhino. He was in his tent now, writing a
letter.

Under the dining tent fly Pop and I talked over what we had better do.

'He's got his rhino anyway,' Pop said. 'That saves us time. Now you
can't stand on that one.'

'No.'

'But this country is washed out. Something wrong with it. Droopy claims
to know a good country about three hours from here in the lorries and
another hour or so on with the porters. We can head for there this
afternoon with a light outfit, send the lorries back, and Karl and Dan
can move on down to M'uto Umbu and he can get his oryx.'

'Fine.'

'He has a chance to get a leopard on that rhino carcass this evening,
too, or in the morning. Dan said they heard one. We'll try to get a
rhino out of this country of Droopy's and then you join up with them and
go on for kudu. We want to leave plenty of time for them.'

'Fine.'

'Even if you don't get an oryx. You'll pick one up somewhere.'

'Even if I don't get one at all, it's all right. We'll get one another
time. I want a kudu, though.'

'You'll get one. You're sure to.'

'I'd rather get one, a good one, than all the rest. I don't give a damn
about these rhino outside of the fun of hunting them. But I'd like to
get one that wouldn't look silly beside that dream rhino of his.'

'Absolutely.'

So we told Karl and he said: 'Whatever you say. Sure. I hope you get one
twice as big.' He really meant it. He was feeling better now and so were
we all.




CHAPTER THREE


Droopy's country, when we reached it that evening, after a hot ride
through red-soiled, bush-scrubby hills, looked awful. It was at the edge
of a belt where all the trees had been girdled to kill the tsetse flies.
And across from camp was a dusty, dirty native village. The soil was red
and eroded and seemed to be blowing away, and camp was pitched in a high
wind under the sketchy shade of some dead trees on a hillside
overlooking a little stream and the mud village beyond. Before dark we
followed Droopy and two local guides up past the village and in a long
climb to the top of a rock-strewn ridge that overlooked a deep valley
that was almost a canyon. Across on the other side, were broken valleys
that sloped steeply down into the canyon. There were heavy growths of
trees in the valleys and grassy slopes on the ridges between, and above
there was the thick bamboo forest of the mountain. The canyon ran down
to the Rift Valley, seeming to narrow at the far end where it cut
through the wall of the rift. Beyond, above the grassy ridges and
slopes, were heavily forested hills. It looked a hell of a country to
hunt.

'If you see one across there you have to go straight down to the bottom
of the canyon. Then up one of those timber patches and across those
damned gullies. You can't keep him in sight and you'll kill yourself
climbing. It's too steep. Those are the kind of innocent-looking gullies
we got into that night coming home.'

'It looks very bad,' Pop agreed.

'I've hunted a country just like this for deer. The south slope of
Timber Creek in Wyoming. The slopes are all too steep. It's hell. It's
too broken. We'll take some punishment to-morrow.'

P.O.M. said nothing. Pop had brought us here and Pop would bring us out.
All she had to do was see her boots did not hurt her feet. They hurt
just a little now, and that was her only worry.

I went on to dilate on the difficulties the country showed and we went
home to camp in the dark all very gloomy and full of prejudice against
Droopy. The fire flamed brightly in the wind and we sat and watched the
moon rise and listened to the hyenas. After we had a few drinks we did
not feel so badly about the country.

'Droopy swears it's good,' Pop said. 'This isn't where he wanted to go
though, he says. It was another place farther on. But he swears this is
good.'

'I love Droopy,' P.O.M. said. 'I have perfect confidence in Droopy.'

Droopy came up to the fire with two spear-carrying natives.

'What does he hear?' I asked.

There was some talk by the natives, then Pop said: 'One of these
sportsmen claims he was chased by a huge rhino to-day. Of course nearly
any rhino would look huge when he was chasing him.'

'Ask him how long the horn was.'

The native showed that the horn was as long as his arm. Droopy grinned.

'Tell him to go,' said Pop.

'Where did all this happen?'

'Oh, over there somewhere,' Pop said. 'You know. Over there. Way over
there. Where these things always happen.'

'That's marvellous. Just where we want to go.'

'The good aspect is that Droopy's not at all depressed,' Pop said. 'He
seems very confident. After all, it's his show.'

'Yes, but we have to do the climbing.'

'Cheer him up, will you?' Pop said to P.O.M. 'He's getting me very
depressed.'

'Should we talk about how well he shoots?'

'Too early in the evening. I'm not gloomy. I've just seen that kind of
country before. It will be good for us all right. Take some of your
belly off, Governor.'

The next day I found that I was all wrong about that country.

       *       *       *       *       *

We had breakfast before daylight and were started before sunrise,
climbing the hill beyond the village in single file. Ahead there was the
local guide with a spear, then Droopy with my heavy gun and a water
bottle, then me with the Springfield, Pop with the Mannlicher, P.O.M.
pleased, as always to carry nothing, M'Cola with Pop's heavy gun and
another water bottle, and finally two local citizens with spears, water
bags, and a chop box with lunch. We planned to lay up in the heat of the
middle of the day and not get back until dark. It was fine climbing in
the cool fresh morning and very different from toiling up this same
trail last evening in the sunset with all the rocks and dirt giving back
the heat of the day. The trail was used regularly by cattle and the dust
was powdered dry and, now, lightly moistened from the dew. There were
many hyena tracks and, as the trail came on to a ridge of grey rock so
that you could look down on both sides into a steep ravine, and then
went on along the edge of the canyon, we saw a fresh rhino track in one
of the dusty patches below the rocks.

'He's just gone on ahead,' Pop said. 'They must wander all over here at
night.'

Below, at the bottom of the canyon, we could see the tops of high trees
and in an opening see the flash of water. Across were the steep hillside
and the gullies we had studied last night. Droopy and the local guide,
the one who had been chased by the rhino, were whispering together. Then
they started down a steep path that went in long slants down the side of
the canyon.

We stopped. I had not seen P.O.M. was limping, and in sudden whispered
family bitterness there was a highly-righteous-on-both-sides clash,
historically on unwearable shoes and boots in the past, and imperatively
on these, which hurt. The hurt was lessened by cutting off the toes of
the heavy short wool socks worn over ordinary socks, and then, by
removing the socks entirely, the boots made possible. Going down-hill
steeply made these Spanish shooting boots too short in the toe and
there was an old argument, about this length of boot and whether the
bootmaker, whose part I had taken, unwittingly first, only as
interpreter, and finally embraced his theory patriotically as a whole
and, I believed, by logic, had overcome it by adding on to the heel. But
they hurt now, a stronger logic, and the situation was unhelped by the
statement that men's new boots always hurt for weeks before they became
comfortable. Now, heavy socks removed, stepping tentatively, trying the
pressure of the leather against the toes, the argument past, she wanting
not to suffer, but to keep up and please Mr. J. P., me ashamed at having
been a four-letter man about boots, at being righteous against pain, at
being righteous at all, at ever being righteous, stopping to whisper
about it, both of us grinning at what was whispered, it all right now,
the boots too, without the heavy socks, much better, me hating all
righteous bastards now, one absent American friend especially, having
just removed myself from that category, certainly never to be righteous
again, watching Droopy ahead, we went down the long slant of the trail
toward the bottom of the canyon where the trees were heavy and tall and
the floor of the canyon, that from above had been a narrow gash, opened
to a forest-banked stream.

We stood now in the shade of trees with great smooth trunks, circled at
their base with the line of roots that showed in rounded ridges up the
trunks like arteries; the trunks the yellow green of a French forest on
a day in winter after rain. But these trees had a great spread of
branches and were in leaf and below them, in the stream bed in the sun,
reeds like papyrus grass grew thick as wheat and twelve feet tall. There
was a game trail through the grass along the stream and Droopy was bent
down looking at it. M'Cola went over and looked and they both followed
it a little way, stooped close over it, then came back to us.

'Nyati,' M'Cola whispered. 'Buffalo.' Droopy whispered to Pop and then
Pop said, softly in his throaty, whisky whisper, 'They're buff gone down
the river. Droop says there are some big bulls. They haven't come back.'

'Let's follow them,' I said. 'I'd rather get another buff than rhino.'

'It's as good a chance as any for rhino, too,' Pop said.

'By God, isn't it a great looking country?' I said.

'Splendid,' Pop said. 'Who would have imagined it?'

'The trees are like André's pictures,' P.O.M. said. 'It's simply
beautiful. Look at that green. It's Masson. Why can't a good painter see
this country?'

'How are your boots?'

'Fine.'

As we trailed the buffalo we went very slowly and quietly. There was no
wind and we knew that when the breeze came up it would be from the east
and blow up the canyon toward us. We followed the game trail down the
river-bed and as we went the grass was much higher. Twice we had to get
down to crawl and the reeds were so thick you could not see two feet
into them. Droop found a fresh rhino track, too, in the mud. I began to
think about what would happen if a rhino came barging along this tunnel
and who would do what. It was exciting but I did not like it. It was too
much like being in a trap and there was P.O.M. to think about. Then as
the stream made a bend and we came out of the high grass to the bank I
smelled game very distinctly. I do not smoke, and hunting at home I have
several times smelled elk in the rutting season before I have seen them,
and I can smell clearly where an old bull has lain in the forest. The
bull elk has a strong musky smell. It is a strong but pleasant odour and
I know it well, but this smell I did not know.

'I can smell them,' I whispered to Pop. He believed me.

'What is it?'

'I don't know but it's plenty strong. Can't you?'

'No.'

'Ask Droop.'

Droopy nodded and grinned.

'They take snuff,' Pop said. 'I don't know whether they can scent or
not.'

We went on into another bed of reeds that were high over our heads,
putting each foot down silently before lifting the other, walking as
quietly as in a dream or a slow motion picture. I could smell whatever
it was clearly now, all of the time, sometimes stronger than at others.
I did not like it at all. We were close to the bank now, and ahead, the
game trail went straight out into a long slough of higher reeds than any
we had come through.

'I can smell them close as hell,' I whispered to Pop. 'No kidding.
Really.'

'I believe you,' Pop said. 'Should we get up here on to the bank and
skirt this bit? We'll be above it.'

'Good.' Then, when we were up, I said. 'That tall stuff had me spooked.
I wouldn't like to hunt in that.'

'How'd you like to hunt elephant in that?' Pop whispered.

'I wouldn't do it.'

'Do you really hunt elephant in grass like that?' P.O.M. asked.

'Yes,' Pop said. 'Get up on somebody's shoulders to shoot.'

Better men than I am do it, I thought. I wouldn't do it.

We went along the grassy right bank, on a sort of shelf, now in the
open, skirting a slough of high dry reeds. Beyond on the opposite bank
were the heavy trees and above them the steep bank of the canyon. You
could not see the stream. Above us, on the right, were the hills, wooded
in patches of orchard bush. Ahead, at the end of the slough of reeds the
banks narrowed and the branches of the big trees almost covered the stream.
Suddenly Droopy grabbed me and we both crouched down. He put the big gun
in my hand and took the Springfield. He pointed and around a curve in
the bank I saw the head of a rhino with a long, wonderful-looking horn.
The head was swaying and I could see the ears forward and twitching, and
see the little pig eyes. I slipped the safety catch and motioned Droopy
down. Then I heard M'Cola saying, 'Toto! Toto!' and he grabbed my arm.
Droopy was whispering, 'Manamouki! Manamouki! Manamouki!' very fast and
he and M'Cola were frantic that I should not shoot. It was a cow rhino
with a calf, and as I lowered the gun she gave a snort, crashed in the
reeds, and was gone. I never saw the calf. We could see the reeds
swaying where the two of them were moving and then it was all quiet.

'Damn shame,' Pop whispered. 'She had a beautiful horn.'

'I was all set to bust her,' I said. 'I couldn't tell she was a cow.'

'M'Cola saw the calf.'

M'Cola was whispering to Pop and nodding his head emphatically.

'He says there's another rhino in there,' Pop said. 'That he heard him
snort.'

'Let's get higher, where we can see them if they break, and throw
something in,' I said.

'Good idea,' Pop agreed. 'Maybe the bull's there.'

We went a little higher up the bank where we could look out over the
lake of high reeds and, with Pop holding his big gun ready and I with
the safety off mine, M'Cola threw a club into the reeds where he had
heard the snort. There was a wooshing snort and no movement, not a stir
in the reeds. Then there was a crashing farther away and we could see
the reeds swaying with the rush of something through them toward the
opposite bank, but could not see what was making the movement. Then I
saw the black back, the wide-swept, point-lifted horns and then the
quick-moving, climbing rush of a buffalo up the other bank. He went up,
his neck up and out, his head horn-heavy, his withers rounded like a
fighting bull, in fast strong-legged climb. I was holding on the point
where his neck joined his shoulder when Pop stopped me.

'He's not a big one,' he said softly. 'I wouldn't take him unless you
want him for meat.'

He looked big to me and now he stood, his head up, broadside, his head
swung toward us.

'I've got three more on the licence and we're leaving their country,' I
said.

'It's awfully good meat,' Pop whispered. 'Go ahead then. Bust him. But
be ready for the rhino after you shoot.'

I sat down, the big gun feeling heavy and unfamiliar, held on the buff's
shoulder, squeezed off and flinched without firing. Instead of the sweet
clean pull of the Springfield with the smooth, unhesitant release at the
end, this trigger came to what, in a squeeze, seemed metal stuck against
metal. It was like when you shoot in a nightmare. I couldn't squeeze it
and I corrected from my flinch, held my breath, and pulled the trigger.
It pulled off with a jerk and the big gun made a rocking explosion out
of which I came, seeing the buffalo still on his feet, and going out of
sight to the left in a climbing run, to let off the second barrel and
throw a burst of rock dust and dirt over his hind quarters. He was out
of shot before I could reload the double-barrelled ·470 and we had all
heard the snorting and the crashing of another rhino that had gone out
of the lower end of the reeds and on under the heavy trees on our side
without showing more than a glimpse of his bulk in the reeds.

'It was the bull,' Pop said. 'He's gone down the stream.'

'N'Dio. Doumi! Doumi!' Droopy insisted it was a bull.

'I hit the damned buff,' I said. 'God knows where. To hell with those
heavy guns. The trigger pull put me off.'

'You'd have killed him with the Springfield,' Pop said.

'I'd know where I hit him anyway. I thought with the four-seven I'd kill
him or miss him,' I said. 'Instead, now we've got him wounded.'

'He'll keep,' Pop said. 'We want to give him plenty of time.'

'I'm afraid I gut-shot him.'

'You can't tell. Going off fast like that he might be dead in a hundred
yards.'

'The hell with that four-seventy,' I said. 'I can't shoot it. The
trigger's like the last turn of the key opening a sardine can.'

'Come on,' Pop said. 'We've got God knows how many rhino scattered about
here.'

'What about the buff?'

'Plenty of time for him later. We must let him stiffen up. Let him get
sick.'

'Suppose we'd been down there with all that stuff coming out.'

'Yes,' said Pop.

All this in whispers. I looked at P.O.M. She was like someone enjoying a
good musical show.

'Did you see where it hit him?'

'I couldn't tell?' she whispered. 'Do you suppose there are any more in
there?'

'Thousands,' I said. 'What do we do, Pop?'

'That bull may be just around the bend,' Pop said. 'Come on.'

We went along the bank, our nerves cocked, and as we came to the narrow
end of the reeds there was another rush of something heavy through the
tall stalks. I had the gun up waiting for whatever it was to show. But
there was only the waving of the reeds. M'Cola signalled with his hand
not to shoot.

'The calf,' Pop said. 'Must have been two of them. Where's the bloody
bull?'

'How the hell do you see them?'

'Tell by the size.'

Then we were standing looking down into the stream bed, into the shadows
under the branches of the big trees, and off ahead down the stream when
M'Cola pointed up the hill on our right.

'Faro,' he whispered and reached me the glasses.

There on the hillside, head-on, wide, black, looking straight towards
us, ears twitching and head lifted, swaying as the nose searched for the
wind, was another rhino. He looked huge in the glasses. Pop was studying
him with his binoculars.

'He's no better than what you have,' he said softly.

'I can bust him right in the sticking place,' I whispered.

'You have only one more,' Pop whispered. 'You want a good one.'

I offered the glasses to P.O.M.

'I can see him without,' she said. 'He's huge.'

'He may charge,' Pop said. 'Then you'll have to take him.'

Then, as we watched, another rhino came into sight from behind a wide
feathery-topped tree. He was quite a bit smaller.

'By God, it's a calf,' Pop said. 'That one's a cow. Good thing you
didn't shoot her. She bloody well _may_ charge too.'

'Is it the same cow?' I whispered.

'No. That other one had a hell of a horn.'

We all had the nervous exhilaration, like a laughing drunk, that a
sudden over-abundance, idiotic abundance of game makes. It is a feeling
that can come from any sort of game or fish that is ordinarily rare and
that, suddenly, you find in a ridiculously unbelievable abundance.

'Look at her. She knows there's something wrong. But she can't see us or
smell us.'

'She heard the shots.'

'She knows we're here. But she can't make it out.'

The rhino looked so huge, so ridiculous, and so fine to see, and I
sighted on her chest.

'It's a nice shot.'

'Perfect,' Pop said.

'What are we going to do?' P.O.M. said. She was practical.

'We'll work around her,' Pop said.

'If we keep low I don't believe our scent will carry up there once we're
past.'

'You can't tell,' Pop said. 'We don't want her to charge.'

She did not charge, but dropped her head, finally, and worked up the
hill followed by the nearly full-grown calf.

'Now,' said Pop, 'we'll let Droop go ahead and see if he can find the
bull's tracks. We might as well sit down.'

We sat in the shade and Droopy went up one side of the stream and the
local guide the other. They came back and said the bull had gone on
down.

'Did any one ever see what sort of horn he had?' I asked.

'Droop said he was good.'

M'Cola had gone up the hill a little way. Now he crouched and beckoned.

'Nyati,' he said with his hand up to his face.

'Where?' Pop asked him. He pointed, crouched down, and as we crawled up
to him he handed me the glasses. They were a long way away on the
jutting ridge of one of the steep hillsides on the far side of the
canyon, well down the stream. We could see six, then eight buffalo,
black, heavy necked, the horns shining, standing on the point of a
ridge. Some were grazing and others stood, their heads up, watching.

'That one's a bull,' Pop said, looking through the glasses.

'Which one?'

'Second from the right.'

'They all look like bulls to me.'

'They're a long way away. That one's a good bull. Now we've got to cross
the stream and work down toward them and try to get above them.'

'Will they stay there?'

'No. Probably they'll work down into this stream bed as soon as it's
hot.'

'Let's go.'

We crossed the stream on a log and then another log and on the other
side, half way up the hillside, there was a deeply worn game trail that
graded along the bank under the heavily leafed branches of the trees. We
went along quite fast, but walking carefully, and below us, now, the
stream bed was covered solidly with foliage. It was still early in the
morning but the breeze was rising and the leaves stirred over our heads.
We crossed one ravine that came down to the stream, going into the thick
bush to be out of sight and stooping as we crossed behind trees in the
small open place, then, using the shoulder of the ravine as protection,
we climbed so that we might get high up the hillside above the buffalo
and work down to them. We stopped in the shelter of the ridge, me
sweating heavily and fixing a handkerchief inside the sweatband of my
Stetson, and sent Droop ahead to look. He came back to say they were
gone. From above we could see nothing of them, so we cut across the
ravine and the hillside thinking we might intercept them on their way
down into the river bed. The next hillside had been burned and at the
bottom of the hill there was a burned area of bush. In the ash dust were
the tracks of the buffalo as they came down and into the thick jungle of
the stream bed. Here it was too overgrown and there were too many vines
to follow them. There were no tracks going down the stream so we knew
they were down in the part of the stream bed we had looked down on from
the game trail. Pop said there was nothing to do about them in there. It
was so thick that if we jumped them we could not get a shot. You could
not tell one from another, he said. All you could see would be a rush of
black. An old bull would be grey but a good herd bull might be as black
as a cow. It wasn't any good to jump them like that.

It was ten o'clock now and very hot in the open, the sun pegged and the
breeze lifted the ashes of the burned-over ground as we walked.
Everything would be in the thick cover now. We decided to find a shady
place and lie down and read in the cool; to have lunch and kill the hot
part of the day.

Beyond the burned place we came toward the stream and stopped, sweating,
in the shadow of some very large trees. We unpacked our leather coats
and our raincoats and spread them on the grass at the foot of the trees
so that we could lean back against the trunks. P.O.M. got out the books
and M'Cola made a small fire and boiled water for tea.

The breeze was coming up and we could hear it in the high branches. It
was cool in the shade, but if you stirred into the sun, or as the sun
shifted the shadow while you read so that any part of you was out of the
shadow, the sun was heavy. Droopy had gone on down the stream to have a
look, and as we lay there, reading, I could smell the heat of the day
coming, the drying up of the dew, the heat on the leaves, and the
heaviness of the sun over the stream.

P.O.M. was reading _Spanish Gold_, by George A. Birmingham, and she said
it was no good. I still had the Sevastopol book of Tolstoy and in the
same volume I was reading a story called 'The Cossacks' that was very
good. In it were the summer heat, the mosquitoes, the feel of the forest
in the different seasons, and that river that the Tartars crossed,
raiding, and I was living in that Russia again.

I was thinking how real that Russia of the time of our Civil War was, as
real as any other place, as Michigan, or the prairie north of town and
the woods around Evan's game farm, of how, through Turgenev, I knew that
I had lived there, as I had been in the family Buddenbrooks, and had
climbed in and out of her window in _Le Rouge et Le Noir_, or the
morning we had come in the gates of Paris and seen Salcède torn apart by
the horses at the Place de Grèves. I saw all that. And it was me they
did not break on the rack that time because I had been polite to the
executioner the time they killed Coconas and me, and I remember the Eve
of St. Bartholomew's and how we hunted Huguenots that night, and when
they trapped me at her house that time, and no feeling more true than
finding the gate of the Louvre being closed, nor of looking down at his
body in the water where he fell from the mast, and always, Italy, better
than any book, lying in the chestnut woods, and in the fall mist behind
the Duomo going across the town to the Ospedale Maggiore, the nails in
my boots on the cobbles, and in the spring sudden showers in the
mountains and the smell of the regiment like a copper coin in your
mouth. So in the heat the train stopped at Dezenzano and there was Lago
de Garda and those troops are the Czech Legion, and the next time it was
raining, and the next time it was in the dark, and the next time you
passed it riding in a truck, and the next time you were coming from
somewhere else, and the next time you walked to it in the dark from
Sermione. For we have been there in the books and out of the books--and
where we go, if we are any good, there you can go as we have been. A
country, finally, erodes and the dust blows away, the people all die and
none of them were of any importance permanently, except those who
practised the arts, and these now wish to cease their work because it is
too lonely, too hard to do, and is not fashionable. A thousand years
makes economics silly and a work of art endures for ever, but it is very
difficult to do and now it is not fashionable. People do not want to do
it any more because they will be out of fashion and the lice who crawl
on literature will not praise them. Also it is very hard to do. So what?
So I would go on reading about the river that the Tartars came across
when raiding, and the drunken old hunter and the girl and how it was
then in the different seasons.

Pop was reading _Richard Carvell_. We had bought what there was to buy
in Nairobi and we were pretty well to the end of the books.

'I've read this before,' Pop said. 'But it's a good story.'

'I can just remember it. But it was a good story then.'

'It's a jolly good story, but I wish I hadn't read it before.'

'This is terrible,' P.O.M. said. 'You couldn't read it.'

'Do you want this one?'

'Don't be ornamental,' she said. 'No, I'll finish this.'

'Go on. Take it.'

'I'll give it right back.'

'Hey, M'Cola,' I said. 'Beer?'

'N'Dio,' he said with great force, and from the chop box one of the
natives had carried on his head produced, in its straw casing, a bottle
of German beer, one of the sixty-four bottles Dan had brought from the
German trading station. Its neck was wrapped in silver foil and on its
black and yellow label there was a horseman in armour. It was still cool
from the night and opened by the tin-opener it creamed into three cups,
thick-foamed, full-bodied.

'No,' said Pop. 'Very bad for the liver.'

'Come on.'

'All right.'

We all drank and when M'Cola opened the second bottle Pop refused,
firmly.

'Go on. It means more to you. I'm going to take a nap.'

'Poor old Mama?'

'Just a little.'

'All for me,' I said. M'Cola smiled and shook his head at this drinking.
I lay back against the tree and watched the wind bringing the clouds and
drank the beer slowly out of the bottle. It was cooler that way and it
was excellent beer. After a while Pop and P.O.M. were both asleep and I
got back the Sevastopol book and read in 'The Cossacks' again. It was a
good story.

When they woke up we had lunch of cold sliced tenderloin, bread, and
mustard, and a can of plums, and drank the third, and last, bottle of
beer. Then we read again and all went to sleep. I woke thirsty and was
unscrewing the top from a water bottle when I heard a rhino snort and
crash in the brush of the river bed. Pop was awake and heard it too and
we took our guns, without speaking, and started toward where the noise
had come from. M'Cola found the tracks. The rhino had come up the
stream, evidently he had winded us when he was only about thirty yards
away, and had gone on up. We could not follow the tracks the way the
wind was blowing so we circled away from the stream and back to the edge
of the burned place to get above him and then hunted very carefully
against the wind along the stream through very thick bush, but we did
not find him. Finally Droopy found where he had gone up the other side
and on into the hills. From the tracks it did not seem a particularly
large one.

We were a long way from camp, at least four hours as we had come, and
much of it up-hill going back, certainly there would be that long climb
out of the canyon; we had a wounded buffalo to deal with, and when we
came out on the edge of the burned country again, we agreed that we
should get P.O.M. and get started. It was still hot, but the sun was on
its way down and for a good way we would be on the heavily shaded game
trail on the high bank above the stream. When we found P.O.M. she
pretended to be indignant at our going off and leaving her alone but she
was only teasing us.

We started off, Droop and his spearsman in the lead, walking along the
shadow of the trail that was broken by the sun through the leaves.
Instead of the cool early morning smell of the forest there was a nasty
stink like the mess cats make.

'What makes the stink?' I whispered to Pop.

'Baboons,' he said.

A whole tribe of them had gone on just ahead of us and their droppings
were everywhere. We came up to the place where the rhinos and the buff
had come out of the reeds and I located where I thought the buff had
been when I shot. M'Cola and Droopy were casting about like hounds and I
thought they were at least fifty yards too high up the bank when Droop
held up a leaf.

'He's got blood,' Pop said. We went up to them. There was a great
quantity of blood, black now on the grass, and the trail was easy to
follow. Droop and M'Cola trailed one on each side, leaving the trail
between them, pointing to each blood spot formally with a long stem of
grass. I always thought it would be better for one to trail slowly and
the other cast ahead but this was the way they trailed, stooped heads,
pointing each dried splash with their grass stems and occasionally, when
they picked up the tracks after losing them, stooping to pluck a grass
blade or a leaf that had the black stain on it. I followed them with the
Springfield, then came Pop, with P.O.M. behind him. Droop carried my big
gun and Pop had his. M'Cola had P.O.M.'s Mannlicher slung over his
shoulder. None of us spoke and everyone seemed to regard it as a pretty
serious business. In some high grass we found blood, at a pretty good
height on the grass leaves on both sides of the trail where the buff had
gone through the grass. That meant he was shot clean through. You could
not tell the original colour of the blood now, but I had a moment of
hoping he might be shot through the lungs. But farther on we came on
some droppings in the rocks with blood in them and then for a while he
had dropped dung wherever he climbed and all of it was blood-spotted. It
looked, now, like a gut shot or one through the paunch. I was more
ashamed of it all the time.

'If he comes don't worry about Droopy or the others,' Pop whispered.
'They'll get out of his way. Stop him.'

'Right up the nose,' I said.

'Don't try anything fancy,' Pop said. The trail climbed steadily, then
twice looped back on itself and for a time seemed to wander, without
plan, among some rocks. Once it lead down to the stream, crossed a
rivulet of it and then came back up on the same bank, grading up through
the trees.

'I think we'll find him dead,' I whispered to Pop. That aimless turn had
made me see him, slow and hard hit, getting ready to go down.

'I hope so,' Pop said.

But the trail went on, where there was little grass now, and trailing
was much slower and more difficult. There were no tracks now that I
could see, only the probable line he would take, verified by a shiny
dark splatter of dried blood on a stone. Several times we lost it
entirely and, the three of us making casts, one would find it, point
and whisper 'Damu', and we would go on again. Finally it led down from a
rocky hillside with the last of the sun on it, down into the stream bed
where there was a long, wide patch of the highest dead reeds that we had
seen. These were higher and thicker even than the slough the buff had
come out of in the morning and there were several game trails that went
into them.

'Not good enough to take the little Memsahib in there,' Pop said.

'Let her stay here with M'Cola,' I said.

'It's not good enough for the little Memsahib,' Pop repeated. 'I don't
know why we let her come.'

'She can wait here. Droop wants to go on.'

'Right you are. We'll have a look.'

'You wait here with M'Cola,' I whispered over my shoulder.

We followed Droopy into the thick, tall grass that was five feet above
our heads, walking carefully on the game trail, stooping forward, trying
to make no noise breathing. I was thinking of the buff the way I had
seen them when we had gotten the three that time, how the old bull had
come out of the bush, groggy as he was, and I could see the horns, the
boss coming far down, the muzzle out, the little eyes, the roll of fat
and muscle on his thin-haired, grey, scaly-hided neck, the heavy power
and the rage in him, and I admired him and respected him, but he was
slow, and all the while we shot I felt that it was fixed and that we had
him. This was different, this was no rapid fire, no pouring it on him as
he comes groggy into the open, if he comes now I must be quiet inside
and put it down his nose as he comes with the head out. He will have to
put the head down to hook, like any bull, and that will uncover the old
place the boys wet their knuckles on and I will get one in there and
then must go sideways into the grass and he would be Pop's from then on
unless I could keep the rifle when I jumped. I was sure I could get that
one in and jump if I could wait and watch his head come down. I knew I
could do that and that the shot would kill him but how long would it
take? That was the whole thing. How long would it take? Now, going
forward, sure he was in here, I felt the elation, the best elation of
all, of certain action to come, action in which you had something to do,
in which you can kill and come out of it, doing something you are
ignorant about and so not scared, no one to worry about and no
responsibility except to perform something you feel sure you can
perform, and I was walking softly ahead watching Droopy's back and
remembering to keep the sweat out of my glasses when I heard a noise
behind us and turned my head. It was P.O.M. with M'Cola coming on our
tracks.

'For God's sake,' Pop said. He was furious.

We got her back out of the grass and up on to the bank and made her
realize that she must stay there. She had not understood that she was to
stay behind. She had heard me whisper something but thought it was for
her to come behind M'Cola.

'That spooked me,' I said to Pop.

'She's like a little terrier,' he said. 'But it's not good enough.'

We were looking out over that grass.

'Droop wants to go still,' I said. 'I'll go as far as he will. When he
says no that lets us out. After all, I gut-shot the son of a bitch.'

'Mustn't do anything silly, though.'

'I can kill the son of a bitch if I get a shot at him. If he comes he's
got to give me a shot.'

The fright P.O.M. had given us about herself had made me noisy.

'Come on,' said Pop. We followed Droopy back in and it got worse and
worse, and I do not know about Pop but about half-way I changed to the
big gun and kept the safety off and my hand over the trigger guard and I
was plenty nervous by the time Droopy stopped and shook his head and
whispered 'Hapana'. It had gotten so you could not see a foot ahead and
it was all turns and twists. It was really bad and the sun was only on
the hillside now. We both felt good because we had made Droopy do the
calling off and I was relieved as well. What we had followed him into
had made my fancy shooting plans seem very silly and I knew all we had
in there was Pop to blast him over with the four-fifty number two after
I'd maybe miss him with that lousy four-seventy. I had no confidence in
anything but its noise any more.

We were back trailing when we heard the porters on the hillside shout
and we ran crashing through the grass to try to get a high enough place
to see to shoot. They waved their arms and shouted that the buffalo had
come out of the reeds and gone past them and then M'Cola and Droopy were
pointing, and Pop had me by the sleeve trying to pull me to where I
could see them and then, in the sunlight, high up on the hillside
against the rocks I saw two buffalo. They shone very black in the sun
and one was much bigger than the other and I remember thinking this was
our bull and that he had picked up a cow and she had made the pace and
kept him going. Droop had handed me the Springfield and I slipped my arm
through the sling and sighting, the buff now all seen through the
aperture, I froze myself inside and held the bead on the top of his
shoulder and as I started to squeeze he started running and I swung
ahead of him and loosed off. I saw him lower his head and jump like a
bucking horse as he comes out of the chutes and as I threw the shell,
slammed the bolt forward and shot again, behind him as he went out of
sight, I knew I had him. Droopy and I started to run and as we were
running I heard a low bellow. I stopped and yelled at Pop, 'Hear him?
I've got him, I tell you!'

'You hit him,' said Pop. 'Yes.'

'Goddamn it, I killed him. Didn't you hear him bellow?'

'No.'

'Listen!' We stood listening and there it came, clear, a long, moaning,
unmistakable bellow.

'By God,' Pop said. It was a very sad noise.

M'Cola grabbed my hand and Droopy slapped my back and all laughing we
started on a running scramble, sweating, rushing, up the ridge through
the trees and over rocks. I had to stop for breath, my heart pounding,
and wiped the sweat off my face and cleaned my glasses.

'Kufa!' M'Cola said, making the word for dead almost explosive in its
force. 'N'Dio! Kufa!'

'Kufa!' Droopy said grinning.

'Kufa!' M'Cola repeated and we shook hands again before we went on
climbing. Then, ahead of us, we saw him, on his back, throat stretched
out to the full, his weight on his horns, wedged against a tree. M'Cola
put his finger in the bullet hole in the centre of the shoulder and
shook his head happily.

Pop and P.O.M. came up, followed by the porters.

'By God, he's a better bull than we thought,' I said.

'He's not the same bull. This is a real bull. That must have been our
bull with him.'

'I thought he was with a cow. It was so far away I couldn't tell.'

'It must have been four hundred yards. By God, you _can_ shoot that
little pipsqueak.'

'When I saw him put his head down between his legs and buck I knew we
had him. The light was wonderful on him.'

'I knew you had hit him, and I knew he wasn't the same bull. So I
thought we had two wounded buffalo to deal with. I didn't hear the first
bellow.'

'It was wonderful when we heard him bellow,' P.O.M. said. 'It's such a
sad sound. It's like hearing a horn in the woods.'

'It sounded awfully jolly to me,' Pop said. 'By God, we deserve a drink
on this. That was a shot. Why didn't you ever tell us you could shoot?'

'Go to hell.'

'You know he's a damned good tracker, too, and what kind of a bird
shot?' he asked P.O.M.

'Isn't he a beautiful bull?' P.O.M. asked.

'He's a fine one. He's not old but it's a fine head.'

We tried to take pictures but there was only the little box camera and
the shutter stuck, and there was a bitter argument about the shutter
while the light failed, and I was nervous now, irritable, righteous,
pompous about the shutter and inclined to be abusive because we could
get no picture. You cannot live on a plane of the sort of elation I had
felt in the reeds and having killed, even when it is only a buffalo, you
feel a little quiet inside. Killing is not a feeling that you share and
I took a drink of water and told P.O.M. I was sorry I was such a bastard
about the camera. She said it was all right and we were all right again
looking at the buff with M'Cola making the cuts for the headskin and we
standing close together and feeling fond of each other and understanding
everything, camera and all. I took a drink of the whisky and it had no
taste and I felt no kick from it.

'Let me have another,' I said. The second one was all right.

We were going on ahead to camp with the chased-by-a-rhino spearman as
guide and Droop was going to skin out the head and they were going to
butcher and cache the meat in trees so the hyenas would not get it. They
were afraid to travel in the dark and I told Droopy he could keep my big
gun. He said he knew how to shoot so I took out the shells and put on
the safety and handing it to him told him to shoot. He put it to his
shoulder, shut the wrong eye, and pulled hard on the trigger, and
again, and again. Then I showed him about the safety and had him put it
on and off and snap the gun a couple of times. M'Cola became very
superior during Droopy's struggle to fire with the safety on and Droopy
seemed to get much smaller. I left him the gun and two cartridges and
they were all busy butchering in the dusk when we followed the spearsman
and the tracks of the smaller buff, which had no blood on them, up to
the top of the hill and on our way toward home. We climbed around the
tops of valleys, went across gulches, up and down ravines and finally
came on to the main ridge, it dark and cold in the evening, the moon not
yet up, we plodded along, all tired. Once M'Cola, in the dark, loaded
with Pop's heavy gun and an assortment of water bottles, binoculars, and
a musette bag of books, sung out a stream of what sounded like curses at
the guide who was striding ahead.

'What's he say?' I asked Pop.

'He's telling him not to show off his speed. That there is an old man in
the party.'

'Who does he mean, you or himself?'

'Both of us.'

We saw the moon come up, smoky red over the brown hills, and we came
down through the chinky lights of the village, the mud houses all closed
tight, and the smells of goats and sheep, and then across the stream and
up the bare slope to where the fire was burning in front of our tents.
It was a cold night with much wind.

In the morning we hunted, picked up a track at a spring and trailed a
rhino all over the high orchard country before he went down into a
valley that led, steeply, into the canyon. It was very hot and the tight
boots of the day before had chafed P.O.M.'s feet. She did not complain
about them but I could see they hurt her. We were all luxuriantly,
restfully tired.

'The hell with them,' I said to Pop. 'I don't want to kill another one
unless he's big. We might hunt a week for a good one. Let's stand on the
one we have and pull out and join Karl. We can hunt oryx down there and
get those zebra hides and get on after the kudu.'

We were sitting under a tree on the summit of a hill and could see off
over all the country and the canyon running down to the Rift Valley and
Lake Manyara.

'It would be good fun to take porters and a light outfit and hunt on
ahead of them down through that valley and out to the lake,' Pop said.

'That would be swell. We could send the lorries around to meet us at
what's the name of the place?'

'Maji-Moto.'

'Why don't we do that?' P.O.M. asked.

'We'll ask Droopy how the valley is.'

Droopy didn't know but the spearman said it was very rough and bad going
where the stream came down through the rift wall. He did not think we
could get the loads through. We gave it up.

'That's the sort of trip to make, though,' Pop said. 'Porters don't cost
as much as petrol.'

'Can't we make trips like that when we come back?' P.O.M. asked.

'Yes,' Pop said. 'But for a big rhino you want to go up on Mount Kenya.
You'll get a real one there. Kudu's the prize here. You'd have to go up
to Kalal to get one in Kenya. Then if we get them, we'll have time to go
on down in that Handeni country for sable.'

'Let's get going,' I said without moving.

Since a long time we had all felt good about Karl's rhino. We were glad
he had it and all of that had taken on a correct perspective. Maybe he
had his oryx by now. I hoped so. He was a fine fellow, Karl, and it was
good he got these extra fine heads.

'How do you feel, poor old Mama?'

'I'm fine. If we _are_ going I'll be just as glad to rest my feet. But I
love this kind of hunting.'

'Let's get back, eat, break camp, and get down there to-night.'

That night we got into our old camp at M'utu-Umbu, under the big trees,
not far from the road. It had been our first camp in Africa and the
trees were as big, as spreading, and as green, the stream as clear and
fast flowing, and the camp as fine as when we had first been there. The
only difference was that now it was hotter at night, the road in was
hub-deep in dust, and we had seen a lot of country.




CHAPTER FOUR


We had come down to the Rift Valley by a sandy red road across a high
plateau, then up and down through orchard-bushed hills, around a slope
of forest to the top of the rift wall where we could look down and see
the plain, the heavy forest below the wall, and the long, dried-up edged
shine of Lake Manyara rose-coloured at one end with a half million tiny
dots that were flamingoes. From there the road dropped steeply along the
face of the wall, down into the forest, on to the flatness of the
valley, through cultivated patches of green corn, bananas, and trees I
did not know the names of, walled thick with forest, past a Hindu's
trading store and many huts, over two bridges where clear, fast-flowing
streams ran, through more forest, thinning now to open glades, and into
a dusty turn-off that led into a deeply rutted, dust-filled track
through bushes to the shade of M'utu-Umbu camp.

That night after dinner we heard the flamingoes flighting in the dark.
It was like the sound the wings of ducks make as they go over before it
is light, but slower, with a steady beat, and multiplied a thousand
times. Pop and I were a little drunk and P.O.M. was very tired. Karl was
gloomy again. We had taken the edge from his victories over rhino and
now that was past anyway and he was facing possible defeat by oryx.
Then, too, they had found not a leopard but a marvellous lion, a huge,
black-maned lion that did not want to leave, on the rhino carcass when
they had gone there the next morning and could not shoot him because he
was in some sort of forest reserve.

'That's rotten,' I said and I tried to feel bad about it but I was still
feeling much too good to appreciate any one else's gloom, and Pop and I
sat, tired through to our bones, drinking whisky and soda and talking.

The next day we hunted oryx in the dried-up dustiness of the Rift Valley
and finally found a herd way off at the edge of the wooded hills on the
far side above a Masai village. They were like a bunch of Masai donkeys
except for the beautiful straight-slanting black horns and all the heads
looked good. When you looked closely two or three were obviously better
than the others and sitting on the ground I picked what I thought was
the very best of the lot and as they strung out I made sure of this one.
I heard the bullet smack and watched the oryx circle out away from the
others, the circle quickening, and knew I had it. So I did not shoot
again.

This was the one Karl had picked, too. I did not know that, but had
shot, deliberately selfish, to make sure of the best this time at least,
but he got another good one and they went off in a wind-lifted cloud of
grey dust as they galloped. Except for the miracle of their horns there
was no more excitement in shooting them than if they had been donkeys,
and after the lorry came up and M'Cola and Charo had skinned the heads
out and cut up the meat we rode home in the blowing dust, our faces
grey with it, and the valley one long heat mirage.

We stayed at that camp two days. We had to get some zebra hides that we
had promised friends at home and it needed time for the skinner to
handle them properly. Getting the zebra was no fun; the plain was dull,
now that the grass had dried, hot and dusty after the hills, and the
picture that remains is of sitting against an ant hill with, in the
distance, a herd of zebra galloping in the grey heat haze, raising a
dust, and on the yellow plain, the birds circling over a white patch
there, another beyond, there a third, and looking back, the plume of
dust of the lorry coming with the skinners and the men to cut up the
meat for the village. I did some bad shooting in the heat on a Grant's
gazelle that the volunteer skinners asked me to kill them for meat,
wounding him in a running shot after missing him three or four times,
and then following him across the plain until almost noon in that heat
until I got within range and killed him.

But that afternoon we went out along the road that ran through the
settlement and past the corner of the Hindu's general store, where he
smiled at us in well-oiled, unsuccessful-storekeeping, brotherly
humanity, and hopeful salesmanship, turned the car off to the left on to
a track that went into the deep forest, a narrow brush-bordered track
through the heavy timber, that crossed a stream on an unsound log and
pole bridge and went on until the timber thinned and we came out into a
grassy savannah that stretched ahead to the reed-edged, dried-up bed of
the lake with, far beyond, the shine of the water and the rose-pink of
the flamingoes. There were some grass huts of fishermen in the shade of
the last trees and ahead the wind blew across the grass of the savannah
and the dried bed of the lake showed a white-grey with many small
animals humping across its baked surface as our car alarmed them. They
were reed buck and they looked strange and awkward as they moved in the
distance but trim and graceful as you saw them standing close. We turned
the car out through the thick, short grass and on to the dried lake
floor and everywhere, to the left and to the right, where the streams
flowed out into the lake and made a reedy marsh that ran down toward the
receded lake, cut by canals of water, ducks were flying and we could see
big flocks of geese spread over the grassy hummocks that rose above the
marsh. The dried bed was hard and firm and we drove the car until it
commenced to look moist and soft ahead, then left the motor car standing
there, and, Karl taking Charo and I, M'Cola, to carry shells and birds,
we agreed to work one on one side and one the other of the marsh and try
to shoot and keep the birds moving while Pop and P.O.M. went into the
edge of the high reeds on the left shore of the lake where another
stream made a thick marsh to which we thought the ducks might fly.

We saw them walk across the open, a big bulky figure in a faded corduroy
coat and a very small one in trousers, grey khaki jacket, boots, and a
big hat, and then disappear as they crouched in a point of dried reeds
before we started. But as we went out to reach the edge of the stream we
soon saw the plan was no good. Even watching carefully for the firmest
footing you sunk down in the cool mud to the knees, and, as it became
less mucky and there were more hummocks broken by water, sometimes I
went in to the waist. The ducks and geese flew up out of range and after
the first flock had swung across toward where the others were hidden in
the reeds and we heard the sharp, small, double report of P.O.M.'s
28-gauge and saw the ducks wheel off and go out toward the lake, the
other scattered flocks and the geese all went toward the open water. A
flock of dark ibises, looking, with their dipped bills, like great
curlews, flew over from the marsh on the side of the stream where Karl
was and circled high above us before they went back into the reeds. All
through the bog were snipe and black and white godwits and finally, not
being able to get within range of the ducks, I began to shoot snipe to
M'Cola's great disgust. We followed the marsh out and then I crossed
another stream, shoulder high, holding my gun and shooting coat with
shells in the pocket above my head and finally trying to work toward
where P.O.M. and Pop were, found a deep flowing stream where teal were
flying, and killed three. It was nearly dark now and I found Pop and
P.O.M. on the far bank of this stream at the edge of the dried lake bed.
It all looked too deep to wade and the bottom was soft but finally I
found a heavily worn hippo trail that went into the stream and treading
on this, the bottom fairly firm under foot, I made it, the water coming
just under my armpits. As I came out on the grass and stood dripping a
flock of teal came over very fast, and, crouching to shoot in the dusk
at the same time Pop did, we cut down three that fell hard in a long
slant ahead in the tall grass. We hunted carefully and found them all.
Their speed had carried them much farther than we expected and then,
almost dark now, we started for the car across the grey dried mud of the
lake bed, me soaked and my boots squashing water, P.O.M. pleased with
the ducks, the first we'd had since the Serengetti, we all remembering
how marvellous they were to eat, and ahead we could see the car looking
very small and beyond it a stretch of flat, baked mud and then the
grassy savannah and the forest.

Next day we came in from the zebra business grey and sweat-caked with
dust that the car raised and the wind blew over us on the way home
across the plain. P.O.M. and Pop had not gone out, there was nothing for
them to do and no need for them to eat that dust, and Karl and I out on
the plain in the too much sun and dust had gone through one of those
rows that starts like this, 'What was the matter?'

'They were too far.'

'Not at the start.'

'They were too far, I tell you.'

'They get hard if you don't take them.'

'You shoot them.'

'I've got enough. We only want twelve hides altogether. You go ahead.'

Then someone, angry, shooting too fast to show he was being asked to
shoot too fast, getting up from behind the ant hill and turning away in
disgust, walking towards his partner, who says, smugly, 'What's the
matter with them?'

'They're too damned far, I tell you,' desperately.

The smug one, complacently, 'Look at them'.

The zebra that had galloped off had seen the approaching lorry of the
skinners and had circled and were standing now, broadside, in easy
range.

The one looks, says nothing, too angry now to shoot. Then says, 'Go
ahead. Shoot'.

The smug one, more righteous now than ever, refuses. 'Go ahead,' he
says.

'I'm through,' says the other. He knows he is too angry to shoot and he
feels he has been tricked. Something is always tricking him, the need to
do things other than in a regular order, or by an inexact command in
which details are not specified, or to have to do it in front of people,
or to be hurried.

'We've got eleven,' says smug face, sorry now. He knows he should not
hurry him, that he should leave him alone, that he only upsets him by
trying to speed him up, and that he has been a smugly righteous bastard
again. 'We can pick up the other one any time. Come on, Bo, we'll go
in.'

'No, let's get him. You get him.'

'No, let's go in.'

And as the car comes up and you ride in through the dust the bitterness
goes and there is only the feeling of shortness of time again.

'What you thinking about now?' you ask. 'What a son of a bitch I am,
still?'

'About this afternoon,' he says and grins, making wrinkles in the caked
dust on his face.

'Me too,' you say.

Finally the afternoon comes and you start.

This time you wear canvas ankle-high shoes, light to pull out when you
sink, you work out from hummock to hummock, picking a way across the
marsh and wade and flounder through the canals and the ducks fly as
before out to the lake, but you make a long circle to the right and come
out into the lake itself and find the bottom hard and firm and walking
knee deep in the water get outside the big flocks, then there is a shot
and you and M'Cola crouch, heads bent, and then the air is full of them,
and you cut down two, then two again, and then a high one straight
overhead, then miss a fast one straight and low to the right, then they
come whistling back, passing faster than you can load and shoot, you
brown a bunch to get cripples for decoys and then take only fancy shots
because you know now you can get all that we can use or carry. You try
the high one, straight overhead and almost leaning backward, the _coup
de roi_, and splash a big black duck down beside M'Cola, him laughing,
then, the four cripples swimming away, you decide you better kill them
and pick up. You have to run in water to your knees to get in range of
the last cripple and you slip and go face down and are sitting, enjoying
being completely wet finally, water cool on your behind, soaked with
muddy water, wiping off glasses, and then getting the water out of the
gun, wondering if you can shoot up the shells before they will swell,
M'Cola delighted with the spill. He, with the shooting coat now full of
ducks, crouches and a flock of geese pass over in easy range while you
try to pump a wet shell in. You get a shell in, shoot, but it is too
far, or you were behind, and at the shot you see the cloud of flamingoes
rise in the sun, making the whole horizon of the lake pink. Then they
settle. But after that each time after you shoot you turn and look out
into the sun on the water and see that quick rise of the unbelievable
cloud and then the slow settling.

'M'Cola,' you say and point.

'N'Dio,' he says, watching them. 'M'uzuri!' and hands you more shells.

We all had good shooting but it was best out on the lake and for three
days afterward, travelling, we had cold teal, the best of ducks to eat,
fine, plump, and tender, cold with Pan-Yan pickles, and the red wine we
bought at Babati, sitting by the road waiting for the lorries to come
up, sitting on the shady porch of the little hotel at Babati, then late
at night when the lorries finally came in and we were at the house of an
absent friend of a friend high up in the hills, cold at night, wearing
coats at the table, having waited so long for the broken-down lorry to
come that we all drank much too much and were unspeakably hungry, P.O.M.
dancing with the manager of the coffee shamba, and with Karl, to the
gramophone, me shot full of emetine and with a ringing headache drowning
it successfully in whisky-soda with Pop on the porch, it dark and the
wind blowing a gale, and then those teal coming on the table, smoking
hot and with fresh vegetables. Guinea hen were all right, and I had one
now in the lunch box in the back of the car that I would eat to-night;
but those teal were the finest of all.

From Babati we had driven through the hills to the edge of a plain,
wooded in a long stretch of glade beyond a small village where there was
a mission station at the foot of a mountain. Here we had made a camp to
hunt kudu which were supposed to be in the wooded hills and in the
forests on the flats that stretched out to the edge of the open plain.




CHAPTER FIVE


It was a hot place to camp, under trees that had been girdled to kill
them so that the tsetse fly would leave, and there was hard hunting in
the hills, which were steep, brushy, and very broken, with a hard climb
before you got up into them, and easy hunting on the wooded flats where
you wandered as though through a deer park. But everywhere were tsetse
flies, swarming around you, biting hard on your neck, through your
shirt, on arms, and behind the ears. I carried a leafy branch and
swished away at the back of my neck as we walked and we hunted five
days, from daylight until dark, coming home after dark, dead tired but
glad of the coolness and of the darkness that stopped the tsetse from
biting. We took turns hunting the hills and the flats and Karl became
steadily gloomier although he killed a very fine roan antelope. He had
gotten a very complicated personal feeling about kudu and, as always
when he was confused, it was someone's fault, the guides, the choice of
beat, the hills; these all betrayed him. The hills punished him and he
did not believe in the flats. Each day I hoped he would get one and that
the atmosphere would clear but each day his feelings about the kudu
complicated the hunting. He was never a climber and took real punishment
in the hills. I tried to take the bulk of the hill beats to relieve him
but I could see, now that he was tired he felt they probably _were_ in
the hills and he was missing his chance.

In the five days I saw a dozen or more kudu cows and one young bull with
a string of cows. The cows were big, grey, striped-flanked antelope with
ridiculously small heads, big ears, and a soft, fast-rushing gait that
moved them in big-bellied panic through the trees. The young bull had
the start of a spiral on his horns but they were short and dumpy and as
he ran past us at the end of a glade in the dusk, third in a string of
six cows, he was no more like a real bull than a spike elk is like a
big, old, thick-necked, dark-maned, wonder-horned, tawny-hided,
beer-horse-built bugler of a bull-elk.

Another time, headed home as the sun went down along a steep valley in
the hills, the guides pointed to two grey, white-striped, moving
animals, against the sun at the top of the hill, showing only their
flanks through the trunks of the trees and said they were kudu bulls. We
could not see the horns and when we got up to the top of the hill the
sun was gone and on the rocky ground we could not find their tracks. But
from the glimpse we had they looked higher in the legs than the cows we
saw and they might have been bulls. We hunted the ridges until dark but
never saw them again nor did Karl find them the next day when we sent
him there.

We jumped many waterbuck and once, still hunting along a ridge with a
steep gully below, we came on a waterbuck that had heard us, but not
scented us, and as we stood, perfectly quiet, M'Cola holding his hand
on mine, we watched him, only a dozen feet away, standing, beautiful,
dark, full-necked, a dark ruff on his neck, his horns up, trembling all
over as his nostrils widened searching for the scent. M'Cola was
grinning, pressing his fingers tight on my wrist and we watched the big
buck shiver from the danger that he could not locate. Then there was the
distant, heavy boom of a native black powder gun and the buck jumped and
almost ran over us as he crashed up the ridge.

Another day, with P.O.M. along, we had hunted all through the timbered
flat and come out to the edge of the plain where there were only clumps
of bush and sanseviera when we heard a deep, throaty, cough. I looked at
M'Cola.

'Simba,' he said, and did not look pleased.

'Wapi?' I whispered. 'Where?'

He pointed.

I whispered to P.O.M., 'It's a lion. Probably the one we heard early
this morning. You go back to those trees.'

We had heard a lion roaring just before daylight when we were getting
up.

'I'd rather stay with you.'

'It wouldn't be fair to Pop,' I said. 'You wait back there.'

'All right. But you _will_ be careful.'

'I won't take anything but a standing shot and I won't shoot unless I'm
sure of him.'

'All right.'

'Come on,' I said to M'Cola.

He looked very grave and did not like it at all.

'Wapi Simba?' I whispered.

'Here,' he said dismally and pointed at the broken islands of thick,
green spiky cover. I motioned to one of the guides to go back with
P.O.M. and we watched them go back a couple of hundred yards to the edge
of the forest.

'Come on,' I said. M'Cola shook his head without smiling but followed.
We went forward very slowly, looking into and trying to see through the
senseviera. We could see nothing. Then we heard the cough again, a
little ahead and to the right.

'_No!_' M'Cola whispered. '_Hapana_, B'wana!'

'Come on,' I said. I pointed my forefinger into my neck and wriggled the
thumb down. 'Kufa,' I whispered, meaning that I would shoot the lion in
the neck and kill him dead. M'Cola shook his head, his face grave and
sweating. 'Hapana!' he whispered.

There was an ant-hill ahead and we climbed the furrowed clay and from
the top looked all around. We could not make out anything in the green
cactus-like cover. I had believed we might see him from the ant-hill and
after we came down we went on for about two hundred yards into the
broken cactus. Once again we heard him cough ahead of us and once, a
little farther on, we heard a growl. It was very deep and very
impressive. Since the ant heap my heart had not been in it. Until that
had failed I had believed I might have a close and good shot and I knew
that if I could kill one alone, without Pop along, I would feel good
about it for a long time. I had made up my mind absolutely not to shoot
unless I knew I could kill him, I had killed three and knew what it
consisted in, but I was getting more excitement from this one than the
whole trip. I felt it was perfectly fair to Pop to take it on as long as
I had a chance to call the shot but what we were getting into now was
bad. He kept moving away as we came on, but slowly. Evidently he did not
want to move, having fed, probably, when we had heard him roaring in the
early morning, and he wanted to settle down now. M'Cola hated it. How
much of it was the responsibility he felt for me to Pop and how much was
his own acute feeling of misery about the dangerous game I did not know.
But he felt very miserable. Finally he put his hand on my shoulder, put
his face almost into mine and shook his head violently three times.

'Hapana! Hapana! Hapana! B'wana!' he protested, sorrowed, and pleaded.

After all, I had no business taking him where I could not call the shot
and it was a profound personal relief to turn back.

'All right,' I said. We turned around and came back out the same way we
had gone in, then crossed the open prairie to the trees where P.O.M. was
waiting.

'Did you see him?'

'No,' I told her. 'We heard him three or four times.'

'Weren't you frightened?'

'Pea-less,' I said, 'at the last. But I'd rather have shot him in there
than any damned thing in the world.'

'My, I'm glad you're back,' she said. I got the dictionary out of my
pocket and made a sentence in pigeon Swahili. 'Like' was the word I
wanted.

'M'Cola like Simba?'

M'Cola could grin again now and the smile moved the Chinese hairs at the
corner of his mouth.

'Hapana,' he said, and waved his hand in front of his face. 'Hapana!'

'Hapana' is a negative.

'Shoot a kudu?' I suggested.

'Good,' said M'Cola feelingly in Swahili. 'Better. Best. Tendalla, yes.
Tendalla.'

But we never saw a kudu bull out of that camp and we left two days later
to go into Babati and then down to Kondoa and strike across country
toward Handeni and the coast.

I never liked that camp, nor the guides, nor the country. It had that
picked-over, shot-out feeling. We knew there were kudu there and the
Prince of Wales had killed his kudu from that camp, but there had been
three other parties in that season, and the natives were hunting,
supposedly defending their crops from baboons, but on meeting a native
with a brass-bound musket it seemed odd that he should follow the
baboons ten miles away from his shamba up into the kudu hills to have a
shot at them, and I was all for pulling out and trying the new country
toward Handeni where none of us had ever been.

'Let's go then,' Pop said.

It seemed this new country was a gift. Kudu came out into the open and
you sat and waited for the more enormous ones and selecting a suitable
head, blasted him over. Then there were sable and we agreed that whoever
killed the first kudu should move on in the sable country. I was
beginning to feel awfully good and Karl was very cheerful at the
prospect of this new miraculous country where they were so
unsophisticated that it was really a shame to topple them over.

We left, soon after daylight, ahead of the outfit, who were to strike
camp and follow in the two lorries. We stopped in Babati at the little
hotel overlooking the lake and bought some more Pan-Yan pickles and had
some cold beer. Then we started south on the Cape to Cairo road, here
well graded, smooth, and carefully cut through wooded hills overlooking
the long yellow stretch of plains of the Masai Steppes, down and through
farming country, where the dried-breasted old women and the
shrunken-flanked, hollow-ribbed old men hoed in the cornfields, through
miles and dusty miles of this, and then into a valley of sun-baked,
eroded land where the soil was blowing away in clouds as you looked,
into the tree-shaded, pretty, whitewashed, German model-garrison town of
Kandoa-Irangi.

We left M'Cola at the crossroads to hold up our lorries when they came,
put the car into some shade and visited the military cemetery. We
intended to call on the D.O. but they were at lunch, and we did not want
to bother them, so after the military cemetery, which was a pleasant,
clean, well-kept place and as good as another to be dead in, we had some
beer under a tree in shade that seemed liquid cool after the white glare
of a sun that you could feel the weight of on your neck and shoulders,
started the car and went out to the crossroads to pick up the lorries
and head to the east into the new country.




CHAPTER SIX


It was a new country to us but it had the marks of the oldest countries.
The road was a track over shelves of solid rock, worn by the feet of the
caravans and the cattle, and it rose in the boulder-strewn un-roadliness
through a double line of trees and into the hills. The country was so
much like Aragon that I could not believe that we were not in Spain
until, instead of mules with saddle bags, we met a dozen natives
bare-legged and bare-headed dressed in white cotton cloth they wore
gathered over the shoulder like a toga; but when they had passed, the
high trees beside the track over those rocks was Spain and I had
followed this same route forged on ahead and following close behind a
horse one time watching the horror of the flies scuttling around his
crupper. They were the same camel flies we found here on the lions. In
Spain if one got inside your shirt you had to get the shirt off to kill
him. He'd go inside the neckband, down the back, around and under one
arm, make for the navel and the belly band, and if you did not get him
he would move with such intelligence and speed that, scuttling flat and
uncrushable he would make you undress completely to kill him.

That day of watching the camel flies working under the horse's tail,
having had them myself, gave me more horror than anything I could
remember except one time in a hospital with my right arm broken off
short between the elbow and the shoulder, the back of the hand having
hung down against my back, the points of the bone having cut up the
flesh of the biceps until it finally rotted, swelled, burst, and
sloughed off in pus. Alone with the pain in the night in the fifth week
of not sleeping I thought suddenly how a bull elk must feel if you break
a shoulder and he gets away and in that night I lay and felt it all, the
whole thing as it would happen from the shock of the bullet to the end
of the business and, being a little out of my head, thought perhaps what
I was going through was a punishment for all hunters. Then, getting
well, decided if it was a punishment I had paid it and at least I knew
what I was doing. I did nothing that had not been done to me. I had been
shot and I had been crippled and gotten away. I expected, always, to be
killed by one thing or another and I, truly, did not mind that any more.
Since I still loved to hunt I resolved that I would only shoot as long
as I could kill cleanly and as soon as I lost that ability I would stop.

If you serve time for society, democracy, and the other things quite
young, and declining any further enlistment make yourself responsible
only to yourself, you exchange the pleasant, comforting stench of
comrades for something you can never feel in any other way than by
yourself. That something I cannot yet define completely but the feeling
comes when you write well and truly of something and know impersonally
you have written in that way and those who are paid to read it and
report on it do not like the subject so they say it is all a fake, yet
you know its value absolutely; or when you do something which people do
not consider a serious occupation and yet you know, truly, that it is as
important and has always been as important as all the things that are in
fashion, and when, on the sea, you are alone with it and know that this
Gulf Stream you are living with, knowing, learning about, and loving,
has moved, as it moves, since before man, and that it has gone by the
shoreline of that long, beautiful, unhappy island since before Columbus
sighted it and that the things you find out about it, and those that
have always lived in it are permanent and of value because that stream,
will flow, as it has flowed, after the Indians, after the Spaniards,
after the British, after the Americans and after all the Cubans and all
the systems of governments, the richness, the poverty, the martyrdom,
the sacrifice and the venality and the cruelty are all gone as the
high-piled scow of garbage, bright-coloured, white-flecked;
ill-smelling, now tilted on its side, spills off its load into the blue
water, turning it a pale green to a depth of four or five fathoms as the
load spreads across the surface, the sinkable part going down and the
flotsam of palm fronds, corks, bottles, and used electric light globes,
seasoned with an occasional condom or a deep floating corset, the torn
leaves of a student's exercise book, a well-inflated dog, the occasional
rat, the no-longer-distinguished cat; all this well shepherded by the
boats of the garbage pickers who pluck their prizes with long poles, as
interested, as intelligent, and as accurate as historians; they have
the viewpoint; the stream, with no visible flow, takes five loads of
this a day when things are going well in La Habana and in ten miles
along the coast it is as clear and blue and unimpressed as it was ever
before the tug hauled out the scow; and the palm fronds of our
victories, the worn light bulbs of our discoveries and the empty condoms
of our great loves float with no significance against one single,
lasting thing--the stream.

So, in the front seat, thinking of the sea and of the country, in a
little while we ran out of Aragon and down to the bank of a sand river,
half a mile wide, of golden-coloured sand, shored by green trees and
broken by islands of timber and in this river the water is underneath
the sand and the game comes down at night and digs in the sand with
sharp-pointed hoofs and water flows in and they drink. We cross this
river and by now it was getting to be afternoon and we passed many
people on the road who were leaving the country ahead where there was a
famine and there were small trees and close brush now beside the road,
and then it commenced to climb and we came into some blue hills, old,
worn, wooded hills with trees like beeches and clusters of huts with
fire smoking and cattle home driven, flocks of sheep and goats and
patches of corn and I said to P.O.M., 'It's like Galicia'.

'Exactly,' she said. 'We've been through three provinces of Spain
to-day.'

'Is it really?' Pop asked.

'There's no difference,' I said. 'Only the buildings. It was like
Navarre in Droopy's country too. The limestone outcropping in the same
way, the way the land lies, the trees along the watercourses and the
springs.'

'It's damned strange how you can love a country,' Pop said.

'You two are very profound fellows,' P.O.M. said. 'But where are we
going to camp?'

'Here,' said Pop. 'As well as any place. We'll just find some water.'

We camped under some trees near three big wells where native women came
for water and, after drawing lots for location, Karl and I hunted in the
dusk around two of the hills across the road above the native village.

'It's all kudu country,' Pop said. 'You're liable to jump one anywhere.'

But we saw nothing but some Masai cattle in the timber and came home, in
the dark, glad of the walk after a day in the car, to find camp up, Pop
and P.O.M. in pyjamas by the fire, and Karl not yet in.

He came in, furious for some reason, no kudu possibly, pale, and gaunt
looking and speaking to nobody.

Later, at the fire, he asked me where we had gone and I said we had
hunted around our hill until our guide had heard them; then cut up to
the top of the hill, down, and across country to camp.

'What do you mean, heard us?'

'He said he heard you. So did M'Cola.'

'I thought we drew lots for where we would hunt.'

'We did,' I said. 'But we didn't know we had gotten around to your side
until we heard you.'

'Did _you_ hear us?'

'I heard something,' I said. 'And when I put my hand up to my ear to
listen the guide said something to M'Cola and M'Cola said, "B'wana". I
said, "What B'wana?" and he said, "B'wana Kabor". That's you. So we
figured we'd come to our limit and went up to the top and came back.'

He said nothing and looked very angry.

'Don't get sore about it,' I said.

'I'm not sore. I'm tired,' he said. I could believe it because of all
people no one can be gentler, more understanding, more self-sacrificing,
than Karl, but the kudu had become an obsession to him and he was not
himself, nor anything like himself.

'He better get one pretty quick,' P.O.M. said when he had gone into his
tent to bathe.

'Did you cut in on his country?' Pop asked me.

'Hell, no,' I said.

'He'll get one where we're going,' Pop said. 'He'll probably get a
fifty-incher.'

'All the better,' I said. 'But by God, I want to get one too.'

'You will, Old Timer,' Pop said. 'I haven't a thought but what you
will.'

'What the hell! We've got ten days.'

'We'll get sable too, you'll see. Once our luck starts to run.'

'How long have you ever had them hunt them in a good country?'

'Three weeks and leave without seeing one. And I've had them get them
the first half day. It's still hunting, the way you hunt a big buck at
home.'

'I love it,' I said. 'But I don't want that guy to beat me. Pop, he's
got the best buff, the best rhino, the best water-buck . . .'

'You beat him on oryx,' Pop said.

'What's an oryx?'

'He'll look damned handsome when you get him home.'

'I'm just kidding.'

'You beat him on impalla, on eland. You've got a first-rate bushbuck.
Your leopard's as good as his. But he'll beat you on anything where
there's luck. He's got damned wonderful luck and he's a good lad. I
think he's off his feed a little.'

'You know how fond I am of him. I like him as well as I like anyone. But
I want to see him have a good time. It's no fun to hunt if we get that
way about it.'

'You'll see. He'll get a kudu at this next camp and he'll be on top of
the wave.'

'I'm just a crabby bastard,' I said.

'Of course you are,' said Pop. 'But why not have a drink?'

'Right,' I said.

Karl came out, quiet, friendly, gentle, and understandingly delicate.

'It will be fine when we get to that new country,' he said.

'It will be swell,' I said.

'Tell me what it's like, Mr. Phillips,' he said to Pop.

'I don't know,' said Pop. 'But they say it's very pleasant hunting.
They're supposed to feed right out in the open. That old Dutchman claims
there are some remarkable heads.'

'I hope you get a sixty-incher, kid,' Karl said to me.

'You'll get a sixty-incher.'

'No,' said Karl. 'Don't kid me. I'll be happy with any kudu.'

'You'll probably get a hell of a one,' Pop said.

'Don't kid me,' Karl said. 'I know how lucky I've been. I would be happy
with any kudu. Any bull at all.'

He was very gentle and he could tell what was in your mind, forgive you
for it, and understand it.

'Good old Karl,' I said, warmed with whisky, understanding, and
sentiment.

'We're having a swell time, aren't we?' Karl said. 'Where's poor old
Mama?'

'I'm here,' said P.O.M. from the shadow. 'I'm one of those quiet
people.'

'By God if you're not,' Pop said. 'But you can puncture the old man
quick enough when he gets started.'

'That's what makes a woman a universal favourite,' P.O.M. told him.
'Give me another compliment, Mr. J.'

'By God, you're brave as a little terrier.' Pop and I had both been
drinking, it seemed.

'That's lovely.' P.O.M. sat far back in her chair, holding her hands
clasped around her mosquito boots. I looked at her, seeing her quilted
blue robe in the firelight now, and the light on her black hair. 'I
love it when you all reach the little terrier stage. Then I know the war
can't be far away. Were either of you gentlemen in the war by any
chance?'

'Not me,' said Pop. 'Your husband, one of the bravest bastards that ever
lived, an extraordinary wing shot and an excellent tracker.'

'Now he's drunk, we get the truth,' I said.

'Let's eat,' said P.O.M. 'I'm really frightfully hungry.'

We were out in the car at daylight, out on to the road and beyond the
village and, passing through a stretch of heavy bush, we came to the
edge of a plain, still misty before the sunrise, where we could see, a
long way off, eland feeding, looking huge and grey in the early morning
light. We stopped the car at the edge of the bush and getting out and
sitting down with the glasses saw there was a herd of kongoni scattered
between us and the eland and with the kongoni a single bull oryx, like a
fat, plum-coloured, Masai donkey with marvellous long, black, straight,
back-slanting horns that showed each time he lifted his head from
feeding.

'You want to go after him?' I asked Karl.

'No. You go on.'

I knew he hated to make a stalk and to shoot in front of people and so I
said, 'All right'. Also I wanted to shoot, selfishly, and Karl was
unselfish. We wanted meat badly.

I walked along the road, not looking toward the game, trying to look
casual, holding the rifle slung straight up and down from the left
shoulder away from the game. They seemed to pay no attention but fed
away steadily. I knew that if I moved toward them they would at once
move off out of range so, when from the tail of my eye I saw the oryx
drop his head to feed again, and, the shot looking possible, I sat down,
slipped my arm through the sling and as he looked up and started to move
off, quartering away, I held for the top of his back and squeezed off.
You do not hear the noise of the shot on game but the slap of the bullet
sounded as he started running across and to the right, the whole plain
back-grounding into moving animals against the rise of the sun, the
rocking-horse canter of the long-legged, grotesque kongoni, the heavy
swinging trot into gallop of the eland, and another oryx I had not seen
before running with the kongoni. This sudden life and panic all made
background for the one I wanted, now trotting, three-quartering away,
his horns held high now and I stood to shoot running, got on him, the
whole animal miniatured in the aperture and I held above his shoulders,
swung ahead and squeezed and he was down, kicking, before the crack of
the bullet striking bone came back. It was a very long and even more
lucky shot that broke a hind leg.

I ran toward him, then slowed to walk up carefully, in order not to be
blown if he jumped and ran; but he was down for good. He had gone down
so suddenly and the bullet had made such a crack as it landed that I was
afraid I had hit him on the horns but when I reached him he was dead
from the first shot behind the shoulders high up in the back and I saw
it was cutting the leg from under him that brought him down. They all
came up and Charo stuck him to make him legal meat.

'Where did you hold on him the second time?' Karl asked.

'Nowhere. A touch above and quite a way ahead and swung with him.'

'It was very pretty,' Dan said.

'By evening,' Pop said, 'he'll tell us that he broke that off leg on
purpose. That's one of his favourite shots, you know. Did you ever hear
him explain it?'

While M'Cola was skinning the head out and Charo was butchering out the
meat, a long, thin Masai with a spear came up, said good morning, and
stood, on one leg, watching the skinning. He spoke to me at some length,
and I called to Pop. The Masai repeated it to Pop.

'He wants to know if you are going to shoot something else,' Pop said.
'He would like some hides but he doesn't care about oryx hide. It is
almost worthless, he says. He wonders if you would like to shoot a
couple of kongoni or an eland. He likes those hides.'

'Tell him on our way back.'

Pop told him solemnly. The Masai shook my hand.

'Tell him he can always find me around Harry's New York Bar,' I said.

The Masai said something else and scratched one leg with the other.

'He says why did you shoot him twice?' Pop asked.

'Tell him in the morning in our tribe we always shoot them twice. Later
in the day we shoot them once. In the evening we are often half shot
ourselves. Tell him he can always find me at the New Stanley or at
Torr's.'

'He says what do you do with the horns?'

'Tell him in our tribe we give the horns to our wealthiest friends. Tell
him it is very exciting and sometimes members of the tribe are chased
across vast spaces with empty pistols. Tell him he can find me in the
book.'

Pop told the Masai something and we shook hands again, parting on a most
excellent basis. Looking across the plain through the mist we could see
some other Masai coming along the road; earth-brown skins, and knee-ing
forward stride and spears thin in the morning light.

Back in the car, the oryx head wrapped in a burlap sack, the meat tied
inside the mudguards, the blood drying, the meat dusting over, the road
of red sand now, the plain gone, the bush again close to the edge of the
road, we came up into some hills and through the little village of
Kibaya where there was a white rest house and a general store and much
farming land. It was here Dan had sat on a haystack one time waiting for
a kudu to feed out into the edge of a patch of mealy-corn and a lion had
stalked Dan while he sat and nearly gotten him. This gave us a strong
historical feeling for the village of Kibaya and as it was still cool
and the sun had not yet burned off the dew from the grass I suggested we
drink a bottle of that silver-paper-necked, yellow-and-black-labelled
German beer with the horseman in armour on it in order that we might
remember the place better and even appreciate it more. This done, full
of historical admiration for Kibaya, we learned the road was possible
ahead, left word for the lorries to follow on to the eastward and headed
on toward the coast and the kudu country.

For a long time, while the sun rose and the day became hot we drove
through what Pop had described, when I asked him what the country was
like to the south, as a million miles of bloody Africa, bush close to
the road that was impenetrable, solid, scrubby-looking undergrowth.

'There are very big elephant in there,' Pop said. 'But it's impossible
to hunt them. That's why they're very big. Simple, isn't it?'

After a long stretch of the million-mile country, the country began to
open out into dry, sandy, bush-bordered prairies that dried into a
typical desert country with occasional patches of bush where there was
water, that Pop said was like the northern frontier province of Kenya.
We watched for gerenuk, that long-necked antelope that resembles a
praying mantis in its way of carrying itself, and for the lesser kudu
that we knew lived in this desert bush, but the sun was high now and we
saw nothing. Finally the road began to lift gradually into the hills
again, low, blue, wooded hills now, with miles of sparse bush, a little
thicker than orchard bush, between, and ahead a pair of high, heavy,
timbered hills that were big enough to be mountains. These were on each
side of the road and as we climbed in the car where the red road
narrowed there was a herd of hundreds of cattle ahead being driven down
to the coast by Somali cattle buyers; the principal buyer walked ahead,
tall, good-looking in white turban and coast clothing, carrying an
umbrella as a symbol of authority. We worked the car through the herd,
finally, and coming out wound our way through pleasant looking bush, up
and out into the open between the two mountains and on, half a mile, to
a mud and thatched village in the open clearing on a little low plateau
beyond the two mountains. Looking back, the mountains looked very fine
and with timber up their slopes, outcroppings of limestone and open
glades and meadows above the timber.

'Is this the place?'

'Yes,' said Dan. 'We will find where the camping place is.'

A very old, worn, and faded black man, with a stubble of white beard, a
farmer, dressed in a dirty once-white cloth gathered at the shoulder in
the manner of a Roman toga, came out from behind one of the mud and
wattle huts, and guided us back down the road and off it to the left to
a very good camp site. He was a very discouraged-looking old man and
after Pop and Dan had talked with him he went off, seeming more
discouraged than before, to bring some guides whose names Dan had
written on a piece of paper as being recommended by a Dutch hunter who
had been here a year ago and who was Dan's great friend.

We took the seats out of the car to use as a table and benches, and
spreading our coats to sit on had a lunch in the deep shade of a big
tree, drank some beer, and slept or read while we waited for the lorries
to come up. Before the lorries arrived the old man came back with the
skinniest, hungriest, most unsuccessful looking of Wanderobos who stood
on one leg, scratched the back of his neck and carried a bow and quiver
of arrows and a spear. Queried as to whether this was the guide whose
name we had, the old man admitted he was not and went off more
discouraged than ever, to get the official guides.

When we woke next the old man was standing with the two official and
highly-clothed-in-khaki guides and two others, quite naked, from the
village. There was a long palaver and the head one of the two
khaki-panted guides showed his credentials, a To Whom It May Concern,
stating the bearer knew the country well and was a reliable boy and
capable tracker. This was signed by so and so, professional hunter. The
khaki-clothed guide referred to this professional hunter as B'wana Simba
and the name infuriated us all.

'Some bloke that killed a lion once,' Pop said.

'Tell him I am B'wana Fisi, the hyena slaughterer,' I told Dan. 'B'wana
Fisi chokes them with his naked hands.'

Dan was telling them something else.

'Ask them if they would like to meet B'wana Hop-Toad, the inventor of
the hoptoads and Mama Tziggi, who owns all these locusts.'

Dan ignored this. It seemed they were discussing money. After
ascertaining their customary daily wage, Pop told them if either of us
killed a kudu the guide would receive fifteen shillings.

'You mean a pound,' said the leading guide.

'They seem to know what they're up to,' Pop said. 'I must say I don't
care for this sportsman in spite of what B'wana Simba says.'

B'wana Simba, by the way, we later found out to be an excellent hunter
with a wonderful reputation on the coast.

'We'll put them into two lots and you draw from them,' Pop suggested,
'one naked one and one with breeches in each lot. I'm all for the naked
savage, myself, as a guide.'

On suggesting to the two testimonial-equipped, breeched guides that they
select an unclothed partner, we found this would not work out. Loud
Mouth, the financial and, now, theatrical, genius who was giving a
gesture-by-gesture reproduction of How B'wana Simba Killed His Last Kudu
interrupted it long enough to state he would only hunt with Abdullah.
Abdullah, the short, thick-nosed, educated one, was His Tracker. They
always hunted together. He himself did not track. He resumed the
pantomime of B'wana Simba and another character known as B'wana Doktor
and the horned beasts.

'We'll take the two savages as one lot and these two Oxonians as the
other,' Pop said.

'I _hate_ that theatrical bastard,' I said.

'He may be marvellous,' Pop said doubtfully. Anyway, you're a tracker,
you know. The old man says the other two are good.'

'Thank you. Go to hell. Will you hold the straws?'

Pop arranged two grass stems in his fist. 'The long one is for David
Garrick and his pal,' he explained. 'The short one is the two nudist
sportsmen.'

'Do you want to draw first?'

'Go ahead,' Karl said.

I drew David Garrick and Abdullah.

'I got the bloody tragedian.'

'He may be very good,' Karl said.

'Do you want to trade?'

'No. He may be a marvel.'

'Now we'll draw for choice of beats. The long straw gets first choice,'
Pop explained.

'Go ahead and draw.'

Karl drew the short one.

'What are the beats?' I asked Pop.

There was a long conversation in which our David simulated the killing
of half a dozen kudu from different types of ambush, surprise, stalks in
the open, and jumping them in the bush.

Finally Pop said, 'It seems there's some sort of a salt-lick where they
come to lick salt and thousands are slain. Then sometimes you just
stroll around the hill there and pot the poor beggars in the open. If
you're feeling frightfully fit, you climb for them and up in the crags
you knock them over as they stroll out to feed.'

'I'll take the salt-lick.'

'Mind you only shoot the very biggest sort,' Pop said.

'When do we start?' Karl asked.

'The salt-lick is supposed to be an early morning-show,' Pop told us.
'But Old Hem might as well have a look at it to-night. It's about five
miles down the road before you start to walk. He'll start first and take
the car. You can start back in the hills any time after the sun gets a
little farther down.'

'What about the Memsahib?' I asked. 'Should she go with me?'

'I don't think it's advisable,' Pop said seriously. 'The fewer people
when you're after kudu the better.'

M'Cola, Theatre Business, Abdullah, and I came back that evening late in
the cool of the night and full of excitement as we came up to the fire.
The dust of the salt-lick had been cut up and printed deep with fresh
kudu tracks and there were several big bull tracks. The blind made a
marvellous ambush and I was as confident and as sure of a shot at kudu
the next morning as I would be sure of a shot at ducks from a good
blind, with a fine stock of decoys out, cold weather, and the certainty
of a flight on.

'It's airtight. It's foolproof. It's even a shame. What's his name,
Booth, Barrett, McCullough--you know who I mean . . .'

'Charles Laughton,' said Pop, pulling on his pipe.

'That's the one. Fred Astaire. Society's hoofer and the world's. He's an
ace. Found the blind and everything. Knew where the salt-lick was. Could
tell which way the wind blew by simply scattering dust. He's a marvel.
B'wana Simba trains 'em, pal. Pop, we have them in the container. It's
only a question of not spoiling the meat and selecting the more rugged
specimens. I'll kill you two to-morrow on that lick. Citizens, I feel
very well.'

'What _have_ you been drinking?'

'Not a damned thing, really. Call Garrick. Tell him I'll put him in the
cinema. Got a part for him. Little thing I thought up on the way home.
It may not work out but I like the plot. Othello or The Moor of Venice.
D'you like it? It's got a wonderful idea. You see this jig we call
Othello falls in love with this girl who's never been around at all so
we call her Desdemona. Like it? They've been after me to write it for
years but I drew the colour line. Let him go out and get a reputation, I
told them. Harry Wills, hell. Paulino beat him. Sharkey beat him.
Dempsey beat Sharkey. Carnera knocked him out. What if nobody saw the
punch? Where the hell were we, Pop? Harry Greb is dead you know.'

'We were just coming into Town,' Pop said. 'Chaps were throwing things
at you and we couldn't find out why.'

'I remember,' P.O.M. said. 'Why didn't you make him draw the colour
line, Mr. J. P.?'

'I was frightfully tired,' Pop said.

'You're very distinguished looking, though,' P.O.M. said. 'What are we
going to do with this goofy?'

'Throw a drink into the brute and see if he'll quiet down.'

'I'm quiet now,' I said. 'But, by God, I feel awfully good about
to-morrow.'

Just then who should come into camp but old Karl with his two naked
savages and his half-size, very devout Mohammedan gun bearer, Charo. In
the firelight old Karl looked a greyish, yellowish white in the face and
he took off his Stetson.

'Well, did you get one?' he asked.

'No. But they're there. What did you do?'

'Walked along a goddamned road. How do they expect to find kudu along a
road with nothing but cattle and huts and people?'

He did not look like himself and I thought he must be ill. But coming in
like a death's head when we had been clowning made me behave badly again
and I said, 'We drew lots, you know'.

'Of course,' he said bitterly. 'We hunted along a road. What would you
expect to see? Does that seem the way to hunt kudu to you?'

'But you'll get one on the salt-lick in the morning,' P.O.M. told him
very cheerfully.

I drank off the glass of whisky and soda and heard my voice say very
cheerfully, 'You'll be sure to get one on the salt-lick in the morning'.

'You're hunting it in the morning,' Karl said.

'No. You're hunting it. I had it to-night. We're changing off. That's
been understood. Isn't it, Pop?'

'Quite,' Pop said. No one was looking at anyone else.

'Have a whisky and soda, Karl,' P.O.M. said.

'All right,' Karl said.

We had one of those quiet meals. In bed in the tent, I said, 'What in
God's name prompted you to say that about him having the lick in the
morning?'

'I don't know. I don't think that's what I meant to say. I got mixed up.
Let's not talk about it.'

'I won the damned thing drawing lots. You can't go against lots. That's
the only way the luck has a chance to even up, ever.'

'Don't let's talk about it.'

'I don't think he's well now and he doesn't feel himself. The damned
things have gotten his goat and he's liable to blow that salt-lick
higher than a kite in the state he's in.'

'Please stop talking about it.'

'I will.'

'Good.'

'Well, we made him feel good anyway.'

'I don't know that we did. Please stop talking about it.'

'I will.'

'Good.'

'Good night,' she said.

'The hell with it,' I said. 'Good night.'

'Good night.'




CHAPTER SEVEN


In the morning Karl and his outfit started for the salt-lick and
Garrick, Abdullah, M'Cola and I crossed the road, angled behind the
village up a dry watercourse and started climbing the mountains in a
mist. We headed up a pebbly, boulder-filled, dry stream bed overgrown
with vines and brush so that, climbing, you walked, stooping, in a steep
tunnel of vines and foliage. I sweated so that I was soaked through my
shirt and undergarments and when we came out on the shoulder of the
mountain and stood, looking down at the bank of clouds quilting over the
entire valley below us, the morning breeze chilled me and I had to put
on my raincoat while we glassed the country. I was too wet with sweat
to sit down and I signed Garrick to keep on going. We went around one
side of the mountain, doubled back on a higher grade and crossed over,
out of the sun that was drying my wet shirt and along the top of a
series of grassy valleys, stopping to search each one thoroughly with
the field glasses. Finally we came to a sort of amphitheatre, a
bowl-like valley of very green grass with a small stream down the middle
and timber along the far side and all the lower edge. We sat in the
shadow against some rocks, out of any breeze, watching with the glasses
as the sun rose and lighted the opposite slopes, seeing two kudu cows
and a calf feed out from the timber, moving with the quickly browsing,
then head lifted, long-staring vigilance of all browsing animals in a
forest. Animals on a plain can see so far that they have confidence and
feed very differently from animals in the woods. We could see the
vertical white stripes on their grey flanks and it was very satisfying
to watch them and to be high in the mountain that early in the morning.
Then, while we watched, there was a boom, like a rockslide. I thought at
first it was a boulder falling, but M'Cola whispered.

'B'wana Kibor! Piga!' We listened for another shot but we did not hear
one and I was sure Karl had his kudu. The cows we were watching had
heard the shot and stood, listening, then went on feeding. But they fed
into the timber. I remembered the old saying of the Indian in camp, 'One
shot, meat. Two shots, maybe. Three shots, heap s--t,' and I got out the
dictionary to translate it for M'Cola. However it came out seemed to
amuse him and he laughed and shook his head. We glassed that valley
until the sun came on to us, then hunted around the other side of the
mountain and in another fine valley saw the place where the other
B'wana, B'wana Doktor he still sounded like, had shot a fine bull kudu,
but a Masai walked down the centre of the valley while we were glassing
it and when I pretended I was going to shoot him Garrick became very
dramatic insisting it was a man, a man, a man!

'Don't shoot men?' I asked him.

'No! No! No!' he said putting his hand to his head. I took the gun down
with great reluctance, clowning for M'Cola who was grinning, and it
very hot now, we walked across a meadow where the grass was knee high
and truly swarming with long, rose-coloured, gauze-winged locusts that
rose in clouds about us, making a whirring like a mowing machine, and
climbing small hills and going down a long steep slope, we made our way
back to camp to find the air of the valley drifting with flying locusts
and Karl already in camp with his kudu.

Passing the skinner's tent he showed me the head which looked, body-less
and neck-less, the cape of hide hanging loose, wet and heavy from where
the base of the skull had been severed from the vertebral column, a very
strange and unfortunate kudu. Only the skin running from the eyes down
to the nostrils, smooth grey and delicately marked with white, and the
big, graceful ears were beautiful. The eyes were already dusty and there
were flies around them and the horns were heavy, coarse, and instead of
spiralling high they made a heavy turn and slanted straight out. It was
a freak head, heavy and ugly.

Pop was sitting under the dining tent smoking and reading.

'Where's Karl?' I asked him.

'In his tent, I think. What did you do?'

'Worked around the hill. Saw a couple of cows.'

'I'm awfully glad you got him,' I told Karl at the mouth of his tent.
'How was it?'

'We were in the blind and they motioned me to keep my head down and then
when I looked up there he was right beside us. He looked huge.'

'We heard you shoot. Where did you hit him?'

'In the leg first, I think. Then we trailed him and finally I hit him a
couple of more times and we got him.'

'I heard only one shot.'

'There were three or four,' Karl said.

'I guess the mountain shut off some if you were gone the other way
trailing him. He's got a heavy beam and a big spread.'

'Thanks,' Karl said. 'I hope you get a lot better one. They said there
was another one but I didn't see him.'

I went back to the dining tent where Pop and P.O.M. were. They did not
seem very elated about the kudu.

'What's the matter with you?' I asked.

'Did you see the head?' P.O.M. asked.

'Sure.'

'It's _awful_ looking,' she said.

'It's a kudu. He's got another one still to go.'

'Charo and the trackers said there was another bull with this one. A big
bull with a wonderful head.'

'That's all right. I'll shoot him.'

'If he ever comes back.'

'It's fine he has one,' P.O.M. said.

'I'll bet he'll get the biggest one ever known, now,' I said.

'I'm sending him down with Dan to the sable country,' Pop said. 'That
was the agreement. The first to kill a kudu to get first crack at the
sable.'

'That's fine.'

'Then as soon as you get your kudu we'll move down there too.'

'_Good._'




PART III

PURSUIT AND FAILURE




CHAPTER ONE


That all seemed a year ago. Now, this afternoon in the car, on the way
out to the twenty-eight-mile salt-lick, the sun on our faces, just
having shot the guinea fowl, having, in the last five days, failed on
the lick where Karl shot his bull, having failed in the hills, the big
hills and the small hills, having failed on the flats, losing a shot the
night before on this lick because of the Austrian's lorry, I knew there
were only two days more to hunt before we must leave. M'Cola knew it
too, and we were hunting together now, with no feeling of superiority on
either side any more, only a shortness of time and our disgust that we
did not know the country and were saddled with these farcical bastards
as guides.

Kamau, the driver, was a Kikuyu, a quiet man of about thirty-five who,
with an old brown tweed coat some shooter had discarded, trousers
heavily patched on the knees and ripped open again, and a very ragged
shirt, managed always to give an impression of great elegance. Kamau was
very modest, quiet, and an excellent driver, and now, as we came out of
the bush country and into an open, scrubby, desert-looking stretch, I
looked at him, whose elegance, achieved with an old coat and a safety
pin, whose modesty, pleasantness and skill I admired so much now, and
thought how, when we first were out, he had very nearly died of fever,
and that if he had died it would have meant nothing to me except that we
would be short a driver; while now whenever or wherever he should die I
would feel badly. Then abandoning the sweet sentiment of the distant and
improbable death of Kamau, I thought what a pleasure it would be to
shoot David Garrick in the behind, just to see the look on his face,
sometime when he was dramatizing a stalk, and, just then, we put up
another flock of guineas. M'Cola handed me the shotgun and I shook my
head. He nodded violently and said, 'Good. Very Good', and I told Kamau
to go on. This confused Garrick who began an oration. Didn't we want
guineas? Those were guineas. The finest kind. I had seen by the
speedometer that we were only about three miles from the salt and had no
desire to spook a bull off of it, by a shot, to frighten him in the way
we had seen the lesser kudu leave the salt when he heard the lorry noise
while we were in the blind.

We left the lorry under some scrubby trees about two miles from the lick
and walked along the sandy road towards the first salt place which was
in the open to the left of the trail. We had gone about a mile keeping
absolutely quiet and walking in single file, Abdullah the educated
tracker leading, then me, M'Cola, and Garrick, when we saw the road was
wet ahead of us. Where the sand was thin over the clay there was a pool
of water and you could see that a heavy rain had drenched it all on
ahead. I did not realize what this meant but Garrick threw his arms
wide, looked up to the sky and bared his teeth in anger.

'It's no good,' M'Cola whispered.

Garrick started to talk in a loud voice.

'Shut up, you bastard,' I said, and put my hand to my mouth. He kept on
talking in above normal tones and I looked up 'shut up' in the
dictionary while he pointed to the sky and the rained-out road. I
couldn't find 'shut up' so I put the back of my hand against his mouth
with some firmness and he closed it in surprise.

''Cola,' I said.

'Yes,' said M'Cola.

'What's the matter?'

'Salt no good.'

'Ah.'

So that was it. I had thought of the rain only as something that made
tracking easy.

'When the rain?' I asked.

'Last night,' M'Cola said.

Garrick started to talk and I placed the back of my hand against his
mouth.

''Cola.'

'Yes.'

'Other salt,' pointing in the direction of the big lick in the woods,
which I knew was a good bit higher because we went very slightly up hill
through the brush to reach it. 'Other salt good?'

'Maybe.'

M'Cola said something in a very low voice to Garrick who seemed deeply
hurt but kept his mouth shut and we went on down the road, walking
around the wet places, to where, sure enough, the deep depression of the
salt-lick was half filled with water. Garrick started to whisper a
speech here but M'Cola shut him up again.

'Come on,' I said, and, M'Cola ahead, we started trailing up the damp,
sandy, ordinarily dry watercourse that led through the trees to the
upper lick.

M'Cola stopped dead, leaned over to look at the damp sand, then
whispered, 'Man', to me. There was the track.

'Shenzi,' he said, which meant a wild man.

We trailed the man, moving slowly through the trees and stalking the
lick carefully, up and into the blind. M'Cola shook his head.

'No good,' he said. 'Come on.'

We went over to the lick. There it was all written plainly. There were
the tracks of three big bull kudu in the moist bank beyond the lick
where they had come to the salt. Then there were the sudden, deep,
knifely-cut tracks where they made a spring when the bow twanged and the
slashing heavily cut prints of their hoofs as they had gone off up the
bank and then, far-spaced, the tracks running into the bush. We trailed
them, all three, but no man's track joined theirs. The bow-man missed
them.

M'Cola said, 'Shenzi!' putting great hate into the word. We picked up
the shenzi's tracks and saw where he had gone on back to the road. We
settled down in the blind and waited there until it was dark and a light
rain began to fall. Nothing came to the salt. In the rain we made our
way back to the lorry. Some wild-man had shot at our kudu and spooked
them away from the salt and now the lick was being ruined.

Kamau had rigged a tent out of a big canvas ground cloth, hung my
mosquito net inside, and set up the canvas cot. M'Cola brought the food
inside the shelter tent.

Garrick and Abdullah built a fire and they, Kamau and M'Cola cooked over
it. They were going to sleep in the lorry. It rained drizzlingly and I
undressed, got into mosquito boots and heavy pyjamas and sat on the cot,
ate a breast of roast guinea hen and drank a couple of tin cups of half
whisky and water.

M'Cola came in, grave, solicitous, and very awkward inside a tent and
took my clothes out from where I had folded them to make a pillow and
folded them again, very un-neatly, and put them under the blankets. He
brought three tins to see if I did not want them opened.

'No.'

'Chai?' he asked.

'The hell with it.'

'No chai?'

'Whisky better.'

'Yes,' he said feelingly. 'Yes.'

'Chai in the morning. Before the sun.'

'Yes, B'wana M'Kumba.'

'You sleep here. Out of the rain.' I pointed to the canvas where the
rain was making the finest sound that we, who live much outside of
houses, ever hear. It was a lovely sound, even though it was bitching
us.

'Yes.'

'Go on. Eat.'

'Yes. No chai?'

'The hell with tea.'

'Whisky?' he asked hopefully.

'Whisky finish.'

'Whisky,' he said confidently.

'All right,' I said. 'Go eat,' and pouring the cup half and half with
water got in under the mosquito bar, found my clothes and again made
them into a pillow, and lying on my side drank the whisky very slowly,
resting on one elbow, then dropped the cup down under the bar on to the
ground, felt under the cot for the Springfield, put the searchlight
beside me in the bed under the blanket, and went to sleep listening to
the rain. I woke when I heard M'Cola come in, make his bed and go to
sleep, and I woke once in the night and heard him sleeping by me; but in
the morning he was up and had made the tea before I was awake.

'Chai,' he said, pulling on my blanket.

'Bloody chai,' I said, sitting up still asleep.

It was a grey, wet morning. The rain had stopped but the mist hung over
the ground and we found the salt-lick rained out and not a track near
it. Then we hunted through the wet scrub on the flat hoping to find a
track in the soaked earth and trail a bull until we could see him. There
were no tracks. We crossed the road and followed the edge of the scrub
around a moor-like open stretch. I hoped we might find the rhino but
while we came on much fresh rhino dung there were no tracks since the
rain. Once we heard tick birds and looking up saw them in jerky flight
above us headed to the northward over the heavy scrub. We made a long
circle through there but found nothing but a fresh hyena track and a cow
kudu track. In a tree M'Cola pointed out a lesser kudu skull with one
beautiful, long, curling horn. We found the other horn below in the
grass and I screwed it back on to its bone base.

'Shenzi,' M'Cola said and imitated a man pulling a bow. The skull was
quite clean but the hollow horns had some damp residue in them, smelled
unbearably foul and, giving no sign of having noticed the stench, I
handed them to Garrick who promptly, without sign gave them to Abdullah.
Abdullah wrinkled the edge of his flat nose and shook his head. They
really smelled abominably. M'Cola and I grinned and Garrick looked
virtuous.

I decided a good idea might be to drive along the road in the car,
watching for kudu, and hunt any likely-looking clearings. We went back
to the car and did this, working several clearings with no luck. By then
the sun was up and the road was becoming populous with travellers, both
white-clothed and naked, and we decided to head for camp. On our way in,
we stopped and stalked the other salt-lick. There was an impalla on it
looking very red where the sun struck his hide in the patches between
the grey trees and there were many kudu tracks. We smoothed them over
and drove on into camp to find a sky full of locusts passing over, going
to the westward, making the sky, as you looked up, seem a pink dither of
flickering passage, flickering like an old cinema film, but pink instead
of grey. P.O.M. and Pop came out and were very disappointed. No rain had
fallen in camp and they had been sure we would have something when we
came in.

'Did my literary pal get off?'

'Yes,' Pop said. 'He's gone into Handeni.'

'He told me all about American women,' P.O.M. said. 'Poor old Poppa, I
was sure you'd get one. Damn the rain.'

'How are American women?'

'He thinks they're terrible.'

'Very sound fellow,' said Pop. 'Tell me just what happened to-day.'

We sat in the shade of the dining tent and I told them.

'A Wanderobo,' Pop said. 'They're frightful shots. Bad luck.'

'I thought it might be one of those travelling sportsmen you see with
their bows slung going along the road. He saw the lick by the road and
trailed up to the other one.'

'Not very likely. They carry those bows and arrows as protection.
They're not hunters.'

'Well, whoever it was put it on us.'

'Bad luck. That, and the rain. I've had scouts out here on both the
hills but they've seen nothing.'

'Well, we're not bitched until to-morrow night. When do we have to
leave?'

'After to-morrow.'

'That bloody savage.'

'I suppose Karl is blasting up the sable down there.'

'We won't be able to get into camp for the horns. Have you heard
anything?'

'No.'

'I'm going to give up smoking for six months for you to get one,' P.O.M.
said. 'I've started already.'

We had lunch and afterwards I went into the tent and lay down and read.
I knew we still had a chance on the lick in the morning and I was not
going to worry about it. But I _was_ worried and I did not want to go to
sleep and wake up feeling dopey so I came out and sat in one of the
canvas chairs under the open dining tent and read somebody's life of
Charles the Second and looked up every once in a while to watch the
locusts. The locusts were exciting to see and it was difficult for me to
take them as a matter of course.

Finally I went to sleep in the chair with my feet on a chop-box and when
I woke there was Garrick, the bastard, wearing a large, very floppy,
black and white ostrich-plume head-dress.

'Go away,' I said in English.

He stood smirking proudly, then turned so I could see the head-dress
from the side.

I saw Pop coming out of his tent with a pipe in his mouth. 'Look what we
have,' I called to him.

He looked, said, 'Christ', and went back into the tent.

'Come on,' I said. 'We'll just ignore it.'

Pop came out, finally, with a book and we took no notice of Garrick's
head-dress at all, sitting and talking, while he posed with it.

'Bastard's been drinking, too,' I said.

'Probably.'

'I can smell it.'

Pop, without looking at him, spoke a few words to Garrick in a very soft
voice.

'What did you tell him?'

'To go and get dressed properly and be ready to start.'

Garrick walked off, his plumes waving.

'Not the moment for his ostrich plumes,' Pop said.

'Some people probably like them.'

'That's it. Start photographing them.'

'Awful,' I said.

'Frightful,' Pop agreed.

'On the last day if we don't get anything, I'm going to shoot Garrick in
the behind. What would that cost me?'

'Might make lots of trouble. If you shoot one, you have to shoot the
other, too.'

'Only Garrick.'

'Better not shoot then. Remember it's me you get into trouble.'

'Joking, Pop.'

Garrick, un-head-dressed and with Abdullah, appeared and Pop spoke with
them.

'They want to hunt around the hill a new way.'

'Splendid. When?'

'Any time now. It looks like rain. You might get going.'

I sent Molo for my boots and a raincoat, M'Cola came out with the
Springfield; and we walked down to the car. It had been heavily cloudy
all day although the sun had come through the clouds in the forenoon for
a time and again at noon. The rains were moving up on us. Now it was
starting to rain and the locusts were no longer flying.

'I'm dopey with sleep,' I told Pop. 'I'm going to have a drink.'

We were standing under the big tree by the cooking fire with the light
rain pattering in the leaves. M'Cola brought the whisky flask and handed
it to me very solemnly.

'Have one?'

'I don't see what harm it can do.'

We both drank and Pop said, 'The hell with them.'

'The hell with them.'

'You may find some tracks.'

'We'll run them out of the country.'

In the car we turned to the right on the road, drove on up past the mud
village and turned off the road to the left on to a red, hard, clay
track that circled the edge of the hills and was close bordered on
either side with trees. It was raining fairly hard now and we drove
slowly. There seemed to be enough sand in the clay to keep the car from
slipping. Suddenly, from the back seat, Abdullah, very excited, told
Kamau to stop. We stopped with a skid, all got out, and walked back.
There was a freshly cut kudu track in the wet clay. It could not have
been made more than five minutes before as it was sharp-edged and the
dirt, that had been picked up by the inside of the hoof, was not yet
softened by the rain.

'Doumi,' Garrick said and threw back his head and spread his arms wide
to show horns that hung back over his withers. 'Kubwa Sana!' Abdullah
agreed it was a bull; a huge bull.

'Come on,' I said.

It was easy tracking and we knew we were close. In rain or snow it is
much easier to come up close to animals and I was sure we were going to
get a shot. We followed the tracks through thick brush and then out into
an open patch. I stopped to wipe the rain off my glasses and blew
through the aperture in the rear sight of the Springfield. It was
raining hard now, and I pulled my hat low down over my eyes to keep my
glasses dry. We skirted the edge of the open patch and then, ahead,
there was a crash and I saw a grey, white-striped animal making off
through the brush. I threw the gun up and M'Cola grabbed my arm,
'Manamouki!' he whispered. It was a cow kudu. But when we came up to
where it had jumped there were no other tracks. The same tracks we had
followed led, logically and with no possibility of doubt, from the road
to that cow.

'Doumi Kubwa Sana!' I said, full of sarcasm and disgust to Garrick and
made a gesture of giant horns flowing back from behind his ears.

'Manamouki Kubwa Sana,' he said very sorrowfully and patiently. 'What an
enormous cow.'

'You lousy ostrich-plumed punk,' I told him in English. 'Manamouki!
Manamouki! Manamouki!'

'Manamouki,' said M'Cola and nodded his head.

I got out the dictionary, couldn't find the words, and made it clear to
M'Cola with signs that we would circle back in a long swing to the road
and see if we could find another track. We circled back in the rain,
getting thoroughly soaked, saw nothing, found the car, and as the rain
lessened and the roads still seemed firm decided to go on until it was
dark. Puffs of cloud hung on the hillside after the rain and the trees
dripped but we saw nothing. Not in the open glades, not in the fields
where the bush thinned, not on the green hillsides. Finally it was dark
and we went back to camp. The Springfield was very wet when we got out
of the car and I told M'Cola to clean it carefully and oil it well. He
said he would and I went on and into the tent where a lantern was
burning, took off my clothes, had a bath in the canvas tub and came out
to the fire comfortable and relaxed in pyjamas, dressing-gown and
mosquito boots.

P.O.M. and Pop were sitting in their chairs by the fire and P.O.M. got
up to make me a whisky and soda.

'M'Cola told me,' Pop said from his chair by the fire.

'A damned big cow,' I told him. 'I nearly busted her. What do you think
about the morning?'

'The lick I suppose. We've scouts out to watch both of these hills. You
remember that old man from the village? He's on a wild-goose chase after
them in some country over beyond the hills. He and the Wanderobo.
They've been gone three days.'

'There's no reason why we shouldn't get one on the lick where Karl shot
his. One day is as good as another.'

'Quite.'

'It's the last damned day though and the lick may be rained out. As soon
as it's wet there's no salt. Just mud.'

'That's it.'

'I'd like to see one.'

'When you do, take your time and make sure of him. Take your time and
kill him.'

'I don't worry about that.'

'Let's talk about something else,' P.O.M. said. 'This makes me too
nervous.'

'I wish we had old Leather Pants,' Pop said. 'God, he was a talker. He
made the old man here talk too. Give us that spiel on modern writers
again.'

'Go to hell.'

'Why don't we have some intellectual life?' P.O.M. asked. 'Why don't you
men ever discuss world topics? Why am I kept in ignorance of everything
that goes on?'

'World's in a hell of a shape,' Pop stated.

'Awful.'

'What's going on in America?'

'Damned if I know! Some sort of Y.M.C.A. show. Starry eyed bastards
spending money that somebody will have to pay. Everybody in our town
quit work to go on relief. Fishermen all turned carpenters. Reverse of
the Bible.'

'How are things in Turkey?'

'Frightful. Took the fezzes away. Hanged any amount of old pals. Ismet's
still around though.'

'Been in France lately?'

'Didn't like it. Gloomy as hell. Been a bad show there just now.'

'By God,' said Pop, 'it must have been if you can believe the papers.'

'When they riot they really riot. Hell, they've got a tradition.'

'Were you in Spain for the revolution?'

'I got there late. Then we waited for two that didn't come. Then we
missed another.'

'Did you see the one in Cuba?'

'From the start.'

'How was it?'

'Beautiful. Then lousy. You couldn't believe how lousy.'

'Stop it,' P.O.M. said. 'I know about those things. I was crouched down
behind a marble-topped table while they were shooting in Havana. They
came by in cars shooting at everybody they saw. I took my drink with me
and I was very proud not to have spilled it or forgotten it. The
children said, "Mother, can we go out in the afternoon to see the
shooting?" They got so worked up about revolution we had to stop
mentioning it. Bumby got so bloodthirsty about Mr. M. he had terrible
dreams.'

'Extraordinary,' Pop said.

'Don't make fun of me. I don't want to just hear about revolutions. All
we see or hear is revolutions. I'm sick of them.'

'The old man must like them.'

'I'm sick of them.'

'You know, I've never seen one,' Pop said.

'They're beautiful. Really. For quite a while. Then they go bad.'

'They're very exciting,' P.O.M. said. 'I'll admit that. But I'm sick of
them. Really, I don't care anything about them.'

'I've been studying them a little.'

'What did you find out?' Pop asked.

'They were all very different but there were some things you could
co-ordinate. I'm going to try to write a study of them.'

'It could be damned interesting.'

'If you have enough material. You need an awful lot of past
performances. It's very hard to get anything true on anything you
haven't seen yourself because the ones that fail have such a bad press
and the winners always lie so. Then you can only really follow anything
in places where you speak the language. That limits you of course.
That's why I would never go to Russia. When you can't overhear it's no
good. All you get are handouts and sight-seeing. Any one who knows a
foreign language in any country is damned liable to lie to you. You get
your good dope always from the people and when you can't talk with
people and can't overhear you don't get anything that's of anything but
journalistic value.'

'You want to knuckle down on your Swahili then.'

'I'm trying to.'

'Even then you can't overhear because they're always talking their own
language.'

'But if I ever write anything about this it will just be landscape
painting until I know something about it. Your first seeing of a country
is a very valuable one. Probably more valuable to yourself than to
anyone else, is the hell of it. But you ought to always write it to try
to get it stated. No matter what you do with it.'

'Most of the damned Safari books are most awful bloody bores.'

'They're terrible.'

'The only one I ever liked was Streeter's. What did he call it?
_Denatured Africa._ He made you feel what it was like. That's the best.'

'I liked Charlie Curtis's. It was very honest and it made a fine
picture.'

'That man Streeter was damned funny though. Do you remember when he shot
the kongoni?'

'It was very funny.'

'I've never read anything, though, that could make you feel about the
country the way we feel about it. They all have Nairobi fast life or
else rot about shooting beasts with horns half an inch longer than
someone else shot. Or muck about danger.'

'I'd like to try to write something about the country and the animals
and what it's like to someone who knows nothing about it.'

'Have a try at it. Can't do any harm. You know I wrote a diary of that
Alaskan trip.'

'I'd love to read it,' P.O.M. said. 'I didn't know you were a writer,
Mr. J. P.'

'No bloody fear,' said Pop. 'If you'd read it, though, I'll send for it.
You know it's just what we did each day and how Alaska looked to an
Englishman from Africa. It'd bore you.'

'Not if you wrote it,' P.O.M. said.

'Little woman's giving us compliments,' Pop said.

'Not me. You.'

'I've read things by him,' she said. 'I want to read what Mr. J. P.
writes.'

'Is the old man really a writer?' Pop asked her. 'I haven't seen
anything to prove it. You're sure he doesn't support you by tracking and
wing shooting?'

'Oh, yes. He writes. When he's going well he's awfully easy to get along
with. But just before he gets going he's frightful. His temper has to go
bad before he can write. When he talks about never writing again I know
he's about to get started.'

'We ought to get more literary conversation from him,' Pop said.
'Leather Breeches was the lad. Give us some literary anecdotes.'

'Well, the last night we were in Paris I'd been out shooting at Ben
Gallagher's in the Sologne the day before and he had a _fermée_, you
know, they put up a low fence while they're out feeding, and shot
rabbits in the morning and in the afternoon we had several drives and
shot pheasants and I shot a chevreuil.'

'That isn't literary.'

'Wait. The last night Joyce and his wife came to dinner and we had a
pheasant and a quarter of the chevreuil with the saddle and Joyce and I
got drunk because we were off for Africa the next day. God, we had a
night.'

'That's a hell of a literary anecdote,' Pop said. 'Who's Joyce?'

'Wonderful guy,' I said. 'Wrote _Ulysses_.'

'Homer wrote _Ulysses_,' Pop said.

'Who wrote _Æschylus_?'

'Homer,' said Pop. 'Don't try to trap me. D'you know many more literary
anecdotes?'

'Ever heard of Pound?'

'No,' said Pop. 'Absolutely no.'

'I know some good ones about Pound.'

'Suppose you and he ate some funny-sounding beast and then got drunk.'

'Several times,' I said.

'Literary life must be awfully jolly. Think I'd make a writer?'

'Rather.'

'We're going to chuck all this,' Pop told P.O.M., 'and both be writers.
Give us another anecdote.'

'Ever heard of George Moore?'

'Chap that wrote "But before I go, George Moore, here's a last long
health to you?"'

'That's him.'

'What about him?'

'He's dead.'

'That's a damned dismal anecdote. You can do better than that.'

'I saw him in a book-shop once.'

'That's better. See how lively he can make them?'

'I went to call on him once in Dublin,' P.O.M. said. 'With Clara Dunn.'

'What happened?'

'He wasn't in.'

'By God. I tell you the literary life's the thing,' Pop said. 'You can't
beat it.'

'I hate Clara Dunn,' I said.

'So do I,' said Pop. 'What did she write?'

'Letters,' I said. 'You know Dos Passos?'

'Never heard of him.'

'He and I used to drink hot kirsch in the winter time.'

'What happened then?'

'People objected, finally.'

'Only writer I ever met was Stewart Edward White,' Pop said. 'Used to
admire his writing no end. Damned good, you know. Then I met him. Didn't
like him.'

'You're coming on,' I said. 'See. There's no trick to a literary
anecdote.'

'Why didn't you like him?' P.O.M. asked.

'Do I have to tell? Isn't the anecdote complete? It's just like the old
man tells them.'

'Go ahead and tell.'

'Too much the old timer about him. Eyes used to vast distances and that
sort of thing. Killed too many bloody lions. No credit kill so many
lions. Gallop 'em, yes. Couldn't kill that many. Lion kill you instead.
Writes damned fine things in _The Saturday Evening Post_ about, what's
the bloke's name, Andy Burnett. Oh, damned fine. Took an awful dislike
to him, though. See him in Nairobi with his eyes used to vast distances.
Wore his oldest clothes in town. Hell of a fine shot, everybody says.'

'Why you're a literary bastard,' I said. 'Look at that for an anecdote.'

'He's marvellous,' P.O.M. said. 'Aren't we ever going to eat?'

'Thought by God we'd eaten,' Pop said. 'Start these anecdotes. No end to
'em.'

After dinner we sat by the fire a little while and then went to bed.
One thing seemed to be on Pop's mind and before I went in the tent he
said, 'After you've waited so long, when you get a shot take it easy.
You're fast enough so you can take your time, remember. Take it easy.'

'All right.'

'I'll have them get you up early.'

'All right. I'm plenty sleepy.'

'Good night, Mr. J. P.,' P.O.M. called from the tent.

'Good night,' Pop said. He moved toward his tent carrying himself with
comic stiffness, walking in the dark as carefully as though he were an
opened bottle.




CHAPTER TWO


Molo waked me by pulling on the blanket in the morning and I was
dressing, dressed, and out washing the sleep out of my eyes before I was
really awake. It was still very dark and I could see Pop's back shadowed
against the fire. I walked over holding the early morning cup of hot tea
and milk in my hand waiting for it to be cool enough to drink.

'Morning,' I said.

'Morning,' he answered in that husky whisper.

'Sleep?'

'Very well. Feeling fit?'

'Sleepy is all.'

I drank the tea and spat the leaves into the fire.

'Tell your bloody fortune with those,' Pop said.

'No fear.'

Breakfast in the dark with a lantern, cool juice-slippery apricots,
hash, hot-centred, brown, and catsup spread, two fried eggs and the warm
promise-keeping coffee. On the third cup Pop, watching, smoking his
pipe, said, 'Too early for me to face it yet.'

'Get you?'

'A little.'

'I'm getting exercise,' I said. 'It doesn't bother me.'

'Bloody anecdotes,' Pop said. 'Memsahib must think we're silly beggars.'

'I'll think up some more.'

'Nothing better than drinking. Don't know why it should make you feel
bad.'

'Are you bad?'

'Not too.'

'Take a spot of Eno's?'

'It's this damned riding in cars.'

'Well, to-day's the day.'

'Remember to take it very easy.'

'You're not worried about that, are you?'

'Just a touch.'

'Don't. It never worries me a minute. Truly.'

'Good. Better get going.'

'Have to make a trip first.'

Standing in front of the canvas circle of the latrine I looked, as each
morning, at that fuzzy blur of stars that the romanticists of
astronomers called the Southern Cross. Each morning at this moment I
observed the Southern Cross in solemn ceremony.

Pop was at the car. M'Cola handed me the Springfield and I got in the
front. The tragedian and his tracker were in the back. M'Cola climbed in
with them.

'Good luck,' Pop said. Someone was coming from towards the tents. It was
P.O.M. in her blue robe and mosquito boots. '_Oh_, good luck,' she said.
'_Please_, good luck.'

I waved and we started, the headlights showing the way to the road.

There was nothing on the salt when we came up to it after leaving the
car about three miles away and making a very careful stalk. Nothing came
all morning. We sat with our heads down in the blind, each covering a
different direction through openings in the thatched withes, and always
I expected the miracle of a bull kudu coming majestic and beautiful
through the open scrub to the grey, dusty opening in the trees where the
salt lick was worn, grooved, and trampled. There were many trails to it
through the trees and on any one a bull might come silently. But nothing
came. When the sun was up and we were warmed after the misty cold of the
morning I settled my rump deeper in the dust and lay back against the
wall of the hole, resting against the small of my back and my shoulders,
and still able to see out through the slit in the blind. Putting the
Springfield across my knees I noticed that there was rust on the barrel.
Slowly I pulled it along and looked at the muzzle. It was freshly brown
with rust.

'The bastard never cleaned it last night after that rain,' I thought,
and, very angry, I lifted the lug and slipped the bolt out. M'Cola was
watching me with his head down. The other two were looking out through
the blind. I held the rifle in one hand for him to look through the
breech and then put the bolt back in and shoved it forward softly,
lowering it with my finger on the trigger so that it was ready to cock
rather than keeping it on the safety.

M'Cola had seen the rusty bore. His face had not changed and I had said
nothing but I was full of contempt and there had been indictment,
evidence, and condemnation without a word being spoken. So we sat there,
he with his head bent so only the bald top showed, me leaning back and
looking out through the slit, and we were no longer partners, no longer
good friends, and nothing came to the salt.

At ten o'clock the breeze, which had come up in the east, began to shift
around and we knew it was no use. Our scent was being scattered in all
directions around the blind as sure to frighten any animals as though we
were revolving a searchlight in the dark. We got up out of the blind and
went over to look in the dust of the lick for tracks. The rain had
moistened it but it was not soaked and we saw several kudu tracks,
probably made early in the night and one big bull track, long, narrow,
heart-shaped; clearly, deeply cut.

We took the track and followed it on the damp reddish earth for two
hours in thick bush that was like second-growth timber at home. Finally
we had to leave it in stuff we could not move through. All this time I
was angry about the uncleaned rifle and yet happy and eager with
anticipation that we might jump the bull and get a snap at him in the
brush. But we did not see him and now, in the big heat of noon, we made
three long circles around some hills and finally came out into a meadow
full of little, humpy Masai cattle and, leaving all shade behind,
trailed back across the open country under the noon sun to the car.

Kamau, sitting in the car, had seen a kudu bull pass a hundred yards
away. He was headed toward the salt-lick at about nine o'clock when the
wind began to be tricky, had evidently caught our scent and gone back
into the hills. Tired, sweating, and feeling more sunk than angry now, I
got in beside Kamau and we headed the car toward camp. There was only
one evening left now, and no reason to expect we would have any better
luck than we were having. As we came to camp, and the shade of the heavy
trees, cool as a pool, I took the bolt out of the Springfield and handed
the rifle, boltless, to M'Cola without speaking or looking at him. The
bolt I tossed inside the opening of our tent on to my cot.

Pop and P.O.M. were sitting under the dining tent.

'No luck?' Pop asked gently.

'Not a damn bit. Bull went by the car headed toward the salt. Must have
spooked off. We hunted all over hell.'

'Didn't you see anything?' P.O.M. asked. 'Once we thought we heard you
shoot.'

'That was Garrick shooting his mouth off. Did the scouts get anything?'

'Not a thing. We've been watching both hills.'

'Hear from Karl?'

'Not a word.'

'I'd like to have seen one,' I said. I was tired out and slipping into
bitterness fast. 'God damn them. What the hell did he have to blow that
lick to hell for the first morning and gut-shoot a lousy bull and chase
him all over the son-of-a-bitching country spooking it to holy bloody
hell?'

'Bastards,' said P.O.M., staying with me in my unreasonableness.
'Sonsabitches.'

'You're a good girl,' I said. 'I'm all right. Or I will be.'

'It's been awful,' she said. 'Poor old Poppa.'

'You have a drink,' Pop said. 'That's what you need.'

'I've hunted them hard, Pop. I swear to God I have. I've enjoyed it and
I haven't worried up until to-day. I was so damned sure. Those damned
tracks all the time--what if I never see one? How do I know we can ever
get back here again?'

'You'll be back,' Pop said. 'You don't have to worry about that. Go
ahead. Drink it.'

'I'm just a lousy belly-aching bastard but I swear they haven't gotten
on my nerves until to-day.'

'Belly-ache,' said Pop. 'Better to get it out.'

'What about lunch?' asked P.O.M. 'Aren't you frightfully hungry?'

'The hell with lunch. The thing is, Pop, we've never seen them on the
salt in the evening and we've never seen a bull in the hills. I've only
got to-night. It looks washed up. Three times I've had them cold and
Karl and the Austrian and the Wanderobo beat us.'

'We're not beaten,' said Pop. 'Drink another one of those.'

We had lunch, a very good lunch, and it was just over when Kati came and
said there was someone to see Pop. We could see their shadows on the
tent fly, then they came around to the front of the tent. It was the old
man of the first day, the old farmer, but now he was gotten up as a
hunter and carried a long bow and a sealed quiver of arrows.

He looked older, more disreputable and tireder than ever and his get-up
was obviously a disguise. With him was the skinny, dirty, Wanderobo with
the slit and curled up ears who stood on one leg and scratched the back
of his knee with his toes. His head was on one side and he had a narrow,
foolish, and depraved-looking face.

The old man was talking earnestly to Pop, looking him in the eye and
speaking slowly, without gestures.

'What's he done? Gotten himself up like that to get some of the scout
money?' I asked.

'Wait,' Pop said.

'Look at the pair of them,' I said. 'That's goofy Wanderobo and that
lousy old fake. What's he say, Pop?'

'He hasn't finished,' Pop said.

Finally the old man was finished and he stood there leaning on his
property bow. They both looked very tired but I remember thinking they
looked a couple of disgusting fakes.

'He says,' Pop began, 'they have found a country where there are kudu
and sable. He has been there three days. They know where there is a big
kudu bull and he has a man watching him now.'

'Do you believe it?' I could feel the liquor and the fatigue drain out
of me and the excitement come in.

'God knows,' said Pop.

'How far away is the country?'

'One day's march. I suppose that's three or four hours in the car if the
car can go.'

'Does he think the car can get in?'

'None ever has been in but he thinks you can make it.'

'When did they leave the man watching the kudu?'

'This morning.'

'Where are the sable?'

'There in the hills.'

'How do we get in?'

'I can't make out except that you cross the plain, go around that
mountain and then south. He says no one has ever hunted there. He hunted
there when he was young.'

'Do you believe it?'

'Of course natives lie like hell, but he tells it very straight.'

'Let's go.'

'You'd better start right away. Go as far as you can in the car and then
use it for a base and hunt on from there. The Memsahib and I will break
camp in the morning, move the outfit and go on to where Dan and Mr. T.
are. Once the outfit is over that black cotton stretch we're all right
if the rain catches us. You come on and join us. If you're caught we can
always send the car back by Kandoa, if worst comes, and the lorries down
to Tanga and around.'

'Don't you want to come?'

'No. You're better off alone on a show like this. The more people the
less game you'll see. You should hunt kudu alone. I'll move the outfit
and look after the little Memsahib.'

'All right,' I said. 'And I don't have to take Garrick or Abdullah?'

'Hell, no. Take M'Cola, Kamau and these two. I'll tell Molo to pack your
things. Go light as hell.'

'God damn it, Pop. Do you think it could be true?'

'Maybe,' said Pop. 'We have to play it.'

'How do you say sable?'

'Tarahalla.'

'Valhalla, I can remember. Do the females have horns?'

'Sure, but you can't make a mistake. The bull is black and they're
brown. You can't go wrong.'

'Has M'Cola ever seen one?'

'I don't think so. You've got four on your licence. Any time you can
better one, go ahead.'

'Are they hard to kill?'

'They're tough. They're not like a kudu. If you've got one down be
careful how you walk up to him.'

'What about time?'

'We've got to get out. Make it back to-morrow night if you can. Use your
own judgment. I think this is the turning point. You'll get a kudu.'

'Do you know what it's like?' I said. 'It's just like when we were kids
and we heard about a river no one had ever fished out on the huckleberry
plain beyond the Sturgeon and the Pigeon.'

'How did the river turn out?'

'Listen. We had a hell of a time to get in and the night we got there,
just before dark, and saw it, there was a deep pool and a long straight
stretch and the water so cold you couldn't keep your hand in it and I
threw a cigarette butt in and a big trout hit it and they kept snapping
it up and spitting it out as it floated until it went to pieces.'

'Big trout?'

'The biggest kind.'

'God save us,' said Pop. 'What did you do then?'

'Rigged up my rod and made a cast and it was dark, and there was a
nighthawk swooping around and it was cold as a bastard and then I was
fast to three fish the second the flies hit the water.'

'Did you land them?'

'The three of them.'

'You damned liar.'

'I swear to God.'

'I believe you. Tell me the rest when you come back. Were they big
trout?'

'The biggest bloody kind.'

'God save us,' said Pop. 'You're going to get a kudu. Get started.'

In the tent I found P.O.M. and told her.

'Not really?'

'Yes.'

'Hurry up,' she said. 'Don't talk. Get started.'

I found raincoat, extra boots, socks, bathrobe, bottle of quinine
tablets, citronella, note book, a pencil, my solids, the cameras, the
emergency kit, knife, matches, extra shirt and undershirt, a book, two
candles, money, the flask . . .

'What else?'

'Have you got soap? Take a comb and a towel. Got handkerchiefs?'

'All right.'

Molo had everything packed in a rucksack and I found my field glasses,
M'Cola taking Pop's big field glasses, a canteen with water and Kati
sending a chop-box with food. 'Take plenty of beer,' Pop said. 'You can
leave it in the car. We're short on whisky but there's a bottle.'

'How will that leave you?'

'All right. There's more at the other camp. We sent two bottles on with
Mr. K.'

'I'll only need the flask,' I said. 'We'll split the bottle.'

'Take plenty of beer then. There's any amount of it.'

'What's the bastard doing?' I said, pointing at Garrick who was getting
into the car.

'He says you and M'Cola wont be able to talk with the natives there.
You'll have to have some one to interpret.'

'He's poison.'

'You _will_ need someone to interpret whatever they speak into Swahili.'

'All right. But tell him he's not running the show and to keep his
bloody mouth shut.'

'We'll go to the top of the hill with you,' Pop said and we started off,
the Wanderobo hanging to the side of the car. 'Going to pick the old man
up in the village.'

Everyone in camp was out to watch us go.

'Have we plenty of salt?'

'Yes.'

Now we were standing by the car on the road in the village waiting for
the old man and Garrick to come back from their huts. It was early
afternoon and the sky was clouding over and I was looking at P.O.M.,
very desirable, cool, and neat-looking in her khaki and her boots, her
Stetson on one side of her head, and at Pop, big, thick, in the faded
corduroy sleeveless jacket that was almost white now from washing and
the sun.

'You be a good girl.'

'Don't ever worry. I wish I could go.'

'It's a one-man show,' Pop said. 'You want to get in fast and do the
dirty and get out fast. You've a big load as it is.'

The old man appeared and got into the back of the car with M'Cola who
was wearing my old khaki sleeveless, quail-shooting coat.

'M'Cola's got the old man's coat,' Pop said.

'He likes to carry things in the game pockets,' I said.

M'Cola saw we were talking about him. I had forgotten about the
uncleaned rifle. Now I remembered it and said to Pop, 'Ask him where he
got the new coat'.

M'Cola grinned and said something.

'He says it is his property.'

I grinned at him and he shook his old bald head and it was understood
that I had said nothing about the rifle.

'Where's that bastard Garrick?' I asked.

Finally he came with his blanket and got in with M'Cola and the old man
behind. The Wanderobo sat with me in front beside Kamau.

'That's a lovely-looking friend you have,' P.O.M. said. 'You be good
too.'

I kissed her good-bye and we whispered something.

'Billing and cooing,' Pop said. 'Disgusting.'

'Good-bye, you old bastard.'

'Good-bye, you damned bullfighter.'

'Good-bye, sweet.'

'Good-bye and good luck.'

'You've plenty of petrol and we'll leave some here,' Pop called.

I waved and we were starting down hill through the village on a narrow
track that led down and on to the scrubby dry plain that spread out
below the two great blue hills.

I looked back as we went down the hill and saw the two figures, the tall
thick one and the small neat one, each wearing big Stetson hats,
silhouetted on the road as they walked back toward camp, then I looked
ahead at the dried-up, scrubby plain.




PART IV

PURSUIT AS HAPPINESS




CHAPTER ONE


The road was only a track and the plain was very discouraging to see. As
we went on we saw a few thin Grant's gazelles showing white against the
burnt yellow of the grass and the grey trees. My exhilaration died with
the stretching out of this plain, the typical poor game country, and it
all began to seem very impossible and romantic and quite untrue. The
Wanderobo had a very strong odour and I looked at the way the lobes of
his ear were stretched and then neatly wrapped on themselves and at his
strange un-negroid, thin-lipped face. When he saw me studying his face
he smiled pleasantly and scratched his chest. I looked around at the
back of the car. M'Cola was asleep. Garrick was sitting straight up,
dramatizing his awakeness, and the old man was trying to see the road.

By now there was no more road, only a cattle track, but we were coming
to the edge of the plain. Then the plain was behind us and ahead there
were big trees and we were entering a country the loveliest that I had
seen in Africa. The grass was green and smooth, short as a meadow that
has been mown and is newly grown, and the trees were big, high-trunked,
and old with no undergrowth but only the smooth green of the turf like a
deer park and we drove on through shade and patches of sunlight
following a faint trail the Wanderobo pointed out. I could not believe
we had suddenly come to any such wonderful country. It was a country to
wake from, happy to have had the dream and, seeing if it would clown
away, I reached up and touched the Wanderobo's ear. He jumped and Kamau
snickered. M'Cola nudged me from the back seat and pointed and there,
standing in an open space between the trees, his head up, staring at us,
the bristles on his back erect, long, thick, white tusks upcurving, his
eyes showing bright, was a very large wart-hog boar watching us from
less than twenty yards. I motioned to Kamau to stop and we sat looking
at him and he at us. I put the rifle up and sighted on his chest. He
watched and did not move. Then I motioned to Kamau to throw in the
clutch and we went on and made a curve to the right and left the
wart-hog, who had never moved, nor showed any fright at seeing us.

I could see that Kamau was excited and, looking back, M'Cola nodded his
head up and down in agreement. None of us had ever seen a wart-hog that
would not bolt off, fast-trotting, tail in air. This was a virgin
country, an un-hunted pocket in the million miles of bloody Africa. I
was ready to stop and make camp anywhere.

This was the finest country I had seen but we went on, winding along
through the big trees over the softly rolling grass. Then ahead and to
the right we saw the high stockade of a Masai village. It was a very
large village and out of it came running long-legged, brown,
smooth-moving men who all seemed to be of the same age and who wore
their hair in a heavy club-like queue that swung against their
shoulders as they ran. They came up to the car and surrounded it, all
laughing and smiling and talking. They all were tall, their teeth were
white and good, and their hair was stained a red brown and arranged in a
looped fringe on their foreheads. They carried spears and they were very
handsome and extremely jolly, not sullen, nor contemptuous like the
northern Masai, and they wanted to know what we were going to do. The
Wanderobo evidently said we were hunting kudu and were in a hurry. They
had the car surrounded so we could not move. One said something and
three or four others joined in and Kamau explained to me that they had
seen two kudu bulls go along the trail in the afternoon.

'It can't be true,' I said to myself. 'It can't be.'

I told Kamau to start and slowly we pushed through them, they all
laughing and trying to stop the car, making it all but run over them.
They were the tallest, best-built, handsomest people I had ever seen and
the first truly light-hearted happy people I had seen in Africa.
Finally, when we were moving, they started to run beside the car smiling
and laughing and showing how easily they could run and then, as the
going was better, up the smooth valley of a stream, it became a contest
and one after another dropped out of the running, waving and smiling as
they left until there were only two still running with us, the finest
runners of the lot, who kept pace easily with the car as they moved
long-legged, smoothly, loosely, and with pride. They were running too,
at the pace of a fast miler, and carrying their spears as well. Then we
had to turn to the right and climb out of the putting-green smoothness
of the valley into a rolling meadow and, as we slowed, climbing in first
gear, the whole pack came up again, laughing and trying not to seem
winded. We went through a little knot of brush and a small rabbit
started out, zigzagging wildly and all the Masai behind now in a mad
sprint. They caught the rabbit and the tallest runner came up with him
to the car and handed him to me. I held him and could feel the thumping
of his heart through the soft, warm, furry body, and as I stroked him
the Masai patted my arm. Holding him by the ears I handed him back. No,
no, he was mine. He was a present. I handed him to M'Cola. M'Cola did
not take him seriously and handed him to one of the Masai. We were
moving and they were running again now. The Masai stooped and put the
rabbit on the ground and as he ran free they all laughed. M'Cola shook
his head. We were all very impressed by these Masai.

'Good Masai,' M'Cola said, very moved. 'Masai many cattle. Masai no kill
to eat. Masai kill man.'

The Wanderobo patted himself on the chest.

'Wanderobo . . . Masai,' he said, very proudly, claiming kin. His ears
were curled in the same way theirs were. Seeing them running and so
damned handsome and so happy made us all happy. I had never seen such
quick disinterested friendliness, nor such fine-looking people.

'_Good_ Masai,' M'Cola repeated, nodding his head emphatically. '_Good,
good_ Masai.' Only Garrick seemed impressed in a different way. For all
his khaki clothes and his letter from B'wana Simba, I believe these
Masai frightened him in a very old place. They were our friends, not
his. They certainly were our friends though. They had that attitude that
makes brothers, that unexpressed but instant and complete acceptance
that you must be Masai wherever it is you come from. That attitude you
only get from the best of the English, the best of the Hungarians and
the very best Spaniards; the thing that used to be the most clear
distinction of nobility when there was nobility. It is an ignorant
attitude and the people who have it do not survive, but very few
pleasanter things ever happen to you than the encountering of it.

So now there were only the two of them left again, running, and it was
hard going and the machine was beating them. They were still running
well and still loose and long but the machine was a cruel pacemaker. So
I told Kamau to speed it up and get it over with because a sudden burst
of speed was not the humiliation of a steady using. They sprinted, were
beaten, laughed, and then we were leaning out, waving, and they stood
leaning on their spears and waved. We were still great friends but now
we were alone again and there was no track, only the general direction
to follow around clumps of trees and along the run of this green valley.

After a little the trees grew closer and we left the idyllic country
behind and now were picking our way along a faint trail through thick
second-growth. Sometimes we came to a dead halt and had to get out and
pull a log out of the way or cut a tree that blocked the body of the
car. Sometimes we had to back out of bush and look for a way to circle
around and come upon the trail again, chopping our way through with the
long brush knives that are called pangas. The Wanderobo was a pitiful
chopper and Garrick was little better. M'Cola did everything well in
which a knife was used and he swung a panga with a fast yet heavy and
vindictive stroke. I used it badly. There was too much wrist in it to
learn it quickly; your wrist tired and the blade seemed to have a weight
it did not have. I wished that I had a Michigan double-bitted axe, honed
razor-sharp, to chop with instead of this sabring of trees.

Chopping through when we were stopped, avoiding all we could, Kamau
driving with intelligence and a sound feeling for the country, we came
through the difficult going and out into another open-meadow stretch and
could see a range of hills off to our right. But here there had been a
recent heavy rain and we had to be very careful about the low parts of
the meadow where the tyres cut in through the turf to mud and spun in
the slick greasiness. We cut brush and shovelled out twice and then,
having learned not to trust any low part, we skirted the high edge of
the meadow and then were in timber again. As we came out, after several
long circles in the woods to find places where we could get the car
through, we were on the bank of a stream, where there was a sort of
brushy bridging across the bed built like a beaver dam and evidently
designed to hold back the water. On the other side was a
thorn-brush-fenced cornfield, a steep, stump-scattered bank with corn
planted all over it and some abandoned looking corrals or
thorn-bush-fenced enclosures with mud and stick buildings and to the
right there were cone-shaped grass huts projecting above a heavy thorn
fence. We all got out, for this stream was a problem, and, on the other
side, the only place we could get up the bank led through the
stump-filled maize field.

The old man said the rain had come that day. There had been no water
going over the brushy dam when they had passed that morning. I was
feeling fairly depressed. Here we had come through a beautiful country
of virgin timber where kudu had been once seen walking along the trail
to end up stuck on the bank of a little creek in someone's cornfield. I
had not expected any cornfield and I resented it. I thought we would
have to get permission to drive through the maize, provided we could
make it across the stream and up the bank and I took off my shoes and
waded across the stream to test it underfoot. The brush and saplings on
the bottom were packed hard and firm and I was sure we could cross if we
took it fairly fast. M'Cola and Kamau agreed and we walked up the bank
to see how it would be. The mud of the bank was soft but there was dry
earth underneath and I figured we could shovel our way up if we could
get through the stumps. But we would need to unload before we tried it.

Coming toward us, from the direction of the huts, were two men and a
boy. I said 'Jambo', as they came up. They answered 'Jambo', and then
the old man and the Wanderobo talked with them. M'Cola shook his head at
me. He did not understand a word. I thought we were asking permission
to go through the corn. When the old man finished talking the two men
came closer and we shook hands.

They looked like no negroes I had ever seen. Their faces were a grey
brown, the oldest looked to be about fifty, had thin lips, an almost
Grecian nose, rather high cheekbones, and large, intelligent eyes. He
had great poise and dignity and seemed to be very intelligent. The
younger man had the same cast of features and I took him for a younger
brother. He looked about thirty-five. The boy was as pretty as a girl
and looked rather shy and stupid. I had thought he was a girl from his
face for an instant when he first came up, as they all wore a sort of
Roman toga of unbleached muslin gathered at the shoulder that revealed
no line of their bodies.

They were talking with the old man, who, now that I looked at him
standing with them, seemed to bear a sort of wrinkled and degenerate
resemblance to the classic-featured owner of the shamba; just as the
Wanderobo-Masai was a shrivelled caricature of the handsome Masai we had
met in the forest.

Then we all went down to the stream and Kamau and I rigged ropes around
the tyres to act as chains while the Roman elder and the rest unloaded
the car and carried the heaviest things up the steep bank. Then we
crossed in a wild, water-throwing smash and, all pushing heavily, made
it halfway up the bank before we stuck. We chopped and dug out and
finally made it to the top of the bank but ahead was that maize field
and I could not figure where we were to go from there.

'Where do we go?' I asked the Roman elder.

They did not understand Garrick's interpreting and the old man made the
question clear.

The Roman pointed toward the heavy thorn-bush fence to the left at the
edge of the woods.

'We can't get through there in the car.'

'Campi,' said M'Cola, meaning we were going to camp there.

'Hell of a place,' I said.

'Campi,' M'Cola said firmly and they all nodded.

'Campi! Campi!' said the old man.

'There we camp,' Garrick announced pompously.

'You go to hell,' I told him cheerfully.

I walked toward the camp site with the Roman who was talking steadily in
a language I could not understand a word of. M'Cola was with me and the
others were loading and following with the car. I was remembering that I
had read you must never camp in abandoned native quarters because of
ticks and other hazards and I was preparing to hold out against this
camp. We entered a break in the thorn-bush fence and inside was a
building of logs and saplings stuck in the ground and crossed with
branches. It looked like a big chicken coop. The Roman made us free of
this and of the enclosure with a wave of his hand and kept on talking.

'Bugs,' I said to M'Cola in Swahili, speaking with strong disapproval.

'No,' he said, dismissing the idea. 'No bugs.'

'Bad bugs. Many bugs. Sickness.'

'No bugs,' he said firmly.

The no-bugs had it and with the Roman talking steadily, I hoped on some
congenial topic, the car came up, stopped under a huge tree about fifty
yards from the thorn-bush fence and they all commenced carrying the
necessities in for the making of camp. My ground-sheet tent was slung
between a tree and one side of the chicken coop and I sat down on a
petrol case to discuss the shooting situation with the Roman, the old
man, and Garrick, while Kamau and M'Cola fixed up a camp and the
Wanderobo-Masai stood on one leg and let his mouth hang open.

'Where were kudu?'

'Back there,' waving his arm.

'Big ones?'

Arms spread to show hugeness of horns and a torrent from the Roman.

Me, dictionary-ing heavily, 'Where was the one they were watching?'

No results on this but a long speech from the Roman which I took to mean
they were watching them all.

It was late afternoon now and the sky was heavy with clouds. I was wet
to the waist and my socks were mud soaked. Also I was sweating from
pushing on the car and from chopping.

'When do we start?' I asked.

'To-morrow,' Garrick answered without bothering to question the Roman.

'No,' I said. 'To-night.'

'To-morrow,' Garrick said. 'Late now. One hour light.' He showed me one
hour on my watch.

I dictionaried. 'Hunt to-night. Last hour best hour.'

Garrick implied that the kudu were too far away. That it was impossible
to hunt and return, all this with gestures, 'Hunt to-morrow'.

'You bastard,' I said in English. All this time the Roman and the old
man had been standing saying nothing. I shivered. It was cold with the
sun under the clouds in spite of the heaviness of the air after rain.

'Old man,' I said.

'Yes, Master,' said the old man. Dictionary-ing carefully, I said, 'Hunt
kudu to-night. Last hour best hour. Kudu close?'

'Maybe.'

'Hunt now?'

They talked together.

'Hunt to-morrow,' Garrick put in.

'Shut up, you actor,' I said. 'Old man. Little hunt now?'

'Yes,' said the old man and Roman nodded. 'Little while.'

'Good,' I said, and went to find a shirt and undershirt and a pair of
socks.

'Hunt now,' I told M'Cola.

'Good,' he said. 'M'uzuri.'

With the clean feeling of dry shirt, fresh socks and a change of boots I
sat on the petrol case and drank a whisky and water while I waited for
the Roman to come back. I felt certain I was going to have a shot at
kudu and I wanted to take the edge off so I would not be nervous. Also I
wanted not to catch a cold. Also I wanted the whisky for itself,
because I loved the taste of it and because, being as happy as I could
be, it made me feel even better.

I saw the Roman coming and I pulled the zippers up on my boots, checked
the cartridges in the magazine of the Springfield, took off the
foresight protector and blew through the rear aperture. Then I drank
what was left in the tin cup that was on the ground by the box and stood
up, checking that I had a pair of handkerchiefs in my shirt pockets.

M'Cola came carrying his knife and Pop's big glasses.

'You stay here,' I said to Garrick. He did not mind. He thought we were
silly to go out so late and he was glad to prove us wrong. The Wanderobo
wanted to go.

'That's plenty,' I said, and waved the old man back and we started out
of the corral with the Roman ahead, carrying a spear, then me, then
M'Cola with glasses and the Mannlicher, full of solids, and last the
Wanderobo-Masai with another spear.

It was after five when we struck off across the maize field and down to
the stream, crossing where it narrowed in a high grass a hundred yards
above the dam and then, walking slowly and carefully, went up the grassy
bank on the far side, getting soaked to the waist as we stooped going
through the wet grass and bracken. We had not been gone ten minutes and
were moving carefully up the stream bank, when, without warning, the
Roman grabbed my arm and pulled me bodily down to the ground as he
crouched; me pulling back the bolt to cock the rifle as I dropped.
Holding his breath he pointed and across the stream on the far bank at
the edge of the trees was a large, grey animal, white stripes showing on
his flanks and huge horns curling back from his head as he stood,
broadside to us, head up, seeming to be listening. I raised the rifle,
but there was a bush in the way of the shot. I could not shoot over the
bush without standing.

'Piga,' whispered M'Cola. I shook my finger and commenced to crawl
forward to be clear of the bush, sick afraid the bull would jump while I
was trying to make the shot certain, but remembering Pop's 'Take your
time'. When I saw I was clear I got on one knee, saw the bull through
the aperture, marvelling at how big he looked, and then, remembering not
to have it matter, that it was the same as any other shot, I saw the
bead centred exactly where it should be just below the top of the
shoulder and squeezed off. At the roar he jumped and was going into the
brush, but I knew I had hit him. I shot at a show of grey between the
trees as he went in and M'Cola was shouting, 'Piga! Piga!' meaning 'He's
hit! He's hit!' and the Roman was slapping me on the shoulder, then he
had his toga up around his neck and was running naked, and the four of
us were running now, full speed, like hounds, splashing across the
stream, tearing up the bank, the Roman ahead, crashing naked through the
brush, then stooping and holding up a leaf with bright blood, slamming
me on the back, M'Cola saying, 'Damu! Damu!' (blood, blood), then the
deep cut tracks off to the right, me reloading, we all trailing in a
dead run, it almost dark in the timber, the Roman, confused a moment by
the trail, making a cast off to the right, then picking up blood once
more, then pulling me down again with a jerk on my arm and none of us
breathing as we saw him standing in a clearing a hundred yards ahead,
looking to me hard-hit and looking back, wide ears spread, big, grey,
white-striped, his horns a marvel, as he looked straight toward us over
his shoulder. I thought I must make absolutely sure this time, now, with
the dark coming and I held my breath and shot him a touch behind the
fore-shoulder. We heard the bullet smack and saw him buck heavily with
the shot. M'Cola shouted, 'Piga! Piga! Piga!' as he went out of sight
and as we ran again, like hounds, we almost fell over something. It was
a huge, beautiful kudu bull, stone-dead, on his side, his horns in great
dark spirals, widespread and unbelievable as he lay dead five yards from
where we stood when I had just that instant shot. I looked at him, big,
long-legged, a smooth grey with the white stripes and the great curling,
sweeping horns, brown as walnut meats, and ivory pointed, at the big
ears and the great, lovely heavy-maned neck, the white chevron between
his eyes and the white of his muzzle and I stooped over and touched him
to try to believe it. He was lying on the side where the bullet had gone
in and there was not a mark on him and he smelled sweet and lovely like
the breath of cattle and the odour of thyme after rain.

Then the Roman had his arms around my neck and M'Cola was shouting in a
strange high sing-song voice and Wanderobo-Masai kept slapping me on the
shoulder and jumping up and down and then one after the other they all
shook hands in a strange way that I had never known in which they took
your thumb in their fist and held it and shook it and pulled it and held
it again, while they looked you in the eyes, fiercely.

We all looked at him and M'Cola knelt and traced the curve of his horns
with his finger and measured the spread with his arms and kept crooning,
'Oo-oo-eee-eee', making small high noises of ecstasy and stroking the
kudu's muzzle and his mane.

I slapped the Roman on the back and we went through the thumb-pulling
again; me pulling his thumb too. I embraced the Wanderobo-Masai and he,
after a thumb-pulling of great intensity and feeling, slapped his chest
and said very proudly, 'Wanderobo-Masai wonderful guide'.

'Wanderobo-Masai wonderful Masai,' I said.

M'Cola kept shaking his head, looking at the kudu and making the strange
small noises. Then he said, 'Doumi, Doumi, Doumi! B'wana Kabor Kidogo,
Kidogo'. Meaning this was a bull of bulls. That Karl's had been a little
one, a nothing.

We all knew we had killed the other kudu that I had mistaken for this
one, while this first one was lying dead from the first shot, and it
seemed of no importance beside the miracle of this kudu. But I wanted to
see the other.

'Come on, kudu,' I said.

'He's dead,' said M'Cola. 'Kufa!'

'Come on.'

'This one best.'

'Come on.'

'Measure,' M'Cola pleaded. I ran the steel tape around the curve of one
horn, M'Cola holding it down. It was well over fifty inches. M'Cola
looked at me anxiously.

'Big! Big!' I said. 'Twice as big as B'wana Kabor.'

'Eee-eee,' he crooned.

'Come on,' I said. The Roman was off already.

We cut for where we saw the bull when I shot and there were the tracks
with blood breast high on the leaves in the brush from the start. In a
hundred yards we came on him absolutely dead. He was not quite as big as
the first bull. The horns were as long, but narrower, but he was as
beautiful, and he lay on his side, bending down the brush where he fell.

We all shook hands again, using the thumb which evidently denoted
extreme emotion.

'This askari,' M'Cola explained. This bull was the policeman or
bodyguard for the bigger one. He had evidently been in the timber when
we had seen the first bull, had run with him, and had looked back to see
why the big bull did not follow.

I wanted pictures and told M'Cola to go back to camp with the Roman and
bring the two cameras, the Graflex and the cinema camera and my
flashlight. I knew we were on the same side of the stream and above the
camp and I hoped the Roman could make a short cut and get back before
the sun set.

They went off and now, at the end of the day, the sun came out brightly
below the clouds and the Wanderobo-Masai and I looked at this kudu,
measured his horns, smelled the fine smell of him, sweeter than an eland
even, stroked his nose, his neck, and his shoulder, marvelling at his
great ears, and the smoothness and cleanness of his hide, looked at his
hooves, that were built long, narrow, and springy, so he seemed to walk
on tip-toe, felt under his shoulder for the bullet-hole and then shook
hands again while the Wanderobo-Masai told what a man he was and I told
him he was my pal and gave him my best four-bladed pocket knife.

'Let's go look at the first one, Wanderobo-Masai,' I said in English.

The Wanderobo-Masai nodded, understanding perfectly, and we trailed back
to where the big one lay in the edge of the little clearing. We circled
him, looking at him and then the Wanderobo-Masai, reaching underneath
while I held the shoulder up, found the bullet hole and put his finger
in. Then he touched his forehead with the bloody finger and made the
speech about 'Wanderobo-Masai wonderful guide!'

'Wanderobo-Masai king of guides,' I said. 'Wanderobo-Masai my pal.'

I was wet through with sweat and I put on my raincoat that M'Cola had
been carrying and left behind and turned the collar up around my neck. I
was watching the sun now and worrying about it being gone before they
got up with the cameras. In a little while we could hear them coming in
the brush and I shouted to let them know where we were. M'Cola answered
and we shouted back and forth and I could hear them talking and
crashing in the brush while I would shout and watch the sun which was
almost down. Finally I saw them and I shouted to M'Cola, 'Run, run', and
pointed to the sun, but there was no run left in them. They had made a
fast trip uphill, through heavy brush, and when I got the camera, opened
the lens wide and focused on the bull the sun was only lighting the tops
of the trees. I took half a dozen exposures and used the cinema while
they all dragged the kudu to where there seemed to be a little more
light, then the sun was down and, obligation to try to get a picture
over, I put the camera into its case and settled, happily, with the
darkness into the unresponsibility of victory; only emerging to direct
M'Cola in where to cut to make a full enough cape when skinning out the
head-skin. M'Cola used a knife beautifully and I liked to watch him
skin-out, but to-night, after I had shown him where to make the first
cut, well down on the legs, around the lower chest where it joined the
belly and well back over the withers, I did not watch him because I
wanted to remember the bull as I had first seen him, so I went, in the
dusk, to the second kudu and waited there until they came with the
flashlight and then, remembering that I had skinned-out or seen
skinned-out every animal that I had ever shot, yet remembered every one
exactly as he was at every moment, that one memory does not destroy
another, and that the not-watching idea was only laziness and a form of
putting the dishes in the sink until morning, I held the flashlight for
M'Cola while he worked on the second bull and, although tired, enjoyed
as always his fast, clean, delicate scalpeling with the knife, until,
the cape all clear and spread back he nocked through the connection of
the skull and the spine and then, twisting with the horns, swung the
head loose and lifted it, cape and all, free from the neck, the cape
hanging heavy and wet in the light of the electric torch that shone on
his red hands and on the dirty khaki of his tunic. We left the
Wanderobo-Masai, Garrick, the Roman, and his brother with a lantern to
skin out and pack in the meat and M'Cola with a head, the old man with a
head, and me with the flashlight and the two guns, we started in the
dark back for camp.

In the dark the old man fell flat and M'Cola laughed; then the cape
unrolled and came down over his face and he almost choked and we both
laughed. The old man laughed too. Then M'Cola fell in the dark and the
old man and I laughed. A little farther on I went through the covering
on some sort of game pit and went flat on my face and got up to hear
M'Cola chuckling and choking and the old man giggling.

'What the hell is this? A Chaplin comedy?' I asked them in English. They
were both laughing under the heads. We got to the thorn-bush fence,
finally, after a nightmare march through the brush and saw the fire at
the camp and M'Cola seemed to be delighted when the old man fell going
through the thorns and got up cursing and seeming barely able to lift
the head as I shone the flash ahead of him to show him the opening.

We came up to the fire and I could see the old man's face bleeding as
he put the head down against the stick and mud cabin. M'Cola put his
head down, pointed at the old man's face and laughed and shook his head.
I looked at the old man. He was completely done-in, his face was badly
scratched, covered with mud and bleeding, and he was chuckling happily.

'B'wana fell down,' M'Cola said and imitated me pitching forward. They
both chuckled.

I made as though to take a swing at him and said, 'Shenzi!'

He imitated me falling down again and then there was Kamau shaking hands
very gently and respectfully and saying, 'Good, B'wana! Very good,
B'wana!' and then going over to the heads, his eyes shining and
kneeling, stroking the horns and feeling the ears and crooning the same,
sighing, 'Ooo-ooo! Eee-eee!' noises M'Cola had made.

I went into the dark of the tent, we had left the lantern with the meat
bringers, and washed, took off my wet clothes and feeling in the dark in
my rucksack found a pair of pyjamas and a bath-robe. I came out to the
fire wearing these and mosquito boots. I brought my wet things and my
boots to the fire and Kamau spread them on sticks, and put the boots,
each one leg-down, on a stick and back far enough from the blaze where
the fire would not scorch them.

In the firelight I sat on a petrol box with my back against a tree and
Kamau brought the whisky flask and poured some in a cup and I added
water from the canteen and sat drinking and looking in the fire, not
thinking, in complete happiness, feeling the whisky warm me and smooth
me as you straighten the wrinkled sheet in a bed, while Kamau brought
tins from the provisions to see what I would eat for supper. There were
three tins of Christmas special mincemeat, three tins of salmon, and
three of mixed fruit, there were also a number of cakes of chocolate and
a tin of Special Christmas Plum Pudding. I sent these back wondering
what Kati had imagined the mincemeat to be. We had been looking for that
plum pudding for two months.

'Meat?' I asked.

Kamau brought a thick, long chunk of roast Grant gazelle tenderloin from
one of the Grant Pop had shot on the plain while we had been hunting the
twenty-five-mile salt-lick, and some bread.

'Beer?'

He brought one of the big German litre bottles and opened it.

It seemed too complicated sitting on the petrol case and I spread my
raincoat on the ground in front of the fire where the ground had been
dried by the heat and stretched my legs out, leaning my back against the
wooden case. The old man was roasting meat on a stick. It was a choice
piece he had brought with him wrapped in his toga. In a little while
they all began to come in carrying meat and the hides and then I was
stretched out drinking beer and watching the fire and all around they
were talking and roasting meat on sticks. It was getting cold and the
night was clear and there was the smell of the roasting meat, the smell
of the smoke of the fire, the smell of my boots steaming, and, where he
squatted close, the smell of the good old Wanderobo-Masai. But I could
remember the odour of the kudu as he lay in the woods.

Each man had his own meat or collection of pieces of meat on sticks
stuck around the fire, they turned them and tended them, and there was
much talking. Two others that I had not seen had come over from the huts
and the boy we had seen in the afternoon was with them. I was eating a
piece of hot broiled liver I had lifted from one of the sticks of the
Wanderobo-Masai and wondering where the kidneys were. The liver was
delicious. I was wondering whether it was worth while getting up to get
the dictionary to ask about the kidneys when M'Cola said, 'Beer?'

'All right.'

He brought the bottle, opened it, and I lifted it and drank half of it
off to chase down that liver.

'It's a hell of a life,' I told him in English.

He grinned and said, 'More beer?' in Swahili.

My talking English to him was an acceptable joke.

'Watch,' I said, and tipped the bottle up and let it all go down. It was
an old trick we learned in Spain drinking out of wine skins without
swallowing. This impressed the Roman greatly. He came over, squatted
down by the raincoat and started to talk. He talked for a long time.

'Absolutely,' I told him in English. 'And furthermore he can take the
sleigh.'

'More beer?' M'Cola asked.

'You want to see the old man tight, I suppose?'

'N'Dio,' he said. 'Yes,' pretending to understand the English.

'Watch it, Roman.' I started to let the beer go down, saw the Roman
following the motion with his own throat, started to choke, barely
recovered, and lowered the bottle.

'That's all. Can't do it more than twice in an evening. Makes you
liverish.'

The Roman went on talking in his language. I heard him say Simba twice.

'Simba here?'

'No,' he said. 'Over there,' waving at the dark, and I could not make
out the story. But it sounded very good.

'Me plenty Simba,' I said. 'Hell of a man with Simba. Ask M'Cola.' I
could feel that I was getting the evening braggies but Pop and P.O.M.
weren't here to listen. It was not nearly so satisfactory to brag when
you could not be understood, still it was better than nothing. I
definitely had the braggies, on beer, too.

'Amazing,' I told the Roman. He went on with his own story. There was a
little beer in the bottom of the bottle.

'Old Man,' I said. 'Mzee.'

'Yes, B'wana,' said the old man.

'Here's some beer for you. You're old enough, so it can't hurt you.'

I had seen the old man's eyes while he watched me drink and I knew he
was another of the same. He took the bottle, drained it to the last bit
of froth and crouched by his meat sticks holding the bottle lovingly.

'More beer?' asked M'Cola.

'Yes,' I said. 'And my cartridges.'

The Roman had gone on steadily talking. He could tell a longer story
even than Carlos in Cuba.

'That's mighty interesting,' I told him. 'You're a hell of a fellow,
too. We're both good. Listen.' M'Cola had brought the beer and my khaki
coat with the cartridges in the pocket. I drank a little beer, noted the
old man watching and spread out six cartridges. 'I've got the braggies,'
I said. 'You have to stand for this, look!' I touched each of the
cartridges in turn, 'Simba, Simba, Faro, Nyati, Tendalla, Tendalla. What
do you think of that? You don't have to believe it. Look, M'Cola!' and I
named the six cartridges again. 'Lion, lion, rhino, buffalo, kudu,
kudu.'

'Ayee!' said the Roman excitedly.

'N'Dio,' said M'Cola solemnly. 'Yes, it is true.'

'Ayee!' said the Roman and grabbed me by the thumb.

'God's truth,' I said. 'Highly improbable, isn't it?'

'N'Dio,' said M'Cola, counting them over himself. 'Simba, Simba, Faro,
Nyati, Tendalla, Tendalla!'

'You can tell the others,' I said in English. 'That's a hell of a big
piece of bragging. That'll hold me for to-night.'

The Roman went on talking to me again and I listened carefully and ate
another piece of the broiled liver. M'Cola was working on the heads now,
skinning out one skull and showing Kamau how to skin out the easy part
of the other. It was a big job to do for the two of them, working
carefully around the eyes and the muzzle and the cartilage of the ears,
and afterwards flesh all of the head skins so they would not spoil, and
they were working at it very delicately and carefully in the firelight.
I do not remember going to bed, nor if we went to bed.

I remember getting the dictionary and asking M'Cola to ask the boy if he
had a sister and M'Cola saying, 'No, No', to me very firmly and
solemnly.

'Nothing tendacious, you understand. Curiosity.'

M'Cola was firm. 'No,' he said and shook his head. 'Hapana,' in the same
tone he used when we followed the lion into the sanseviera that time.

That disposed of the opportunities for social life and I looked up
kidneys and the Roman's brother produced some from his lot and I put a
piece between two pieces of liver on a stick and started it broiling.

'Make an admirable breakfast,' I said out loud. 'Much better than
mincemeat.'

Then we had a long talk about sable. The Roman did not call them
Tarahalla and that name meant nothing to him. There was some confusion
about buffalo because the Roman kept saying 'nyati', but he meant they
were black like the buff. Then we drew pictures in the dust of ashes
from the fire and what he meant were sable all right. The horns curved
back like scimitars, way back over their withers.

'Bulls?' I said.

'Bulls and cows.'

With the old man and Garrick interpreting, I believed I made out that
there were two herds.

'To-morrow.'

'Yes,' the Roman said. 'To-morrow.'

''Cola,' I said. 'To-day, kudu. To-morrow, sable, buffalo, Simba.'

'Hapana, buffalo!' he said and shook his head. Hapana, Simba!'

'Me and the Wanderobo-Masai buffalo,' I said.

'Yes,' said the Wanderobo-Masai excitedly. 'Yes.'

'There are very big elephants near here,' Garrick said.

'To-morrow, elephants,' I said, teasing M'Cola.

'Hapana elephants!' He knew it was teasing but he did not even want to
hear it said.

'Elephants,' I said. 'Buffalo, Simba, leopard.'

The Wanderobo-Masai was nodding excitedly. 'Rhino,' he put in.

'Hapana!' M'Cola said shaking his head. He was beginning to suffer.

'In those hills many buffalo,' the old man interpreted for the now very
excited Roman who was standing and pointing beyond where the huts were.

'Hapana! Hapana! Hapana!' M'Cola said definitely and finally. 'More
beer?' putting down his knife.

'All right,' I said. 'I'm just kidding you.'

M'Cola was crouched close talking, making an explanation. I heard Pop's
title and I thought it was that Pop would not like it. That Pop would
not want it.

'I was just kidding you,' I said in English. Then in Swahili,
'To-morrow, sable?'

'Yes,' he said feelingly. 'Yes.'

After that the Roman and I had a long talk in which I spoke Spanish and
he spoke whatever it was he spoke and I believe we planned the entire
campaign for the next day.




CHAPTER TWO


I do not remember going to bed nor getting up, only being by the fire in
the grey before daylight, with a tin cup of hot tea in my hand and my
breakfast, on the stick, not looking nearly so admirable and very
over-blown with ashes. The Roman was standing making an oration with
gestures in the direction where the light was beginning to show and I
remember wondering if the bastard had talked all night.

The head skins were all spread and neatly salted and the skulls with the
horns were leaning against the log and stick house. M'Cola was folding
the head skins. Kamau brought me the tins and I told him to open one of
fruit. It was cold from the night and the mixed fruit and the cold
syrupy juice sucked down smoothly. I drank another cup of tea, went in
the tent, dressed, put on my dry boots and we were ready to start. The
Roman had said we would be back before lunch.

We had the Roman's brother as guide. The Roman was going, as near as I
could make out, to spy on one of the herds of sable and we were going to
locate the other. We started out with the brother ahead, wearing a toga
and carrying a spear, then me with the Springfield slung and my small
Zeiss glasses in my pocket, then M'Cola with Pop's glasses, slung on one
side, water canteen on the other, skinning knife, whetstone, extra box
of cartridges, and cakes of chocolates in his pockets, and the big gun
over his shoulder, then the old man with the Graflex, Garrick with the
movie camera, and the Wanderobo-Masai with a spear and bow and arrows.

We said good-bye to the Roman and started out of the thorn-bush fence
just as the sun came through the gap in the hills and shone on the
cornfield, the huts and the blue hills beyond. It promised to be a fine
clear day.

The brother led the way through some heavy brush that soaked us all;
then through the open forest, then steeply uphill until we were well up
on the slope that rose behind the edge of the field where we were
camped. Then we were on a good smooth trail that graded back into these
hills above which the sun had not yet risen. I was enjoying the early
morning, still a little sleepy, going along a little mechanically and
starting to think that we were a very big outfit to hunt quietly,
although everyone seemed to move quietly enough, when we saw two people
coming towards us.

They were a tall, good-looking man with features like the Roman's, but
slightly less noble, wearing a toga and carrying a bow and quiver of
arrows, and behind him, his wife, very pretty, very modest, very wifely,
wearing a garment of brown tanned skins and neck ornament of concentric
copper wire circles and many wire circles on her arms and ankles. We
halted, said 'Jambo', and the brother talked to this seeming tribesman
who had the air of a business man on the way to his office in the city
and, as they spoke in rapid question and answer, I watched the most
freshly brideful wife who stood a little in profile so that I saw her
pretty pear-shaped breasts and the long, clean niggery legs and was
studying her pleasant profile most profitably until her husband spoke to
her suddenly and sharply, then in explanation and quiet command, and she
moved around us, her eyes down, and went on along the trail that we had
come, alone, we all watching her. The husband was going on with us, it
seemed. He had seen the sable that morning and, slightly suspicious,
obviously displeased at leaving that now out-of-sight wife of wives that
we all had taken with our eyes, he led us off and to the right along
another trail, well-worn and smooth, through woods that looked like fall
at home and where you might expect to flush a grouse and have him whirr
off to the other hill or pitch down in the valley.

So, sure enough we put up partridges and, watching them fly, I was
thinking all the country in the world is the same country and all
hunters are the same people. Then we saw a fresh kudu track beside the
trail and then, as we moved through the early morning woods, no
undergrowth now, the first sun coming through the tops of the trees, we
came on the ever miracle of elephant tracks, each one as big around as
the circle you make with your arms putting your hands together, and sunk
a foot deep in the loam of the forest floor, where some bull had passed,
travelling after rain. Looking at the way the tracks graded down through
the pleasant forest I thought that we had the mammoths too, a long time
ago, and when they travelled through the hills in southern Illinois
they made these same tracks. It was just that we were an older country
in America and the biggest game was gone.

We kept along the face of this hill on a pleasant sort of jutting
plateau and then came out to the edge of the hill where there was a
valley and a long open meadow with timber on the far side and a circle
of hills at its upper end where another valley went off to the left. We
stood in the edge of the timber on the face of this hill looking across
the meadow valley which extended to the open out in a steep sort of
grassy basin at the upper end where it was backed by the hills. To our
left there were steep, rounded, wooded hills, with outcroppings of
limestone rock that ran, from where we stood, up to the very head of the
valley, and there formed part of the other range of hills that headed
it. Below us, to the right, the country was rough and broken in hills
and stretches of meadow and then a steep fall of timber that ran to the
blue hills we had seen to the westward beyond the huts where the Roman
and his family lived. I judged camp to be straight down below us and
about five miles to the north-west through the timber.

The husband was standing, talking to the brother and gesturing and
pointing out that he had seen the sable feeding on the opposite side of
the meadow valley and that they must have fed either up or down the
valley. We sat in the shelter of the trees and sent the Wanderobo-Masai
down into the valley to look for tracks. He came back and reported there
were no tracks leading down the valley below us and to the westward, so
we knew they had fed on up the meadow valley.

Now the problem was to so use the terrain that we might locate them, and
get up and into range of them without being seen. The sun was coming
over the hills at the head of the valley and shone on us while
everything at the head of the valley was in heavy shadow. I told the
outfit to stay where they were in the woods, except for M'Cola and the
husband who would go with me, we keeping in the timber and grading up
our side of the valley until we could be above and see into the pocket
of the curve at the upper end to glass it for the sable.

You ask how this was discussed, worked out, and understood with the bar
of language, and I say it was as freely discussed and clearly understood
as though we were a cavalry patrol all speaking the same language. We
were all hunters except, possibly, Garrick, and the whole thing could be
worked out, understood, and agreed to without using anything but a
forefinger to signal and a hand to caution. We left them and worked very
carefully ahead, well back in the timber to get height. Then, when we
were far enough up and along, we crawled out on to a rocky place and,
being behind rock, shielding the glasses with my hat so they would not
reflect the sun, M'Cola nodding and grunting as he saw the
practicability of that, we glassed the opposite side of the meadow
around the edge of the timber, and up into the pocket at the head of the
valley; and there they were. M'Cola saw them just before I did and
pulled my sleeve.

'N'Dio,' I said. Then I held my breath to watch them. All looked very
black, big necked, and heavy. All had the back-curving horns. They were
a long way away. Some were lying down. One was standing. We could see
seven.

'Where's the bull?' I whispered.

M'Cola motioned with his left hand and counted four fingers. It was one
of those lying down in the tall grass and the animal did look much
bigger and the horns much more sweeping. But we were looking into the
morning sun and it was hard to see well. Behind them a sort of gully ran
up into the hill that blocked the end of the valley.

Now we knew what we had to do. We must go back, cross the meadow far
enough down so we were out of sight, get into the timber on the far side
and work along through the timber to get above the sable. First we must
try to make sure there were no more of them in the timber or the meadow
that we must work through before we made our stalk.

I wet my finger and put it up. From the cool side it seemed as though
the breeze came down the valley. M'Cola took some dead leaves and
crumpled them and tossed them up. They fell a little toward us. The wind
was all right and now we must glass the edge of the timber and check on
it.

'Hapana,' M'Cola said finally. I had seen nothing either and my eyes
ached from the pull of the eight-power glasses. We could take a chance
on the timber. We might jump something and spook the sable but we had to
take that chance to get around and above them.

We made our way back and down and told the others. From where they were
we could cross the valley out of sight of its upper end and bending
low, me with my hat off, we headed down into the high meadow grass and
across the deeply cut watercourse that ran down through the centre of
the meadow, across its rocky shelf, and up the grassy bank on the other
side, keeping under the edge of a fold of the valley into the shelter of
the woods. Then we headed up through the woods, crouched, in single
file, to try to get above the sable.

We went forward making as good time as we could and still move quietly.
I had made too many stalks on big horn sheep only to find them fed away
and out of sight when you came round the shoulder of the mountain to
trust these sable to stay where they were and, since once we were in the
timber we could no longer see them, I thought it was important that we
come up above them as fast as we could without getting me too blown and
shaky for the shooting.

M'Cola's water bottle made a noise against the cartridges in his pocket
and I stopped and had him pass it to the Wanderobo-Masai. It seemed too
many people to be hunting with, but they all moved quietly as snakes,
and I was over-confident anyway. I was sure the sable could not see us
in the forest, nor wind us.

Finally I was certain we were above them and that they must be ahead of
us, and past where the sun was shining in a thinning of the forest, and
below us, under the edge of the hill. I checked on the aperture in the
sight being clean, cleaned my glasses and wiped the sweat from my
forehead remembering to put the used handkerchief in my left pocket so I
would not fog my glasses wiping them with it again. M'Cola and I and
the husband started to work our way to the edge of the timber; finally
crawling almost to the edge of the ridge. There were still some trees
between us and the open meadow below and we were behind a small bush and
a fallen tree when, raising our heads, we could see them in the grassy
open, about three hundred yards away, showing big and very dark in the
shadow. Between us was scattered open timber full of sunlight and the
openness of the gulch. As we watched two got to their feet and seemed to
be standing looking at us. The shot was possible but it was too long to
be certain and as I lay, watching, I felt somebody touch me on the arm
and Garrick, who had crawled up, whispered throatily, 'Piga! Piga,
B'wana! Doumi! Doumi!' saying to shoot, that it was a bull. I glanced
back and there were the whole outfit on their bellies or hands and
knees, the Wanderobo-Masai shaking like a bird dog. I was furious and
motioned them all down.

So that was a bull, eh, well there was a much bigger bull that M'Cola
and I had seen lying down. The two sable were watching us and I dropped
my head, I thought they might be getting a flash from my glasses. When I
looked up again, very slowly, I shaded my eyes with my hand. The two
sable had stopped looking and were feeding. But one looked up again
nervously and I saw the dark, heavy-built antelope with scimitar-like
horns swung back staring at us.

I had never seen a sable. I knew nothing about them, neither whether
their eyesight was keen, like a ram who sees you at whatever distance
you see him, or like a bull elk who cannot see you at two hundred yards
unless you move. I was not sure of their size either, but I judged the
range to be all of three hundred yards. I knew I could hit one if I shot
from a sitting position or prone, but I could not say where I would hit
him.

Then Garrick again, 'Piga, B'wana, Piga!' I turned on him as though to
slug him in the mouth. It would have been a great comfort to do it. I
truly was not nervous when I first saw the sable, but Garrick was making
me nervous.

'Far?' I whispered to M'Cola who had crawled up and was lying by me.

'Yes.'

'Shoot?'

'No. Glasses.'

We both watched, using the glasses guardedly. I could only see four.
There had been seven. If that was a bull that Garrick pointed out, then
they were all bulls. They all looked the same colour in the shadow.
Their horns all looked big to me. I knew that with mountain sheep the
rams all kept together in bunches until late in the winter when they
went with the ewes; that in the late summer you found bull elk in
bunches too, before the rutting season, and that later they herded up
together again. We had seen as many as twenty impalla rams together upon
the Serenea. All right, then, they could all be bulls, but I wanted a
good one, the best one, and I tried to remember having read something
about them, but all I could remember was a silly story of some man
seeing the same bull every morning in the same place and never getting
up on him. All I could remember was the wonderful pair of horns we had
seen in the Game Warden's office in Arusha. And here were sable now, and
I must play it right and get the best one. It never occurred to me that
Garrick had never seen a sable and that he knew no more about them than
M'Cola or I.

'Too far,' I said to M'Cola.

'Yes.'

'Come on,' I said, then waved the others down, and we started crawling
up to reach the edge of the hill.

Finally we lay behind a tree and I looked around it. Now we could see
their horns clearly with the glasses and could see the other three. One,
lying down, was certainly much the biggest and the horns, as I caught
them in silhouette, seemed to curve much higher and farther back. I was
studying them, too excited to be happy as I watched them, when I heard
M'Cola whisper 'B'wana.'

I lowered the glasses and looked and there was Garrick, taking no
advantage of the cover, crawling on his hands and knees out to join us.
I put my hand out, palm toward him, and waved him down but he paid no
attention and came crawling on, as conspicuous as a man walking down a
city street on hands and knees. I saw one sable looking toward us,
toward him, rather. Then three more got to their feet. Then the big one
got up and stood broadside with head turned toward us as Garrick came up
whispering, 'Piga, B'wana! Piga! Doumi! Doumi! Kubwa Sana.'

There was no choice now. They were definitely spooked and I lay out
flat on my belly, put my arm through the sling, got my elbows settled
and my right toe pushing the ground and squeezed off on the centre of
the bull's shoulder. But at the roar I knew it was bad. I was over him.
They all jumped and stood looking, not knowing where the noise came
from. I shot again at the bull and threw dirt all over him and they were
off. I was on my feet and hit him as he ran and he was down. Then he was
up and I hit him again and he took it and was in the bunch. They passed
him and I shot and was behind him. Then I hit him again and he was
trailing slowly and I knew I had him. M'Cola was handing me cartridges
and I was shoving shells down into the damned-to-hell, lousy, staggered,
Springfield magazine watching the sable making heavy weather of it
crossing the watercourse. We had him all right. I could see he was very
sick. The others were trailing up into the timber. In the sunlight on
the other side they looked much lighter and the one I'd shot looked
lighter, too. They looked a dark chestnut and the one I had shot was
almost black. But he was not black and I felt there was something wrong.
I shoved the last shell in and Garrick was trying to grab my hand to
congratulate me when, below us across the open space where the gully
that we could not see opened on to the head of the valley, sable started
to pass at a running stampede.

'Good God,' I thought. They all looked like the one I had shot and I was
trying to pick a big one. They all looked about the same and they were
crowding running and then came the bull. Even in the shadow he was a
dead black and shiny as he hit the sun, and his horns swept up high,
then back, huge and dark, in two great curves nearly touching the middle
of his back. He was a bull all right. God, what a bull.

'Doumi,' said M'Cola in my ear. 'Doumi!'

I hit him and at the roar he was down. I saw him up, the others passing,
spreading out, then bunching. I missed him. Then I saw him going almost
straight away up the valley in the tall grass and I hit him again and he
went out of sight. The sable now were going up the hill at the head of
the valley, up the hill at our right, up the hill in the timber across
the valley, spread out and travelling fast. Now that I had seen a bull I
knew they all were cows including the first one I had shot. The bull
never showed and I was absolutely sure that we would find him where I
had seen him go down in the long grass.

The outfit were all up and I shook off handshaking and thumb pulling
before we started down through the trees and over the edge of the gully
and to the meadow on a dead run. My eyes, my mind, and all inside of me
were full of the blackness of that sable bull and the sweep of those
horns and I was thanking God I had the rifle reloaded before he came
out. But it was excited shooting, all of it, and I was not proud of it.
I had gotten excited and shot at the whole animal instead of the right
place and I was ashamed; but the outfit now were drunk excited. I would
have walked but you could not hold them, they were like a pack of dogs
as we ran. As we crossed the meadow opening where we had first seen the
seven and went beyond where the bull had gone out of sight, the grass
suddenly was high and over our heads and every one slowed down. There
were two washed-out concealed ravines ten or twelve feet deep that ran
down to the watercourse and what had looked a smooth grass-filled basin
was very broken, tricky country with grass that was from waist-high to
well above our heads. We found blood at once and it led off to the left,
across the watercourse and up the hillside on the left toward the head
of the valley. I thought that was the first sable but it seemed a wider
swing than he had seemed to make when we watched him going from above in
the timber. I made a circle to look for the big bull but I could not
pick his track from the mass of tracks and in the high grass and the
broken terrain it was difficult to figure just where he had gone.

They were all for the blood spoor and it was like trying to make
badly-trained bird dogs hunt a dead bird when they are crazy to be off
after the rest of the covey.

'Doumi! Doumi!' I said. 'Kubwa Sana! The bull. The big bull.'

'Yes,' everybody agreed. 'Here! Here!' The blood spoor that crossed the
watercourse.

Finally I took that trail thinking we must get them one at a time, and
knowing this one was hard hit and the other would keep. Then, too, I
might be wrong and this might be the big bull, he might possibly have
turned in the high grass and crossed here as we were running down. I had
been wrong before, I remembered.

We trailed fast up the hillside, into the timber, the blood was
splashed freely; made a turn toward the right, climbing steeply, and at
the head of the valley in some large rocks jumped a sable. It went
scrambling and bounding off through the rocks. I saw in an instant that
it was not hit and knew that, in spite of the back-swung dark horns, it
was a cow from the dark chestnut colour. But I saw this just in time to
keep from shooting. I had started to pull when I lowered the rifle.

'Manamouki,' I said. 'It's a cow.'

M'Cola and the two Roman guides agreed. I had very nearly shot. We went
on perhaps five yards and another sable jumped. But this one was swaying
its head wildly and could not clear the rocks. It was hard hit and I
took my time, shot carefully, and broke its neck.

We came up to it, lying in the rocks, a large, deep chestnut-brown
animal, almost black, the horns black and curving handsomely back, there
was a white patch on the muzzle and back from the eye, there was a white
belly; but it was no bull.

M'Cola, still in doubt, verified this and feeling the short, rudimentary
teats said 'Manamouki', and shook his head sadly.

It was the first big bull that Garrick had pointed out.

'Bull down there,' I pointed.

'Yes,' said M'Cola.

I thought that we would give him time to get sick, if he were only
wounded, and then go down and find him. So I had M'Cola make the cuts
for taking off the head skin and we would leave the old man to skin out
the head while we went down after the bull.

I drank some water from the canteen. I was thirsty after the run and the
climb, and the sun was up now and it was getting hot. Then we went down
the opposite side of the valley from that we had just come up trailing
the wounded cow, and below, in the tall grass, casting in circles,
commenced to hunt for the trail of the bull. We could not find it.

The sable had been running in a bunch as they came out and any
individual track was confused or obliterated. We found some blood on the
grass stems where I had first hit him, then lost it, then found it again
where the other blood spoor turned off. Then the tracks had all split up
as they had gone, fan-wise, up the valley and the hills and we could not
find it again. Finally I found blood on a grass blade about fifty yards
up the valley and I plucked it and held it up. This was a mistake. I
should have brought them to it. Already everyone but M'Cola was losing
faith in the bull.

He was not there. He had disappeared. He had vanished. Perhaps he had
never existed. Who could say he was a real bull? If I had not plucked
the grass with the blood on it I might have held them. Growing there
with blood on it, it was evidence. Plucked, it meant nothing except to
me and to M'Cola. But I could find no more blood and they were all
hunting half-heartedly now. The only possible way was to quarter every
foot of the high grass and trace every foot of the gullies. It was very
hot now and they were only making a pretence of hunting.

Garrick came up. 'All cows,' he said. 'No bull. Just biggest cow. You
killed biggest cow. We found her. Smaller cow get away.'

'You wind-blown son of a bitch,' I said, then, using my fingers.
'Listen. Seven cows. Then fifteen cows and one bull. Bull hit. Here.'

'All cows,' said Garrick.

'One big cow hit. One bull hit.'

I was so sure sounding that they agreed to this and searched for a while
but I could see they were losing belief in the bull.

'If I had one good dog,' I thought. 'Just one good dog.'

Then Garrick came up. 'All cows,' he said. 'Very big cows.'

'You're a cow,' I said. 'Very big cow.'

This got a laugh from the Wanderobo-Masai, who was getting to look a
picture of sick misery. The brother half believed in the bull, I could
see. Husband, by now, did not believe in any of us. I didn't think he
even believed in the kudu of the night before. Well, after this
shooting, I did not blame him.

M'Cola came up. 'Hapana,' he said glumly. Then, 'B'wana, you shot that
bull?'

'Yes,' I said. For a minute I began to doubt whether there ever was a
bull. Then I saw again his heavy, high-withered blackness and the high
rise of his horns before they swept back, him running with the bunch,
shoulder higher than them and black as hell and as I saw it, M'Cola saw
it again too through the rising mist of the savage's unbelief in what he
can no longer see.

'Yes,' M'Cola agreed. 'I see him. You shoot him.'

I told it again. 'Seven cows. Shoot biggest. Fifteen cows, one bull. Hit
that bull.'

They all believed it now for a moment and circled, searching, but the
faith died at once in the heat of the sun and the tall grass blowing.

'All cows,' Garrick said. The Wanderobo-Masai nodded, his mouth open. I
could feel the comfortable lack of faith coming over me too. It was a
damned sight easier not to hunt in that sun in that shadeless pocket and
in the sun on that steep hillside. I told M'Cola we would hunt up the
valley on both sides, finish skinning out the head, and he and I would
come down alone and find the bull. You could not hunt them against that
unbelief. I had had no chance to train them; no power to discipline. If
there had been no law I would have shot Garrick and they would all have
hunted or cleared out. I think they would have hunted. Garrick was not
popular. He was simply poison.

M'Cola and I came back down the valley, quartered it like bird dogs,
circled and followed and checked track after track. I was hot and very
thirsty. The sun was something serious by now.

'Hapana,' M'Cola said. We could not find him. Whatever he was, we had
lost him.

'Maybe he was a cow. Maybe it was all goofy,' I thought, letting the
unbelief come in as a comfort. We were going to hunt up the hill side to
the right and then we would have checked it all and would take the cow
head into camp and see what the Roman had located. I was dead thirsty
and drained the canteen. We would get water in camp.

We started up the hill and I jumped a sable in some brush. I almost
loosed off at it before I saw it was a cow. That showed how one could be
hidden, I thought. We would have to get the men and go over it all
again; and then, from the old man, came a wild shouting.

'Doumi! Doumi!' in a high, screaming shout.

'Where?' I shouted, running across the hill toward him.

'There! There!' he shouted, pointing into the timber on the other side
of the head of the valley. 'There! There! There he goes! There!'

We came on a dead run but the bull was out of sight in the timber on the
hillside. The old man said he was huge, he was black, he had great
horns, and he came by him ten yards away, hit in two places, in the gut
and high up in the rump, hard hit but going fast, crossing the valley,
through the boulders and going up the hillside.

I gut-shot him, I thought. Then as he was going away I laid that one on
his stern. He lay down and was sick and we missed him. Then, when we
were past, he jumped.

'Come on,' I said. Everyone was excited and ready to go now and the old
man was chattering about the bull as he folded the head skin and put the
head upon his own head and we started across through the rocks and up,
quartering up on to the hillside. There, where the old man had pointed,
was a very big sable track, the hoof marks spread wide, the tracks
grading up into the timber and there was blood, plenty of it.

We trailed him fast, hoping to jump him and have a shot, and it was easy
trailing in the shade of the trees with plenty of blood to follow. But
he kept climbing, grading up around the hill, and he was travelling
fast. We kept the blood bright and wet but we could not come up on him.
I did not track but kept watching ahead thinking I might see him as he
looked back, or see him down, or cutting down across the hill through
the timber, and M'Cola and Garrick were tracking, aided by every one but
the old man who staggered along with the sable skull and head skin held
on his own grey head. M'Cola had hung the empty water bottle on him, and
Garrick had loaded him with the cinema camera. It was hard going for the
old man.

Once we came on a place where the bull had rested and watched his back
track, there was a little pool of blood on a rock where he had stood,
behind some bushes, and I cursed the wind that blew our scent on ahead
of us. There was a big breeze blowing now and I was certain we had no
chance of surprising him, our scent would keep everything moving out of
the way ahead of us as long as anything could move. I thought of trying
to circle ahead with M'Cola and let them track but we were moving fast,
the blood was still bright on the stones and on the fallen leaves and
grass and the hills were too steep for us to make a circle. I did not
see how we could lose him.

Then he took us up and into a rocky, ravine-cut country where the
trailing was slow and the climbing difficult. Here, I thought, we would
jump him in a gully but the spatters of blood, not so bright now, went
on around the boulders, over the rocks and up and up and left us on a
rim-rock ledge. He must have gone down from there. It was too steep
above for him to have gone over the top of the hill. There was no other
way to go but down, but how had he gone, and down which ravine? I sent
them looking down three possible ways and got out on the rim to try to
sight him. They could not find any spoor, and then the Wanderobo-Masai
called from below and to the right that he had blood and, climbing down,
we saw it on a rock and then followed it in occasional drying splatters
down through a steep descent to the meadow below. I was encouraged when
he started down hill and in the knee-high, heavy grass of the meadow
trailing was easy again, because the grass brushed against his belly and
while you could not see tracks clearly without stooping double and
parting the grass to look, yet the blood spoor was plain on the grass
blades. But it was dry now and dully shiny and I knew we had lost much
time on him when he rim-rocked us on the hill.

Finally his trail crossed the dry watercourse about where we had first
come in sight of the meadow in the morning and led away into the
sloping, sparsely-wooded country on the far side. There were no clouds
and I could feel the sun now, not just as heat but as a heavy deadly
weight on my head and I was very thirsty. It was very hot but it was not
the heat that bothered. It was the weight of the sun.

Garrick had given up tracking seriously and was only contributing
theatrical successes of discovering blood when M'Cola and I were
checked. He would do no routine tracking any more, but would rest and
then track in irritating spurts. The Wanderobo-Masai was useless as a
blue-jay and I had M'Cola give him the big rifle to carry so that we
would get some use out of him. The Roman's brother was obviously not a
hunter and the husband was not very interested. He did not seem to be a
hunter either. As we trailed, slowly, the ground, hard now as the sun
had baked it, the blood only black spots and splatters on the short
grass, one by one the brother, Garrick, and the Wanderobo-Masai dropped
out and sat in the shade of the scattered trees.

The sun was terrific and as it was necessary to track with heads bent
down and stooping, in spite of a handkerchief spread over my neck I had
a pounding ache in my head.

M'Cola was tracking slowly, steadily, and absolutely absorbed in the
problem. His bare, bald head gleamed with sweat and when it ran down in
his eyes he would pluck a grass stem, hold it with each hand and shave
the sweat off his forehead and bald black crown with the stem.

We went on slowly. I had always sworn to Pop that I could out-track
M'Cola but I realized now that in the past I had been giving a sort of
Garrick performance in picking up the spoor when it was lost and that in
straight, steady trailing, now in the heat, with the sun really bad,
truly bad so that you could feel what it was doing to your head, cooking
it to hell, trailing in short grass on hard ground where a blood spot
was a dry, black blister on a grass blade, difficult to see; that you
must find the next little black spot perhaps twenty yards away, one
holding the last blood while the other found the next, then going on,
one on each side of the trail; pointing with a grass stem at the spots
to save talking, until it ran out again and you marked the last blood
with your eye and both made casts to pick it up again, signalling with a
hand up, my mouth too dry to talk, a heat shimmer over the ground now
when you straightened up to let your neck stop aching and looked ahead,
I knew M'Cola was immeasurably the better man and the better tracker.
Have to tell Pop, I thought.

At this point M'Cola made a joke. My mouth was so dry that it was hard
to talk.

'B'wana,' M'Cola said, looking at me when I had straightened up and was
leaning my neck back to get the crick out of it.

'Yes?'

'Whisky?' and he offered me the flask.

'You bastard,' I said in English, and he chuckled and shook his head.

'Hapana whisky?'

'You savage,' I said in Swahili.

We started tracking again, M'Cola shaking his head and very amused, and
in a little while the grass was longer and it was easier again. We
crossed all that semi-open country we had seen from the hillside in the
morning and going down a slope the tracks swung back into high grass. In
this higher grass I found that by half shutting my eyes I could see his
trail where he had shouldered through the grass and I went ahead fast
without trailing by the blood, to M'Cola's amazement, but then we came
out on very short grass and rock again and now the trailing was the
hardest yet.

He was not bleeding much now; the sun and the heat must have dried the
wounds and we found only an occasional small starry splatter on the
rocky ground.

Garrick came up and made a couple of brilliant discoveries of blood
spots, then sat down under a tree. Under another tree I could see the
poor old Wanderobo-Masai holding his first and last job as gun-bearer.
Under another was the old man, the sable head beside him like some
black-mass symbol, his equipment hanging from his shoulders. M'Cola and
I went on trailing very slowly and laboriously across the long stony
slope and back and up into another tree-scattered meadow, and through
it, and into a long field with piled up boulders at the end. In the
middle of this field we lost the trail completely and circled and hunted
for nearly two hours before we found blood again.

The old man found it for us below the boulders and to the right half a
mile away. He had gone ahead down there on his own idea of what the bull
would have done. The old man was a hunter.

Then we trailed him very slowly, on to hard stony ground a mile away.
But we could not trail from there. The ground was too hard to leave a
track and we never found blood again. Then we hunted on our various
theories of where the bull would go, but the country was too big and we
had no luck.

'No good,' M'Cola said.

I straightened up and went over to the shade of a big tree. It felt cool
as water and the breeze cooled my skin through the wet shirt. I was
thinking about the bull and wishing to God I had never hit him. Now I
had wounded him and lost him. I believe he kept right on travelling and
went out of that country. He never showed any tendency to circle back.
To-night he would die and the hyenas would eat him, or, worse, they
would get him before he died, hamstringing him and pulling his guts out
while he was alive. The first one that hit that blood spoor would stay
with it until he found him. Then he would call up the others. I felt a
son of a bitch to have hit him and not killed him. I did not mind
killing anything, any animal, if I killed it cleanly, they all had to
die and my interference with the nightly and the seasonal killing that
went on all the time was very minute and I had no guilty feeling at all.
We ate the meat and kept the hides and horns. But I felt rotten sick
over this sable bull. Besides, I wanted him, I wanted him damned badly,
I wanted him more than I would admit. Well, we had played our string out
with him. Our chance was at the start when he was down and we missed
him. We had lost that. No, our best chance, the only chance a rifleman
should ever ask, was when I had a shot and shot at the whole animal
instead of calling the shot. It was my own lousy fault. I was a son of a
bitch to have gut-shot him. It came from over-confidence in being able
to do a thing and then omitting one of the steps in how it is done.
Well, we had lost him. I doubted if there was a dog in the world could
trail him now in that heat. Still that was the only chance. I got out
the dictionary and asked the old man if there were any dogs at the
Roman's place.

'No,' said the old man. 'Hapana.'

We made a very wide circle and I sent the brother and the husband out in
another circle. We found nothing, no trace, no tracks, no blood, and I
told M'Cola we would start for camp. The Roman's brother and the husband
went up the valley to get the meat of the sable cow we had shot. We were
beaten.

M'Cola and I ahead, the other following, we went across the long heat
haze of the open country, down to cross the dry watercourse, and up and
into the grateful shade of the trail through the woods. As we were going
along through the broken sunlight and shadow, the floor of the forest
smooth and springy where we cut across to save distance from the trail,
we saw, less than a hundred yards away, a herd of sable standing in the
timber looking at us. I pulled back the bolt and looked for the best
pair of horns.

'Doumi,' Garrick whispered. 'Doumi kubwa sana!'

I looked where he pointed. It was a very big cow sable, dark chestnut,
white marks on the face, white belly, heavy built and with a fine
curving pair of horns. She was standing broadside to us with her head
turned, looking. I looked carefully at the whole lot. They were all
cows; evidently the bunch whose bull I had wounded and lost, and they
had come over the hill and herded up again together here.

'We go to camp,' I said to M'Cola.

As we started forward the sable jumped and ran past us, crossing the
trail ahead. At every good pair of cow horns, Garrick said, 'Bull,
B'wana. Big, big bull. Shoot, B'wana. Shoot, oh shoot!'

'All cows,' I said to M'Cola when they were past, running in a panic
through the sun-splashed timber.

'Yes,' he agreed.

'Old man,' I said. The old man came up.

'Let the guide carry that,' I said.

The old man lowered the cow sable head.

'No,' said Garrick.

'Yes,' I said. 'Bloody well yes.'

We went on through the woods toward camp. I was feeling better, much
better. All through the day I had never thought once of the kudu. Now we
were coming home to where they were waiting.

It seemed much longer coming home although, usually, the return over a
new trail is shorter. I was tired all the way into my bones, my head
felt cooked, and I was thirstier than I had ever been in my life. But
suddenly, walking through the woods, it was much cooler. A cloud had
come over the sun.

We came out of the timber and down on to the flat and in sight of the
thorn fence. The sun was behind a bank of clouds now and then in a
little while the sky was covered completely and the clouds looked heavy
and threatening. I thought perhaps this had been the last clear hot day;
unusual heat before the rains. First I thought: if it had only rained,
so that the ground would hold a track, we could have stayed with that
bull for ever; then, looking at the heavy, woolly clouds that so
quickly had covered all the sky, I thought that if we were going to join
the outfit, and get the car across that ten-mile stretch of black cotton
road on the way to Handeni, we had better start. I pointed to the sky.

'Bad,' M'Cola agreed.

'Go to the camp of B'wana M'Kubwa?'

'Better.' Then, vigorously, accepting the decision, 'N'Dio. N'Dio.'

'We go,' I said.

Arrived at the thorn fence and the hut, we broke camp fast. There was a
runner there from our last camp who had brought a note, written before
P.O.M. and Pop had left, and bringing my mosquito net. There was nothing
in the note, only good luck and that they were starting. I drank some
water from one of our canvas bags, sat on a petrol tin and looked at the
sky. I could not, conscientiously, chance staying. If it rained here we
might not even be able to get out to the road. If it rained heavily on
the road, we would never get out to the coast that season. Both the
Austrian and Pop had said that, I had to go.

That was settled, so there was no use to think how much I wanted to
stay. The day's fatigue helped make the decision easy. Everything was
being loaded into the car and they were all gathering up their meat from
the sticks around the ashes of the fire.

'Don't you want to eat, B'wana?' Kamau asked me.

'No,' I said. Then in English, 'Too bloody tired.'

'Eat. You are hungry.'

'Later, in the car.'

M'Cola went by with a load, his big, flat face completely blank again.
It only came alive about hunting or some joke. I found a tin cup by the
fire and called to him to bring the whisky, and the blank face cracked
at the eyes and mouth into a smile as he took the flask out of his
pocket.

'With water better,' he said.

'You black Chinaman.'

They were all working fast and the Roman's women came over and stood a
little way away watching the carrying and the packing of the car. There
were two of them, good-looking, well built, and shy, but interested. The
Roman was not back yet. I felt very badly to go off like this with no
explanation to him. I liked the Roman very much and had a high regard
for him.

I took a drink of the whisky and water and looked at the two pairs of
kudu horns that leaned against the wall of the chicken coop hut. From
the white, cleanly picked skulls the horns rose in slow spirals that
spreading made a turn, another turn, and then curved delicately into
those smooth, ivory-like points. One pair was narrower and taller
against the side of the hut. The other was almost as tall but wider in
spread and heavier in beam. They were the colour of black walnut meats
and they were beautiful to see. I went over and stood the Springfield
against the hut between them and the tips reached past the muzzle of the
rifle. As Kamau came back from carrying a load to the car I told him to
bring the camera and then had him stand beside them while I took a
picture. Then he picked them up, each head a load, and carried them over
to the car.

Garrick was talking loudly and in a roostery way to the Roman's women.
As near as I could make out he was offering them the empty petrol boxes
in exchange for a piece of something.

'Come here,' I called to him. He came over still feeling smart.

'Listen,' I told him in English. 'If I get through this safari without
socking you it's going to be a bloody marvel. And if I ever hit you I'll
break your mucking jaw. That's all.'

He did not understand the words but the tone made it clearer than if I
had got something out of the dictionary to tell him. I stood up and
motioned to the women that they could have the petrol tins and the
cases. I was damned if I could not have anything to do with them if I
would let Garrick make any passes.

'Get in the car,' I told him. 'No,' as he started to make delivery of
one of the petrol tins, 'in the car.' He went over to the car.

We were all packed now and ready to go. The horns were curling out the
back of the car, tied on to the loads. I left some money for the Roman
and one of the kudu hides with the boy. Then we got in the car. I got in
the front seat with the Wanderobo-Masai. Behind were M'Cola, Garrick,
and the runner, who was a man from the old man's village by the road.
The old man was crouched on top of the loads at the back, close under
the roof.

We waved and started, passing more of the Roman's household, the older
and uglier part, roasting up piles of meat by a log fire beside the
trail that came up from the river through the maize field. We made the
crossing all right, the creek was down and the banks had dried and I
looked back at the field, the Roman's huts, and the stockade where we
had camped, and the blue hills, dark under the heavy sky, and I felt
very badly not to have seen the Roman and explain why we had gone off
like this.

Then we were going through the woods, following our trail and trying to
make time to get out before dark. We had trouble, twice, at boggy places
and Garrick seemed to be in a state of great hysteria, ordering people
about when we were cutting brush and shovelling, until I was certain I
would have to hit him. He called for corporal punishment the way a
showing-off child does for a spanking. Kamau and M'Cola were both
laughing at him. He was playing the victorious leader home from the
chase now. I thought it was really a shame that he could not have his
ostrich plumes.

Once when we were stuck and I was shovelling and he was stooping over in
a frenzy of advice and command-giving, I brought the handle of the
shovel, with manifest un-intention, up hard into his belly and he sat
down, backwards. I never looked toward him, and M'Cola, Kamau, and I
could not look at each other for fear we would laugh.

'I am hurt,' he said in astonishment, getting to his feet.

'Never get near a man shovelling,' I said in English. 'Damned
dangerous.'

'I am hurt,' said Garrick holding his belly.

'Rub it,' I told him and rubbed mine to show him how. We all got into
the car again and I began to feel sorry for the poor, bloody, useless,
theatrical bastard, so I told M'Cola I would drink a bottle of beer. He
got one out from under the loads in the back, we were going through the
deer-park-looking country now, opened it, and I drank it slowly. I
looked around and saw Garrick was all right now, letting his mouth run
freely again. He rubbed his belly and seemed to be telling them what a
hell of a man he was and how he had never felt it. I could feel the old
man watching me from up under the roof as I drank the beer.

'Old man,' I said.

'Yes, B'wana.'

'A present,' and I handed what was left in the bottle back. There wasn't
much left but the foam and a very little beer.

'Beer?' asked M'Cola.

'By God, yes,' I said. I was thinking about beer and in my mind was back
to that year in the spring when we walked on the mountain road to the
Bains de Alliez and the beer-drinking contest where we failed to win the
calf and came home that night around the mountain with the moonlight on
the fields of narcissi that grew on the meadows, and how we were drunk
and talked about how you would describe that light on that paleness, and
the brown beer sitting at the wood tables under the wistaria vine at
Aigle when we came in across the Rhone Valley from fishing the
Stockalper with the horse chestnut trees in bloom, and Chink and I again
discussing writing and whether you could call them waxen candelabras.
God, what bloody literary discussions we had; we were literary as hell
then just after the war, and later there was the good beer at Lipp's at
midnight after Mascart-Ledoux at the Cirque de Paris or Routis-Ledoux,
or after any other great fight where you lost your voice and were still
too excited to turn in; but beer was mostly those years just after the
war with Chink and in the mountains. Flags for the Fusilier, crags for
the Mountaineer, for English poets beer, strong beer for me. That was
Chink then, quoting Robert Graves, then. We outgrew some countries and
we went to others but beer was still a bloody marvel. The old man knew
it too. I had seen it in his eye the first time he saw me take a drink.

'Beer,' said M'Cola. He had it open, and I looked out at that park-like
country, the engine hot under my boots, the Wanderobo-Masai as strong as
ever beside me, Kamau watching the grooves of the tyre tracks in the
green turf, and I hung my booted legs over the side to let my feet cool
and drank the beer and wished old Chink was along. Captain Eric Edward
Dorman-Smith, M.C., of His Majesty's Fifth Fusiliers. Now if he were
here we could discuss how to describe this deer-park country and whether
deer-park was enough to call it. Pop and Chink were much alike. Pop was
older and more tolerant for his years and the same sort of company. I
was learning under Pop, while Chink and I had discovered a big part of
the world together and then our ways had gone a long way apart.

But that damned sable bull. I should have killed him; but it was a
running shot. To hit him at all I had to use him all as a target. Yes,
you bastard, but what about the cow you missed twice, prone, standing
broadside? Was that a running shot? No. If I'd gone to bed last night I
would not have done that. Or if I'd wiped out the bore to get the oil
out she would not have thrown high the first time. Then I would not have
pulled down and shot under her the second shot. Every damned thing is
your own fault if you're any good. I thought I could shoot a shot-gun
better than I could and I had lost plenty of money backing my opinion,
but I knew, coldly, and outside myself, that I could shoot a rifle on
game as well as any son of a bitch that ever lived. Like hell I could.
So what? So I gut-shot a sable bull and let him get away. Could I shoot
as well as I thought I could? Sure. Then why did I miss on that cow?
Hell, everybody is off sometime. You've got no bloody business to be
off. Who the hell are you? My conscience? Listen, I'm all right with my
conscience. I know just what kind of a son of a bitch I am and I know
what I can do well. If I hadn't had to leave and pull out I would have
got a sable bull. You know the Roman was a hunter. There was another
herd. Why did I have to make a one-night stand? Was that any way to
hunt? Hell, no. I'd make some money some way and when we came back we
would come to the old man's village in lorries, then pack in with
porters so there wouldn't be any damned car to worry about, send the
porters back, and make a camp in the timber up the stream above the
Roman's and hunt that country slowly, living there and hunting out each
day, sometimes laying off and writing for a week, or writing half the
day, or every other day, and get to know it as I knew the country around
the lake where we were brought up. I'd see the buffalo feeding where
they lived, and when the elephants came through the hills we would see
them and watch them breaking branches and not have to shoot, and I would
lie in the fallen leaves and watch the kudu feed out and never fire a
shot unless I saw a better head than this one in the back, and instead
of trailing that sable bull, gut-shot to hell, all day, I'd lie behind a
rock and watch them on the hillside and see them long enough so they
belonged to me for ever. Sure, if Garrick didn't take his B'wana Simba
car in there and shoot the country out. But if he did I'd go on down
beyond those hills and there would be another country where a man could
live and hunt if he had time to live and hunt. They'd gone in wherever a
car could go. But there must be pockets like this all over, that no one
knows of, that the cars pass all along the road. They all hunt the same
places.

'Beer?' asked M'Cola.

'Yes,' I said.

Sure, you couldn't make a living. Everyone had explained that. The
locusts came and ate your crops and the monsoon failed, and the rains
did not come, and everything dried up and died. There were ticks and fly
to kill the stock, and the mosquitoes gave you fever and maybe you got
blackwater. Your cattle would die and you would get no price for your
coffee. It took an Indian to make money from sisal and on the coast
every coconut plantation meant a man ruined by the idea of making money
from copra. A white hunter worked three months out of the year and drank
for twelve and the Government was ruining the country for the benefit of
the Hindu and the natives. That was what they told you. Sure. But I did
not want to make money. All I wanted was to live in it and have time to
hunt. Already I had had one of the diseases and had experienced the
necessity of washing a three-inch bit of my large intestine with soap
and water and tucking it back where it belonged an unnumbered amount of
times a day. There were remedies which cured this and it was well worth
going through for what I had seen and where I had been. Besides I caught
that on the dirty boat out from Marseilles. P.O.M. hadn't been ill a
day. Neither had Karl. I loved this country and I felt at home and where
a man feels at home, outside of where he's born, is where he's meant to
go. Then, in my grandfather's time, Michigan was a malaria ridden state.
They called it fever and ague. And in Tortugas, where I'd spent months,
a thousand men once died of yellow fever. New continents and islands try
to frighten you with disease as a snake hisses. The snake may be
poisonous too. You kill them off. Hell, what I had a month ago would
have killed me in the old days before they invented the remedies. Maybe
it would and maybe I would have got well.

It is easier to keep well in a good country by taking simple
precautions than to pretend that a country which is finished is still
good.

A continent ages quickly once we come. The natives live in harmony with
it. But the foreigner destroys, cuts down the trees, drains the water,
so that the water supply is altered, and in a short time the soil, once
the sod is turned under, is cropped out, and next it starts to blow away
as it has blown away in every old country and as I had seen it start to
blow in Canada. The earth gets tired of being exploited. A country wears
out quickly unless man puts back in it all his residue and that of all
his beasts. When he quits using beasts and uses machines the earth
defeats him quickly. The machine can't reproduce, nor does it fertilize
the soil, and it eats what he cannot raise. A country was made to be as
we found it. We are the intruders and after we are dead we may have
ruined it but it will still be there and we don't know what the next
changes are. I suppose they all end up like Mongolia.

I would come back to Africa but not to make a living from it. I could do
that with two pencils and a few hundred sheets of the cheapest paper.
But I would come back to where it pleased me to live; to really live.
Not just to let my life pass. Our people went to America because that
was the place to go then. It had been a good country and we had made a
mess of it and I would go, now, somewhere else as we had always had the
right to go somewhere else and as we had always gone. You could always
come back. Let the others come to America who did not know that they had
come too late. Our people had seen it at its best and fought for it
when it was well worth fighting for. Now I would go somewhere else. We
always went in the old days and there were still good places to go.

I knew a good country when I saw one. Here there was game, plenty of
birds, and I liked the natives. Here I could shoot and fish. That, and
writing, and reading, and seeing pictures was all I cared about doing.
And I could remember all the pictures. Other things I liked to watch but
they were what I liked to do. That and ski-ing. But my legs were bad now
and it was not worth the time you spent hunting good snow any more. You
saw too many people ski-ing now.

Now, the car making a turn around a bank and crossing a green, grassy
field, we came in sight of the Masai village.

When the Masai saw us they started running and we stopped, surrounded by
them, just below the stockade. There were the young warriors who had run
with us, and now their women and the children all came out to see us.
The children were all quite young and the men and women all seemed the
same age. There were no old people. They all seemed to be our great
friends and we gave a very successful party with refreshments in the
shape of our bread which they all ate with much laughing, the men first,
then the women. Then I had M'Cola open the two cans of mincemeat and the
plum pudding and I cut these into rations and passed them out. I had
heard and read that the Masai subsisted only on the blood of their
cattle mixed with milk, drawing the blood off from a wound in a vein of
the neck made by shooting an arrow at close range. These Masai, however,
ate bread, cold mincemeat, and plum pudding with great relish and much
laughter and joking. One very tall and handsome one kept asking me
something that I did not understand and then five or six more joined in.
Whatever this was they wanted it very badly. Finally the tallest one
made a very strange face and emitted a sound like a dying pig. I
understood finally: he was asking if we had one of those, and I pressed
the button of the klaxon. The children ran screaming, the warriors
laughed and laughed, and then as Kamau, in response to popular demand,
pressed the klaxon again and again, I watched the look of utter rapture
and ecstasy on the women's faces and knew that with that klaxon he could
have had any woman in the tribe.

Finally we had to go and after distributing the empty beer bottles, the
labels from the bottles, and finally the bottle caps, picked up by
M'Cola from the floor, we left, klaxoning the women into ecstasy, the
children into panic, and the warriors into delight. The warriors ran
with us for a good way but we had to make time, the going was good
through the park-like country and, in a little while, we waved to the
last of them standing straight and tall, in their brown skin garments,
their clubbed pig-tails hanging, their faces stained a red-brown,
leaning on their spears, looking after us and smiling.

The sun was almost down and as I did not know the road I had the runner
get up in front to sit with the Wanderobo-Masai and help direct Kamau
and I sat in the back with M'Cola and Garrick. We were out of the park
country and on to the dry bush-spattered plain before the sun went down
and I had another bottle of the German beer and, watching the country,
saw, suddenly, that all the trees were full of white storks. I did not
know whether they were there in migration or were following the locusts
but, in the twilight, they were lovely to see and, deeply moved by them,
I gave the old man a good two fingers of beer that was left in the
bottom of the bottle.

On the next bottle I forgot and drank it all before I remembered the old
man. (There were still storks in the trees and we saw some Grant's
gazelles feeding off to the right. A jackal, like a grey fox, trotted
across the road.) So I told M'Cola to open another bottle and we were
through the plain and climbing the long slope toward the road and the
village, the two mountains in sight now, and it almost dark and quite
cold when I handed the bottle to the old man, who took it where he was
crouched up under the roof, and nursed it tenderly.

At the village we stopped in the road in the dark, and I paid the runner
the amount it said to give him in the note he had brought. I paid the
old man the amount Pop said to pay him and a bonus. Then there was a big
dispute among them all. Garrick was to go to the main camp to get his
money. Abdullah insisted upon going along. He did not trust Garrick. The
Wanderobo-Masai insisted pitifully that he go. He was sure the others
would cheat him out of his share and I was fairly sure they would, too.
There was petrol that had been left for us to use in case we were short
and for us to bring in any event. We were overloaded and I did not know
how the road was ahead. But I thought we might carry Abdullah and
Garrick and squeeze in the Wanderobo-Masai. There was no question of the
old man going. He had been paid off and had agreed to the amount, but
now he would not leave the car. He crouched on top of the load and hung
on to the ropes saying, 'I am going with B'wana'.

M'Cola and Kamau had to break his handholds and pull him off to re-load,
him shouting, 'I want to go with B'wana!'

While they were loading in the dark he held on to my arm and talked very
quietly in a language that I could not understand.

'You have the shillings,' I said.

'Yes, B'wana,' he said. That was not what it was about. The money was
all right.

Then, when we started to get in the car he broke away and started to
climb up through the back and on to the loads. Garrick and Abdullah
pulled him down.

'You can't go. There isn't room.'

He talked to me softly again, begging and pleading.

'No, there is no room.'

I remembered I had a small penknife and I got it out of my pocket and
put it in his hand. He pushed it back in my hand.

'No,' he said. 'No.'

He was quiet then and stood by the road. But when we started, he started
to run after the car and I could hear him in the dark screaming,
'B'wana! I want to go with B'wana!'

We went on up the road, the headlights making it seem like a boulevard
after where we had been. We drove fifty-five miles on that road in the
dark night without incident. I stayed awake until after we were through
the bad part, a long plain of deeply rutted black cotton where the
headlights picked out the trail through bushes and then, when the road
was better, I went to sleep, waking occasionally to see the headlights
shining on a wall of tall trees, or a naked bank, or when we ground in
low gear up a steep place, the light slanting up ahead.

Finally, when the speedometer showed fifty miles, we stopped and woke a
native in his hut and M'Cola asked about the camp. I slept again and
then woke as we were turning off the road and on a track through trees
with the fires of the camp showing ahead. Then as we came to where our
lights shone on the green tents I shouted and we all commenced to shout
and blew the klaxon and I let the gun off, the flame cutting up into the
dark and it making a great noise. Then we were stopped and out from
Pop's tent I saw him coming, thick and heavy in his dressing-gown, and
then he had his arms around my shoulders and said, 'You god damned bull
fighter', and I was clapping him on the back.

And I said, 'Look at them, Pop'.

'I saw them,' he said. 'The whole back of the car's full of them.'

Then I was holding P.O.M. tight, she feeling very small inside the
quilted bigness of the dressing-gown, and we were saying things to each
other.

Then Karl came out and I said, 'Hi, Karl'.

'I'm so damned glad,' he said. 'They're marvellous.'

M'Cola had the horns down by now and he and Kamau were holding them so
they could all see them in the light of the fire.

'What did you get?' I asked Karl.

'Just another one of those. What do you call them? Tendalla.'

'Swell,' I said. I knew I had one no one could beat and I hoped he had a
good one too. 'How big was he?'

'Oh, fifty-seven,' Karl said.

'Let's see him,' I said, cold in the pit of my stomach.

'He's over there,' Pop said, and we went over. They were the biggest,
widest, darkest, longest-curling, heaviest, most unbelievable pair of
kudu horns in the world. Suddenly, poisoned with envy, I did not want to
see mine again; never, never.

'That's great,' I said, the words coming out as cheerfully as a croak. I
tried it again. 'That's swell. How did you get him?'

'There were three,' Karl said. 'They were all as big as that. I couldn't
tell which was the biggest. We had a hell of a time. I hit him four or
five times.'

'He's a wonder,' I said. I was getting so I could do it a little better
but it would not fool anybody yet.

'I'm awfully glad you got yours,' Karl said. 'They're beauties. I want
to hear all about them in the morning. I know you're tired to-night.
Good night.'

He went off, delicate as always, so we could talk about it if we wanted
to.

'Come on over and have a drink,' I called.

'No thanks, I think I better go to bed. I've got a sort of headache.'

'Good night, Karl.'

'Good night. Good night, Poor Old Mamma,'

'Good night,' we all said.

By the fire, with whisky and soda, we talked and I told them about it
all.

'Perhaps they'll find the bull,' Pop said. 'We'll offer a reward for the
horns. Have them sent to the Game Department. How big is your biggest
one?'

'Fifty-two.'

'Over the curve?'

'Yes. Maybe he's a little better.'

'Inches don't mean anything,' Pop said. 'They're damned wonderful kudu.'

'Sure. But why does he have to beat me so _bloody_ badly?'

'He's got the luck,' Pop said. 'God, what a kudu. I've only seen one
head killed over fifty in my life before. That was up on Kalal.'

'We knew he had it when we left the other camp. The lorry came in and
told us,' P.O.M. said. 'I've spent all my time praying for you. Ask Mr.
J. P.'

'You'll never know what it meant to see that car come into the firelight
with those damned horns sticking out,' Pop said. 'You old bastard.'

'It's wonderful,' P.O.M. said. 'Let's go and look at them again.'

'You can always remember how you shot them. That's what you really get
out of it,' Pop said. 'They're damned wonderful kudu.'

But I was bitter and I was bitter all night long. In the morning,
though, it was gone. It was all gone and I have never had it again.

Pop and I were up and looking at the heads before breakfast. It was a
grey, overcast morning and cold. The rains were coming.

'They're three marvellous kudu,' he said.

'They look all right with the big one this morning,' I said. They did,
too, strangely enough. I had accepted the big one now and was happy to
see him and that Karl had him. When you put them side by side they
looked all right. They really did. They all were big.

'I'm glad you're feeling better,' Pop said. 'I'm feeling better myself.'

'I'm really glad he has him,' I said truly. 'Mine'll hold me.'

'We have very primitive emotions,' he said. 'It's impossible not to be
competitive. Spoils everything, though.'

'I'm all through with that,' I said. 'I'm all right again. I had quite a
trip, you know.'

'Did you not,' said Pop.

'Pop, what does it mean when they shake hands and get hold of your thumb
and pull it?'

'It's on the order of blood brotherhood but a little less formal. Who's
been doing that to you?'

'Everybody but Kamau.'

'You're getting to be a hell of a fellow,' Pop said. 'You must be an old
timer out here. Tell me, are you much of a tracker and bird shot?'

'Go to hell.'

'M'Cola has been doing that with you too?'

'Yes.'

'Well, well,' said Pop. 'Let's get the little Memsahib and have some
breakfast. Not that I'm feeling up to it.'

'I am,' I said. 'I haven't eaten anything since day before yesterday.'

'Drank some beer though, didn't you?'

'Ah, yes.'

'Beer's a food,' Pop said.

We got the little Memsahib and old Karl and had a very jolly breakfast.

       *       *       *       *       *

A month later P.O.M., Karl, and Karl's wife who had come out and joined
us at Haifa, were sitting in the sun against a stone wall by the Sea of
Galilee eating some lunch and drinking a bottle of wine and watching the
grebes out on the lake. The hills made shadows on the water, which was
flat calm and rather stagnant looking. There were many grebes, making
spreading wakes in the water as they swam, and I was counting them and
wondering why they never were mentioned in the Bible. I decided that
those people were not naturalists.

'I'm not going to walk on it,' Karl said, looking out at the dreary
lake. 'It's been done already.'

'You know,' P.O.M. said, 'I can't remember it. I can't remember Mr. J.
P.'s face. And he's beautiful. I think about him and think about him
and I can't see him. It's terrible. He isn't the way he looks in a
photograph. In a little while I won't be able to remember him at all.
Already I can't see him.'

'You must remember him,' Karl said to her.

'I can remember him,' I said. 'I'll write you a piece some time and put
him in.'
Chapter I

They started two hours before daylight, and at first, it was not
necessary to break the ice across the canal as other boats had gone on
ahead.  In each boat, in the darkness, so you could not see, but only
hear him, the poler stood in the stern, with his long oar.  The shooter
sat on a shooting stool fastened to the top of a box that contained his
lunch and shells, and the shooter's two, or more, guns were propped
against the load of wooden decoys.  Somewhere, in each boat, there was
a sack with one or two live mallard hens, or a hen and a drake, and in
each boat there was a dog who shifted and shivered uneasily at the
sound of the wings of the ducks that passed overhead in the darkness.

Four of the boats went on up the main canal towards the big lagoon to
the north.  A fifth boat had already turned off into a side canal.
Now, the sixth boat turned south into a shallow lagoon, and there was
no broken water.

It was all ice, new-frozen during the sudden, windless cold of the
night.  It was rubbery and bending against the thrust of the boatman's
oar.  Then it would break as sharply as a pane of glass, but the boat
made little forward progress.

'Give me an oar,' the shooter in the sixth boat said.  He stood up and
braced himself carefully.  He could hear the ducks passing in the
darkness, and feel the restless lurching of the dog.  To the north he
heard the sound of breaking ice from the other boats.

'Be careful,' the poler in the stern said.  'Don't tip the boat over.'

'I am a boatman, too,' the shooter said.

He took the long oar the boatman handed him and reversed it so he could
hold it by the blade.  Holding the blade he reached forward and punched
the handle through the ice.  He felt the firm bottom of the shallow
lagoon, put his weight on the top of the wide oar-blade, and holding
with both hands and, first pulling, then shoving, until the pole-hold
was well to the stern, he drove the boat ahead to break the ice.  The
ice broke like sheets of plate glass as the boat drove into it, and
onto it, and astern the boatman shoved them ahead into the broken
passage.

After a while, the shooter, who was working hard and steadily and
sweating in his heavy clothes, asked the boatman, 'Where is the
shooting barrel?'

'Off there to the left.  In the middle of the next bay.'

'Should I turn for it now?'

'As you wish.'

'What do you mean, as I wish?  You know the water.  Is there water to
carry us there?'

'The tide is low.  Who knows?'

'It will be daylight before we get there if we don't hurry.'

The boatman did not answer.

All right, you surly jerk, the shooter thought to himself.  We are
going to get there.  We've made two-thirds of the way now and if you
are worried about having to work to break ice to pick up birds, that is
altogether too bad.

'Get your back in it, jerk,' he said in English.

'What?' the boatman asked in Italian.

'I said let's go.  It's going to be light.'

It was daylight before they reached the oaken-staved hogshead sunk in
the bottom of the lagoon.  It was surrounded by a sloping rim of earth
that had been planted with sedge and grass, and the shooter swung
carefully up onto this, feeling the frozen grasses break as he stepped
on them.  The boatman lifted the combination shooting stool and shell
box out of the boat and handed it to the shooter, who leaned over and
placed it in the bottom of the big barrel.

The shooter, wearing his hip boots and an old combat jacket, with a
patch on the left shoulder that no one understood, and with the slight
light places on the straps, where stars had been removed, climbed down
into the barrel and the boatman handed him his two guns.

He placed them against the wall of the barrel and hung his other shell
bag between them, hanging it on two hooks built into the wall of the
sunken barrel.  Then he leaned the guns against each side of the shell
bag.

'Is there water?' he asked the boatman.

'No water,' the boatman said.

'Can you drink the lagoon water?'

'No.  It is unhealthy.'

The shooter was thirsty from the hard work of breaking the ice and
driving the boat in and he felt his anger rise, and then held it, and
said, 'Can I help you in the boat to break ice to put out the decoys?'

'No,' the boatman said and shoved the boat savagely out on to the thin
sheet ice that cracked and ripped as the boat drove up on to it.  The
boatman commenced smashing at the ice with the blade of his oar and
then started tossing decoys out to the side and behind him.

He's in a beautiful mood, the shooter thought.  He's a big brute, too.
I worked like a horse coming out here.  He just pulled his weight and
that's all.  What the hell is eating him?  This is his trade, isn't it?

He arranged the shooting stool so he would have the maximum swing to
left and right, opened a box of shells, and filled his pockets and
opened another of the boxes of shells in the shell bag so he could
reach into it easily.  In front of him, where the lagoon lay glazed in
the first light, was the black boat and the tall, heavily built boatman
smashing with his oar at the ice and tossing decoys overboard as though
he were ridding himself of something obscene.

It was getting lighter now and the shooter could see the low line of
the near point across the lagoon.  Beyond that point he knew there were
two other shooting posts and far beyond it there was more marsh and
then the open sea.  He loaded both his guns and checked the position of
the boat that was putting out decoys.

From behind him, he heard the incoming whisper of wings and he
crouched, took hold of his right-hand gun with his right hand as he
looked up from under the rim of the barrel, then stood to shoot at the
two ducks that were dropping down, their wings set to brake, coming
down dark to the grey dim sky, slanting towards the decoys.

His head low, he swung the gun on a long slant, down, well and ahead of
the second duck, then without looking at the result of his shot he
raised the gun smoothly, up, up ahead and to the left of the other duck
that was climbing to the left and as he pulled, saw it fold in flight
and drop among the decoys in the broken ice.  He looked to his right
and saw the first duck a black patch on the same ice.  He knew he had
shot carefully on the first duck, far to the right of where the boat
was and on the second, high out and to the left, letting the duck climb
far up and to the left to be sure the boat was out of any line of fire.
It was a lovely double, shot exactly as he should have shot, with
complete consideration and respect for the position of the boat and he
felt very good as he reloaded.

'Listen,' the man in the boat called.  'Don't shoot towards the boat.'

I'll be a sad son of a bitch, the shooter said to himself.  I will
indeed.

'Get your decoys out,' he called to the man in the boat.  'But get them
out fast.  I won't shoot until they are all out.  Except straight
overhead.'

The man in the boat said nothing that could be heard.

I can't figure it, the shooter thought to himself.  He knows the game.
He knows I split the work, or more, coming out.  I never shot a safer
or more careful duck in my life than that.  What's the matter with him?
I offered to put the dekes out with him.  The hell with him.

Out on the right now, the boatman was still chopping angrily at the ice
and tossing out the wooden decoys in a hatred that showed in every move
he made.

Don't let him spoil it, the shooter told himself.  There won't be much
shooting with this ice unless the sun should melt it later on, You
probably will only have a few birds, so don't let him spoil it for you.
You don't know how many more times you will shoot ducks and do not let
anything spoil it for you.

He watched the sky lightening beyond the long point of marsh and
turning in the sunken barrel, he looked out across the frozen lagoon
and the marsh and saw the snow-covered mountains a long way off.  Low
as he was, no foot-hills showed and the mountains rose abruptly from
the plain.  As he looked towards the mountains he could feel a breeze
on his face and he knew, then, the wind would come from there, rising
with the sun and that some birds would surely come flying in from the
sea when the wind disturbed them.

The boatman had finished putting out the decoys.  They were in two
bunches, one straight ahead and to the left towards where the sun would
rise and the other to the shooter's right.  Now he dropped over the hen
mallard with her string and anchor and the calling duck bobbed her head
under water and raising and dipping her head, splashed water on to her
back.

'Don't you think it would be good to break more ice around the edges?'
the shooter called to the boatman.  'There's not much water to attract
them.'

The boatman said nothing but commenced to smash at the jagged perimeter
of ice with his oar.  This ice breaking was unnecessary and the boatman
knew it.  But the shooter did not know it and he thought, I do not
understand him but I must not let him ruin it.  I must keep it entire
and not let him do it.  Every time you shoot now can be the last shoot
and no stupid son of a bitch should be allowed to ruin it.  Keep your
temper, boy, he told himself.




Chapter II

But he was not a boy.  He was fifty and a Colonel of Infantry in the
Army of the United States and to pass a physical examination that he
had to take the day before he came down to Venice for this shoot, he
had taken enough mannitol hexanitrate to, well he did not quite know
what to--to pass, he said to himself.

The surgeon had been quite sceptical.  But he noted the readings after
taking them twice.

'You know, Dick,' he said.  'It isn't indicated; in fact it is
definitely contra-indicated in increased intra-colour and intra-cranial
pressure.'

'I don't know what you are talking about,' the shooter, who was not a
shooter, then, except potentially and was a Colonel of Infantry in the
Army of the United States, reduced from being a general officer, said.

'I have known you a long time, Colonel.  Or maybe it just seems a long
time,' the surgeon told him.

'It's been a long time,' the Colonel said.

'We sound like song writers,' the surgeon said.  'But don't you ever
run into anything, or let any sparks strike you, when you're really
souped up on nitroglycerin.  They ought to make you drag a chain like a
high-octane truck.'

'Wasn't my cardiograph O.K.?' the Colonel asked.

'Your cardiograph was wonderful, Colonel.  It could have been that of a
man of twenty-five.  It might have been that of a boy of nineteen.'

'Then what are you talking about?' the Colonel asked.

That much mannitol hexanitrate produced a certain amount of nausea,
sometimes, and he was anxious for the interview to terminate.  He was
also anxious to lie down and take a seconal.  I ought to write the
manual of minor tactics for the heavy pressure platoon, he thought.
Wish I could tell him that.  Why don't I just throw myself on the mercy
of the court?  You never do, he told himself.  You always plead them
non-guilty.

'How many times have you been hit in the head?' the surgeon asked him.

'You know,' the Colonel told him.  'It's in my 201.'

'How many times have you been hit _on_ the head?'

'Oh Christ.'  Then he said.  'You are asking for the army or as my
physician?'

'As your physician.  You didn't think I'd try to wind your clock, did
you?'

'No, Wes.  I'm sorry.  Just what was it you wanted to know?'

'Concussions.'

'Real ones?'

'Any time you were cold or couldn't remember afterwards.'

'Maybe ten,' the Colonel said.  'Counting polo.  Give or take three.'

'You poor old son of a bitch,' the surgeon said.  'Colonel, sir,' he
added.

'Can I go now?' the Colonel asked.

'Yes, sir,' the surgeon said.  'You're in good shape.'

'Thanks,' the Colonel said.  'Want to go on a duck shoot down in the
marshes at the mouth of the Tagliamento?  Wonderful shoot.  Some nice
Italian kids I met up at Cortina own it.'

'Is that where they shoot coots?'

'No.  They shoot real ducks at this one.  Good kids.  Good shoot.  Real
ducks.  Mallard, pin-tail, widgeon.  Some geese.  Just as good as at
home when we were kids.'

'I was kids in 'twenty-nine and 'thirty.'

'That's the first mean thing I ever heard you say.'

'I didn't mean it like that.  I just meant I didn't remember when duck
shooting was good.  I'm a city boy, too.'

'That's the only God-damn trouble with you, too.  I never saw a city
boy yet that was worth a damn.'

'You don't mean that, do you, Colonel?'

'Of course not.  You know damn well I don't.'

'You're in good shape, Colonel,' the surgeon said.  'I'm sorry I can't
go on the shoot.  I can't even shoot.'

'Hell,' said the Colonel.  'That doesn't make any difference.  Neither
can anybody else in this army.  I'd like to have you around.'

'I'll give you something else to back up what you're using.'

'Is there anything?'

'Not really.  They're working on stuff, though.'

'Let 'em work,' the Colonel said.

'I think that's a laudable attitude, sir.'

'Go to hell,' the Colonel said.  'You sure you don't want to go?'

'I get my ducks at Longchamps on Madison Avenue,' the surgeon said.
'It's air-conditioned in the summer and it's warm in the winter and I
don't have to get up before first light and wear long-horned underwear.'

'All right, City Boy.  You'll never know.'

'I never wanted to know,' the surgeon said.  'You're in good shape,
Colonel, sir.'

'Thanks,' said the Colonel and went out.




Chapter III

That was the day before yesterday.  Yesterday he had driven down from
Trieste to Venice along the old road that ran from Montfalcone to
Latisana and across the flat country.  He had a good driver and he
relaxed completely in the front seat of the car and looked out at all
this country he had known when he was a boy.

It looks quite differently now, he thought.  I suppose it is because
the distances are all changed.  Everything is much smaller when you are
older.  Then, too, the roads are better now and there is no dust.  The
only times I used to ride through it was in a camion.  The rest of the
times we walked.  I suppose what I looked for then, was patches of
shade when we fell out, and wells in farmyards.  And ditches, too, he
thought.  I certainly looked for plenty of ditches.

They made a curve and crossed the Tagliamento on a temporary bridge.
It was green along the banks and men were fishing along the far shore
where it ran deep.  The blown bridge was being repaired with a snarl of
riveting hammers, and eight hundred yards away the smashed buildings
and outbuildings of what was now a ruined country house once built by
Longhena showed where the mediums had dropped their loads.

'Look at it,' the driver said.  'In this country you find a bridge or a
railway station.  Then go half a mile from it in any direction and you
find it like that.'

'I guess the lesson is,' the Colonel said, 'don't ever build yourself a
country house, or a church, or hire Giotto to paint you any frescoes,
if you've got a church, eight hundred yards away from any bridge.'

'I knew there must be a lesson in it, sir,' the driver said.

They were past the ruined villa now and on to the straight road with
the willows growing by the ditches still dark with winter, and the
fields full of mulberry trees.  Ahead a man was pedalling a bicycle and
using both his hands to read a paper.

'If there are heavies the lesson ought to say a mile,' the driver said.
'Would that be about right, sir?'

'If it's guided missiles,' the Colonel said.  'Better make it two
hundred and fifty miles.  Better give that cyclist some horn.'

The driver did, and the man moved over to the side of the road without
either looking up or touching his handlebars.  As they passed him, the
Colonel tried to see what paper he was reading, but it was folded over.

'I guess a man would do better now not to build himself a fine house or
a church, or to get who did you say it was to paint frescoes?'

'Giotto, I said.  But it could be Piero della Francesca or Mantegna.
Could be Michelangelo.'

'Do you know a lot about painters, sir?' the driver asked.

They were on a straight stretch of road now and were making time so
that one farm blended, almost blurred, into another farm and you could
only see what was far ahead and moving towards you.  Lateral vision was
just a condensation of flat, low country in the winter.  I'm not sure I
like speed, the Colonel thought.  Brueghel would have been in a hell of
a shape if he had to look at the country like this.

'Painters?' he answered the driver.  'I know quite a little about them,
Burnham.'

'I'm Jackson, sir.  Burnham's up at the rest centre at Cortina.  That's
a fine place, sir.'

'I'm getting stupid,' the Colonel said.  'Excuse me, Jackson.  It is a
fine place.  Good chow.  Well run.  Nobody bothers you.'

'Yes, sir,' Jackson agreed.  'Now the reason I asked you about
painters, is these madonnas.  I thought I ought to see some painting so
I went to that big place in Florence.'

'The Uffizi?  The Pitti?'

'Whatever they call it.  The biggest one.  And I kept looking at those
paintings until madonnas started to run out of my ears.  I tell you,
Colonel, sir, a man who hasn't been checked out on this painting can
only see just about so many madonnas and it gets him.  You know my
theory?  You know how crazy they are about bambinis and the less they
got to eat the more bambinis they got and that they have coming?  Well,
I think these painters were probably big bambini lovers like all
Italians.  I don't know these ones you mentioned just now, so I don't
include them in my theory and you'll put me straight anyway.  But it
looks to me like these madonnas, that I really saw plenty of, sir, it
looks to me like these just straight ordinary madonna painters were
sort of a manifest, say, of this whole bambini business, if you
understand what I mean.'

'Plus the fact that they were restricted to religious subjects.'

'Yes, sir.  Then you think there is something to my theory?'

'Sure.  I think it is a little more complicated, though.'

'Naturally, sir.  It's just my preliminary theory.'

'Do you have any other theories on art, Jackson?'

'No, sir.  That bambini theory is as far as I've thought it through.
What I wish is, though, they would paint some good pictures of that
high country up around the rest centre at Cortina.'

'Titian came from up there,' the Colonel said.  'At least they say he
did.  I went down the valley and saw the house where he was supposed to
be born.'

'Was it much of a place, sir?'

'Not so much.'

'Well, if he painted any pictures of that country up around there, with
those sunset colour rocks and the pines and the snow and all the
pointed steeples----'

'_Campaniles_,' the Colonel said.  'Like that one ahead at Ceggia.  It
means bell tower.'

'Well, if he painted any really good pictures of that country I'd sure
as hell like to trade him out of some of them.'

'He painted some wonderful women,' the Colonel said.

'If I had a joint or a roadhouse or some sort of an inn, say, I could
use one of those,' the driver said.  'But if I brought home a picture
of some woman, my old woman would run me from Rawlins to Buffalo.  I'd
be lucky if I _got_ to Buffalo.'

'You could give it to the local museum.'

'All they got in the local museum is arrow heads, war bonnets, scalping
knives, different scalps, petrified fish, pipes of peace, photographs
of Liver Eating Johnston, and the skin of some bad man that they hanged
him and some doctor skinned him out.  One of those women pictures would
be out of place there.'

'See that next _campanile_ down there across the plain?' the Colonel
said.  'I'll show you a place down there where we used to fight when I
was a kid.'

'Did you fight here, too, sir?'

'Yeah,' the Colonel said.

'Who had Trieste in that war?'

'The Krauts.  The Austrians, I mean.'

'Did we ever get it?'

'Not till the end when it was over.'

'Who had Florence and Rome?'

'We did.'

'Well, I guess you weren't so damned bad off then.'

'Sir,' the Colonel said gently.

'I'm sorry, sir,' the driver said quickly.  'I was in the Thirty-Sixth
Division, sir.'

'I've seen the patch.'

'I was thinking about the Rapido, sir, I didn't mean to be insolent or
lacking in respect.'

'You weren't,' the Colonel said.  'You were just thinking about the
Rapido.  Listen, Jackson, everybody who's soldiered a long time has had
their Rapidos and more than one.'

'I couldn't take more than one, sir.'

The car went through the cheerful town of San Dona di Piave.  It was
built up and new, but no more ugly than a middle western town, and it
was as prosperous and as cheery as Fossalta, just up the river, is
miserable and gloomy, the Colonel thought.  Did Fossalta never get over
the first war?  I never saw it before it was smacked, he thought.  They
shelled it badly before the big fifteenth of June offensive in
'eighteen.  Then we shelled it really badly before we re-took it.  He
remembered how the attack had taken off from Monastier, gone through
Fornace, and on this winter day he remembered how it had been that
summer.

A few weeks ago he had gone through Fossalta and had gone out along the
sunken road to find the place where he had been hit, out on the river
bank.  It was easy to find because of the bend of the river, and where
the heavy machine gun post had been the crater was smoothly grassed.
It had been cropped, by sheep or goats, until it looked like a designed
depression in a golf course.  The river was slow and a muddy blue here,
with reeds along the edges, and the Colonel, no one being in sight,
squatted low, and looking across the river from the bank where you
could never show your head in daylight, relieved himself in the exact
place where he had determined, by triangulation, that he had been badly
wounded thirty years before.

'A poor effort,' he said aloud to the river and the river bank that
were heavy with autumn quiet and wet from the fall rains.  'But my own.

He stood up and looked around.  There was no one in sight and he had
left the car down the sunken road in front of the last and saddest
rebuilt house in Fossalta.

'Now I'll complete the monument,' he said to no one but the dead, and
he took an old Solingen clasp knife, such as German poachers carry,
from his pocket.  It locked on opening and, twirling it, he dug a neat
hole in the moist earth.  He cleaned the knife on his right combat boot
and then inserted a brown ten thousand lira note in the hole and tamped
it down and put the grass that he had cored out over it.

'That is twenty years at five hundred lira a year for the Medaglia
d'Argento al Valore Militare.  The V.C. carries ten guineas, I believe.
The D.S.C. is non-productive.  The Silver Star is free.  I'll keep the
change,' he said.

It's fine now, he thought.  It has merde, money, blood; look how that
grass grows; and the iron's in the earth along with Gino's leg, both of
Randolfo's legs and my right knee-cap.  It's a wonderful monument.  It
has everything.  Fertility, money, blood and iron.  Sounds like a
nation.  Where fertility, money, blood and iron is; there is the
fatherland.  We need coal though.  We ought to get some coal.

Then he looked across the river to the rebuilt white house that had
once been rubble, and he spat in the river.  It was a long spit and he
just made it.

'I couldn't spit that night nor afterwards for a long time,' he said.
'But I spit good now for a man who doesn't chew.'

He walked slowly back to where the car was parked.  The driver was
asleep.

'Wake up, son,' he had said.  'Turn her around and take that road
towards Treviso.  We don't need a map on this part.  I'll give you the
turns.'




Chapter IV

Now, on his way into Venice, keeping strictly controlled and unthinking
his great need to be there, the big Buick cleared the last of San Dona
and came up on to the bridge over the Piave.

They crossed the bridge and were on the Italian side of the river and
he saw the old sunken road again.  It was as smooth and undistinguished
now, as it was all along the river.  But he could see the old
positions.  And now, along each side of the straight, flat,
canal-bordered road they were making time on were the willows of the
two canals that had contained the dead.  There had been a great killing
at the last of the offensive and someone, to clear the river bank
positions and the road in the hot weather, had ordered the dead thrown
into the canals.  Unfortunately, the canal gates were still in the
Austrians' hands down the river, and they were closed.

So there was little movement to the water, and the dead had stayed,
there a long time, floating and bloating face up and face down
regardless of nationality until they had attained colossal proportions.
Finally, after organization had been established, labour troops hauled
them out at night and buried them close to the road.  The Colonel
looked for added greenness close to the road but could not note any.
However, there were many ducks and geese in the canals, and men were
fishing in them all along the road.

They dug them all up anyway, the Colonel thought, and buried them in
that big _ossario_ up by Nervesa.

'We fought along here when I was a kid,' the Colonel told the driver.

'It's a God-damn flat country to fight in,' the driver said.  'Did you
hold that river?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'We held it and lost it and took it back
again.'

'There isn't a contour here as far as you can see.'

'That was the trouble,' the Colonel said.  'You had to use contours you
couldn't see, they were so small, and ditches and houses and canal
banks and hedgerows.  It was like Normandy only flatter.  I think it
must have been something like fighting in Holland.'

'That river sure doesn't look anything like the Rapido.'

'It was a pretty good old river,' the Colonel said.  'Up above, it had
plenty of water then, before all these hydro-electric projects.  And it
had very deep and tricky channels in the pebbles and shingle when it
was shallow.'

He knew how boring any man's war is to any other man, and he stopped
talking about it.  They always take it personally, he thought.  No one
is interested in it, abstractly, except soldiers and there are not many
soldiers.  You make them and the good ones are killed, and above they
are always bucking for something so hard they never look or listen.
They are always thinking of what they have seen and while you are
talking they are thinking of what they will say and what it may lead to
in their advancement or their privilege.  There was no sense boring
this boy, who, for all his combat infantryman badge, his Purple Heart
and the other things he wore, was in no sense a soldier but only a man
placed, against his will, in uniform, who had elected to remain in the
army for his own ends.

'What did you do in civil life, Jackson?' he asked.

'I was partners with my brother in a garage in Rawlins, Wyoming, sir.

'Are you going back there?'

'My brother got killed in the Pacific and the guy who was running the
garage was no good,' the driver said.  'We lost what we had put in it.'

'That's bad,' the Colonel said.

'You're God-damned right it's bad,' the driver said and added, 'sir'.

The Colonel looked up the road.

He knew that if they kept on this road they would come, shortly, to the
turn that he was waiting for; but he was impatient.

'Keep your eyes open and take a left hand turn on the road leading off
this pike,' he told the driver.

'Do you think those low roads will be good with this big car, sir?'

'We'll see,' the Colonel said.  'Hell, man, it hasn't rained in three
weeks.'

'I don't trust those side roads in this low country.'

'If we get stuck, I'll haul you out with oxen.'

'I was only thinking about the car, sir.'

'Well, think about what I told you and turn off on the first left side
road you see if it looks practicable.'

'That looks like one coming up, from the hedges,' the driver said.

'You're all clear behind.  Pull up just ahead of it and I'll go over
and have a look.'

He stepped out of the car and walked across the wide, hard-surfaced
road and looked at the narrow dirt road, with the swift flowing canal
beside it, and the thick hedge beyond.  Beyond the hedge, he saw a low
red farmhouse with a big barn.  The road was dry.  There were not even
cart ruts sunk in it.  He got back into the car.

'It's a boulevard,' he said.  'Quit worrying.'

'Yes, sir.  It's your car, sir.'

'I know,' the Colonel said.  'I'm still paying for it.  Say, Jackson,
do you always suffer so much any time you go off a highway on to a
secondary road?'

'No, sir.  But there's a lot of difference between a jeep, and a car as
low hung as this.  Do you know the clearance you have on your
differential and your body frame on this?'

'I've got a shovel in the truck and we've got chains.  Wait till you
see where we're going after we leave Venice.'

'Do we go all the way in this car?'

'I don't know.  I'll see.'

'Think about your fenders, sir.'

'We'll cut the fenders off like the Indians do in Oklahoma.  She's
over-fendered right now.  She's got too much of everything except
engine.  Jackson, that's a real engine she's got.'

'It certainly is, sir.  It's a great pleasure to drive that big engine
on the good roads.  That's why I don't want anything to happen to her.'

'That's very good of you, Jackson.  Now just quit suffering.'

'I'm not suffering, sir.'

'Good,' said the Colonel.

He was not, either, because just then he saw, beyond the line of
close-bunched brown trees ahead, a sail moving along.  It was a big red
sail, raked sharply down from the peak, and it moved slowly behind the
trees.

Why should it always move your heart to see a sail moving along through
the country, the Colonel thought.  Why does it move my heart to see the
great, slow, pale oxen?  It must be the gait as well as the look of
them and the size and the colour.

But a good fine big mule, or a string of pack mules in good condition,
moves me, too.  So does a coyote every time I ever see one, and a wolf,
gaited like no other animal, grey and sure of himself, carrying that
heavy head and with the hostile eyes.

'Ever see any wolves out around Rawlins, Jackson?'

'No, sir.  Wolves were gone before my time; they poisoned them out.
Plenty coyotes, though.'

'Do you like coyotes?'

'I like to hear them nights.'

'So do I.  Better than anything, except seeing a ship sailing along
through the country.'

'There's a boat doing that over there, sir.'

'On the Sile canal,' the Colonel told him.  'She's a sailing barge
going to Venice.  This wind is off the mountains now and she makes it
along pretty good.  It's liable to turn really cold to-night if this
wind holds and it ought to bring in plenty ducks.  Turn to your left
here and we'll run along the canal.  There's a good road.'

'They didn't have much duck shooting where I came from.  But there was
plenty of it in Nebraska along the Platte.'

'Do you want to shoot where we're going?'

'I don't believe so, sir.  I'm not much of a shot, and I'd rather stay
in that sack.  It's a Sunday morning, you know.'

'I know,' the Colonel said.  'You can stay in the sack until noon if
you want.'

'I brought my repellent.  I ought to sleep O.K.'

'I'm not sure you'll need it,' the Colonel said.  'Did you bring any
K-rations or Ten in One?  They're liable to eat Italian food, you know.'

'I brought a few cans to help out and a little stuff to give away.'

'That's good,' the Colonel said.

He was looking ahead now to see where the canal road joined the main
highway again.  There he knew that he would see it on a clear day such
as this was.  Across the marshes, brown as those at the mouths of the
Mississippi around Pilot Town are in winter, and with their reeds bent
by the heavy north wind, he saw the squared tower of the church at
Torcello and the high _campanile_ of Burano beyond it.  The sea was a
slate blue and he could see the sails of twelve sailing barges running
with the wind for Venice.

I'll have to wait until we cross the Dese River above Noghera to see it
perfectly, he thought.  It is strange to remember how we fought back
there along the canal that winter to defend it and we never saw it.
Then one time, I was back as far as Noghera and it was clear and cold
like to-day, and I saw it across the water.  But I never got into it.
It is my city, though, because I fought for it when I was a boy, and
now that I am half a hundred years old, they know I fought for it and
am a part owner and they treat me well.

Do you think that's why they treat you well, he asked himself.

Maybe, he thought.  Maybe they treat me well because I'm a chicken
colonel on the winning side.  I don't believe it, though.  I hope not,
anyway.  It is not France, he thought.

There you fight your way into a city that you love and are very careful
about breaking anything and then, if you have good sense, you are
careful not to go back because you will meet some military characters
who will resent your having fought your way in.  _Vive la France et les
pommes de terre frites.  Liberté, Venalité, et Stupidité_.  The great
_clarte_ of the French military thinking.  They haven't had a military
thinker since du Picq.  He was a poor bloody Colonel, too.  _Mangin_,
_Maginot_ and _Gamelin_.  Take your choice, Gentlemen.  Three schools
of thought.  One; I hit them on the nose.  Two; I hide behind this
thing which does not cover my left flank.  Three; I hide my head in the
sand like an ostrich, confident in the greatness of France as a
military power and then take off.

Take off is putting it very cleanly and pleasantly.  Sure, he thought,
whenever you over-simplify you become unjust.  Remember all the fine
ones in the Resistance, remember Foch both fought and organized and
remember how fine the people were.  Remember your good friends and
remember your deads.  Remember plenty things and your best friends
again and the finest people that you know.  Don't be a bitter nor a
stupid.  And what has that to do with soldiering as a trade?  Cut it
out, he told himself.  You're on a trip to have fun.

'Jackson,' he said, 'are you happy?'

'Yes, sir.'

'Good.  Shortly, we are coming to a view that I want you to see.  You
only have to take one look at it.  The entire operation will be
practically painless.'

I wonder what he's riding me for now, the driver thought.  Just because
he was a B.G. once he knows everything.  If he was any good as a B.G.
why didn't he hold it?  He's been beat up so much he's slug-nutty.

'There's the view, Jackson,' the Colonel said.  'Stop her by the side
of the road and we'll take a look.'

The Colonel and the driver walked over to the Venice side of the road
and looked across the lagoon that was whipped by the strong, cold wind
from the mountains that sharpened all the outlines of buildings so that
they were geometrically clear.

'That's Torcello directly opposite us,' the Colonel pointed.  'That
where the people lived that were driven off the mainland by the
Visigoths.  They built that church you see there with the square tower.
There were thirty thousand people lived there once and they built that
church to honour their Lord and to worship him.  Then, after they built
it, the mouth of the Sile River silted up or a big flood changed it,
and all that land we came through just now got flooded and started to
breed mosquitoes and malaria hit them.  They all started to die, so the
elders got together and decided they should pull out to a healthy place
that would be defensible with boats, and where the Visigoths and the
Lombards and the other bandits couldn't get at them, because these
bandits had no sea-power.  The Torcello boys were all great boatmen.
So they took the stones of all their houses in barges, like that one we
just saw, and they built Venice.'

He stopped.  'Am I boring you, Jackson?'

'No, sir.  I had no idea who pioneered Venice.'

'It was the boys from Torcello.  They were very tough and they had very
good taste in building.  They came from a little place up the coast
called Caorle.  But they drew on all the people from the towns and the
farms behind when the Visigoths overran them.  It was a Torcello boy
who was running arms into Alexandria, who located the body of St. Mark
and smuggled it out under a load of fresh pork so the infidel customs
guards wouldn't check him.  This boy brought the remains of St. Mark to
Venice, and he's their patron saint and they have a cathedral there to
him.  But by that time, they were trading so far to the east that the
architecture is pretty Byzantine for my taste.  They never built any
better than at the start there in Torcello.  That's Torcello there.'

It was, indeed.

'St Mark's square is where the pigeons are and where they have that big
cathedral that looks sort of like a moving picture palace, isn't it?'

'Right, Jackson.  You're on the ball.  If that's the way you look at
it.  Now you look beyond Torcello you will see the lovely campanile on
Burano that has damn near as much list on it as the leaning tower of
Pisa.  That Burano is a very over-populated little island where the
women make wonderful lace, and the men make bambinis and work day-times
in the glass factories in that next island you see on beyond with the
other campanile, which is Murano.  They make wonderful glass day-times
for the rich of all the world, and then they come home on the little
vaporetto and make bambinis.  Not everyone passes every night with his
wife though.  They hunt ducks nights too, with big punt guns, out along
the edge of the marshes on this lagoon you're looking across now.  All
night long on a moonlight night you hear the shots.'  He paused.

'Now when you look past Murano you see Venice.  That's my town.
There's plenty more I could show you, but I think we probably ought to
roll now.  But take one good look at it.  This is where you can see how
it all happened.  But nobody ever looks at it from here.'

'It's a beautiful view.  Thank you, sir.'

'O.K.,' the Colonel said.  'Let's roll.'




Chapter V

But he continued to look and it was all as wonderful to him and it
moved him as it had when he was eighteen years old and had seen it
first, understanding nothing of it and only knowing that it was
beautiful.  The winter had come very cold that year and all the
mountains were white beyond the plain.  It was necessary for the
Austrians to try to break through at the angle where the Sile River and
the old bed of the Piave were the only lines of defence.

If you had the old bed of the Piave then you had the Sile to fall back
on if the first line did not hold.  Beyond the Sile there was nothing
but bare-assed plain and a good road network into the Veneto plain and
the plains of Lombardy, and the Austrians attacked again and again and
again late through the winter, to try to get on to this fine road that
they were rolling on now which led straight to Venice.  That winter the
Colonel, who was a lieutenant then, and in a foreign army, which had
always made him slightly suspect afterwards in his own army, and had
done his career no good, had a sore throat all winter.  This sore
throat was from being in the water so much.  You could not get dry and
it was better to get wet quickly and stay wet.

The Austrian attacks were ill co-ordinated, but they were constant and
exasperated and you first had the heavy bombardment which was supposed
to put you out of business, and then, when it lifted, you checked your
positions and counted the people.  But you had no time to care for
wounded, since you knew that the attack was coming immediately, and
then you killed the men who came wading across the marshes, holding
their rifles above the water and coming as slow as men wade, waist deep.

If they did not lift the shelling when it started, the Colonel, then a
lieutenant, often thought, I do not know what we would be able to do.
But they always lifted it and moved it back ahead of the attack.

If we had lost the old Piave and were on the Sile they would move it
back to the second and third lines; although such lines were quite
untenable, and they should have brought all their guns up very close
and whammed it in all the time they attacked and until they breached
us.  But thank God, some high fool always controls it, the Colonel
thought, and they did it piecemeal.

All that winter, with a bad sore throat, he had killed men who came,
wearing the stick bombs hooked up on a harness under their shoulders
with the heavy, calf-hide packs and the bucket helmets.  They were the
enemy.

But he never hated them; nor could have any feeling about them.  He
commanded with an old sock around his throat, which had been dipped in
turpentine, and they broke down the attacks with rifle fire and with
the machine guns which still existed, or were usable, after the
bombardment.  He taught his people to shoot, really, which is a rare
ability in continental troops, and to be able to look at the enemy when
they came, and, because there was always a dead moment when the
shooting was free, they became very good at it.

But you always had to count and count fast after the bombardment to
know how many shooters you would have.  He was hit three times that
winter, but they were all gift wounds; small wounds in the flesh of the
body without breaking bone, and he had become quite confident of his
personal immortality since he knew he should have been killed in the
heavy artillery bombardment that always preceded the attacks.  Finally,
he did get hit properly and for good.  No one of his other wounds had
ever done to him what the first big one did.  I suppose it is just the
loss of the immortality, he thought.  Well, in a way, that is quite a
lot to lose.

This country meant very much to him, more than he could, or would ever
tell anyone and now he sat in the car happy that in another half hour
they would be in Venice.  He took two mannitol hexanitrate tablets;
since he had always been able to spit since 1918, he could take them
dry, and asked:

'How are you doing, Jackson?'

'Fine, sir.'

'Take the left outside road when we hit the fork for Mestre and we'll
be able to see the boats along the canal and miss that main traffic.'

'Yes, sir,' the driver said.  'Will you check me on the fork?'

'Of course,' the Colonel said.

They were coming up on Mestre fast, and already it was like going to
New York the first time you were ever there in the old days when it was
shining, white and beautiful.  I stole that, he thought.  But that was
before the smoke.  We are coming into my town, he thought.  Christ,
what a lovely town.

They made the left turn and came along the canal where the fishing
boats tied up, and the Colonel looked at them and his heart was happy
because of the brown nets and the wicker fish traps and the clean,
beautiful lines of the boats.  It's not that they are picturesque.  The
hell with picturesque.  They are just damned beautiful.

They passed the long line of boats in the slow canal that carried water
from the Brenta, and he thought about the long stretch of the Brenta
where the great villas were, with their lawns and their gardens and the
plane trees and the cypresses.  I'd like to be buried out there, he
thought.  I know the place very well.  I don't believe you could fix
it, though.  I don't know.  I know some people that might let me be
buried on their place.  I'll ask Alberto.  He might think it was
morbid, though.

For a long time he had been thinking about all the fine places he would
like to be buried and what parts of the earth he would like to be a
part of.  The stinking, putrefying part doesn't last very long, really,
he thought, and anyway you are just a sort of mulch, and even the bones
will be some use finally.  I'd like to be buried way out at the edge of
the grounds, but in sight of the old graceful house and the tall, great
trees.  I don't think it would be much of a nuisance to them.  I could
be a part of the ground where the children play in the evenings, and in
the mornings, maybe, they would still be training jumping horses and
their hoofs would make the thudding on the turf, and trout would rise
in the pool when there was a hatch of fly.

They were up on the causeway from Mestre to Venice now with the ugly
Breda works that might have been Hammond, Indiana.

'What do they make there, sir?' Jackson asked.

'The company makes locomotives in Milan,' the Colonel said.  'Here they
make a little of everything in the metallurgic line.'

It was a miserable view of Venice now and he always disliked this
causeway except that you made such good time and you could see the
buoys and the channels.

'This town makes a living on its own,' he said to Jackson.  'She used
to be the queen of the seas and the people are very tough and they give
less of a good God-damn about things than almost anybody you'll ever
meet.  It's a tougher town than Cheyenne when you really know it, and
everybody is very polite.'

'I wouldn't say Cheyenne was a tough town, sir.'

'Well, it's a tougher town than Casper.'

'Do you think that's a tough town, sir?'

'It's an oil town.  It's a nice town.'

'But I don't think it's tough, sir.  Or ever was.'

'O.K., Jackson.  Maybe we move in different circles.  Or maybe we have
a differing definition for the word.  But this town of Venice, with
everybody being polite and having good manners, is as tough as Cooke
City, Montana, on the day they have the Old Timers' Fish Fry.'

'My idea of a tough town is Memphis.'

'Not like Chicago, Jackson.  Memphis is only tough if you are a Negro.
Chicago is tough North, South, there isn't any East and West.  But
nobody has any manners.  But in this country, if you ever want to know
a _really_ tough town where they eat wonderfully, too, go to Bologna.'

'I never was there.'

'Well, there's the Fiat garage where we leave the car,' the Colonel
said.  'You can leave the key at the office.  They don't steal.  I'll
go in the bar while you park upstairs.  They have people that will
bring the bags.'

'Is it O.K. to leave your gun and shooting gear in the trunk, sir?'

'Sure.  They don't steal here.  I told you that once.'

'I wanted to take the necessary precautions, sir, on your valuable
property.'

'You're so damned noble that sometimes you stink,' the Colonel said.
'Get the wax out of your ears and hear what I say the first time.'

'I heard you, sir,' Jackson said.  The Colonel looked at him
contemplatively and with the old deadliness.

He sure is a mean son of a bitch, Jackson thought, and he can be so
God-damn nice.

'Get my and your bag out and park her up there and check your oil, your
water and your tyres,' the Colonel said, and walked across the oil and
rubber stained cement of the entry of the bar.




Chapter VI

In the bar, sitting at the first table as he came in, there was a
post-war rich from Milan, fat and hard as only Milanese can be, sitting
with his expensive looking and extremely desirable mistress.  They were
drinking negronis, a combination of two sweet vermouths and seltzer
water, and the Colonel wondered how much taxes the man had escaped to
buy that sleek girl in her long mink coat and the convertible he had
seen the chauffeur take up the long, winding ramp to lock away.  The
pair stared at him with the bad manners of their kind and he saluted,
lightly and said to them in Italian, 'I am sorry that I am in uniform.
But it is a uniform.  Not a costume.'

Then he turned his back on them, without waiting to see the effect of
his remark, and walked to the bar.  From the bar you could watch your
luggage, just as well as the two _pescecani_ were watching theirs.

He is probably a Commendatore, he thought.  She is a beautiful, hard
piece of work.  She is damned beautiful, actually.  I wonder what it
would have been like if I had ever had the money to buy me that kind
and put them into the mink?  I'll settle for what I have, he thought,
and they can go and hang themselves.

The bar-tender shook hands with him.  This bar-tender was an Anarchist
but he did not mind the Colonel being a Colonel at all.  He was
delighted by it and proud and loving about it as though the Anarchists
had a Colonel, too, and in some ways, in the several months that they
had known each other, he seemed to feel that he had invented, or at
least erected, the Colonel as you might be happy about participating in
the erection of a _campanile_, or even the old church at Torcello.

The bar-tender had heard the conversation, or, rather, the flat
statement at the table and he was very happy.

He had already sent down, via the dumb-waiter, for a Gordon's gin and
Campari and he said, 'It is coming up in that hand-pulled device.  How
does everything go at Trieste?'

'About as you would imagine.'

'I couldn't even imagine.'

'Then don't strain,' the Colonel said, 'and you will never get piles.'

'I wouldn't mind it if I was a Colonel.'

'I never mind it.'

'You'd be overrun like a dose of salts,' the waiter said.

'Don't tell the Honorable Pacciardi,' the Colonel said.

He and the bar-tender had a joke about this because the Honourable
Pacciardi was Minister of Defence in the Italian Republic.  He was the
same age as the Colonel and had fought very well in the first world
war, and had also fought in Spain as a battalion commander where the
Colonel had known him when he, himself, was an observer.  The
seriousness with which the Honourable Pacciardi took the post of
Minister of Defence of an indefensible country was a bond between the
Colonel and the bar-tender.  The two of them were quite practical men
and the vision of the Honourable Pacciardi defending the Italian
Republic stimulated their minds.

'It's sort of funny up there,' the Colonel said, 'and I don't mind it.'

'We must mechanize the Honourable Pacciardi,' the bar-tender said.
'And supply him with the atomic bomb.'

'I've got three of them in the back of the car,' the Colonel said.
'The new model, complete with handles.  But we can't leave him unarmed.
We must supply him with botulism and anthrax.'

'We cannot fail the Honourable Pacciardi,' the bar-tender said.
'Better to live one day as a lion than a hundred years as a sheep.'

'Better to die on our feet than to live on our knees,' the Colonel
said.  'Though you better get on your belly damn fast if you want to
stay alive in plenty places.'

'Colonel, do not say anything subversive.'

'We will strangle them with our bare hands,' the Colonel said.  'A
million men will spring to arms overnight.'

'Whose arms?' the bar-tender asked.

'All that will be attended to,' the Colonel said.  'It's only a phase
in the Big Picture.'

Just then the driver came in the door.  The Colonel saw that while they
had been joking, he had not watched the door and he was annoyed,
always, with any lapse of vigilance or of security.

'What the hell's been keeping you, Jackson?  Have a drink.'

'No, thank you, sir.'

You prissy jerk, the Colonel thought.  But I better stop riding him; he
corrected.

'We'll be going in a minute,' the Colonel said.  'I've been trying to
learn Italian from my friend here.'  He turned to look at the Milan
profiteers; but they were gone.

I'm getting awfully slow, he thought.  Somebody will take me any day
now.  Maybe even the Honourable Pacciardi, he thought.

'How much do I owe you?' he asked the bar-tender shortly.

The bar-tender told him and looked at him with his wise Italian eyes,
not merry now, although the lines of merriment were clearly cut where
they radiated from the corners of each eye.  I hope there is nothing
wrong with him, the bar-tender thought.  I hope to God, or anything
else, there's nothing really bad.

'Good-bye, my Colonel,' he said.

'_Ciao_,' the Colonel said.  'Jackson, we are going down the long ramp
and due north from the exit to where the small launches are moored.
The varnished ones.  There is a porter with the two bags.  It is
necessary to let them carry them since they have a concession.'

'Yes, sir,' said Jackson.

The two of them went out the door and no one looked back at anyone.

At the _imbarcadero_, the Colonel tipped the man who had carried their
two bags and then looked around for a boatman he knew.

He did not recognize the man in the launch that was first on call, but
the boatman said, 'Good day, my Colonel.  I'm the first.'

'How much is it to the Gritti?'

'You know as well as I, my Colonel.  We do not bargain.  We have a
fixed tariff.'

'What's the tariff?'

'Three thousand five hundred.'

'We could go on the vaporetto for sixty.'

'And nothing prevents you going,' the boatman, who was an elderly man
with a red but un-choleric face, said.  'They won't take you to the
Gritti but they will stop at the _imbarcadero_ past Harry's, and you
can telephone for someone from the Gritti to get your bags.'

And what would I buy with the God-damn three thousand five hundred
lire; and this is a good old man.

'Do you want me to send that man there?' he pointed to a destroyed old
man who did odd jobs and ran errands around the docks, always ready
with the un-needed aid to the elbow of the ascending or descending
passenger, always ready to help when no help was needed, his old felt
hat held out as he bowed after the unneeded act.  'He'll take you to
the vaporetto.  There's one in twenty minutes.'

'The hell with it,' the Colonel said.  'Take us to the Gritti.'

'_Con piacere_,' the boatman said.

The Colonel and Jackson lowered themselves into the launch which looked
like a speed boat.  It was radiantly varnished and lovingly kept and
was powered with a marine conversion of a tiny Fiat engine that had
served its allotted time in the car of a provincial doctor and had been
purchased out of one of the graveyards of automobiles; those mechanical
elephant cemeteries that are the one certain thing you may find in our
world near any populated centre; and been re-conditioned and
re-converted to start this new life on the canals of this city.

'How is the motor doing?' the Colonel asked.  He could hear her
sounding like a stricken tank or T.D., except the noises were in
miniature from the lack of power.

'So-so,' the boatman said.  He moved his free hand in a parallel motion.

'You ought to get the smallest model Universal puts out.  That's the
best and lightest small marine engine I know.'

'Yes,' the boatman said.  'There are quite a few things I should get.'

'Maybe you'll have a good year.'

'It's always possible.  Lots of _pescecani_ come down from Milano to
gamble at the Lido.  But nobody would ride twice in this thing on
purpose.  As a boat, it is fine, too.  It is a well built, pleasant
boat.  Not beautiful as a gondola is, of course.  But it needs an
engine.'

'I might get you a jeep engine.  One that was condemned and you could
work it over.'

'Don't talk about such things,' the boatman said.  'Things like that
don't happen.  I don't want to think about it.'

'You can think about it,' the Colonel said.  'I'm talking true.'

'You mean it.'

'Sure.  I don't guarantee anything.  I'll see what I can do.  How many
children have you got?'

'Six.  Two male and four female.'

'Hell, you mustn't have believed in the Regime.  Only six.'

'I _didn't_ believe in the Regime.'

'You don't have to give me that stuff,' the Colonel said.  'It would
have been quite natural for you to _have_ believed in it.  Do you think
I hold that against a man after we've won?'

They were through the dull part of the canal that runs from Piazzale
Roma to Ca'Foscari, though none of it is dull, the Colonel thought.

It doesn't all have to be palaces nor churches.  Certainly that isn't
dull.  He looked to the right, the starboard, he thought.  I'm on the
water.  It was a long low pleasant building and there was a trattoria
next to it.

I ought to live here.  On retirement pay I could make it all right.  No
Gritti Palace.  A room in a house like that and the tides and the boats
going by.  I could read in the mornings and walk around town before
lunch and go every day to see the Tintorettos at the Accademia and to
the Sculoa San Rocco and eat in good cheap joints behind the market or,
maybe, the woman that ran the house would cook in the evenings.

I think it would be better to have lunch out and get some exercise
walking.  It's a good town to walk in.  I guess the best, probably.  I
never walked in it that it wasn't fun.  I could learn it really well,
he thought, and then I'd have that.

It's a strange, tricky town and to walk from any part to any other
given part of it is better than working crossword puzzles.  It's one of
the few things to our credit that we never smacked it, and to their
credit that they respected it.

Christ, I love it, he said, and I'm so happy I helped defend it when I
was a punk kid, and with an insufficient command of the language and I
never even saw her until that clear day in the winter when I went back
to have that small wound dressed, and saw her rising from the sea.
Merde, he thought, we did very well that winter up at the junction.

I wish I could fight it again, he thought.  Knowing what I know now and
having what we have now.  But they'd have it too and the essential
problem is just the same, except who holds the air.

And all this time he had been watching the bow of the beat-up
beautifully varnished, delicately brass-striped boat, with the brass
all beautifully polished, cut the brown water and seen the small
traffic problems.

They went under the white bridge and under the unfinished wood bridge.
Then they left the red bridge on the right and passed under the first
high-flying white bridge.  Then there was the black iron fret-work
bridge on the canal leading into the Rio Nuovo and they passed the two
stakes chained together but not touching: like us the Colonel thought.
He watched the tide pull at them and he saw how the chains had worn the
wood since he first had seen them.  That's us, he thought.  That's our
monument.  And how many monuments are there to us in the canals of this
town?

Then they still went slowly until the great lantern that was on the
right of the entrance to the Grand Canal where the engine commenced its
metallic agony that produced a slight increase in speed.

Now they came down and under the Accademia between the pilings where
they passed, at touching distance, a heavily loaded black, diesel boat
full of cut timber, cut to chunks, to burn for firewood in the damp
houses of the Sea City.

'That's beech, isn't it?' the Colonel asked the boatman.

'Beech and another wood that is cheaper that I do not recall, at this
moment, the name of.'

'Beech is, to an open fire, as anthracite coal is to a stove.  Where do
they cut that beech?'

'I'm not a man of the mountains.  But I think it comes from up beyond
Bassano on the other side of the Grappa.  I went there to the Grappa to
see where my brother was buried.  It was an excursion that they made
from Bassano, and we went to the big ossario.  But we returned by
Feltre.  I could see it was a fine timber country on the other side as
you came down the mountains into the valley.  We came down that
military road, and they were hauling lots of wood.'

'In what year was your brother killed on Grappa?'

'In nineteen-eighteen.  He was a patriot and inflamed by hearing
d'Annunzio talk, and he volunteered before his class was called.  We
never knew him very well because he went so quickly.'

'How many were you in the family?'

'We were six.  We lost two beyond the Isonzo, one on the Bainsizza and
one on the Carso.  Then we lost this brother I speak of on the Grappa
and I remained.'

'I'll get you the God-damned jeep complete with handles,' the Colonel
said.  'Now let's not be morbid and look for all the places where my
friends live.'

They were moving up the Grand Canal now and it was easy to see where
your friends lived.

'That's the house of the Contessa Dandolo,' the Colonel said.

He did not say, but thought, she is over eighty, and she is as gay as a
girl and does not have any fear of dying.  She dies her hair red and it
looks very well.  She is a good companion and an admirable woman.

Her palazzo was pleasant looking, set well back from the Canal with a
garden in front and a landing place of its own where many gondolas had
come, in their various times, bringing hearty, cheerful, sad and
disillusioned people.  But most of them had been cheerful because they
were going to see the Contessa Dandolo.

Now, beating up the Canal, against the cold wind off the mountains, and
with the houses as clear and sharp as on a winter day, which, of
course, it was, they saw the old magic of the city and its beauty.  But
it was conditioned, for the Colonel, by his knowing many of the people
who lived in the palazzos; or if no one lived there now, knowing to
what use the different places had been put.

There's Alvarito's mother's house, he thought, and did not say.

She never lives there much and stays out at the country house near
Treviso where they have trees.  She's tired of there not being trees in
Venice.  She lost a fine man and nothing really interests her now
except efficiency.

But the family at one time lent the house to George Gordon, Lord Byron,
and nobody sleeps now in Byron's bed nor in the other bed, two flights
below, where he used to sleep with the gondolier's wife.  They are not
sacred, nor relics.  They are just extra beds that were not used
afterwards for various reasons, or possibly to respect Lord Byron who
was well loved in this town, in spite of all the errors he committed.
You have to be a tough boy in this town to be loved, the Colonel
thought.  They never cared anything for Robert Browning, nor Mrs.
Robert Browning, nor for their dog.  They weren't Venetians no matter
how well he wrote of it.  And what is a tough boy, he asked himself.
You use it so loosely you should be able to define it.  I suppose it is
a man who will make his play and then backs it up.  Or just a man who
backs his play.  And I'm not thinking of the theatre, he thought.
Lovely as the theatre can be.

And yet, he thought, seeing now the little villa, close up against the
water, ugly as a building you would see on the boat train from Havre or
Cherbourg, coming into the banlieue before Paris as you came into town.
It was overrun with badly administered trees, and not a place that you
would live in if you could help it.  There _he_ lived.

They loved him for his talent, and because he was bad, and he was
brave.  A Jewish boy with nothing, he stormed the country with his
talent, and his rhetoric.  He was a more miserable character than any
that I know and as mean.  But the man I think of to compare him with
never put the chips on the line and went to war, the Colonel thought,
and Gabriele d'Annunzio (I always wondered what his real name was, he
thought, because nobody is named d'Annunzio in a practical country and
perhaps he was not Jewish and what difference did it make if he was or
was not) had moved through the different arms of the service as he had
moved into and out of the arms of different women.

All the arms were pleasant that d'Annunzio served with and the mission
was fast and easily over, except the Infantry.  He remembered how
d'Annunzio had lost an eye in a crash, flying as an observer, over
Trieste or Pola, and how, afterwards, he had always worn a patch over
it and people who did not know, for, then, no one really knew, thought
it had been shot out at the Veliki or San Michele or some other bad
place beyond the Carso where everyone died, or was incapacitated, that
you knew.  But d'Annunzio, truly, was only making heroic gestures with
the other things.  An Infantryman knows a strange trade, he thought;
perhaps the strangest.  He, Gabriele, flew, but he was not a flier.  He
was in the Infantry but he was not an Infantryman and it was always the
same appearances.

And the Colonel remembered one time when he had stood, commanding a
platoon of assault troops, while it was raining in one of the
interminable winters, when the rain fell always; or at least, always
when there were parades or speeches to the troops, and d'Annunzio, with
his lost eye, covered by the patch, and his white face, as white as the
belly of a sole, new turned over in the market, the brown side not
showing, and looking thirty hours dead, was shouting.  'Morire non a
basta,' and the Colonel, then a lieutenant, had thought, 'What the muck
more do they want of us?'

But he had followed the discourse and, at the end, when the
Lieutenant-Colonel d'Annunzio, writer and national hero, certified and
true if you must have heroes, and the Colonel did not believe in
heroes, asked for a moment of silence for our glorious dead, he had
stood stiffly to attention.  But his platoon, who had not followed the
speech, there being no loud speakers then, and they being slightly out
of hearing of the orator, responded, as one man, at the pause for the
moment of silence for our glorious dead, with a solid and ringing
'Evviva d'Annunzio'.

They had been addressed before by d'Annunzio after victories, and
before defeats, and they knew what they should shout if there was any
pause by an orator.

The Colonel, being then a lieutenant, and loving his platoon, had
joined with them and uttered, with the tone of command, 'Evviva
d'Annunzio', thus absolving all those who had not listened to the
discourse, speech, or harangue and attempting, in the small way a
lieutenant can attempt anything, except to hold an indefensible
position; or intelligently direct his own part in an attack; to share
their guilt.

But now he was passing the house where the poor beat-up old boy had
lived with his great, sad and never properly loved actress and he
thought of her wonderful hands and her so transformable face, that was
not beautiful, but that gave you all love, glory and delight and
sadness; and of the way the curve of her forearm could break your
heart, and he thought, Christ they are dead and I do not know where
either one is buried even.  But I certainly hope they had fun in that
house.

'Jackson,' he said, 'that small villa on the left belonged to Gabriele
d'Annunzio, who was a great writer.'

'Yes, sir,' said Jackson, 'I'm glad to know about him.  I never heard
of him.'

'I'll check you out on what he wrote if you ever want to read him,' the
Colonel said.  'There are some fair English translations.'

'Thank you, sir,' said Jackson.  'I'd like to read him any time I have
time.  He has a nice practical looking place.  What did you say the
name was?'

'D'Annunzio,' the Colonel said.  'Writer.'

He added to himself, not wishing to confuse Jackson, nor be difficult,
as he had been with the man several times that day, writer, poet,
national hero, phraser of the dialectic of Fascism, macabre egotist,
aviator, commander, or rider, in the first of the fast torpedo attack
boats, Lieutenant-Colonel of Infantry without knowing how to command a
company, nor a platoon properly, the great, lovely writer of _Notturno_
whom we respect, and jerk.

Up ahead now there was a crossing place of gondolas at the Santa Maria
del Giglio and, beyond, was the wooden dock of the Gritti.

'That's the hotel where we are stopping at, Jackson.'

The Colonel indicated the three-storey, rose-coloured, small, pleasant
palace abutting on the Canal.  It had been a dependence of the Grand
Hotel--but now it was its own hotel and a very good one.  It was
probably the best hotel, if you did not wish to be fawned on, or fussed
over, or over-flunkied, in a city of great hotels and the Colonel loved
it.

'It looks O.K. to me, sir,' Jackson said.

'It is O.K.,' the Colonel said.

The motor boat came gallantly up beside the piling of the dock.  Every
move she makes, the Colonel thought, is a triumph of the gallantry of
the ageing machine.  We do not have war horses now like old Traveller,
or Marbot's Lysette who fought, personally, at Eylau.  We have the
gallantry of worn through-rods that refuse to break; the cylinder head
that does not blow though it has every right to and the rest of it.

'We're at the dock, sir,' Jackson said.

'Where the hell else would we be, man.  Jump out while I settle with
this sportsman.'

He turned to the boatman and said, 'That was thirty-five hundred,
wasn't it?'

'Yes, my Colonel.'

'I'll not forget about the over-age jeep engine.  Take this and buy
your horse some oats.'

The porter, who was taking the bags from Jackson, heard this and
laughed.

'No veterinarian will ever fix his horse.'

'She still runs,' the boatman said.

'But she doesn't win any races,' the porter said.  'How are you, my
Colonel?'

'I couldn't be better,' the Colonel said.  'How are all the members of
the Order?'

'All members are well.'

'Good,' said the Colonel.  'I will go in and see the Grand Master.'

'He is waiting for you, my Colonel.'

'Let us not keep him waiting, Jackson,' the Colonel said.  'You may
proceed to the lobby with this gentleman and tell them to sign me in.
See the sergeant gets a room,' he said to the porter.  'We're here for
the night only.'

'The Baron Alvarito was here looking for you.'

'I'll find him at Harry's.'

'Good, my Colonel.'

'Where is the Grand Master?'

'I'll find him for you.'

'Tell him I'll be in the bar.'




Chapter VII

The bar was just across from the lobby of the Gritti, although lobby
the Colonel thought, was not the accurate term to describe that
gracious entrance.  Didn't Giotto describe a circle, he thought?  No,
that was in maths.  What he remembered and loved best as an anecdote
about that painter was: 'It was easy,' said Giotto as he drew the
perfect circle.  Who the hell had said that and where?

'Good evening, Privy Councillor,' he said to the bar-man, who was not a
full paid-up member of the order but whom he did not wish to offend.
'What can I do for you?'

'Drink, my Colonel.'

The Colonel looked out of the windows and the door of the bar on to the
waters of the Grand Canal.  He could see the big black hitching post
for the gondolas and the later afternoon winter light on the wind-swept
water.  Across the Canal was the old Palace and a wood barge, black and
broad, was coming up the Canal, her bluff bows pushing up a wave even
though she had the wind behind her.

'Make it a very dry Martini,' the Colonel said.  'A double.'

Just then the Grand Master came into the room.  He was wearing his
formal attire as a head waiter.  He was truly handsome as a man should
be, from the inside out, so that his smile starts from his heart, or
whatever is the centre of the body, and comes frankly and beautifully
to the surface, which is the face.

He had a fine face with the long, straight nose of his part of the
Veneto; the kind, gay, truthful eyes and the honourable white hair of
his age, which was two years older than that of the Colonel.

He advanced smiling, lovingly and yet conspiratorially, since they both
shared many secrets and he extended his hand, which was a big, long,
strong, spatular-fingered hand; well kept as was becoming, as well as
necessary, to his position and the Colonel extended his own hand, which
had been shot through twice and was slightly misshapen.  Thus contact
was made between two old inhabitants of the Veneto, both men and
brothers in their membership in the human race, the only club that
either one paid dues to and brothers, too, in their love of an old
country, much fought over and always triumphant in defeat, which they
had both defended in their youth.

Their handshake was only long enough to feel, firmly, the contact and
the pleasure of meeting and then the Maitre d'Hotel said, 'My Colonel.'

The Colonel said, '_Gran Maestro_.'

Then the Colonel asked the _Gran Maestro_ to accompany him in a drink,
but the Maitre d'Hotel said that he was working.  It was impossible as
well as forbidden.

'---- forbidden,' said the Colonel.

'Of course,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'But everyone must comply with
his duty and here the rules are reasonable and we all should comply
with them; me especially, as a matter of precept.'

'Not for nothing are you the _Gran Maestro_,' the Colonel said.

'Give me a small _Carpano punto e mezzo_,' the _Gran Maestro_ said to
the bar-tender, who was still outside of the Order for some small, not
defined, unstated reason.  'To drink to the ordine.'

Thus, violating orders and the principle of precept and example in
command, the Colonel and the _Gran Maestro_ downed a quick one.  They
did not hurry nor did the _Gran Maestro_ worry.  They simply made it
fast.

'Now, let us discuss the affairs of the Order,' the Colonel said.  'Are
we in the secret chamber?'

'We are,' said the _Gran Maestro_.  'Or I declare it to be such.'

'Continue,' said the Colonel.

The Order, which was a purely fictitious organization, had been founded
in a series of conversations between the _Gran Maestro_ and the
Colonel.  Its name was _El Ordine Militar, Nobile y Espirituoso de los
Caballeros de Brusadelli_.  The Colonel and the head waiter both spoke
Spanish and since that is the best language for founding orders, they
had used it in the naming of this one, which was named after a
particularly notorious multi-millionaire non-taxpaying profiteer of
Milan, who had, in the course of a dispute over property, accused his
young wife, publicly and legally through due process of law, of having
deprived him of his judgment through her extraordinary sexual demands.

'_Gran Maestro_,' the Colonel said.  'Have you heard from our Leader,
_The Reverend One_?'

'Not a word.  He is silent these days.'

'He must be thinking.'

'He must.'

'Perhaps he is meditating on new and more distinguished shameful acts.'

'Perhaps.  He has not given me any word.'

'But we can have confidence in him.'

'Until he dies,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'After that he can roast in
hell and we will revere his memory.'

'Giorgio,' the Colonel said.  'Give the _Gran Maestro_ another short
_Carpano_.'

'If it is your order,' the _Gran Maestro_ said, 'I can only obey.'

They touched glasses.

'Jackson,' the Colonel called.  'You're on the town.  You can sign here
for chow.  I don't want to see you until eleven hundred to-morrow in
the lobby, unless you get into trouble.  Do you have money?'

'Yes, sir,' Jackson said and thought, the old son of a bitch really is
as crazy as they say.  But he might have called me instead of shouting.

'I don't want to see you,' the Colonel said.

Jackson had entered the room and stood before him at a semblance of
attention.

'I'm tired of seeing you, because you worry and you don't have fun.
For Christ sake have yourself some fun.'

'Yes, sir.'

'You understand what I said?'

'Yes, sir.'

'Repeat it.'

'Ronald Jackson, T5 Serial Number 100678, will present himself in the
lobby of this Gritti Hotel at 11.00 to-morrow morning, I don't know the
date, sir, and will absent himself from the Colonel's sight and will
have some fun.  Or,' he added, 'will make every reasonable attempt to
attain that objective.'

'I'm sorry, Jackson,' the Colonel said.  'I'm a ----.'

'I beg to differ with the Colonel,' Jackson said.

'Thank you, Jackson,' the Colonel told him.  'Maybe I'm not.  I hope
you are correct.  Now muck off.  You've got a room here, or you should
have and you can sign for chow.  Now try and have some fun.'

'Yes, sir,' said Jackson.

When he was gone, the _Gran Maestro_ said to the Colonel, 'What is the
boy?  One of those _sad_ Americans?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'And by Jesus Christ we've got a lot of them.
Sad, self-righteous, over-fed and undertrained.  If they are
under-trained, it is my fault.  But we've got some good ones, too.'

'Do you think they would have done Grappa, Pasubio and the Basso Piave
as we did?'

'The good ones, yes.  Maybe better.  But you know, in our army, they
don't even shoot for self-inflicted wounds.'

'Jesus,' said the _Gran Maestro_.  He and the Colonel both remembered
the men who decided that they did not wish to die, not thinking that he
who dies on Thursday does not have to die on Friday and how one soldier
would wrap another's puttee-ed leg in a sandbag so there would be no
powder burns and loose off at his friend from as far a distance as he
figured he could hit the calf of the leg without hitting bone and then
fire twice over the parapet to alibi the shot.  They had this knowledge
shared between them and it was for this reason and for a true, good
hatred of all those who profited by war that they had founded the Order.

They knew, the two of them, who loved and respected each other, how
_poor_ boys who did not want to die, would share the contents of a
match-box to produce the infection that would keep them from the next
murderous frontal attack.

They knew about the other boys who put the big ten-centime pieces under
their arm-pits to produce jaundice.  And they knew, too, about the
richer boys who, in different cities, had paraffin injected under their
knee-caps so they would not have to go to the war.

They knew how garlic could be used to produce certain effects which
could absent a man from an attack and they knew all, or nearly all, of
the other tricks; for one had been a sergeant and the other a
lieutenant of infantry and they had fought on the three key points,
Pasubio, Grappa and the Piave, where it all made sense.

They had fought, too, in the earlier stupid butchery on the Isonzo and
the Carso.  But they were both ashamed of those who had ordered that
and they never thought about it except as a shameful, stupid thing to
be forgotten and the Colonel remembered it technically as something to
learn from.  So, now, they had founded the Order of Brusadelli; noble,
military and religious, and there were only five members.

'What is the news of the Order?' the Colonel asked the _Gran Maestro_.

'We have ascended the cook at the Magnificent to the rank of
Commendatore.  He comported himself as a man three times on his
fiftieth birthday.  I accepted his statement without corroboration.  He
never lied ever.'

'No.  He never lied.  But it is a topic on which you must be chary in
your credibility.'

'I believed him.  He looked ruined.'

'I can remember him when he was a tough kid and we called him the
cherry buster.'

'_Anch' io_.'

'Have you any concrete plans for the Order during the winter?'

'No, Supreme Commander.'

'Do you think we should give a homage to the Honourable Pacciardi?'

'As you wish.'

'Let's defer it,' the Colonel said.  He thought a moment, and signalled
for another dry Martini.

'Do you think we might organize a homage and manifestation in some
historic place such as San Marco or the old Church at Torcello in
favour of our Great Patron, Brusadelli, the Revered One?'

'I doubt if the religious authorities would permit it at this moment.'

'Then let us abandon all ideas of public manifestations for this
winter, and work within our cadres, for the good of the Order.'

'I think that is soundest,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'We will regroup.'

'And how are you, yourself?'

'Awful,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'I have low blood pressure, ulcers
and I owe money.'

'Are you happy?'

'All the time,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'I like my work very much and
I meet extraordinary and interesting characters, also many Belgians.
They are what we have instead of the locusts this year.  Formerly we
had the Germans.  What was it Caesar said, 'And the bravest of these
are the Belgians.'  But not the best dressed.  Do you agree?'

'I've seen them quite well costumed in Brussels,' the Colonel said.  'A
well-fed, gay capital.  Win, lose, or draw.'

'We should have fought in Flanders in the old days.'

'We were not born in the old days,' the Colonel said.  'So we
automatically could not have fought then.'

'I wish we could have fought with the Condottieri when all you had to
do was out-think them and they conceded.  You could think and I would
convey your orders.'

'We'd have to take a few towns for them to respect our thinking.'

'We would sack them if they defended them,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.
'What towns would you take?'

'Not this one,' the Colonel said.  'I'd take Vicenza, Bergamo and
Verona.  Not necessarily in that order.'

'You'd have to take two more.'

'I know,' the Colonel said.  He was a general now again and he was
happy.  'I figured that I'd by-pass Brescia.  It could fall of its own
weight.'

'And how are you, Supreme Commander?' the _Gran Maestro_ said, for this
taking of towns had pulled him out of his depth.

He was at home in his small house in Treviso, close to the fast-flowing
river under the old walls.  The weeds waved in the current and the fish
hung in the shelter of the weeds and rose to insects that touched the
water in the dusk.  He was at home, too, in all operations that did not
involve more than a company and understood them as clearly as he
understood the proper serving of a small dining-room; or a large
dining-room.

But when the Colonel became a general officer again, as he had once
been and thought in terms that were as far beyond him as calculus is
distant from a man who has only the knowledge of arithmetic, then he
was not at home and their contact was strained and he wished the
Colonel would return to things they both knew together when they were a
lieutenant and a sergeant.

'What would you do about Mantova?' the Colonel asked.

'I do not know, my Colonel.  I do not know whom you are fighting, nor
what forces are at your disposal.'

'I thought you said we were Condottieri.  Based on this town or on
Padova.'

'My Colonel,' the _Gran Maestro_ said, and he had diminished in no way,
'I know nothing, truly, about Condottieri.  Nor really how they fought
then.  I only said I would like to fight under you in such times.'

'There aren't any such times any more,' the Colonel said and the spell
was broken.

What the hell, maybe there never was any spell, the Colonel thought.
The hell with you, he said to himself.  Cut it out and be a human being
when you're half a hundred years old.

'Have another _Carpano_,' he said to the _Gran Maestro_.

'My Colonel, you will allow me to refuse because of the ulcers?'

'Yes.  Yes.  Of course.  Boy, what's your name, Giorgio?  Another dry
Martini.  _Secco, molto secco e doppio_.'

Breaking spells, he thought.  It is not my trade.  My trade is killing
armed men.  A spell should be armed if I'm to break it.  But we have
killed many things which were not armed.  All right, spell breaker,
retract.

'_Gran Maestro_,' he said.  'You are still _Gran Maestro_ and ---- the
Condottieri.'

'They were ---- many years ago, Supreme Commander.'

'Exactly,' the Colonel said.

But the spell was broken.

'I'll see you at dinner,' the Colonel said.  'What is there?'

'We will have anything you wish and what we do not have I will send out
for.'

'Do you have any fresh asparagus?'

'You know we cannot have it in these months.  It comes in April and
from Bassano.'

'Then you think of something and I'll eat it,' the Colonel said,

'How many will you be?' the Maitre d'Hotel asked.

'We'll be two,' the Colonel said.  'What time do you close the bistro?'

'We will serve dinner as late as you wish to eat, my Colonel.'

'I'll try to be in at a sound hour,' the Colonel said.  'Good-bye,
_Gran Maestro_,' he said and smiled and gave the _Gran Maestro_ his
crooked hand.

'Good-bye, Supreme Commander,' said the _Gran Maestro_ and the spell
was existent again and almost complete.

But it was not quite complete and the Colonel knew it and he thought:
why am I always a bastard and why can I not suspend this trade of arms
and be a kind and good man as I would have wished to be.

I try always to be just, but I am brusque and I am brutal and it is not
that I have erected the defence against brown-nosing my superiors and
brown-nosing the world.  I should be a better man with less wild boar
blood in the small time which remains.  We will try it out to-night, he
thought.  With whom, he thought and where, and God help me not to be
bad.

'Giorgio,' he said to the barman, who had a face as white as a leper,
but with no bulges and without the silver shine.

Giorgio did not really like the Colonel very much, or perhaps he was
simply from Piemonte and cared for no one truly; which was
understandable in cold people from a border province.  Borderers are
not trusters and the Colonel knew about this and expected nothing from
anyone that they did not have to give.

'Giorgio,' he said to the pale-faced barman.  'Write these down for me,
please.'

He went out, walking as he had always walked, with a slightly
exaggerated confidence, even when it was not needed and, in his always
renewed plan of being kind, decent and good, he greeted the concierge,
who was a friend, the assistant manager, who spoke Swahili and had been
a prisoner of war in Kenya and was a most amiable man, young, full of
juice, handsome, perhaps not yet a member of the Order, and experienced.

'And the _cavaliere ufficiale_ who manages this place?' he asked.  'My
friend?'

'He is not here,' the assistant manager said.  'For the moment,
naturally,' he added.

'Give him my compliments,' the Colonel said.  'And have somebody show
me to my room.'

'It is the usual room.  You still wish it?'

'Yes.  Have you taken care of the Sergeant?'

'He is well taken care of.'

'Good,' said the Colonel.

The Colonel proceeded to his room accompanied by the boy who carried
his bag.

'This way, my Colonel,' the boy said, when the elevator halted with
slight hydraulic inaccuracy at the top floor.

'Can't you run an elevator properly?' the Colonel asked.

'No, my Colonel,' the boy said.  'The current is not stable.'




Chapter VIII

The colonel said nothing and preceded the boy down the corridor.  It
was large, wide and high ceilinged and there was a long and
distinguished interval between the doors of the rooms on the side of
the Grand Canal.  Naturally, since it had been a palace, there were no
rooms without excellent views, except those which had been made for the
servants.

The Colonel found the walk long, although it was a very short one and
when the waiter, who served the room, appeared, short, dark and with
his glass eye in the left eye socket, gleaming, unable to smile his
full, true smile as he worked the big key in the lock, the Colonel
wished that the door would open more rapidly.

'Open it up,' he said.

'I will, my Colonel,' the waiter said.  'But you know these locks.'

Yes, the Colonel thought.  I know them, but I wish that he would get it
open.

'How are your family?' he said to the waiter, who had swung the door
wide so that the Colonel, now entered, was within the room with the
high, dark but well-mirrored armoire, the two good beds, the great
chandelier and the view, through the still closed windows, on to the
wind-beaten water of the Grand Canal.

The Canal was grey as steel now in the quick, failing, winter light and
the Colonel said, 'Arnaldo, open the windows.'

'There is much wind, my Colonel, and the room is badly heated due to
the lack of electric power.'

'Due to the lack of rainfall,' the Colonel said.  'Open the windows.
All of them.'

'As you wish, my Colonel.'

The waiter opened the windows and the north wind came into the room.

'Please call the desk and ask them to ring this number.'  The waiter
made the call while the Colonel was in the bathroom.

'The Contessa is not at home, my Colonel,' he said.  'They believe you
might find her at Harry's.'

'You find everything on earth at Harry's.'

'Yes, my Colonel.  Except, possibly, happiness.'

'I'll damn well find happiness, too,' the Colonel assured him.
'Happiness, as you know, is a movable feast.'

'I am aware of that,' the waiter said.  'I have brought Campari bitters
and a bottle of Gordon Gin.  May I make you a Campari with gin and
soda?'

'You're a good boy,' the Colonel said.  'Where did you bring them from.
The bar?'

'No.  I bought them while you were away so that you would not have to
spend money at the bar.  The bar is very costly.'

'I agree,' the Colonel agreed.  'But you should not use your own money
on such a project.'

'I took a chance.  We have both taken many.  The gin was 3200 lire and
is legitimate.  The Campari was 800.'

'You're a very good boy,' the Colonel told him.  'How were the ducks?'

'My wife still speaks of them.  We had never had wild ducks, since they
are of such expense, and outside of our way of life.  But one of our
neighbours told her how to prepare them and these same neighbours ate
them with us.  I never knew that anything could be so wonderful to eat.
When your teeth close on the small slice of meat it is an almost
unbelievable delight.'

'I think so, too.  There is nothing lovelier to eat than those fat
iron-curtain ducks.  You know their fly-way is through the great grain
fields of the Danube.  This is a splinter flight we have here, but they
always come the same way since before there were shot-guns.'

'I know nothing about shooting for sport,' the waiter said.  'We were
too poor.'

'But many people without money shoot in the Veneto.'

'Yes.  Of course.  One hears them shoot all night.  But we were poorer
than that.  We were poorer than you can know, my Colonel.'

'I think I can know.'

'Perhaps,' the waiter said.  'My wife also saved all the feathers and
she asked me to thank you.'

'If we have any luck the day after to-morrow, we'll get plenty.  The
big ducks with the green heads.  Tell your wife, with luck, there will
be good eating ducks, fat as pigs with what they have eaten from the
Russians and with beautiful feathers.'

'How do you feel about the Russians, if it is not indiscreet to ask, my
Colonel?'

'They are our potential enemy.  So, as a soldier, I am prepared to
fight them.  But I like them very much and I have never known finer
people nor people more as we are.'

'I have never had the good fortune to know them.'

'You will, boy.  You will.  Unless the Honourable Pacciardi stops them
on the line of the Piave, which is a river which no longer contains
water.  It has been siphoned off for hydro-electric projects.  Perhaps
the Honorable Pacciardi will fight there.  But I do not think he will
fight for long.'

'I do not know the Honourable Pacciardi.'

'I know him,' said the Colonel.

'Now ask them to ring Harry's and see if the Contessa is there.  If
not, have them ring the house again.'

The Colonel took the drink Arnaldo, the glass-eyed waiter, made him.
He did not want it and he knew that it was bad for him.

But he took it with his old wild-boar truculence, as he had taken
everything all of his life and he moved, still cat-like when he moved,
although it was an old cat now, over to the open window and looked out
on the great Canal which was now becoming as grey as though Degas had
painted it on one of his greyest days.

'Thanks very much for the drink,' the Colonel said and Arnaldo, who was
talking into the telephone, nodded and smiled his glass-eyed smile.

I wish he did not have to have that glass eye, the Colonel thought.  He
only loved people, he thought, who had fought or been mutilated.

Other people were fine and you liked them and were good friends; but
you only felt true tenderness and love for those who had been there and
had received the castigation that everyone receives who goes there long
enough.

So I'm a sucker for cripes, he thought, drinking the unwanted drink.
And any son of a bitch who has been hit solidly, as every man will be
if he stays, then I love him.

Yes, his other, good side said.  You love them.

I'd rather not love anyone, the Colonel thought.  I'd rather have fun.

And fun, his good side said to him, you have no fun when you do not
love.

All right.  I love more than any son of the great bitch alive, the
Colonel said, but not aloud.

Aloud, he said, 'Where are you getting on that call, Arnaldo?'

'Cipriani has not come in,' the waiter said.  'They are expecting him
at any moment and I am keeping the line open in case he arrives.'

'A costly procedure,' the Colonel said.  'Get me a reading on who's
there so we don't waste time.  I want to know exactly who is there.'

Arnaldo spoke guardedly into the mouthpiece of the telephone.

He covered the mouth of the phone with his hand and said, 'I am talking
to Ettore.  He says the Barone Alvarito is not there.  The Count Andrea
is there and he is rather drunk, Ettore says, but not too drunk for you
to have fun together.  The group of ladies that comes in each afternoon
are there and there is a Greek princess, that you know and several
people that you do not know.  Riff-raff from the American Consulate who
have stayed on since noon.'

'Tell him to call back when the riff-raff goes and I'll come over.'

Arnaldo spoke into the phone, then turned to the Colonel who was
looking out of the window at the Dome of the Dogana, 'Ettore says he
will try to move them, but he is afraid Cipriani will not like it.'

'Tell him not to move them.  They don't have to work this afternoon and
there is no reason why they should not get drunk like any other man.  I
just don't want to see them.'

'Ettore says he will call back.  He told me to tell you he thinks the
position will fall of its own weight.'

'Thank him for calling,' the Colonel said.

He watched a gondola working up the Canal against the wind and thought,
not with Americans drinking.  I know they are bored.  In this town,
too.  They are bored in this town.  I know the place is cold and their
wages are inadequate and what fuel costs.  I admire their wives, for
the valiant efforts they make to transport Keokuk to Venice, and their
children already speak Italian like little Venetians.  But no snapshots
to-day, Jack.  To-day we are giving the snapshots, the bar-room
confidences, the unwanted comradely drinks and the tedious woes of the
Consular services a miss.

'No second, third or fourth vice-consuls to-day, Arnaldo.'

'There are some very pleasant people from the Consulate.'

'Yeah,' the Colonel said.  'They had a hell of a nice consul here in
1918.  Everybody liked him.  I'll try to remember his name.'

'You go back a long way back, my Colonel.'

'I go back so damn far back that it isn't funny.'

'Do you remember everything from the old days?'

'Everything,' the Colonel said.  'Carroll was the man's name.'

'I have heard of him.'

'You weren't born then.'

'Do you think it is necessary to have been born at the time to know
about things that have happened in this town, my Colonel?'

'You're perfectly correct.  Tell me, does everybody always know about
everything that happens in this town?'

'Not everybody.  But nearly everybody,' the waiter said.  'After all,
sheets are sheets and someone has to change them and someone has to
wash them.  Naturally I do not refer to the sheets in a hotel such as
this.'

'I've had some damn good times in my life without sheets.'

'Naturally.  But the gondoliers, while they are the most co-operative
and, for me, the finest people that we have, speak among themselves.'

'Naturally.'

'Then the clergy.  While they would never violate the secrecy of the
confessional, talk among themselves.'

'It is to be expected.'

'Their housekeepers talk among themselves.'

'It is their right.'

'Then the waiters,' Arnaldo said.  'People talk at a table as though
the waiter were stone-deaf.  The waiter, according to his ethics, makes
no attempt to ever overhear a conversation.  But sometimes he cannot
escape from hearing.  Naturally, we have our own conversations among
ourselves.  Never in this hotel of course.  I could go on.'

'I believe I get the point.'

'Not to mention the coiffeurs and the hair-dressers.'

'And what's the news from the Rialto now?'

'You will get it all at Harry's except the part you figure in.'

'Do I figure?'

'Everyone knows everything.'

'Well, it's a damn pleasant story.'

'Some people don't understand the Torcello part.'

'I'm damned if I do sometimes myself.'

'How old are you, my Colonel, if it is not too indiscreet to ask?'

'Fifty plus one.  Why didn't you find out from the concierge?  I fill
out a slip there for the Questura.'

'I wanted to hear it from you yourself and to congratulate you.'

'I don't know what you are talking about.'

'Let me congratulate you anyway.'

'I can't accept it.'

'You are very well liked in this city.'

'Thank you.  That is a very great compliment.'

Just then the telephone buzzed.

'I'll take it,' the Colonel said and heard Ettore's voice say, 'Who
speaks?'

'Colonel Cantwell.'

'The position has fallen, my Colonel.'

'Which way did they go?'

'Towards the Piazza.'

'Good.  I will be there at once.'

'Do you want a table?'

'In the corner,' said the Colonel and hung up.

'I am off for Harry's.'

'Good hunting.'

'I hunt ducks day after tomorrow before first light in a botte in the
marshes.'

'It will be cold, too.'

'I dare say,' the Colonel said and put on his trench coat and looked at
his face in the glass of the long mirror as he put on his cap.

'An ugly face,' he said to the glass.  'Did you ever see a more ugly
face?'

'Yes,' said Arnaldo.  'Mine.  Every morning when I shave.'

'We both ought to shave in the dark,' the Colonel told him and went out
the door.




Chapter IX

As Colonel Cantwell stepped out of the door of the Gritti Palace Hotel
he came out into the last sunlight of that day.  There was still
sunlight on the opposite side of the Square but the gondoliers
preferred to be sheltered from the cold wind by lounging in the lee of
the Gritti, than to use the last remaining heat of the sun on the
wind-swept side of the Square.

After noting this, the Colonel turned to the right and walked along the
Square to the paved street which turned off on the right.  As he
turned, he stopped for a moment and looked at the church of Santa Maria
del Giglio.

What a fine, compact, and yet ready to be air-borne building, he
thought.  I never realized a small church could look like a P47.  Must
find out when it was built and who built it.  Damn, I wish I might walk
around this town all my life.  All my life, he thought.  What a gag
that is.  A gag to gag on.  A throttle to throttle you with.  Come on,
boy, he said to himself.  No horse named Morbid ever won a race.

Besides, he thought, as he looked in the windows of the various shops
he passed, the _charcuteri_ with the Parmesan cheeses and the hams from
San Daniele and the sausages _alla cacciatora_ and the bottles of good
Scotch whisky and real Gordon's gin, the cutlery store, an antique
dealer's with some good pieces and some old maps and prints, a
second-rate restaurant disguised expensively as one of the first class
and then came to the first bridge crossing a feeder canal with steps to
be climbed; I don't feel so badly.  There is only the buzzing.  I
remember when that started and I thought perhaps it was seven-year
locusts in the trees and I did not like to ask young Lowry but I did.
And he answered, 'No, General, I don't hear any crickets or seven-year
locusts.  The night is perfectly quiet except for the usual noises.'

Then, as he climbed, he felt the twinges and coming down the other
side, he saw two lovely looking girls.  They were beautiful and hatless
and poorly but chicly dressed, and they were talking very fast to each
other and the wind was blowing their hair as they climbed with their
long, easy striding Venetian legs and the Colonel said to himself, 'I'd
better quit window gazing along this street and make that next bridge
and two squares afterwards you turn due right and keep along it till
you are in Harry's.'

He did just that, twinging on the bridge, but walking with his same old
stride and only seeing, quickly, the people that he passed.  There's a
lot of oxygen in this air, he thought, as he faced into the wind and
breathed deeply.

Then he was pulling open the door of Harry's bar and was inside and he
had made it again and was at home.

At the bar a tall, very tall, man, with a ravaged face of great
breeding, merry blue eyes and the long, loose-coupled body of a buffalo
wolf said, 'My ancient and depraved Colonel.'

'My wicked Andrea.'

They embraced and the Colonel felt the rough texture of Andrea's
handsome tweed coat that must have been entering, at least, its
twentieth year.

'You look well, Andrea,' the Colonel said.

It was a lie and they both knew it.

'I am,' said Andrea, returning the lie.  'I must say I never felt
better.  You look extraordinarily well, yourself.'

'Thank you, Andrea.  Us healthy bastards shall inherit the earth.'

'Very good idea.  I must say I wouldn't mind inheriting something these
days.'

'You have no kick.  You'll inherit well over six feet four of it.'

'Six feet six,' said Andrea.  'You wicked old man.  Are you still
slaving away at _la vie militaire_?'

'I don't slave too hard at it,' the Colonel said.  'I'm down to shoot
at San Relajo.'

'I know.  But don't make jokes in Spanish at this hour.  Alvarito was
looking for you.  He said to tell you he'd be back.'

'Good.  Is your lovely wife and are the children well?'

'Absolutely, and they asked me to remember them to you if I saw you.
They're down in Rome.  There comes your girl.  Or one of your girls.'
He was so tall he could see into the now almost dark street, but this
was a girl you could recognize if it was much darker than it was at
this hour.

'Ask her to have a drink with us here before you carry her off to that
corner table.  Isn't she a lovely girl?'

'She is.'

Then she came into the room, shining in her youth and tall striding
beauty and the carelessness the wind had made of her hair.  She had a
pale, almost olive-coloured skin, a profile that could break your, or
anyone else's, heart and her dark hair, of an alive texture, hung down
over her shoulders.

'Hello, my great beauty,' the Colonel said.

'Oh, oh, hello,' she said.  'I thought I would miss you.  I am so sorry
to be late.'

Her voice was low and delicate and she spoke English with caution.

'_Ciao_, Andrea,' she said.  'How is Emily and are the children?'

'Probably just the same as when I answered that same question for you
at noon.'

'I am so sorry,' she said and blushed.  'I am so excited and I always
say the wrong things.  What should I say?  Have you had a good time
here all afternoon?'

'Yes,' said Andrea.  'With my old friend and severest critic.'

'Who is that?'

'Scotch whisky and water.'

'I suppose if he must tease me he must,' she said to the Colonel.  'But
you won't tease me, will you?'

'Take him over to that corner table and talk to him.  I'm tired of you
both.'

'I'm not tired of you,' the Colonel told him.  'But I think it is a
good idea.  Should we have a drink sitting down, Renata?'

'I'd love to if Andrea isn't angry.'

'I'm never angry.'

'Would you have a drink with us, Andrea?'

'No,' said Andrea.  'Get along to your table.  I'm sick of seeing it
unoccupied.'

'Good-bye, Carlo.  Thanks for the drink we didn't have.'

'_Ciao_, Ricardo,' Andrea said and that was all.

He turned his fine, long, tall back on them and looked into the mirror
that is placed behind bars so a man can tell when he is drinking too
much and decided that he did not like what he saw there.  'Ettore,' he
said.  'Please put this nonsense on my bill.'

He walked out after waiting carefully for his coat, swinging into it
and tipping the man who brought it exactly what he should be tipped
plus twenty per cent.

At the corner table, Renata said, 'Do you think we hurt his feelings?'

'No.  He loves you and he likes me.'

'Andrea is so nice.  And you're so nice.'

'Waiter,' the Colonel called; then asked, 'Do you want a dry Martini,
too?'

'Yes,' she said.  'I'd love one.'

'Two very dry Martinis,' the Colonel said.  'Montgomerys.  Fifteen to
one.'

The waiter, who had been in the desert, smiled and was gone and the
Colonel turned to Renata.

'You're nice,' he said.  'You're also very beautiful and lovely and I
love you.'

'You always say that and I don't know what it means but I like to hear
it.'

'How old are you now?'

'Nearly nineteen.  Why?'

'And you don't know what it means?'

'No.  Why should I?  Americans always say it to you before they go
away.  It seems to be necessary to them.  But I love you very much,
too, whatever that is.'

'Let's have a fine time,' the Colonel said.  'Let's not think about
anything at all.'

'I would like that.  I cannot think very well this time of day at any
rate.'

'Here are the drinks,' the Colonel said.  'Remember not to say,
chin-chin.'

'I remember that from before.  I never say chin-chin, nor here's to
you, nor bottoms up.'

'We just raise the glass to each other and, if you wish, we can touch
the edges.'

'I wish,' she said.

The Martinis were icy cold and true Montgomerys and, after touching the
edges, they felt them glow happily all through their upper bodies.

'And what have you been doing?' the Colonel asked.

'Nothing.  I still wait to go away to school.'

'Where now?'

'God knows.  Wherever I go to learn English.'

'Turn your head and raise your chin once for me.'

'You're not making fun?'

'No.  I'm not making fun.'

She turned her head and raised her chin, without vanity, nor coquetry
and the Colonel felt his heart turn over inside him, as though some
sleeping animal had rolled over in its burrow and frightened,
deliciously, the other animal sleeping close beside.

'Oh, you,' he said.  'Would you ever like to run for Queen of Heaven?'

'That would be sacrilegious.'

'Yes,' he said.  'I suppose it would and I withdraw the suggestion.'

'Richard,' she said.  'No, I can't say it.'

'Say it.'

'No.'

The Colonel thought, I order you to say it.  And she said, 'Please
never look at me like that.'

'I'm sorry,' the Colonel said.  'I had just slipped into my trade
unconsciously.'

'And if we were such a thing as married would you practise your trade
in the home?'

'No.  I swear it.  I never have.  Not in my heart.'

'With no one?'

'With no one of your sex.'

'I don't like that word your sex.  It sounds as though you were
practising your trade.'

'I throw my trade out of that God-damn window into the Grand Canal.'

'There,' she said.  'You see how quickly you practise it?'

'All right,' he said.  'I love you and my trade can gently leave.'

'Let me feel your hand,' she said.  'It's all right.  You can put it on
the table.'

'Thank you,' the Colonel said.

'Please don't,' she said.  'I wanted to feel it because all last week,
every night, or I think nearly every night, I dreamed about it and it
was a strange mixed-up dream and I dreamed it was the hand of Our Lord.'

'That's bad.  You oughtn't to do that.'

'I know it.  That's just what I dreamed.'

'You aren't on the junk, are you?'

'I don't know what you mean and please don't make fun when I tell you
something true.  I dreamed just as I say.'

'What did the hand do?'

'Nothing.  Or maybe that is not true.  Mostly it was just a hand.'

'Like this one?' The Colonel asked, looking at the mis-shapen hand with
distaste and remembering the two times that had made it that way.

'Not like.  It _was_ that one.  May I touch it carefully with my
fingers if it does not hurt?'

'It does not hurt.  Where it hurts is in the head, the legs and the
feet.  I don't believe there's any sensation in that hand.'

'You're wrong,' she said.  'Richard.  There is very much sensation in
that hand.'

'I don't like to look at it much.  You don't think we could skip it?'

'Of course.  But you don't have to dream about it.'

'No.  I have other dreams.'

'Yes.  I can imagine.  But I dream lately about this hand.  Now that I
have touched it carefully, we can talk about funny things if you like.
What is there funny we should talk about?'

'Let's look at the people and discuss them.'

'That's lovely,' she said.  'And we won't do it with malice.  Only with
our best wit.  Yours and mine.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'Waiter, _Ancora due Martini_.'

He did not like to call for Montgomerys in a tone that could be
overheard because there were two obvious Britishers at the next table.

The male might have been wounded, the Colonel thought, although, from
his looks, it seems unlikely.  But God help me to avoid brutality.  And
look at Renata's eyes, he thought.  They are probably the most
beautiful of all the beautiful things she has with the longest honest
lashes I have ever seen and she never uses them for anything except to
look at you honestly and straight.  What a damn wonderful girl and what
am I doing here anyway?  It is wicked.  She is your last and true and
only love, he thought, and that's not evil.  It is only unfortunate.
No, he thought, it is damned fortunate and you are very fortunate.

They sat at a small table in the corner of the room and on their right
there were four women at a larger table.  One of the women was in
mourning; a mourning so theatrical that it reminded the Colonel of the
Lady Diana Manners playing the nun in Max Reinhardt's 'The Miracle'.
This woman had an attractive, plump, naturally gay face and her
mourning was incongruous.

At the table there was another woman who had hair three times as white
as hair can be, the Colonel thought she, also, had a pleasant face.
There were two other women whose faces meant nothing to the Colonel.

'Are they lesbians?' he asked the girl.

'I do not know,' she said.  'They are all very nice people.'

'I should say they are lesbians.  But maybe they are just good friends.
Maybe they are both.  It means nothing to me and it was not a
criticism.'

'You are nice when you are gentle.'

'Do you suppose the word gentleman derives from a man who is gentle?'

'I do not know.' the girl said, and she ran her fingers very lightly
over the scarred hand.  'But I love you when you are gentle.'

'I'll try very hard to be gentle,' the Colonel said.  'Who do you
suppose that son of a bitch is at the table beyond them?'

'You don't stay gentle very long,' the girl said.  'Let us ask Ettore.'

They looked at the man at the third table.  He had a strange face like
an over-enlarged, disappointed weasel or ferret.  It looked as
pock-marked and as blemished as the mountains of the moon seen through
a cheap telescope and, the Colonel thought, it looked like Goebbels's
face, if Herr Goebbels had ever been in a plane that burned and not
been able to bale out before the fire reached him.

Above this face, which was ceaselessly peering, as though the answer
might be found by enough well directed glances and by queries, there
was black hair that seemed to have no connection with the human race.
The man looked as though he had been scalped and then the hair
replaced.  Very interesting, the Colonel thought.  Can he be a
compatriot?  Yes, he must.

A little spit ran out of the corner of his mouth as he spoke,
peeringly, with the elderly, wholesome looking woman who was with him.
She looks like anybody's mother in an illustration in _The Ladies' Home
Journal_, the Colonel thought.  _The Ladies' Home Journal_ was one of
the magazines received regularly at the Officers's Club in Trieste and
the Colonel looked through it when it came.  It is a wonderful
magazine, he thought, because it combines sexology and beautiful foods.
It makes me hungry both ways.

But who do you suppose that character is?  He looks like a caricature
of an American who has been run one half way through a meat chopper and
then been boiled, slightly, in oil.  I'm not being so gentle, he
thought.

Ettore, with his emaciated face and his love of joking and fundamental
and abiding disrespect, came over and the Colonel said, 'Who is that
spiritual character?'

Ettore shook his head.

The man was short and dark with glossy black hair that did not seem to
go with his strange face.  He looked, the Colonel thought, as though he
had forgotten to change his wig as he grew older.  Has a wonderful face
though, the Colonel thought.  Looks like some of the hills around
Verdun.  I don't suppose he could be Goebbels and he picked up that
face in the last days when they were all playing at Gotterdammerung.
_Komm' Susser Tod_, he thought.  Well they sure bought themselves a
nice big piece of Susser Tod at the end.

'You don't want a nice Susser Tod sandwich do you Miss Renata?'

'I don't think so,' the girl said.  'Though I love Bach and I am sure
Cipriani could make one.'

'I was not talking against Bach,' the Colonel said.

'I know it.'

'Hell,' the Colonel said.  'Bach was practically a co-belligerent.  As
you were,' he added.

'I don't think we have to talk against me.'

'Daughter,' the Colonel said.  'When will you learn that I might joke
against you because I love you?'

'Now,' she said.  'I've learned it.  But you know it's fun not to joke
too rough.'

'Good.  I've learned it.'

'How often do you think of me during the week?'

'All of the time.'

'No.  Tell me truly.'

'All of the time.  Truly.'

'Do you think it is this bad for everyone?'

'I wouldn't know,' the Colonel said.  'That's one of the things I would
not know.'

'I hope it's not this bad for everyone.  I had no idea it could be this
bad.'

'Well you know now.'

'Yes,' the girl said.  'I know now.  I know now and for keeps and for
always.  Is that the correct way to say it?'

'I know now is enough,' the Colonel said.  'Ettore, that character with
the inspiring face and the nice looking woman with him doesn't live at
the Gritti does he?'

'No,' Ettore said.  'He lives next door but he goes to the Gritti
sometimes to eat.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'It will be wonderful to see him if I should
ever be down-hearted.  Who is the woman with him?  His wife?  His
mother?  His daughter?'

'There you have me,' Ettore said.  'We haven't kept track of him in
Venice.  He has aroused neither love, hate, dislike, fear nor
suspicion.  Do you really want to know anything about him?  I could ask
Cipriani.'

'Let us skip him,' the girl said.  'Is that how you say it?'

'Let's skip him,' the Colonel said.

'When we have so little time, Richard.  He is rather a waste of time.'

'I was looking at him as at a drawing by Goya.  Faces are pictures,
too.'

'Look at mine and I will look at yours.  Please skip the man.  He
didn't come here to do anyone any harm.'

'Let me look at your face and you not look at mine.'

'No,' she said.  'That's not fair.  I have to remember yours all week.'

'And what do I do?' the Colonel asked her.

Ettore came over, unable to avoid conspiracy and, having gathered his
intelligence rapidly and as a Venetian should, said:

'My colleague who works at his hotel, says that he drinks three or four
highballs and then writes vastly and fluently far into the night.'

'I daresay that makes marvellous reading.'

'I daresay,' Ettore said.  'But it was hardly the method of Dante.'

'Dante was another _vieux con_,' the Colonel said.  'I mean as a man.
Not as a writer.'

'I agree,' Ettore said.  'I think you will find no one, outside of
Firenze, who has studied his life who would not agree.'

'Eff Florence,' the Colonel said.

'A difficult manoeuvre,' Ettore said.  'Many have attempted it but very
few have succeeded.  Why do you dislike it, my Colonel?'

'Too complicated to explain.  But it was the depot,' he said
_deposito_, 'of my old regiment when I was a boy.'

'That I can understand.  I have my own reasons for disliking it, too.
You know a good town?'

'Yes,' said the Colonel.  'This one.  A part of Milano; and Bologna.
And Bergamo.'

'Cipriani has a large store of vodka in case the Russians should come,'
Ettore said, loving to joke rough.

'They'll bring their own vodka, duty free.'

'Still I believe Cipriani is prepared for them.'

'Then he is the only man who is,' the Colonel said.  'Tell him not to
take any cheques from junior officers on the Bank of Odessa and thank
you for the data on my compatriot.  I won't take more of your time.'

Ettore left and the girl turned towards him and looked in his old steel
eyes and put both her hands on his bad one and said, 'You were quite
gentle.'

'And you are most beautiful and I love you.'

'It's nice to hear it anyway.'

'What are we going to do about dinner?'

'I will have to call my home and find out if I can come out.'

'Why do you look sad now?'

'Do I?'

'Yes.'

'I am not, really.  I am as happy as I ever am.  Truly.  Please believe
me, Richard.  But how would you like to be a girl nineteen years old in
love with a man over fifty years old that you knew was going to die?'

'You put it a little bluntly,' the Colonel said.  'But you are very
beautiful when you say it.'

'I never cry,' the girl said.  'Never.  I made a rule not to.  But I
would cry now.'

'Don't cry,' the Colonel said.  'I'm gentle now and the hell with the
rest of it.'

'Say once again that you love me.'

'I love you and I love you and I love you.'

'Will you do your best not to die?'

'Yes.'

'What did the doctor say?'

'So-so.'

'Not worse?'

'No,' he lied.

'Then let us have another Martini,' the girl said.  'You know I never
drank a Martini until we met.'

'I know.  But you drink them awfully well.'

'Shouldn't you take the medicine?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'I should take the medicine.'

'May I give it to you?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'You may give it to me.'

They continued to sit at the table in the corner and some people went
out and others came in.  The Colonel felt a little dizzy from the
medicine and he let it ride.  That's the way it always is, he thought.
To hell with it.

He saw the girl watching him and he smiled at her.  It was an old smile
that he had been using for fifty years, ever since he first smiled and
it was still as sound as your grandfather's Purdey shot-gun.  I guess
my older brother has that, he thought.  Well, he could always shoot
better than I could and he deserves it.

'Listen, Daughter,' he said.  'Don't be sorry for me.'

'I'm not.  Not at all.  I just love you.'

'It isn't much of a trade is it?'  He said _oficio_ instead of trade,
because they spoke Spanish together, too, when they left French and
when they did not wish to speak English before other people.  Spanish
is a rough language, the Colonel thought, rougher than a corncob
sometimes.  But you can say what you mean in it and make it stick.

'_Es un oficio bastante malo_,' he repeated, 'loving me.'

'Yes.  But it is the only one I have.'

'Don't you write any more poetry?'

'It was young girl poetry.  Like young girl painting.  Everyone is
talented at a certain age.'

At what age do you become old in this country, the Colonel thought.  No
one is ever old in Venice, but they grow up very fast.  I grew up very
rapidly in the Veneto myself and I was never as old as I was at
twenty-one.

'How is your mother?' he asked lovingly.

'She is very well.  She does not receive and she sees almost no one
because of her sorrow.'

'Do you think she would mind if we had a baby?'

'I don't know.  She is very intelligent, you know.  But I would have to
marry someone, I suppose.  I don't really want to.'

'We could be married.'

'No,' she said.  'I thought it over and I thought we should not.  It is
just a decision as the one about crying.'

'Maybe you make wrong decisions.  Christ knows I've made a few and too
many men are dead from when I was wrong.'

'I think, perhaps, you exaggerate.  I don't believe you made many wrong
decisions.'

'Not many,' the Colonel said.  'But enough.  Three is plenty in my
trade and I made all three.'

'I'd like to know about them.'

'They'd bore you,' the Colonel told her.  'They beat the hell out of me
to remember them.  So what would they do to some outsider?'

'Am I an outsider?'

'No.  You're my true love.  My last and only and true love.'

'Did you make them early or late?  The decisions.'

'I made them early.  In the middle.  And late.'

'Wouldn't you tell me about them?  I would like to have a share in your
sad trade.'

'The hell with them,' the Colonel said.  'They were made and they've
all been paid for.  Only you can't pay for that.'

'Can you tell me about that and why?'

'No,' the Colonel said.  And that was the end of that.

'Then let's have fun.'

'Let's,' the Colonel said.  'With our one and only life.'

'Maybe there are others.  Other lives.'

'I don't think so,' the Colonel said.  'Turn your head sideways,
beauty.'

'Like this?'

'Like that,' the Colonel said.  'Exactly like that.'

So, the Colonel thought, here we come into the last round and I do not
know even the number of the round.  I have loved but three women and
have lost them thrice.

You lose them the same way you lose a battalion; by errors of judgment;
orders that are impossible to fulfil and through impossible conditions.
Also through brutality.

I have lost three battalions in my life and three women and now I have
a fourth and loveliest and where the hell does it end?

You tell me, General, and, incidentally, while we are discussing the
matter and it is frank discussion of the situation and in no sense a
Council of War, as you have so often pointed out to me General: GENERAL
WHERE IS YOUR CAVALRY?

I have thought so, he said to himself.  The Commanding Officer does not
know where his cavalry is and his cavalry are not completely accurate
as to their situation, nor their mission and they will, some of them,
_enough_, muck off as cavalry have always mucked off in all the wars
since they, the Cavalry, had the big horses.

'Beauty,' he said, '_Ma très chère et bien aimée_.  I am very dull and
I am sorry.'

'You are never dull, to me, and I love you and I only wish we could be
cheerful to-night.'

'We damn well will be,' said the Colonel.  'Do you know anything
particular we should be cheerful about?'

'We might be cheerful about us, and about the town.  You've often been
very cheerful.'

'Yes,' the Colonel agreed.  'I have been.'

'Don't you think we could do it once more?'

'Sure.  Of course.  Why not?'

'Do you see the boy with the wave in his hair, that is natural, and he
only pushes it a little, skilfully, to be more handsome?'

'I see him,' the Colonel said.

'He is a very good painter, but he has false teeth in front because he
was a little bit _pédéraste_ once and other _pédérastes_ attacked him
one night on the Lido when there was a full moon.'

'How old are you?'

'I will be nineteen.'

'How do you know this?'

'I know it from the Gondoliere.  This boy is a very good painter, for
now.  There aren't any really good painters now.  But with false teeth,
now, in his twenty-fifth year, what a thing.'

'I love you very truly,' the Colonel said.

'I love you very truly, too.  Whatever that means in American.  I also
love you in Italian, against all my judgment and all of my wishes.'

'We shouldn't wish for too God-damn much,' the Colonel said.  'Because
we are always liable to get it.'

'I agree,' she said.  'But I would like to get what I wish for now.'

Neither of them said anything and then the girl said, 'That boy, he is
a man now, of course, and goes with very many women to hide what he is,
painted my portrait once.  You can have it if you like.'

'Thank you,' the Colonel said.  'I would love it.'

'It is very romantic.  My hair is twice as long as it has ever been and
I look as though I were rising from the sea without the head wet.
Actually, you rise from the sea with the hair very flat and coming to
points at the end.  It is almost the look of a very nearly dead rat.
But Daddy paid him adequately for the portrait, and, while it is not
truly me, it is the way you like to think of me.'

'I think of you when you come from the sea too.'

'Of course.  Very ugly.  But you might like to have this portrait for a
souvenir.'

'Your lovely mother would not mind?'

'Mummy would not mind.  She would be glad to be rid of it, I think.  We
have better pictures in the house.'

'I love you and your mother both very much.'

'I must tell her,' the girl said.

'Do you think that pock-marked jerk is really a writer?'

'Yes.  If Ettore says so.  He loves to joke but he does not lie.
Richard, what is a jerk?  Tell me truly.'

'It is a little rough to state.  But I think it means a man who has
never worked at his trade (_oficio_) truly, and is presumptuous in some
annoying way.'

'I must learn to use the term properly.'

'Don't use it,' the Colonel said.

Then the Colonel asked, 'When do I get the portrait?'

'To-night if you wish it.  I'll have someone wrap it and send it from
the house.  Where will you hang it?'

'In my quarters.'

'And no one will come in and make remarks and speak badly of me?'

'No.  They damn well will not.  Also I'll tell them it is a portrait of
my daughter.'

'Did you ever have a daughter?'

'No.  I always wanted one.'

'I can be your daughter as well as everything else.'

'That would be incest.'

'I don't think that would be so terrible in a city as old as this and
that has seen what this city has seen.'

'Listen, Daughter.'

'Good,' she said.  'That was fine.  I liked it.'

'All right,' the Colonel said and his voice was thickened a little.  'I
liked it, too.'

'Do you see now why I lore you when I know better than to do it?'

'Look, Daughter.  Where should we dine?'

'Wherever you like.'

'Would you eat at the Gritti?'

'Of course.'

'Then call the house and ask for permission.'

'No.  I decided not to ask permission but to send word where I was
dining.  So they would not worry.'

'But do you really prefer the Gritti?'

'I do.  Because it is a lovely restaurant and it is where you live and
anyone can look at us that wants to.'

'When did you get like that?'

'I have always been like that.  I have never cared what anyone thought,
ever.  Nor have I ever done anything that I was ashamed of except tell
lies when I was a little girl and be unkind to people.'

'I wish we could be married and have five sons,' the Colonel said.

'So do I,' the girl said.  'And send them to the five corners of the
world.'

'Are there five corners to the world?'

'I don't know,' she said.  'It sounded as though there were when I said
it.  And now we are having run again, aren't we?'

'Yes, Daughter,' the Colonel said.

'Say it again.  Just as you said it.'

'Yes, Daughter.'

'Oh,' she said.  'People must be very complicated.  Please may I take
your hand?'

'It's so damned ugly and I dislike looking at it.'

'You don't know about your hand.'

'That's a matter of opinion,' he said.  'I'd say you were wrong,
Daughter.'

'Maybe I am wrong.  But we're having fun again and whatever the bad
thing was is gone now.'

'It's gone the way the mist is burned off the hollows in broken ground
when the sun comes out,' the Colonel said.  'And you're the sun.'

'I want to be the moon, too.'

'You are,' the Colonel told her.  'Also any particular planet that you
wish to be and I will give you an accurate location of the planet.
Christ, Daughter, you can be a God-damn constellation if you like.
Only that's an airplane.'

'I'll be the moon.  She has many troubles, too.'

'Yes.  Her sorrows come regularly.  But she always fills before she
wanes.'

'She looks so sad to me sometimes across the Canal, that I cannot stand
it.'

'She's been around a long time,' the Colonel said.

'Do you think we should have one more Montgomery?' the girl asked and
the Colonel noticed that the British were gone.

He had been noticing nothing but her lovely face.  I'll get killed
sometime that way, he thought.  On the other hand it is a form of
concentration I suppose.  But it is damned careless.

'Yes,' he said.  'Why not?'

'They make me feel very good,' the girl said.

'They have a certain effect on me, too, the way Cipriani makes them.'

'Cipriani is very intelligent.'

'He's more than that.  He's able.'

'Some day he'll own all Venice.'

'Not quite all,' the Colonel disagreed.  'He'll never own you.'

'No,' she said.  'Nor will anyone else unless you want me.'

'I want you, Daughter.  But I don't want to own you.'

'I know it,' the girl said.  'And that's one more reason why I love
you.'

'Let's get Ettore and have him call up your house.  You can tell them
about the portrait.'

'You are quite correct.  If you want the portrait to-night, I must
speak to the butler to have it wrapped and sent.  I will also ask to
speak to Mummy and tell her where we are dining, and, if you like, I
will ask her permission.'

'No,' the Colonel said.  'Ettore, two Montgomerys, super Montgomerys,
with garlic olives, not the big ones, and please call the home of this
lady and let her know when you have completed the communication.  And
all of this as rapidly as possible.'

'Yes, my Colonel.'

'Now, Daughter, let us resume the having of the fun.'

'It was resumed when you spoke,' she said.




Chapter X

They were walking, now, along the right side of the street that led to
the Gritti.  The wind was at their backs and it blew the girl's hair
forward.  The wind parted her hair in the back and blew it forward
about her face.  They were looking in the shop windows and the girl
stopped in front of the lighted window of a jewellery shop.

There were many good pieces of old jewellery in the window and they
stood and looked at them and pointed out the best ones to each other,
unclasping their hands to do so.

'Is there anything you really want?  I could get it in the morning.
Cipriani would loan me the money.'

'No,' she said.  'I do not want anything but I notice that you never
give me presents.'

'You are much richer than I am.  I bring you small things from the PX
and I buy you drinks and meals.'

'And take me in gondolas and to lovely places in the country.'

'I never thought you wanted presents of hard stones.'

'I don't.  It is just the thought of giving and then one looks at them
and thinks about them when they are worn.'

'I'm learning,' the Colonel said.  'But what could I buy you on Army
pay that would be like your square emeralds?'

'But don't you see.  I inherited them.  They came from my grandmother,
and she had them from her mother who had them from her mother.  Do you
think it is the same to wear stones that come from dead people?'

'I never thought about it.'

'You can have them if you like, if you like stones.  To me they are
only something to wear like a dress from Paris.  You don't like to wear
your dress uniform, do you?'

'No.'

'You don't like to carry a sword, do you?'

'No, repeat, no.'

'You are not that kind of a soldier and I am not that sort of girl.
But some time give me something lasting that I can wear and be happy
each time I wear it.'

'I see,' the Colonel said.  'And I will.'

'You learn fast about things you do not know,' the girl said.  'And you
make lovely quick decisions.  I would like you to have the emeralds and
you could keep them in your pocket like a lucky piece, and feel them if
you were lonely.'

'I don't put my hands much in my pockets when I'm working.  I usually
twirl a stick, or something, or point things out with a pencil.'

'But you could put your hand in your pocket only once in a long time
and feel them.'

'I'm not lonely when I'm working.  I have to think too hard to ever be
lonely.'

'But you are not working now.'

'No.  Only preparing the best way to be overrun.'

'I'm going to give them to you anyway.  I'm quite sure Mummy will
understand.  Also I won't need to tell her for quite a long time.  She
keeps no check on my things.  I'm sure my maid would never tell her.'

'I don't think I should take them.'

'You should, please, to give me pleasure.'

'I'm not sure it's honourable.'

'That is like not being sure whether you are a virgin.  What you do to
give pleasure to another whom you love is most honourable.'

'All right,' the Colonel said.  'I will take them for better or for
worse.'

'Now you say thank you,' the girl said and slipped them into his pocket
as quickly and ably as a jewel thief might.  'I brought them with me
because I have been thinking and deciding about this all week.'

'I thought you thought about my hand.'

'Don't be surly, Richard.  And _you_ should never be stupid.  It is
your hand you touch them with.  Didn't you think of that?'

'No.  And I was stupid.  What would you like from that window?'

'I would like that small Negro with the ebony face and the turban made
of chip diamonds with the small ruby on the crown of the turban.  I
should wear it as a pin.  Everyone wore them in the old days in this
city and the faces were those of their confidential servants.  I have
coveted this for a long time, but I wanted you to give it to me.'

'I'll send it in the morning.'

'No.  Give it to me when we have lunch before you go.'

'Right,' the Colonel said.

'Now we must walk or we will be too late for dinner.'

They started to walk, arm through arm, and as they went up the first
bridge the wind lashed at them.

When the twinge came, the Colonel said to himself, the hell with that.

'Richard,' the girl said.  'Put your hand in your pocket to please me
and feel them.'

The Colonel did.

'They feel wonderful,' he said.




Chapter XI

They came in, out of the wind and the cold, through the main entrance
of the Gritti Palace Hotel, into the light and warmth of the lobby.

'Good evening, Contessa,' the concierge said.  'Good evening, my
Colonel.  It must be cold outside.'

'It is,' the Colonel said, and did not add any of the rough or obscene
phrases about the extent of the cold, or the force of the wind, that he
could ordinarily have employed, for their mutual pleasure when
speaking, alone, with the concierge.

As they entered the long hallway that led to the big stairs and to the
elevator, leaving, on your right, the entrance to the bar, the doorway
on to the Grand Canal, and the entrance to the dining-room, the _Gran
Maestro_ came out of the bar.

He was wearing a formal white jacket, cut long, and he smiled at them
and said, 'Good evening, my Countess.  Good evening, my Colonel.'

'_Gran Maestro_,' the Colonel said.

The _Gran Maestro_ smiled and, still bowing, said, 'We are dining in
the bar at the far end.  There is no one here now in the winter time
and the dining-room is too big.  I have saved your table.  We have a
very fine lobster if you would like him to commence with.'

'Is he really fresh?'

'I saw him this morning when he came from the market in a basket.  He
was alive and a dark green and completely unfriendly.'

'Would you like lobster, Daughter, to start your dinner?'

The Colonel was conscious of using the word, and so was the _Gran
Maestro_, and so was the girl.  But to each one it meant a different
thing.

'I wanted to have him for you in case any _pescecani_ came in.  They
are down now to gamble at the Lido.  I was not trying to sell him.'

'I would love some lobster,' the girl said.  'Cold, and with
mayonnaise.  The mayonnaise rather stiff.'  She said this in Italian.

'It isn't too expensive?' she said to the Colonel, seriously.

'_Ay hija mia_,' the Colonel said.

'Feel in your right pocket,' she said.

'I'll see that he is not too expensive,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'Or
I'll buy him myself.  I could get him quite easily with a week's wages.'

'Sold to TRUST,' the Colonel said, this being the code designation of
the task force occupying Trieste.  'He only costs me a day's wages.'

'Put your hand in your right hand pocket and feel very rich,' the girl
said.

The _Gran Maestro_ had sensed this was a private joke and had gone;
silently.  He was happy about the girl, whom he respected and admired,
and he was happy for his Colonel.

'I am rich,' the Colonel said.  'But if you tease me about them, I will
give them back, and on the linen tablecloth, and in public.'

He was teasing rough in his turn; throwing in the counter-attack
without even thinking.

'No, you won't,' she said.  'Because you love them already.'

'I would take anything I love and throw it off the highest cliff you
ever saw and not wait to hear it bounce.'

'No, you wouldn't,' the girl said.  'You would not throw me off any
high cliffs.'

'No,' the Colonel agreed.  'And forgive me for talking badly.'

'You didn't talk very badly and I didn't believe it anyway,' the girl
told him.  'Now should I go to the women's room to comb my hair and
make myself presentable, or should I come up to your room?'

'Which do you wish?'

'To come to your room, of course, and see how you live and how things
are there.'

'What about the hotel?'

'Everything is known in Venice anyway.  But it is also known who my
family are and that I am a good girl.  Also they know it is you and it
is I.  We have some credit to exhaust.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'By stairs or elevator?'

'By elevator,' she said, and he heard the change in her voice.  'You
can call a boy or we can run it ourselves.'

'We run it ourselves,' the Colonel said.  'I checked out on elevators
long ago.'

It was a good ride with a slight bump, and a rectification at the end,
and the Colonel thought: Checked out, eh?  You better be checked out
again.

The corridor was now not simply beautiful, but exciting, and putting
the key into the lock was not a simple process, but a rite.

'Here it is,' the Colonel said when he swung the door open.  'What
there is of it.'

'It is charming,' the girl said.  'But it is awfully cold with the
windows open.'

'I'll close them.'

'No, please.  Leave them open if you like it that way.'

The Colonel kissed her and felt her wonderful, long, young, lithe and
properly built body against his own body, which was hard and good, but
beat-up, and as he kissed her he thought of nothing.

They kissed for a long time, standing straight, and kissing true, in
the cold of the open windows that were on to the Grand Canal.

'Oh,' she said.  Then, 'Oh.'

'We owe nothing,' the Colonel said.  'Not a thing.'

'Will you marry me and will we have the five sons?'

'I will!  I will!'

'The thing is that, would you?'

'Of course.'

'Kiss me once again and make the buttons of your uniform hurt me but
not too much.'

They stood there and kissed each other true.  'I have a disappointment
for you, Richard,' she said.  'I have a disappointment about
everything.'

She said it as a flat statement and it came to the Colonel in the same
way as a message came from one of the three battalions, when the
battalion commander spoke the absolute truth and told you the worst.

'You are positive?'

'Yes.'

'My poor Daughter,' he said.

Now there was nothing dark about the word and she was his daughter,
truly, and he pitied her and loved her.

'No matter,' he said.  'You comb yourself and make a new mouth and all
that, and we will have a good dinner.'

'Say once more, first, that you love me and make the buttons very
tight.'

'I love you,' the Colonel said quite formally.

Then he whispered into her ear as gently as he knew how to whisper, as
his whisper was when they are fifteen feet away and you are a young
lieutenant on a patrol, 'I love you only, my best and last and only and
one true love.'

'Good,' she said, and kissed him hard so he could feel the sweet salt
of the blood inside his lip.  And I like that too, he thought.

'Now I will comb my hair and make my mouth new and you can watch me.'

'Do you want me to shut the windows?'

'No,' she said.  'We will do it all in the cold.'

'Who do you love?'

'You,' she said.  'And we don't have too much luck, do we?'

'I don't know,' the Colonel said.  'Go ahead and comb your hair.'

The Colonel went into the bathroom to wash up for dinner.  The bathroom
was the only disappointing part of the room.  Due to the exigencies of
the Gritti having been built as a palace, there had been no site for
bathrooms at the time of building, and, later, when they were
introduced, they had been built down the corridor and those entitled to
use them gave due warning beforehand and water was heated and towels
laid out.

This bathroom had been cut, arbitrarily, from a corner of the room and
it was a defensive, rather than an attacking bathroom, the Colonel
felt.  Washing, and forced to look in the mirror to check any traces of
lipstick, he regarded his face.

It looks as though it had been cut out of wood by an indifferent
craftsman, he thought.

He looked at the different welts and ridges that had come before they
had plastic surgery, and at the thin, only to be observed by the
initiate, lines of the excellent plastic operations after head wounds.

Well, that is what I have to offer as a _gueule_ or a _façade_, he
thought1 It is a damn poor offer.  The only thing is that it is tanned,
and that takes some of the curse off of it.  But, Christ what an ugly
man.

He did not notice the old used steel of his eyes nor the small long
extending laugh wrinkles at the corners of his eyes, nor that his
broken nose was like a gladiator's in the oldest statues.  Nor did he
notice his basically kind mouth which could be truly ruthless.

The hell with you, he said to the mirror.  You beat-up, miserable.
Should we rejoin the ladles?

He went out from the bathroom into the room, and he was as young as at
his first attack.  Every worthless thing had been left in the bathroom.
As always, he thought.  That's the place for it.

_Où sont les neiges d'antan?  Où sont les neiges d'autrefois?  Dans le
pissoir toute la chose comme ça._

The girl, whose first name was Renata, had the doors of the tall
armoire open.  They were all mirrored inside and she was combing her
hair.

She was not combing it for vanity, nor to do to the Colonel what she
knew it could and would do.  She was combing it with difficulty and
without respect, and, since it was very heavy hair and as alive as the
hair of peasants, or the hair of the beauties of the great nobility, it
was resistant to the comb.

'The wind made it very tangled,' she said.  'Do you love me still?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'May I help you?'

'No, I've done it all my life.'

'You could stand sidewise.'

'No.  All contours are for our five sons and for your head to rest on.'

'I was only thinking of the face,' the Colonel said.  'But thank you
for calling my attention.  My attention has been faulty again.'

'I am over bold.'

'No,' the Colonel said.  'In America, they make such things of wire and
of sponge-rubber, such as you use in the seats of tanks.  You never
know there, whether there is any truth in the matter, unless you are a
bad boy, as I am.'

'Here it is not that way,' she said, and, with the comb, swung her now
parted hair forward so that it came below the line of her cheek and,
slanting back, hung over her shoulders.

'Do you like it neat?'

'It's not too neat but it is damn lovely.'

'I could put it up and all that sort of thing if you value neatness.
But I cannot manage hairpins and it seems so silly.'  Her voice was so
lovely and it always reminded him of Pablo Casals playing the 'cello
that it made him feel as a wound does that you think you cannot bear.
But you can bear anything, he thought.

'I love you very much the way you are,' the Colonel said.  'And you are
the most beautiful woman I have ever known, or seen, ever in paintings
by good painters.'

'I wonder why the portrait has not come.'

'The portrait is lovely to have,' the Colonel said, and now he was a
General again without thinking of it.  'But it is like skinning a dead
horse.'

'Please don't be rough,' the girl said.  'I don't feel at all like
being rough to-night.'

'I slipped into the jargon of my _sale mètier_.'

'No,' she said.  'Please put your arms around me, gently and well.
Please.  It is not a dirty trade.  It is the oldest and the best,
although most people who practise it are unworthy.'

He held her as tight as he could without hurting and she said, 'I would
not have you be a lawyer nor a priest.  Nor sell things.  Nor be a
great success.  I love you to be in your trade and I love you.  Please
whisper to me if you wish.'

The Colonel whispered; holding her tight, and with his heart broken,
honestly and fairly, in his whisper that was as barely audible as a
silent dog whistle heard close to the ear, 'I love you, devil.  And
you're my daughter, too.  And I don't care about our losses because the
moon is our mother and our father.  And now let's go down to dinner.'

He whispered this last so low that it was inaudible to anyone who did
not love you.

'Yes,' the girl said.  'Yes.  But kiss me once more first.'




Chapter XII

They were at their table in the far corner of the bar, where the
Colonel had both his flanks covered, and he rested solidly against the
corner of the room.  The _Gran Maestro_ knew about this, since he had
been an excellent sergeant in a good company of infantry, in a
first-rate regiment, and he would no more have seated his Colonel in
the middle of a room than he would have taken up a stupid defensive
position.

'The lobster,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.

The lobster was imposing.  He was double the size a lobster should be,
and his unfriendliness had gone with the boiling, so that now he looked
a monument to his dead self; complete with protruding eyes and his
delicate, far-extended antennae that were for knowing what rather
stupid eyes could not tell him.

He looks a little bit like Georgie Patton, the Colonel thought.  But he
probably never cried in his life when he was moved.

'Do you think that he will be tough?' he asked the girl in Italian.

'No,' the _Gran Maestro_ assured them, still bowing with the lobster.
'He's truly not tough.  He's only big.  You know the type.'

'All right,' the Colonel said.  'Serve him.'

'And what will you drink?'

'What do you want, Daughter?'

'What you want?'

'Capri Bianco,' the Colonel said.  'Secco and really cold.'

'I have it ready,' said the _Gran Maestro_.

'We are having fun,' the girl said.  'We are having it again and
without sorrow.  Isn't he an imposing lobster?'

'He is,' the Colonel answered.  'And he better damn well be tender.'

'He will be,' the girl told him.  'The _Gran Maestro_ doesn't lie.
Isn't it wonderful to have people who do not lie?'

'Very wonderful and quite rare,' the Colonel said.  'I was thinking
just now of a man named Georgie Patton who possibly never told the
truth in his life.'

'Do you ever lie?'

'I've lied four times.  But each time I was very tired.  That's not an
excuse,' he added.

'I lied a lot when I was a little girl.  But mostly it was making up
stories.  Or I hope so.  But I have never lied to my own advantage.'

'I have,' said the Colonel.  'Four times.'

'Would you have been a general if you had not lied?'

'If I had lied as others lied, I would have been a three-star general.'

'Would it make you happier to be a three-star general?'

'No,' said the Colonel.  'It would not.'

'Put your right hand, your real hand, in your pocket once and tell me
how you feel.'

The Colonel did so.

'Wonderful,' he said.  'But I have to give them back you know.'

'No.  Please, no.'

'We won't go into it now.'

Just then the lobster was served.

It was tender, with the peculiar slippery grace of that kicking muscle
which is the tail, and the claws were excellent; neither too thin, nor
too fat.

'A lobster fills with the moon,' the Colonel told the girl.  'When the
moon is dark he is not worth eating.'

'I didn't know that.'

'I think it may be because, with the full moon, he feeds all night.  Or
maybe it is that the full moon brings him feed.'

'They come from the Dalmatian coast do they not?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'That's your rich coast in fish.  Maybe I
should say our rich coast.'

'Say it,' the girl said.  'You don't know how important things that are
said are.'

'They are a damn sight more important when you put them on paper.'

'No,' the girl said.  'I don't agree.  The paper means nothing unless
you say them in your heart.'

'And what if you haven't a heart, or your heart is worthless?'

'You have a heart and it is not worthless.'

I would sure as hell like to trade it in on a new one, the Colonel
thought.  I do not see why that one, of all the muscles, should fail
me.  But he said nothing of this, and put his hand in his pocket.

'They feel wonderful,' he said.  'And you look wonderful.'

'Thank you,' she said.  'I will remember that all week.'

'You could always just look in the glass.'

'The mirror bores me,' she said.  'Putting on lipstick and moving your
lips over each other to get it spread properly and combing your too
heavy hair is not a life for a woman, or even a girl alone, who loves
someone.  When you want to be the moon and various stars and live with
your man and have five sons, looking at yourself in the mirror and
doing the artifices of a woman is not very exciting.'

'Then let us be married at once.'

'No,' she said.  'I had to make a decision about that, as about the
other different things.  All week long is my time to make decisions.'

'I make them, too,' the Colonel told her.  'But I am very vulnerable on
this.'

'Let's not talk about it.  It makes a sweet hurt, but I think we would
do better to find out what the _Gran Maestro_ has for meat.  Please
drink your wine.  You haven't touched it.'

'I'll touch it now,' the Colonel said.  He did and it was pale and cold
like the wines of Greece, but not resinous, and its body was as full
and as lovely as that of Renata.

'It's very like you.'

'Yes.  I know.  That's why I wanted you to taste it.'

'I'm tasting it,' the Colonel said.  'Now I will drink a full glass.'

'You're a good man.'

'Thank you,' the Colonel said.  'I'll remember that all week and try to
be one.'  Then he said, '_Gran Maestro_.'

When the _Gran Maestro_ came over, happy, conspiratorial, and ignoring
his ulcers, the Colonel asked him, 'What sort of meat have you that is
worth our eating?'

'I'm not quite sure I know,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'But I will
check.  Your compatriot is over there in hearing distance.  He would
not let me seat him in the far corner.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'We'll give him something to write about.'

'He writes every night, you know.  I've heard that from one of my
colleagues at his hotel.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'That shows that he is industrious even if
he has outlived his talents.'

'We are all industrious,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.

'In different ways.'

'I will go and check on what there actually is among the meats.'

'Check carefully.'

'I am industrious.'

'You are also damn sagacious.'

The _Gran Maestro_ was gone and the girl said, 'He is a lovely man and
I love how fond he is of you.'

'We are good friends,' the Colonel said.  'I hope he has a good steak
for you.'

'There is one very good steak,' the _Gran Maestro_ said, reappearing.

'You take it, Daughter.  I get them all the time at the mess.  Do you
want it rare?'

'Quite rare, please.'

'_Al sangue_,' the Colonel said, 'as John said when he spoke to the
waiter in French.  _Crudo, bleu_, or just make it very rare.'

'It's rare,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'And you, my Colonel?'

'The scaloppine with Marsala, and the cauliflower braised with butter.
Plus an artichoke vinaigrette if you can find one.  What do you want,
Daughter?'

'Mashed potatoes and a plain salad.'

'You're a growing girl.'

'Yes.  But I should not grow too much nor in the wrong directions.'

'I think that handles it,' the Colonel said.  'What about a fiasco of
Valpolicella?'

'We don't have fiascos.  This is a good hotel, you know.  It comes in
bottles.'

'I forgot,' the Colonel said.  'Do you remember when it cost thirty
centesimi the litre?'

'And we would throw the empty fiascos at the station guards from the
troop trains?'

'And we would throw all the left over grenades away and bounce them
down the hillside coming back from the Grappa?'

'And they would think there was a break-through when they would see the
bursts and you never shaved, and we wore the _fiamme nere_ on the grey,
open jackets with the grey sweaters?'

'And I drank grappa and could not even feel the taste?'

'We must have been tough then,' the Colonel said.

'We were tough then,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'We were bad boys then,
and you were the worst of the bad boys.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'I think we were rather bad boys.  You
forgive this will you, Daughter?'

'You haven't a picture of then, have you?'

'No.  There weren't any pictures except with Mr. d'Annunzio in them.
Also most of the people turned out badly.'

'Except for us,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'Now I must go and see how
the steak marches.'

The Colonel, who was a sub-lieutenant again now, riding in a camion,
his face dust, until only his metallic eyes showed, and they were
red-rimmed and sore, sat thinking.

The three key points, he thought.  The massif of Grappa with Assalone
and Pertica and the hill I do not remember the name of on the right.
That was where I grew up, he thought, and all the nights I woke
sweating, dreaming I would not be able to get them out of the trucks.
They should not have gotten out, ever, of course.  But what a trade it
is.

'In our army, you know,' he told the girl, 'practically no generals
have ever fought.  It is quite strange and the top organization
dislikes those who have fought.'

'Do generals really fight?'

'Oh, yes.  When they are captains and lieutenants.  Later, except in
retreats, it is rather stupid.'

'Did you fight much?  I know you did.  But tell me.'

'I fought enough to be classified as a fool by the great thinkers.'

'Tell me.'

'When I was a boy, I fought against Erwin Rommel half way from Cortina
to the Grappa, where we held.  He was a captain then and I was an
acting captain; really a sub-lieutenant.'

'Did you know him?'

'No.  Not until after the war when we could talk together.  He was very
nice and I liked him.  We used to ski together.'

'Did you like many Germans?'

'Very many.  Ernst Udet I liked the best.'

'But they were in the wrong.'

'Of course.  But who has not been?'

'I never could like them or take such a tolerant attitude as you do,
since they killed my father and burned our villa on the Brenta and the
day I saw a German officer shooting pigeons with a shotgun in the
Piazzo San Marco.'

'I understand,' the Colonel said.  'But please, Daughter, you try to
understand my attitude too.  When we have killed so many we can afford
to be kind.'

'How many have you killed?'

'One hundred and twenty-two sures.  Not counting possibles.'

'You had no remorse?'

'Never.'

'Nor bad dreams about it?'

'Nor bad dreams.  But usually strange ones.  Combat dreams, always, for
a while after combat.  But then strange dreams about places mostly.  We
live by accidents of terrain, you know.  And terrain is what remains in
the dreaming part of your mind.'

'Don't you ever dream about me?'

'I try to.  But I can't.'

'Maybe the portrait will help.'

'I hope so,' the Colonel said.  'Please don't forget to remind me to
give back the stones.'

'Please don't be cruel.'

'I have my small necessities of honour in the same proportions as we
have our great and enveloping love.  You cannot have the one without
the other.'

'But you could give me privileges.'

'You have them,' the Colonel said.  'The stones are in my pocket.'

The _Gran Maestro_ came then with the steak and the scaloppine and the
vegetables.  They were brought by a sleek-headed boy who believed in
nothing; but was trying hard to be a good second waiter.  He was a
member of the Order.  The _Gran Maestro_ served adroitly and with
respect both for the food, and those that were to eat it.

'Now eat,' he said.

'Uncork that Valpolicella,' he said to the boy who had the eyes of an
unbelieving spaniel.

'What do you have on that character?' the Colonel asked him, referring
to his pitted compatriot, sitting chawing at his food, while the
elderly woman with him ate with suburban grace.

'You should tell me.  Not me you.'

'I never saw him before to-day,' the Colonel said.  'He's hard to take
with food.'

'He condescends to me.  He speaks bad Italian assiduously.  He goes
everywhere in Baedeker, and he has no taste in either food or wine.
The woman is nice.  I believe she is his aunt.  But I have no real
information.'

'He looks like something we could do without.'

'I believe we could.  In a pinch.'

'Does he speak of us?'

'He asked me who you were.  He was familiar with the Contessa's name
and had book-visited several palaces that had belonged to the family.
He was impressed by your name, Madam, which I gave to impress him.'

'Do you think he will put us in a book?'

'I'm sure of it.  He puts everything in a book.'

'We ought to be in a book,' the Colonel said.  'Would you mind,
Daughter?'

'Of course not,' the girl said.  'But I'd rather Dante wrote it.'

'Dante isn't around,' the Colonel said.

'Can you tell me anything about the war?' the girl asked.  'Anything
that I should be permitted to know?'

'Sure.  Anything you like.'

'What was General Eisenhower like?'

'Strictly the Epworth League.  Probably that is unjust too.  Also
complicated by various other influences.  An excellent politician.
Political General.  Very able at it.'

'The other leaders?'

'Let us not name them.  They've named themselves enough in their
memoirs.  Mostly extremely plausible out of something called the Rotary
Club that you would never have heard of.  In this club, they have
enamelled buttons with their first names and you are fined if you call
them by their proper names.  Never fought.  Ever.'

'Were there no good ones?'

'Yes, many.  Bradley, the schoolmaster, and many others.  Give you
Lightning Joe as a good one.  Very good.'

'Who was he?'

'Commanded the Seventh Corps when I was there.  Very sound.  Rapid.
Accurate.  Now chief of staff.'

'But what about the great leaders we heard about like the Generals
Montgomery and Patton?'

'Forget them, Daughter.  Monty was a character who needed fifteen to
one to move, and then moved tardily.'

'I always supposed he was a great General.'

'He was not,' the Colonel said.  'The worst part was he knew it.  I
have seen him come into an hotel and change from his proper uniform
into a crowd-catching kit to go out in the evening to animate the
populace.'

'Do you dislike him?'

'No.  I simply think he is a British General.  Whatever that means.
And don't you use the term.'

'But he beat General Rommel.'

'Yes.  And you don't think anyone else had softened him up?  And who
can't win with fifteen to one?  When we fought here, when we were boys,
the _Gran Maestro_ and I, we won for one whole year with three to four
against one and we won each one.  Three main bad ones.  That is why we
can make jokes and not be solemn.  We had something over one hundred
and forty thousand dead that year.  That is why we can speak gaily and
without pomposity.'

'It is such a sad science; if it is a science,' the girl said.  'I hate
the war monuments, though I respect them.'

'I do not like them either.  Nor the process which led to their
construction.  Have you ever seen that end of the thing?'

'No.  But I would like to know.'

'Better not know,' the Colonel said.  'Eat your steak before it gets
cold and forgive me for talking about my trade.'

'I hate it but I love it.'

'I believe we share the same emotions,' the Colonel said.  'But what is
my pitted compatriot thinking three tables down?'

'About his next book, or about what it says in Baedeker.'

'Should we go and ride in a gondola in the wind after we have dined?'

'That would be lovely.'

'Should we tell the pitted man that we are going?  I think he has the
same pits on his heart and in his soul and maybe in his curiosity.'

'We tell him nothing,' the girl said.  'The _Gran Maestro_ can convey
him any information we wish.'

Then she chewed well and solidly on her steak and said, 'Do you think
it is true that men make their own faces after fifty.'

'I hope not.  Because I would not sign for mine.'

'You,' she said.  'You.'

'Is the steak good?' the Colonel asked.

'It's wonderful.  How are your scaloppine?'

'Very tender and the sauce is not at all sweet.  Do you like the
vegetables?'

'The cauliflower is almost crisp; like celery.'

'We should have some celery.  But I don't think there is any or the
_Gran Maestro_ would have brought it.'

'Don't we have fun with food?  Imagine if we could eat together always.'

'I've suggested it.'

'Let's not talk about that.'

'All right,' the Colonel said.  'I've made a decision too.  I'm going
to chuck the army and live in this town, very simply, on my retirement
pay.'

'That's wonderful.  How do you look in civilian clothes?'

'You've seen me.'

'I know it, my dear.  I said it for a joke.  You make rough jokes
sometimes too, you know.'

'I'll look all right.  That is if you have a tailor here who can cut
clothes.'

'There isn't one here, but there is in Rome.  Can we drive together to
Rome to get the clothes?'

'Yes.  And we will live outside the town at Viterbo and only go in for
the fittings and for dinner in the evening.  Then we'll drive back in
the night.'

'Will we see cinema people and speak about them with candour and
perhaps not have a drink with them?'

'We'll see them by the thousands.'

'Will we see them being married for the second and third time and then
being blessed by the Pope?'

'If you go in for that kind of thing.'

'I don't,' the girl said.  'That's one reason that I cannot marry you.'

'I see,' the Colonel said.  'Thank you.'

'But I will love you, whatever that means, and you and I know what it
means very well, as long as either of us is alive and after.'

'I don't think you can love very much after you, yourself, are dead,'
the Colonel said.

He started to eat the artichoke taking a leaf at a time, and dipping
them, heavy side down, into the deep saucer of _sauce vinaigrette_.

'I don't know whether you can either,' the girl said.  'But I will try.
Don't you feel better to be loved?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'I feel as though I were out on some
bare-assed hill where it was too rocky to dig, and the rocks all solid,
but with nothing jutting, and no bulges, and all of a sudden instead of
being there naked, I was armoured.  Armoured and the eighty-eights not
there.'

'You should tell that to our writer friend with the craters of the moon
face so he could write it to-night.'

'I ought to tell it to Dante if he was around,' the Colonel, suddenly
gone as rough as the sea when a line squall comes up, said.  'I'd tell
him what I'd do if I were shifted, or ascended, into an armoured
vehicle under such circumstances.'

Just then the Barone Alvarito came into the dining-room.  He was
looking for them and, being a hunter, he saw them instantly.

He came over to the table and kissed Renata's hand, saying, 'Ciao,
Renata.'  He was almost tall, beautifully built in his town clothes,
and he was the shyest man the Colonel had ever known.  He was not shy
from ignorance, nor from being ill at ease, nor from any defect.  He
was basically shy, as certain animals are, such as the Bongo that you
will never see in the jungle, and that must be hunted with dogs.

'My Colonel,' he said.  He smiled as only the truly shy can smile.

It was not the easy grin of the confident, nor the quick slashing smile
of the extremely durable and the wicked.  It had no relation with the
poised, intently used smile of the courtesan or the politician.  It was
the strange, rare smile which rises from the deep, dark pit, deeper
than a well, deep as a deep mine, that is within them.

'I can only stay a moment.  I came to tell you that it looks quite good
for the shoot.  The ducks are coming in heavily from the north.  There
are many big ducks.  The ones you like,' he smiled again.

'Sit down, Alvarito.  Please.'

'No,' the Barone Alvarito said.  'We can meet at the garage at
two-thirty if you like?  You have your car?'

'Yes.'

'That makes it very good.  Leaving at that hour, we will have time to
see the ducks in the evening.'

'Splendid,' the Colonel said.

'Ciao, then, Renata.  Good-bye, my Colonel.  Until two-thirty.'

'We knew each other as children,' the girl said.  'But he was about
three years older.  He was born very old.'

'Yes.  I know.  He is a good friend of mine.'

'Do you think your compatriot has looked him up in Baedeker?'

'I wouldn't know,' the Colonel said.  '_Gran Maestro_,' he asked, 'did
my illustrious compatriot look up the _Barone_ in Baedeker?'

'Truly, my Colonel.  I have not seen him pull his Baedeker during the
meal.'

'Give him full marks,' the Colonel said.  'Now look.  I believe that
the Valpolicella is better when it is newer.  It is not a _grand vin_
and bottling it and putting years on it only adds sediment.  Do you
agree?'

'I agree.'

'Then what should we do?'

'My Colonel, you know that in a Great Hotel, wine must cost money.  You
cannot get Pinard at the Ritz.  But I suggest that we get several
fiascos of the good.  You can say they come from the Contessa Renata's
estates and are a gift.  Then I will have them decanted for you.  This
way, we will have better wine and make an impressive saving.  I will
explain it to the manager if you like.  He is a very good man.'

'Explain it to him,' the Colonel said.  'He's not a man who drinks
labels either.'

'Agreed.'

'In the meantime you might as well drink this.  It is very good you
know.'

'It is,' the Colonel said.  'But it isn't Chambertin.'

'What did we use to drink?'

'Anything,' the Colonel said.  'But now I seek perfection.  Or, rather,
not absolute perfection, but perfection for my money.'

'I seek it, too,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'But rather vainly.'

'What do you want for the end of the meal?'

'Cheese,' the Colonel said.  'What do you want, Daughter?'

The girl had been quiet and a little withdrawn, since she had seen
Alvarito.  Something was going on in her mind, and it was an excellent
mind.  But, momentarily, she was not with them.

'Cheese,' she said.  'Please.'

'What cheese?'

'Bring them all and we'll look at them,' the Colonel said.

The _Gran Maestro_ left and the Colonel said, 'What's the matter,
Daughter?'

'Nothing.  Never anything.  Always nothing.'

'You might as well pull out of it.  We haven't time for such luxuries.'

'No.  I agree.  We will devote ourselves to the cheese.'

'Do I have to take it like a corn cob?'

'No,' she said, not understanding the colloquialism, but understanding
exactly what was meant, since it was she who had been doing the
thinking.  'Put your right hand in your pocket.'

'Good,' the Colonel said.  'I will.'

He put his right hand in his pocket and felt what was there, first with
the tips of his fingers, and then with the insides of his fingers, and
then with the palm of his hand; his split hand.

'I'm sorry,' she said.  'And now we begin the good part of it again.
We will dedicate ourselves to the cheese with happiness.'

'Excellent,' the Colonel said.  'I wonder what cheeses he has?'

'Tell me about the last war,' the girl said.  'Then we will ride in our
gondola in the cold wind.'

'It was not very interesting,' the Colonel said.  'To us, of course,
such things are always interesting.  But there were only three, maybe
four, phases that really interested me.'

'Why?'

'We were fighting a beaten enemy whose communications had been
destroyed.  We destroyed many divisions on paper, but they were ghost
divisions.  Not real ones.  They had been destroyed by our tactical
aviation before they ever got up.  It was only really difficult in
Normandy, due to the terrain, and when we made the break for Georgie
Patton's armour to go through and held it open on both sides.'

'How do you make a break for armour to go through?  Tell me, please.'

'First you fight to take a town that controls all the main roads.  Call
the town St. Lo.  Then you have to open up the roads by taking other
towns and villages.  The enemy has a main line of resistance, but he
cannot bring up his divisions to counter-attack because the
fighter-bombers catch them on the roads.  Does this bore you?  It bores
the hell out of me.'

'It does not bore me.  I never heard it said understandably before.'

'Thank you,' the Colonel said.  'Are you sure you want more of the sad
science?'

'Please,' she said.  'I love you, you know, and I would like to share
it with you.'

'Nobody shares this trade with anybody,' the Colonel told her.  'I'm
just telling you how it works.  I can insert anecdotes to make it
interesting, or plausible.'

'Insert some, please.'

'The taking of Paris was nothing,' the Colonel said.  'It was only an
emotional experience.  Not a military operation.  We killed a number of
typists and the screen the Germans had left, as they always do, to
cover their withdrawal.  I suppose they figured they were not going to
need a hell of a lot of office workers any more and they left them as
soldiers.'

'Was it not a great thing?'

'The people of Leclerc, another jerk of the third or fourth water,
whose death I celebrated with a magnum of Perrier-Jouet Brut 1942, shot
a great number of rounds to make it seem important and because we had
given them what they had to shoot with.  But it was not important.'

'Did you take part in it?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'I think I could safely say, yes.'

'Did you have no great impressions of it?  After all, it was Paris and
not everyone has taken it.'

'The French, themselves, had taken it four days before.  But the grand
plan of what we called SHAEF, Supreme, get that word, Headquarters of
the Allied Expeditionary Forces, which included all the military
politicians of the rear, and who wore a badge of shame in the form of a
flaming something, while we wore a four-leafed clover as a designation,
and for luck, had a master plan for the envelopment of the city.  So we
could not simply take it.

'Also we had to wait for the possible arrival of General or Field
Marshal Bernard Law Montgomery who was unable to close, even, the gap
at Falaise and found the going rather sticky and could not quite get
there on time.'

'You must have missed him,' the girl said.

'Oh, we did,' the Colonel said.  'No end.'

'But was there nothing noble or truly happy about it?'

'Surely,' the Colonel told her.  'We fought from Bas Meudon, and then
the Porte de Saint Cloud, through streets I knew and loved and we had
no deads and did as little damage as possible.  At the Etoile I took
Elsa Maxwell's butler prisoner.  It was a very complicated operation.
He had been denounced as a Japanese sniper.  A new thing.  Several
Parisians were alleged to have been killed by him.  So we sent three
men to the roof where he had taken refuge and he was an Indo-China boy.'

'I begin to understand a little.  But it is disheartening.'

'It is always disheartening as hell.  But you are not supposed to have
a heart in this trade.'

'But do you think it was the same in the time of the Grand Captains?'

'I am quite sure it was worse.'

'But you got your hand honourably?'

'Yes.  Very honourably.  On a rocky, bare-assed hill.'

'Please let me feel it,' she said.

'Just be careful around the centre,' the Colonel said.  'It's split
there and it still cracks open.'

'You ought to write,' the girl said.  'I mean it truly.  So someone
would know about such things.'

'No,' the Colonel disagreed.  'I have not the talent for it and I know
too much.  Almost any liar writes more convincingly than a man who was
there.'

'But other soldiers wrote.'

'Yes.  Maurice de Saxe.  Frederick the Great.  Mr. T'sun Su.'

'But soldiers of our time.'

'You use the word our with facility.  I like it though.'

'But didn't many modern soldiers write?'

'Many.  But did you ever read them?'

'No.  I have read mostly the classics and I read the illustrated papers
for the scandals.  Also, I read your letters.'

'Burn them,' the Colonel said.  'They are worthless.'

'Please.  Don't be rough.'

'I won't.  What can I tell you that won't bore you?'

'Tell me about when you were a General.'

'Oh, that,' he said and motioned to the _Gran Maestro_ to bring
champagne.  It was Roederer Brut '42 and he loved it.

'When you are a General you live in a trailer and your Chief of Staff
lives in a trailer, and you have bourbon whisky when other people do
not have it.  Your Gs live in the C.P.  I'd tell you what Gs are, but
it would bore you.  I'd tell you about G1, G2, G3, G4, G5 and on the
other side there is always Kraut-6.  But it would bore you.  On the
other hand, you have a map covered with plastic material, and on this
you have three regiments composed of three battalions each.  It is all
marked in coloured pencil.

'You have boundary lines so that when the battalions cross their
boundaries they will not then fight each other.  Each battalion is
composed of five companies.  All should be good, but some are good, and
some are not so good.  Also you have divisional artillery and a
battalion of tanks and many spare parts.  You live by co-ordinates.'

He paused while the _Gran Maestro_ poured the Roederer Brut '42.

'From Corps,' he translated, unlovingly, _cuerpo d'Armata_, 'they tell
you what you must do, and then you decide how to do it.  You dictate
the orders or, most often, you give them by telephone.  You ream out
people you respect, to make them do what you know is fairly impossible,
but is ordered.  Also, you have to think hard, stay awake late and get
up early.'

'And you won't write about this?  Not even to please me?'

'No,' said the Colonel.  'Boys who were sensitive and cracked and kept
all their valid first impressions of their day of battle, or their
three days, or even their four, write books.  They are good books but
can be dull if you have been there.  Then others write to profit
quickly from the war they never fought in.  The ones who ran back to
tell the news.  The news is hardly exact.  But they ran quickly with
it.  Professional writers who had jobs that prevented them from
fighting wrote of combat that they could not understand, as though they
had been there.  I do not know what category of sin that comes under.

'Also a nylon-smooth captain of the Navy who could not command a
cat-boat wrote about the intimate side of the truly Big Picture.
Everybody will write their book sooner or later.  We might even draw a
good one.  But I don't write, Daughter.'

He motioned for the _Gran Maestro_ to fill the glasses.

'_Gran Maestro_,' he said.  'Do you like to fight?'

'No.'

'But we fought?'

'Yes.  Too much.'

'How is your health?'

'Wonderful except for the ulcers and a small cardiac condition.'

'No,' the Colonel said, and his heart rose and he felt it choke him.
'You only told me about the ulcers.'

'Well, you know now,' the _Gran Maestro_ said and did not finish the
sentence and he smiled his best and clearest smile that came as solid
as the sun rises.

'How many times?'

The _Gran Maestro_ held up two fingers as a man might do giving odds
where he had credit, and all the betting was on the nod.

'I'm ahead of you,' the Colonel said.  'But let's not be macabre.  Ask
Donna Renata if she wishes more of this excellent wine.'

'You did not tell me there were more,' the girl said.  'You owe it to
me to tell me.'

'There has been nothing since we were together last.'

'Do you think it breaks for me?  If so, I would come and simply be with
you and care for you.'

'It's just a muscle,' the Colonel said.  'Only it is the main muscle.
It works as perfectly as a Rolex Oyster Perpetual.  The trouble is you
cannot send it to the Rolex representative when it goes wrong.  When it
stops, you just do not know the time.  You're dead.'

'Don't please talk about it.'

'You asked me,' the Colonel said.

'And that pitted man with the caricature face?  He has no such thing?'

'Of course not,' the Colonel told her.  'If he is a mediocre writer he
will live for ever.'

'But you're not a writer.  How do you know this?'

'No,' the Colonel said.  'By the grace of God.  But I've read several
books.  We have a lot of time to read when we are unmarried.  Not as
much as the merchant marine maybe.  But plenty.  I can tell one writer
from another and I tell you that a mediocre writer has a long span of
life.  They ought to all draw longevity pay.'

'Could you tell me any anecdotes, and we stop talking about this, which
is my true sorrow?'

'I can tell you hundreds of them.  All true.'

'Tell me just one.  Then we will finish this wine and then go in the
gondola.'

'Do you think you will be warm enough?'

'Oh, I'm sure I will.'

'I don't know what to tell you,' the Colonel said.  'Everything about
war bores those who have not made it.  Except the tales of the liars.'

'I would like to know about the taking of Paris.'

'Why?  Because I told you that you looked like Marie Antoinette in the
tumbril?'

'No.  I was complimented by that and I know we are a little alike in
profile.  But I have never been in any tumbril, and I would like to
hear about Paris.  When you love someone and he is your hero, you like
to hear about the places and the things.'

'Please turn your head,' the Colonel said, 'and I will tell you.  _Gran
Maestro_ is there any more in that wretched bottle?'

'No,' the _Gran Maestro_ answered.

'Then bring another.'

'I have one already iced.'

'Good.  Serve it.  Now, Daughter, we parted from the column of the
General Leclerc at Clamart.  They went to Montrouge and the Porte
d'Orleans and we went directly to Bas Meudon and secured the bridge of
the Porte de Saint Cloud.  Is this too technical and does it bore you?'

'No.'

'It would be better with a map.'

'Go on.'

'We secured the bridge and established a bridgehead on the other side
of the river and we threw the Germans, living and dead, who had
defended the bridge, into the Seine River,' he stopped.  'It was a
token defence of course.  They should have blown it.  We threw all
these Germans into the River Seine.  They were nearly all office
workers, I believe.'

'Go on.'

'The next morning, we were informed that the Germans had strong points
at various places, and artillery on Mount Valerien, and that tanks were
roaming the streets.  A portion of this was true.  We were also
requested not to enter too rapidly as the General Leclerc was to take
the city.  I complied with this request and entered as slowly as I
could.'

'How do you do that?'

'You hold up your attack two hours and you drink champagne whenever it
is offered to you by patriots, collaborators or enthusiasts.'

'But was there nothing wonderful nor great, the way it is in books?'

'Of course.  There was the city itself.  The people were very happy.
Old general officers were walking about in their moth-balled uniforms.
We were very happy, too, not to have to fight.'

'Did you not have to fight at all?'

'Only three times.  Then not seriously.'

'But was that all you had to fight to take such a city?'

'Daughter, we fought twelve times from Ranbouillet to enter the city.
But only two of them were worth describing as fights.  Those at Toussus
le Noble and at Le Buc.  The rest was the necessary garnishing of a
dish.  I really did not need to fight at all except at those two
places.'

'Tell me some true things about fighting.'

'Tell me you love me.'

'I love you,' the girl said.  'You can publish it in the _Gazzettina_
if you like.  I love your hard, flat body and your strange eyes that
frighten me when they become wicked.  I love your hand and all your
other wounded places.'

'I better try to tell you something pretty good,' the Colonel said.
'First I can tell you that I love you, Period.'

'Why don't you buy some good glass?' the girl asked, suddenly.  'We
could go to Murano together.'

'I don't know anything about glass.'

'I could teach you.  It would be fun.'

'We lead too nomadic a life for good glass.'

'But when you retire and live here.'

'We'll get some then.'

'I wish that that was now.'

'So do I, except that I go duck shooting to-morrow and that to-night is
to-night.'

'Can I come duck shooting?'

'Only if Alvarito asks you.'

'I can make him ask me.'

'I doubt that.'

'It isn't polite to doubt what your daughter says when she is old
enough not to lie.'

'All right, Daughter.  I withdraw the doubt.'

'Thank you.  For that I will not go and be a nuisance.  I will stay in
Venice and go to Mass with Mother and my aunt and my great-aunt and
visit my poors.  I am an only child so I have many duties.'

'I always wondered what you did.'

'That's what I do.  Also, I'll have my maid wash my head and give me a
manicure and a pedicure.'

'You can't do that because the shoot is on Sunday.'

'Then I'll do that on Monday.  On Sunday, I will read all the
illustrated papers including the outrageous ones.'

'Maybe they'll have pictures of Miss Bergman.  Do you still want to be
like her?'

'Not any more,' the girl said.  'I want to be like me only much, much
better and I want to have you love me.'

'Also,' she said suddenly and un-maskingly, 'I want to be like you.
Can I be like you a little while to-night?'

'Of course,' the Colonel said.  'In what town are we anyway?'

'Venice,' she said.  'The best town, I think.'

'I quite agree.  And thank you for not asking me for more war episodes.'

'Oh, you are going to have to tell them to me later.'

'_Have to_?' the Colonel said, and the cruelty and resolution showed in
his strange eyes as clearly as when the hooded muzzle of the gun of a
tank swings towards you.

'Did you say _have to_, Daughter?'

'I said it.  But I did not mean it in that way.  Or, if I did wrong, I
am sorry.  I meant will you please tell me more true episodes later?
And explain me the things I do not understand?'

'You can use _have to_ if you want, Daughter.  The hell with it.'

He smiled and his eyes were as kind as they ever were, which was not
too kind, as he knew.  But there was nothing now that he could do about
it except to try to be kind to his last and true and only love.

'I don't really mind, Daughter.  Please believe me.  I know about
command and, at your age, I used to take considerable pleasure in
exercising it.'

'But I don't want to command,' the girl said.  In spite of her
resolution not to cry, her eyes were wet.  'I wish to serve you.'

'I know.  But you wish to command, too.  There's nothing wrong in that.
All people such as us have it.'

'Thank you for the such as us.'

'It wasn't hard to say,' the Colonel said.  'Daughter,' he added.

Just then the concierge came to the table and said, 'Excuse me, my
Colonel.  There is a man outside, I believe he is a servant of yours,
my lady, with quite a large package which he says is for the Colonel.
Should I keep it in the storeroom or have it sent to your room?'

'To my room,' the Colonel said.

'Please,' the girl said.  'Can't we look at it here?  We don't care
about anyone here, do we?'

'Have it unwrapped and brought in here.'

'Very good.'

'Later, you may have it taken with great care to my room and have it
wrapped, solidly, for transport at noon to-morrow.'

'Very good, my Colonel.'

'Are you excited to see it?' the girl asked.

'Very,' said the Colonel.  '_Gran Maestro_, some more of that Roederer,
please, and please place a chair in such a position that we may view a
portrait.  We are devotees of the pictorial arts.'

'There's no more Roederer cold,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'But if you
would like some Perrier-Jouet----'

'Bring it,' the Colonel said and added, 'Please.'

'I don't talk like Georgie Patton,' the Colonel told her.  'I don't
have to.  And besides he's dead.'

'Poor man.'

'Yes.  Poor man all his life.  Although quite rich in money and with a
lot of armour.'

'Do you have anything against armour?'

'Yes.  Most of the people inside of it.  It makes men into bullies
which is the first step towards cowardice; true cowardice, I mean.
Perhaps it is a little complicated by claustrophobia.'

Then he looked at her and smiled and regretted taking her beyond her
depth, as you might take a new swimmer on a shallow, shelving beach,
into too deep water; and he sought to reassure her.

'You forgive me, Daughter.  Much of what I say is unjust.  But it is
truer than the things that you will read in Generals' memoirs.  After a
man gets one star, or more, the truth becomes as difficult for him to
attain as the Holy Grail was in our ancestors' time.'

'But you were a general officer.'

'Not for too damn long,' the Colonel said.  'Now captains,' the General
said, 'they know the exact truth and they can mostly tell it to you.
If they can't, you reclassify them.'

'Would you reclassify me if I lied?'

'It would depend on what you lied about.'

'I'm not going to lie about anything.  I don't want to be reclassified.
It sounds horrible.'

'It is,' the Colonel said.  'And you send them back to have it done to
them with eleven different copies of why it should be done, every one
of which you sign.'

'Did you reclassify many?'

'Plenty.'

The concierge came into the room with the portrait, carrying it in its
big frame, much as a ship moves when she is carrying too much sail.

'Get two chairs,' the Colonel said to the second waiter, 'and put them
there.  See that the canvas does not touch the chairs.  And hold it so
it does not slip.'

Then to the girl he said, 'We'll have to change that frame.'

'I know,' she said.  'It was not my choice.  Take it unframed with you
and we'll choose a good frame next week.  Now look at it.  Not at the
frame.  At what it says, or does not say, of me.'

It was a beautiful portrait; neither cold, nor snobbish, nor stylized,
nor modern.  It was the way you would want your girl painted if
Tintoretto were still around and, if he were not around, you settled
for Velasquez.  It was not the way either of them painted.  It was
simply a splendid portrait painted, as they sometimes are, in our time.

'It's wonderful,' the Colonel said.  'It is truly lovely.'

The concierge and the second waiter were holding it and looking at it
around the edges.  The _Gran Maestro_ was admiring fully.  The
American, two tables down, was looking at it with his journalistic
eyes, wondering who painted it.  The back of the canvas was to the
other diners.

'It is wonderful,' the Colonel said.  'But you can't give me that.'

'I already have,' the girl said.  'I'm sure my hair was never that long
over my shoulders.'

'I think it probably was.'

'I could try to let it get that long if you want.'

'Try,' the Colonel said.  'You great beauty you.  I love you very much.
You and you portrayed on canvas.'

'Tell the waiters if you like.  I'm sure it won't come as a great shock
to them.'

'Take the canvas upstairs to my room,' the Colonel said to the
concierge.  'Thank you very much for bringing it in.  If the price is
right, I am going to buy it.'

'The price is right,' the girl said to him.  'Should we have them take
it and the chairs down and make a special showing of it for your
compatriot?  The _Gran Maestro_ could tell him the address of the
painter and he could visit the picturesque studio.'

'It is a very lovely portrait,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'But it
should be taken to the room.  One should never let Roederer or
Perrier-Jouet do the talking.'

'Take it to the room, please.'

'You said please without a pause before it.'

'Thank you,' the Colonel said.  'I am very deeply moved by the portrait
and I am not entirely responsible for what I say.'

'Let's neither of us be responsible.'

'Agreed,' the Colonel said.  'The _Gran Maestro_ is really very
responsible.  He always was.'

'No,' the girl said.  'I think he did not only from responsibility but
from malice.  We all have malice, you know, of some kind or another in
this town.  I think perhaps he did not want the man to have even a
journalist's look into happiness.'

'Whatever that is.'

'I learned that phrase from you and now you have re-learned it back
from me.'

'That's the way it goes,' the Colonel said.  'What you win in Boston
you lose in Chicago.'

'I don't understand that at all.'

'Too hard to explain,' the Colonel said.  Then, 'No.  Of course it
isn't.  Making things clear is my main trade.  The hell with being too
hard to explain.  It is like professional football, _calcio_.  What you
win in Milano you lose in Torino.'

'I don't care about football.'

'Neither do I,' the Colonel said.  'Especially not about the Army and
Navy game and when the very high brass speaks in terms of American
football so they can understand, themselves, what they are talking of.'

'I think we will have a good time to-night.  Even under the
circumstances, whatever they are.'

'Should we take this new bottle in the gondola?'

'Yes,' the girl said.  'But with deep glasses.  I'll tell the _Gran
Maestro_.  Let's get our coats and go.'

'Good.  I'll take some of this medicine and sign for the G.M. and we'll
go.'

'I wish it was me taking the medicine instead of you.'

'I'm glad as hell it isn't,' the Colonel said.  'Should we pick our
gondola or have them bring one to the landing?'

'Let's gamble and have them bring one to the landing.  What do we have
to lose?'

'Nothing, I guess.  Probably nothing.'




Chapter XIII

They went out the side door of the hotel to the _imbarcadero_ and the
wind hit them.  The light from the hotel shone on the blackness of the
gondola and made the water green.  She looks as lovely as a good horse
or as a racing shell, the Colonel thought.  Why have I never seen a
gondola before?  What hand or eye framed that darked symmetry?

'Where should we go?' the girl asked.

Her hair, in the light from the hotel door and window, as she stood on
the dock by the black gondola, was blowing back in the wind, so she
looked like the figure-head on a ship.  The rest of it, too, the
Colonel thought.

'Let's just ride through the park,' the Colonel said.  'Or through the
Bois with the top down.  Let him take us out to Armenonville.'

'Will we go to Paris?'

'Sure,' the Colonel said.  'Tell him to take us for an hour where the
going is easiest.  I don't want to drive him into that wind.'

'The tide is quite high with this wind,' the girl said.  'Some of our
places he couldn't get under the bridges.  May I tell him where to go?'

'Of course, Daughter.'

'Stow that ice bucket aboard,' the Colonel said to the second waiter,
who had come out with them.

'The _Gran Maestro_ said to tell you, as you embarked, that this bottle
of wine was his present.'

'Thank him properly and tell him he can't do that.'

'He had better go into the wind a little first,' the girl said.  'Then
I know how he should go.'

'The _Gran Maestro_ sent this,' the second waiter said.

It was a folded, old U.S.O.D. blanket.  Renata was talking to the
gondoliere, her hair blowing.  The gondoliere wore a heavy blue navy
sweater and he was bare-headed too.

'Thank him,' the Colonel said.

He slipped a bill into the second waiter's hand.  The second waiter
returned it.  'You already made the notation on the check.  Neither you
nor I nor the _Gran Maestro_ are starving.'

'What about the moglie and the bambini?'

'I don't have that.  Your mediums smacked our house in Treviso.'

'I'm sorry.'

'You needn't be,' the second waiter said.  'You were a foot soldier as
I was.'

'Permit me to be sorry.'

'Sure,' the second waiter said.  'And what the hell difference does it
make?  Be happy, my Colonel and be happy, my Lady.'

They got down into the gondola and there was the same magic, as always,
of the light hull and the sudden displacement that you made and then
the trimming in the dark privacy and then the second trimming, as the
gondoliere started to scull, laying her partly on her side so that he
would have more control.

'Now,' the girl said.  'We are in our home and I love you.  Please kiss
me and put all love into it.'

The Colonel held her close, with her head thrown back and kissed her
until there was nothing left of the kiss but desperation.

'I love you.'

'Whatever that means,' she interrupted.

'I love you and I know whatever that means.  The picture is lovely.
But there is no word for what you are.'

'Wild,' she said.  'Or careless or unkempt?'

'No.'

'The last was one of the first words I learned from my governess.  It
means you do not comb your hair enough.  Neglectful is when you do not
brush one hundred strokes at night.'

'I'm going to run my hand through it and make it unkempter still.'

'Your hurt hand?'

'Yes.'

'We're sitting on the wrong sides for that.  Change over.'

'Good.  That is a sensible order couched in simple language and easily
understood.'

It was fun moving over, trying not to disturb the balance of the
gondola, but having to trim again carefully.

'Now,' she said.  'But hold me tightly with the other arm.'

'You know just what you want?'

'I do indeed.  Is it un-maidenly?  I learned that word, too, from my
governess.'

'No,' he said.  'It's lovely.  Pull up the blanket good and feel that
wind.'

'It's from the high mountains.'

'Yes.  And beyond there it's from somewhere else.'

The Colonel heard the slap of the waves and he felt the wind come
sharply and the rough familiarity of the blanket and then he felt the
girl cold-warm and lovely and with upraised breasts that his left hand
coasted lightly over.  Then he ran his bad hand through her hair once,
twice and three times and then he kissed her and it was worse than
desperation.

'Please,' she said, from almost underneath the blanket.  'Let me kiss
now.'

'No,' he said.  'Me again.'

The wind was very cold and lashed their faces but under the blanket
there was no wind nor nothing; only his ruined hand that searched for
the island in the great river with the high steep banks.

'That's it,' she said.

He kissed her then and he searched for the island, finding it and
losing it and then finding it for good.  For good and for bad, he
thought and for good and for all.

'My darling,' he said.  'My well beloved.  Please.'

'No.  Just hold me very tight and hold the high ground, too.'

The Colonel said nothing, because he was assisting, or had made an act
of presence, at the only mystery that he believed in except the
occasional bravery of man.

'Please don't move,' the girl said.  'Then move a great amount.'

The Colonel, lying under the blanket in the wind, knowing it is only
what man does for woman that he retains; except what he does for his
fatherland or his motherland, however you get the reading, proceeded.

'Please, darling,' the girl said.  'I don't think I can stand it.'

'Don't think of anything.  Don't think of anything at all.'

'I'm not.'

'Don't think.'

'Oh please let's not talk.'

'Is it right?'

'You know.'

'You're sure.'

'Oh please not talk.  Please.'

Yes, he thought.  Please and please again.

She said nothing and neither did he, and when the great bird had flown
far out of the closed window of the gondola and was lost and gone,
neither of them said anything.  He held her head lightly with his good
arm and the other arm held the high ground now.

'Please put it where it should be,' she said.  'Your hand.'

'Should we?'

'No.  Just hold me tight and try to love me true.'

'I love you true,' he said and just then the gondola turned to the
left, quite sharply and the wind was on his right cheek and he said,
with his old eyes catching the outline of the Palace where they turned
and noting it, 'You're in the lee now, Daughter.'

'But it is too soon now.  Don't you know how a woman feels?'

'No.  Only what you tell me.'

'Thank you for the you.  But don't you really know?'

'No.  I never asked, I guess.'

'Guess now,' she said.  'And please wait until after we have gone under
the second bridge.'

'Take a glass of this,' the Colonel said, reaching accurately and well
for the champagne bucket with the ice and uncorking the bottle the Gran
Maestro had uncorked and then placed a common wine cork in.

'This is good for you, Daughter.  It is good for all the ills that all
of us have and for all sadness and indecision.'

'I have none of those,' she said, speaking grammatically as her
governess had taught her.  'I am just a woman, or a girl, or whatever
that is, doing whatever it is she should not do.  Let's do it again,
please, now I am in the lee.'

'Where is the island now and in what river?'

'You are making the discovery.  I am only the unknown country.'

'Not too unknown,' the Colonel said.

'Please don't be rude,' the girl said.  'And please attack gently and
with the same attack as before.'

'It's no attack,' the Colonel said.  'It is something else.'

'Whatever it is, whatever it is, while I'm still in the lee.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'Yes, now if you want, or will accept from
kindness.'

'Please, yes.'

She talks like a gentle cat, though the poor cats cannot speak, the
Colonel thought.  But then he stopped thinking and he did not think for
a long time.

The gondola now was in one of the secondary canals.  When it had turned
from the Grand Canal, the wind had swung it so the gondoliere had to
shift all his weight as ballast and the Colonel and the girl had
shifted too, under the blanket, with the wind getting under the edge of
the blanket; wildly.

They had not spoken for a long time and the Colonel had noted that the
gondola had only inches free in passing under the last bridge.

'How are you, Daughter?'

'I'm quite lovely.'

'Do you love me?'

'Please don't ask such silly things.'

'The tide is very high and we only just made that last bridge.'

'I think I know where we are going.  I was born here.'

'I've made mistakes in my home town,' the Colonel said.  'Being born
there isn't everything.'

'It is very much,' the girl said.  'You know that.  Please hold me very
tightly so we can be a part of each other for a little while.'

'We can try,' the Colonel said.

'Couldn't I be you?'

'That's awfully complicated.  We could try of course.'

'I'm you now,' she said.  'And I just took the city of Paris.'

'Jesus, Daughter,' he said.  'You've got an awful lot of problems on
your hands.  The next thing, they will parade the twenty-eighth
division through.'

'I don't care.'

'I do.'

'Were they not good?'

'Sure.  They had fine commanders, too.  But they were National Guard
and hard luck.  What you call a T.S. division.  Get your T.S. slip from
the chaplain.'

'I understand none of those things.'

'They aren't worth explaining,' the Colonel said.

'Will you tell me some true things about Paris?  I love it so much and
when I think of you taking it, then, it is as though I were riding in
this gondola with Marechal Ney.'

'A no good job,' the Colonel said.  'Anyway, not after he fought all
those rear-guard actions coming back from that big Russian town.  He
used to fight ten, twelve, fifteen times a day.  Maybe more.
Afterwards, he couldn't recognize people.  Please don't get in any
gondolas with him.'

'He was always one of my great heroes.'

'Yeah.  Mine too.  Until Quatre Bras.  Maybe it wasn't Quatre Bras.
I'm getting rusty.  Give it the generic title of Waterloo.'

'Was he bad there?'

'Awful,' the Colonel told her.  'Forget it.  Too many rear-guard
actions coming back from Moskova.'

'But they called him the bravest of the brave.'

'You can't eat on that.  You have to be that, always, and then be the
smartest of the smart.  Then you need a lot of stuff coming up.'

'Tell me about Paris, please.  We should not make more love, I know.'

'I don't know it.  Who says it?'

'I say it because I love you.'

'All right.  You said it and you love me.  So we act on that.  The hell
with it.'

'Do you think we could once more if it would not hurt you?'

'Hurt me?' the Colonel said.  'When the hell was I ever hurt?'




Chapter XIV

'Please don't be bad,' she said, pulling the blanket over them both.
'Please drink a glass of this with me.  You know you've been hurt.'

'Exactly,' the Colonel said.  'Let's forget it.'

'All right,' she said.  'I learned that word, or those two words from
you.  We have forgotten it.'

'Why do you like the hand?' the Colonel asked, placing it where he
should.

'Please don't pretend to be stupid and please let's not think of
anything, or anything, or anything.'

'I am stupid,' the Colonel said.  'But I won't think of anything or
anything nor of nothing nor of his brother, to-morrow.'

'Please be good and kind.'

'I will be.  And I will tell you, now, a military secret.  Top Secret
equals British Most Secret.  I love you.'

'That's nice,' she said.  'And you put it nicely.'

'I'm nice,' the Colonel said and checked on the bridge that was coming
up and saw there was clearance.  'That's the first thing people notice
about me.'

'I always use the wrong words,' the girl said.  'Please just love me.
I wish it was me who could love you.'

'You do.'

'Yes, I do,' she said.  'With all my heart.'

They were going with the wind now and they were both tired.

'Do you think----'

'I don't think,' the girl said.

'Well try and think.'

'I will.'

'Drink a glass of this.'

'Why not?  It's very good.'

It was.  There was still ice in the bucket and the wine was cold and
clear.

'Can I stay at the Gritti?'

'No.'

'Why not?'

'It wouldn't be right.  For them.  Nor you.  The hell with me.'

'Then I suppose I should go home.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'That is the logical supposition.'

'That is an awful way to say a sad thing.  Can't we even pretend some
things?'

'No.  I'll take you home and you sleep good and well and to-morrow we
will meet where and when you say.'

'May I call the Gritti?'

'Of course.  I'll always be awake.  Will you call when you are awake?'

'Yes.  But why do you always wake so early?'

'It is a business habit.'

'Oh, I wish you were not in that business and that you were not going
to die.'

'So do I,' said the Colonel.  'But I'm getting out of the business.'

'Yes,' she said, sleepily and comfortably.  'Then we go to Rome and get
the clothes.'

'And live happily ever after.'

'Please don't,' she said.  'Please, please, don't.  You know I made the
resolution not to cry.'

'You're crying now,' the Colonel said.  'What the hell have you got to
lose on that resolution?'

'Take me home, please.'

'That's what I was doing in the first place,' the Colonel told her.

'Be kind once first.'

'I will,' the Colonel said.

After they, or the Colonel, rather, had paid the gondoliere who was
unknowing, yet knowing all; solid, sound, respectful and trustworthy;
they walked into the Piazzetta and then across the great, cold,
wind-swept square that was hard and old under their feet.  They walked
holding close and hard in their sorrow and their happiness.

'This is the place where the German shot the pigeons,' the girl said.

'We probably killed him,' the Colonel said.  'Or his brother.  Maybe we
hanged him.  I wouldn't know.  I'm not in C.I.D.'

'Do you love me still on these water-worn, cold and old stones?'

'Yes.  I'd like to spread a bed roll here and prove it.'

'That would be more barbarous than the pigeon shooter.'

'I'm barbarous,' the Colonel said.

'Not always.'

'Thank you for the not always.'

'We turn here.'

'I think I know that.  When are they going to tear that damned Cinema
Palace down and put up a real cathedral?  That's what T5 Jackson wants.'

'When someone brings Saint Mark back another time under a load of pork
from Alexandria.'

'That was a Torcello boy.'

'You're a Torcello boy.'

'Yes.  I'm a Basso Piave boy and a Grappa boy straight here from
Pertica.  I'm a Pasubio boy, too, if you know what that means.  It was
worse just to live there than to fight anywhere else.  In the platoon
they used to share anyone's gonococci brought from Schio and carried in
a match-box.  They used to share this just so they could leave because
it was intolerable.'

'But you stayed.'

'Sure,' the Colonel said.  'I'm always the last man to leave the party,
fiesta I mean, not as in political party.  The truly unpopular guest.'

'Should we go?'

'I thought you had made up your mind.'

'I had.  But when you said it about unpopular guest it was unmade.'

'Keep it made up.'

'I can hold a decision.'

'I know.  You can hold any damn thing.  But, Daughter, sometimes you
don't just hold.  That is for stupids.  Sometimes you have to switch
fast.'

'I'll switch if you like.'

'No.  I think the decision was sound.'

'But won't it be an awfully long time until morning?'

'That all depends on whether one has luck or not.'

'I should sleep well.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'At your age if you can't sleep they ought to
take you out and hang you.'

'Oh please.'

'Sorry,' he said.  'I meant shoot you.'

'We are nearly home and you could be kind now if you wanted.'

'I'm so kind I stink.  Let somebody else be kind.'

They were in front of the palace now and there it was; the palace.
There was nothing to do now but pull the bell cord, or enter with the
key.  I've been lost in this place, the Colonel thought, and I was
never lost in my life.

'Please kiss me good night, kindly.'

The Colonel did and loved her so he could not bear it.

She opened the door with the key, which was in her bag.  Then she was
gone and the Colonel was alone, with the worn pavement, the wind, which
still held in the north and the shadows from where a light went on.  He
walked home.

Only tourists and lovers take gondolas, he thought.  Except to cross
the canal in the places where there are no bridges.  I ought to go to
Harry's, probably, or some damn place.  But I think I'll go home.




Chapter XV

It was really home, if a hotel room can be so described.  His pyjamas
were laid on the bed.  There was a bottle of Valpolicella by the
reading light and by the bed a bottle of mineral water, in an ice
bucket with a glass beside it on the silver tray.  The portrait had
been deframed and was placed on two chairs where he could see it from
the bed.

The Paris edition of the _New York Herald Tribune_ lay on the bed
beside his three pillows.  He used three pillows, as Amaldo knew, and
his extra bottle of medicine, not the one that he carried in his
pocket, was beside the reading light.  The inner doors of the armoire,
the mirrored ones, were opened in such a way that he could see the
portrait from the side.  His scuffed slippers were by the bed.

I'll buy it, the Colonel said, to himself, since there was no one else
there except the portrait.

He opened the Valpolicella which had been uncorked, and then re-corked,
carefully, precisely and lovingly and poured himself a glass into the
glass which was much better than any hotel should use which was faced
with breakage.

'Here's to you, Daughter,' he said.  'You beauty and lovely.  Do you
know, that, among other things, you smell good always?  You smell
wonderfully even in a high wind or under a blanket or kissing good
night.  You know almost no one does and you don't use scent.'

She looked at him from the portrait and said nothing.

'The hell with it,' he said.  'I'm not going to talk to a picture.'

What do you think went wrong to-night? he thought.

Me, I guess.  Well I will try to be a good boy to-morrow all day;
starting at first light.

'Daughter,' he said, and he was talking to her and not to a picture
now.  'Please know I love you and that I wish to be delicate and good.
And please stay with me always now.'

The picture was the same.

The Colonel took out the emeralds from his pocket and looked at them,
feeling them slide, cold and yet warm, as they take warmth and as all
good stones have warmth, from his bad hand into his good hand.

I should have put these in an envelope and locked them up, he thought.
But what the ---- security is there better than I can give them?  I
have to get these back to you fast, Daughter.

It was fun, though.  And they're not worth more than a quarter of a
million.  What I would make in four hundred years.  Have to check that
figure.

He put the stones in the pocket of his pyjamas and put a handkerchief
over them.  Then he buttoned the pocket.  The first sound thing you
learn, he thought, is to have flaps and buttons on all your pockets.  I
imagine that I learned it too early.

The stones felt good.  They were hard and warm against his flat, hard,
old and warm chest, and he noted how the wind was blowing, looked at
the portrait, poured another glass of Valpolicella and then started to
read the Paris edition of the _New York Herald Tribune_.

I ought to take the pills, he thought.  But the hell with the pills.

Then he took them just the same and went on reading the _New York
Herald_.  He was reading Red Smith and he liked him very much.




Chapter XVI

The colonel woke before daylight and checked that there was no one
sleeping with him.

The wind was still blowing hard and he went to the open windows to
check the weather.  There was no light as yet in the east across the
Grand Canal, but his eyes could see how rough the water was.  Be a hell
of a tide to-day, he thought.  Probably flood the square.  That's
always fun.  Except for the pigeons.

He went to the bathroom, taking the _Herald Tribune_ and Red Smith with
him, as well as a glass of Valpolicella.  Damn I'll be glad when the
_Gran Maestro_ gets those big fiascos, he thought.  This wine gets
awfully dreggy at the end.

He sat there, with his newspaper, thinking of the things of that day.

There would be the telephone call.  But it might be very late because
she would be sleeping late.  The young sleep late, he thought, and the
beautiful sleep half again as late.  She certainly would not call early
and the shops did not open until nine or a little later.

Hell, he thought, I have these damned stones.  How could anyone do a
thing like that?

You know how, he said to himself, reading the ads. in the back of the
paper.  You've put it on the line enough times.  It isn't crazy or
morbid.  She just wanted to put it on the line.  It was a good thing it
was me, he thought.

That is the only good thing about being me, he considered.  Well I'm
me, God-damn it.  For better or for much worse.  How would you like to
sit on the can as you have sat almost every morning of your damned life
with this in your pocket?

He was addressing no one, except, perhaps, posterity.

How many mornings have you sat in the row with all the others?  That's
the worst of it.  That and shaving.  Or you go off to be alone and
think or not think and pick a good piece of cover and there are two
riflemen there already, or some boy asleep.

There's no more privacy in the army than in a professional ----.  I've
never been in a professional ---- but I imagine they run it much the
same.  I could learn to run one, he thought.

Then I'd make all my leading ---- characters Ambassadors and the
unsuccessful ones could be Corps commanders or command military
districts in peace time.  Don't be bitter, boy, he said to himself.
It's too early in the morning and your duty's not completed yet.

What would you do with their wives, he asked himself?  Buy them new
hats or shoot them, he said.  It's all part of the same process.

He looked at himself in the mirror, set in the half-closed door.  It
showed him at a slight angle.  It's a deflexion shot, he said to
himself and they didn't lead me enough.  Boy, he said, you certainly
are a beat-up, old looking bastard.

Now you have to shave and look at that face while you do it.  Then you
must get a hair-cut.  That's easy in this town.  You're a Colonel of
Infantry, boy.  You can't go around looking like Joan of Arc or General
(Breveted) George Armstrong Custer.  That beautiful horse-cavalryman.
I guess it is fun to be that way and have a loving wife and use sawdust
for brains.  But it must have seemed like the wrong career to him when
they finished up on that hill above the Little Big Horn, with the
ponies making the circle around them in all the dust and the sage brush
crushed by the hooves of the horses of the other people and nothing
left to him for the rest of his life but that old lovely black powder
smell and his own people shooting each other and themselves, because
they were afraid of what the squaws would do to them.

The body was unspeakably mutilated, they used to put in this same
paper.  And on that hill to know you'd made one real mistake, finally
and for good and complete with true handles.  Poor horse-cavalryman, he
thought.  The end of all his dreams.  That's one good thing about being
an Infantryman.  You never have any dreams except bad dreams.

Well, he said to himself, we're finished here and pretty soon there
will be good light and I can see the portrait.  I'll be damned if I'll
turn that in.  I keep that.

Oh Christ, he said, I wonder what she looks like now sleeping.  I know
how she looks, he said to himself.  Wonderful.  She sleeps as though
she had not gone to sleep.  As though she were just resting.  I hope
she is, he thought.  I hope she's resting well.  Christ Jesus how I
love her and I hope I never do her harm.




Chapter XVII

When it started to be light, the Colonel saw the portrait.  He, very
probably, saw it as quickly as any man who was civilized and had to
read and sign the forms he did not believe in, could see an object, as
soon as it was visible.  Yes, he said to himself, I have eyes and they
have fairly fast perception still and once they had ambition.  I have
led my Ruffians where they were well peppered.  There are but three of
the two hundred and fifty of them left alive and they are for the
town's end to beg during life.

That's from Shakespeare, he told the portrait.  The winner and still
the undisputed champion.

Someone might take him, in a short bout.  But I would rather revere
him.  Did you ever read _King Lear_, Daughter?  Mr. Gene Tunney did and
he was the champion of the world.  But I read it too.  Soldiers care
for Mr. Shakespeare too, though it may seem impossible.

You have anything to say in your defence except to put your head back?
he asked the portrait.  You want some more, Shakespeare?

You don't have to defend.  You just rest and leave it as it is.  It's
no good.  Your defence and my defence is no damn good.  But who could
tell you to go out and hang yourself the way we do?

Nobody, he said to himself and to the portrait.  And certainly not me.

He put his good hand down and found that the room waiter had left a
second bottle of Valpolicella alongside of where the first had been.

If you love a country, the Colonel thought, you might as well admit it.
Sure, admit it, boy.

I have loved three and lost them thrice.  Give a credit.  We've re-took
two.  Retaken, he corrected.

And we will retake the other one, General Fat Ass Franco on his
shooting stick with the advice of his doctor and tame ducks and a
screen of Moorish cavalry when he shoots.

Yes, he said softly to the girl who looked at him clearly now in the
first and best light.

We will retake and they will all be hung upside down outside of filling
stations.  You have been warned, he added.

'Portrait,' he said, 'why the hell can't you just get into bed with me
instead of being eighteen solid stone blocks away.  Maybe more.  I'm
not as sharp now as I was; whenever.'

'Portrait,' he said to the girl and to the portrait and to the girl
both; but there wasn't any girl and the portrait was as it was painted.

'Portrait, keep your God-damn chin up so you can break my heart easier.'

It certainly was a lovely present, the Colonel thought.

'Can you manoeuvre?' he asked the portrait.  'Good and fast?'

Portrait said nothing and the Colonel answered.  You know damn well she
can.  She'd out-manoeuvre you the best day you were ever born and she
would stay and fight where you would ----, discreetly.

'Portrait,' he said.  'Boy or daughter or my one true love or whatever
it is; you know what it is, portrait.'

The Portrait, as before, did not answer.  But the Colonel, who was a
General now again, early in the morning at the only time he really
knew, and with Valpolicella, knew as absolutely as though he had just
read his third Wassermann that there was no ---- in Portrait and he
felt shame for having talked to Portrait roughly.

'I'll be the best God-damned boy you ever witnessed to-day.  And you
can tell your principal that.'

Portrait, as was her fashion, was silent.

She probably would speak to a horse-cavalryman, the General, for now he
had two stars and they grated on his shoulders and showed white in the
vague, scuffed red on the plaque in front of his jeep.  He never used
command cars, nor semi-armoured vehicles complete with sand-bags.

'The hell with you, Portrait,' he said.  'Or get your T.S. slip from
the universal chaplain of us all, with combined religions.  You ought
to be able to eat on that.'

'The hell with you,' the Portrait said, without speaking.  'You low
class soldier.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said, for now he was a Colonel again and had
relinquished all his former rank.

'I love you, Portrait, very much.  But don't get rough with me.  I love
you very much because you are beautiful.  But I love the girl better, a
million times better, hear it?'

There was no sign that she heard it, so he tired of it.

'You are in a fixed position, Portrait,' he said.  'Without or with any
frame.  And I am going to manoeuvre.'

The portrait was as silent as she had been since the concierge had
brought her into the room, and aided and abetted by the second waiter,
had shown her to the Colonel and to the girl.

The Colonel looked at her and saw she was indefensible, now that the
light was good, or almost good.

He saw, too, that she was the portrait of his own true love and so he
said, 'I am sorry for all the stupidnesses I say.  I do not wish ever
to be brutal.  Maybe we could both sleep a little while, with luck, and
then, perhaps, your Mistress would call on the telephone?'

Maybe she will even call, he thought.




Chapter XVIII

The hall porter pushed the _Gazzettina_ under the door and the Colonel
had it, noiselessly, almost as soon as it had passed through the slit.

He very nearly took it from the hall porter's hand.  He did not like
the hall porter since he had found him, one day, going through his bag,
when he, the Colonel, had re-entered the room after having left it,
presumably for some time.  He had to come back to the room to get his
bottle of medicine, which he had forgotten, and the hall porter was
well through his bag.

'I guess you don't say stick them up in this hotel,' the Colonel had
said.  'But you're no credit to your town.'

There was silence produced and re-produced, by the striped waistcoated
man with the Fascist face and the Colonel said, 'Go on, boy, look
through the rest of it.  I don't carry any military secrets with my
toilet articles.'

Since then, there was scant friendship between them and the Colonel
enjoyed trying to take the morning paper from the striped waistcoated
man's hand; noiselessly, and when he heard, or saw it first make a move
under the door.

'O.K., you won to-day, jerk,' he said in the best Venetian dialect he
could summon at that hour.  'Go hang yourself.'

But they don't hang themselves, he thought.  They just have to go on
putting papers under other people's doors that do not even hate them.
It must be quite a difficult trade being an ex-Fascist.  Maybe he is
not an ex-Fascist, too.  How do you know.

I can't hate Fascists, he thought.  Nor Krauts, either, since
unfortunately, I am a soldier.

'Listen, Portrait,' he said.  'Do I have to hate the Krauts because we
kill them?  Do I have to hate them as soldiers and as human beings?  It
seems too easy a solution to me.'

Well, Portrait.  Forget it.  Forget it.  You're not old enough to know
about it.  You are two years younger than the girl that you portray and
she is younger and older than hell; which is quite an old place.

'Listen, Portrait,' he said and, saying it, knew that now, as long as
he lived, he would have someone to talk to at the early hours that he
woke.

'As I was saying, Portrait.  The hell with that too.  That's too old
for you too.  That is one of the things you can't say no matter how
true it is.  There are lots of things I can never say to you and maybe
that will be good for me.  It is about time something was.  What do you
think would be good for me, Portrait?'

'What's the matter, Portrait?' he asked her.  'You getting hungry?  I
am.'

So he rang the bell for the waiter who would bring breakfast.

He knew that now, even though the light was so good that every wave
showed on the Grand Canal, lead-coloured and solid heavy with the wind
and the tide now high over the landing steps of the Palace directly
opposite his room, that there would be no telephone call for several
hours.

The young sleep good, he thought.  They deserve it.

'Why do we have to get old?' he asked the waiter who had come in with
his glass-eye and the menu.

'I don't know, my Colonel.  I suppose it is a natural process.'

'Yes.  I guess I imagine that too.  The eggs fried with their faces up.
Tea and toast.'

'You don't want anything American?'

'The hell with anything American except me.  Is the _Gran Maestro_
astir yet?'

'He has your Valpolicella in the big wicker fiascos of two litres and I
have brought this decanter with it.'

'That one,' the Colonel said.  'I wish to Christ I could give him a
regiment.'

'I don't think he would want one, really.'

'No,' the Colonel said.  'I don't want one, really, myself.'




Chapter XIX

The colonel breakfasted with the leisure of a fighter who has been
clipped badly, hears four and knows how to relax truly for five seconds
more.

'Portrait,' he said.  'You ought to relax too.  That's the only thing
that is going to be difficult about you.  That's what they call the
static element in painting.  You know, Portrait that almost no
pictures, paintings rather, move at all.  A few do, but not many.

'I wish that your mistress was here and we could have movement.  How do
girls like you and she know so much so damn young and be so beautiful?

'With us, if a girl is really beautiful, she comes from Texas and
maybe, with luck, she can tell you what month it is.  They can all
count good though.

'They teach them how to count and keep their legs together and how to
put their hair up in pin curls.  Sometime, Portrait, for your sins, if
you have any, you ought to have to sleep in a bed with a girl who has
put her hair up in pin curls to be beautiful to-morrow.  Not to-night.
They'd never be beautiful to-night.  For to-morrow, when we make the
competition.

'The girl, Renata, that you are, is sleeping now without ever having
done anything to her hair.  She is sleeping with it spread out on the
pillow and all it is to her is a glorious, dark, silky annoyance, that
she can hardly remember to comb, except that her governess taught her.

'I see her in the street with the lovely long-legged stride and the
wind doing anything it wants to her hair and her true breasts under the
sweater and then I see the nights in Texas with the pin curls; tight
and subjected by metallic instruments.

'Pin me no pin curls, my beloved,' he said to the portrait, 'and I will
try to lay it on the line in round, heavy, hard silver dollars or with
the other.'

I mustn't get rough, he thought.

Then he said to the portrait, for he did not capitalize her now in his
mind, 'You are so God-damned beautiful you stink.  Also you are
jail-bait.  Renata's two years older now.  You are under seventeen.'

And why can't I have her and love her and cherish her and never be
rude, nor bad and have the five sons that go to the five corners of the
world; wherever that is!  I don't know.  I guess the cards we draw are
those we get.  You wouldn't like to re-deal would you, dealer?

No.  They only deal to you once and then you pick them up and play
them.  I can play them, if I draw any damn thing at all, he told
portrait; who was also unimpressed.

'Portrait,' he said.  'You better look the other way so that you will
not be un-maidenly.  I am going to take a shower now and shave,
something you will never have to do, and put on my soldier-suit and go
and walk around this town even though it is too early.'

So, he got out of bed, favouring his bad leg, which hurt him always.
He pulled the reading light with his bad hand.  There was sufficient
light and he had been wasting electricity for nearly an hour.

He regretted this as he regretted all his errors.  He walked past
portrait, only looking casually and looked at himself in the mirror.
He had dropped both parts of his pyjamas and he looked at himself
critically and truly.

'You beat-up old bastard,' he said to the mirror.  Portrait was a thing
of the past.  Mirror was actuality and of this day.

The gut is flat, he said without uttering it.  The chest is all right
except where it contains the defective muscle.  We are hung as we are
hung, for better or worse, or something, or something awful.

You are one half a hundred years old, you bastard you.  Now go in and
take a shower and scrub good and afterwards put on your soldier-suit.
To-day is another day.




Chapter XX

The colonel stopped at the reception desk in the lobby, but the
concierge was not there yet.  There was only the night porter.

'Can you put something in the safe for me?'

'No, my Colonel.  No one may open the safe until the assistant manager,
or the concierge, arrives.  But I will guard anything for you that you
wish.'

'Thank you.  It's not worth the trouble,' and he buttoned the Gritti
envelope, with the stones inside, the envelope addressed to himself,
into the inside left pocket of his tunic.

'There's no real crime here now,' the night porter said.

It had been a long night and he was happy to speak to someone.  'There
never really was, my Colonel.  There are only differences of opinion
and politics.'

'What do you have for politics?' the Colonel asked; for he was lonely,
too.

'About what you would expect.'

'I see.  And how is your thing going?'

'I think it goes quite well.  Maybe not as well as last year.  But
still quite well.  We were beaten and we have to wait a while now.'

'Do you work at it?'

'Not much.  It is more the politics of my heart than of my head.  I
believe in it with my head too, but I have very little political
development.'

'When you get it you won't have any heart.'

'Maybe not.  Do you have politics in the army?'

'Plenty,' the Colonel said.  'But not what you mean.'

'Well, we better not discuss it then.  I have not meant to be
intrusive.'

'I asked the question; the original question rather.  It was only to
talk.  It was not an interrogation.'

'I don't think it was.  You do not have the face of an inquisitor, my
Colonel, and I know about the Order, although I am not a member.'

'You may be member material.  I'll take it up with the _Gran Maestro_.'

'We come from the same town; but from distinct quarters.'

'It's a good town.'

'My Colonel, I have so little political development that I believe all
honourable men are honourable.'

'Oh you'll get over that,' the Colonel assured him.  'Don't worry, boy.
You've got a young party.  Naturally you make errors.'

'Please don't talk like that.'

'It was just rough early morning joking.'

'Tell me, my Colonel, what do you really think about Tito?'

'I think several things.  But he's my next-door neighbour.  I've found
it better not to talk about my neighbour.'

'I'd like to learn.'

'Then learn it the hard way.  Don't you know people don't give answers
to such questions?'

'I had hoped they did.'

'They don't,' the Colonel said.  'Not in my position.  All I can tell
you is that Mr. Tito has plenty problems.'

'Well, I know that now truly,' the night porter who was really only a
boy said.

'I hope you do,' the Colonel said.  'I wouldn't call it, as knowledge,
any pearl of great price.  Now, good day, for I must take a walk for
the good of my liver, or something.'

'Good day, my Colonel.  _Fa brutto tempo_.'

'_Bruttissimo_,' the Colonel said and, pulling the belt of his raincoat
tight and settling his shoulders into it and the skirts well down, he
stepped out into the wind.

Chapter XXI

The colonel took the ten _centesimi_ gondola across the Canal, paying
the usual dirty note and standing with the crowd of those condemned to
early rising.

He looked back at the Gritti and saw the windows of his room; still
open.  There was no promise, nor threat of rain; only the same strong,
wild, cold wind from the mountains.  Everyone in the gondola looked
cold and the Colonel thought, I wish I could issue these wind-proof
coats to everyone on board.  God, and every officer that ever wore one,
knows they are not water-proof and who made the money out of that one?

You can't get water through a Burberry.  But I suppose some able jerk
has his boy in Groton now, or maybe Canterbury, where the big
contractors' boys go, because our coats leaked.

And what about some brother officer of mine who split with him?  I
wonder who the Benny Meyers of the ground forces were?  There probably
wasn't only one.  Probably, he thought, there must be very many.  You
must not be awake yet, to talk that simply.  They do keep the wind out
though.  The raincoats.  Raincoats my ass.

The gondola pulled up between the stakes on the far bank of the canal
and the Colonel watched the black-clad people climb up out of the
black-painted vehicle.  Is she a vehicle?  he thought.  Or must a
vehicle have wheels or be tracked?

Nobody would give you a penny for your thoughts, he thought.  Not this
morning.  But I've seen them worth a certain amount of money when the
chips were down.

He penetrated into the far side of the city, the side that finally
fronted on the Adriatic and that he liked the best.  He was going in by
a very narrow street and he was going to not keep track of the number
of more or less north and south streets that he crossed, nor count the
bridges and then try and orient himself so he would come out at the
market without getting up any dead ends.

It was a game you play, as some people used to play double Canfield or
any solitary card games.  But it had the advantage of you moving while
you do it and that you look at the houses, the minor vistas, the shops
and the _trattorias_ and at old palaces of the city of Venice while you
are walking.  If you loved the city of Venice it was an excellent game.

It is a sort of _solitaire ambulante_ and what you win is the happiness
of your eye and heart.  If you made the market, on this side of town,
without ever being stymied, you won the game.  But you must not make it
too easy and you must not count.

On the other side of the town, game was to leave from the Gritti and
make the Rialto by the _Fondamente Nuove_ without a mistake.

Then you could climb the bridge and cross it and go down into the
market.  He liked the market best.  It was the part of any town he
always went to first.

Just then he heard the two young men behind him saying the things about
him.  He knew they were young men by their voices and he did not look
back, but listened carefully for distance and waited for the next turn
to see them, as he turned.

They are on their way to work, he decided.  Maybe they are former
Fascists or maybe they are something else, or maybe it is just the line
that they are talking.  But they are making it pretty personal now.  It
isn't just Americans, it is also me, myself, my grey hair, the slightly
crooked way I walk, the combat boots (those, of that stripe, disliked
the practicability of combat boots.  They liked boots that rang on the
flag stones and took a high black polish).

It is my uniform which they find to be without grace.  Now it is why I
am walking at this hour and now it is their absolute security that I
can no longer make love.

The Colonel swung sharp to the left at the next corner, seeing what he
had to deal with and the exact distance and when the two young men came
around the corner which was formed by the apse of the church of Frari
there was no Colonel.  He was in the dead angle behind the apse of the
ancient church and as they passed, he, hearing them come by their talk,
stepped out with a hand in each low pocket of his raincoat and turned
himself and the raincoat, with the two hands in the pockets, towards
them.

They stopped and he looked at them both in the face and smiled his old
and worn death smile.  Then he looked down at their feet, as you always
look at the feet of such people, since they wear their shoes too tight
and when you take the shoes off them you see their hammer-toes.  The
Colonel spat on the pavement and said nothing.

The two of them, they _were_ the first thing he had suspected, looked
at him with hatred and with that other thing.  Then they were off like
marsh-birds, walking with the long strides of herons too, the Colonel
thought, and something of the flight of curlews and looking back with
hatred, waiting to have the last word if the distance was ever safe.

It is a pity they weren't ten against one, the Colonel thought.  They
might have fought.  I should not blame them, since they were defeated.

But their manners were not good in respect to a man of my rank and age.
Also it was not intelligent to think all fifty-year-old colonels would
not understand their language.  Nor was it intelligent to think old
Infantrymen would not fight this early in the morning against the
simple odds of two to one.

I'd hate to fight in this town where I love the people.  I would avoid
it.  But couldn't those badly educated youths realize what sort of
animal they were dealing with?  Don't they know how you get to walk
that way?  Nor any of the other signs that combat people show as surely
as a fisherman's hands tell you if he is a fisherman from the creases
from the cord cuts.

It is true they only saw my back and ass and legs and boots.  But you'd
think they might have told from the way they must move.  Maybe they
don't any more.  But when I had a chance to look at them and think.
Take the two of them out and hang them, I believe they understood.
They understood quite clearly.

What's a man's life worth anyway?  Ten thousand dollars if his
insurance is paid up in our army.  What the hell has that got to do
with it.  Oh yes, that was what I was thinking about before those jerks
showed; how much money I had saved my government, in my time when
people like Benny Meyers were in the trough.

Yes, he said and how much you lost them at the Chateau that time at ten
Gs a head.  Well nobody ever really understood it except me, I guess.
There's no reason to tell them now.  Your commanding general sometimes
puts things down as the Fortunes of War.  Back at Army they know such
things are bound to happen.  You do it, as ordered, with a big butcher
bill and you're a hero.

Christ, I am opposed to the excessive butcher bill, he thought.  But
you get the orders, and you have to carry them out.  It is the mistakes
that are no good to sleep with.  But why the hell sleep with them
anyway.  It never did any good.  But they can certainly crawl into a
sack sometimes.  They can crawl in and stay in there with you.

Cheer up, boy, he said.  Remember you had a lot of money on you when
you picked that one.  And you might have been stripped if you lost.
You can't fight a lick any more with your hands and you didn't have any
weapon.

So don't be gloomy, boy, or man, or Colonel, or busted General.  We're
almost to the market now and you made it without hardly noticing.

Hardly noticing is bad, he added.




Chapter XXII

He loved the market.  A great part of it was close-packed and crowded
into several side streets and it was so concentrated that it was
difficult not to jostle people, unintentionally, and each time you
stopped to look, to buy, or to admire, you formed an _îlot de
résistance_ against the flow of the morning attack of the purchasers.

The Colonel liked to study the spread and high piled cheeses and the
great sausages.  People at home think _mortadella_ is a sausage, he
thought.

Then he said to the woman in the booth, 'Let me try a little of that
sausage, please.  Only a sliver.'

She cut a thin, paper thin, slice for him, ferociously and lovingly,
and when the Colonel tasted it there was the half smoky, black
pepper-corned, true flavour of the meat from the hogs that ate acorns
in the mountains.

'I will take a quarter of a kilo.'

The Barone's lunches for the shooting blinds were of a Spartan quality,
which the Colonel respected, since he knew no one should eat much while
shooting.  He felt, though, that he might augment the lunch with his
sausage and share it with the poler and picker-upper.  He might give a
slice to Bobby, the retriever, who would be wet through to his hide
many times and enthusiastic still, but shaking with cold.

'Is this the best sausage that you have?' he asked the woman.  'Have
you nothing that does not show and is reserved for better and steadier
customers?'

'This is the best sausage.  There are many other sausages, as you know.
But this is the best.'

'Then give me one-eighth of a kilo of a sausage that is highly
fortifying, but is not highly seasoned.'

'I have it,' she said.  'It is a little new but exactly as you
describe.'

This sausage was for Bobby.

But you do not say that you buy sausages for a dog in Italy where the
worst crime is to be considered a fool and many people go hungry.  You
may give expensive sausage to a dog before a man who works for his
living and knows what a dog goes through in water in cold weather.  But
you do not buy them, stating your purpose in possessing them, unless
you are a fool, or a millionaire from the war and from after.

The Colonel paid for the wrapped-up package and proceeded on through
the market inhaling the smell of roasted coffee and looking at the
amount of fat on each carcass in the butcher section, as though he were
enjoying the Dutch painters, whose names no one remembers, who painted,
in perfection of detail, all things you shot, or that were eatable.

A market is the closest thing to a good museum like the Prado or as the
Accademia is now, the Colonel thought.

He took a short cut and was at the fish market.

In the market, spread on the slippery stone floor, or in their baskets,
or their rope-handled boxes, were the heavy, grey-green lobsters with
their magenta overtones that presaged their death in boiling water.
They have all been captured by treachery, the Colonel thought, and
their claws are pegged.

There were the small soles and there were a few albacore and bonito.
These last, the Colonel thought, looked like boat-tailed bullets,
dignified in death and with the huge eye of the pelagic fish.

They were not made to be caught except for their voraciousness.  The
poor sole exists, in shallow water, to feed man.  But these other
roving bullets, in their great bands, live in blue water and travel
through all oceans and all seas.

A nickel for your thoughts now, he thought.  Let's see what else they
have.

There were many eels, alive and no longer confident in their eeldom.
There were fine prawns that could make a scampi brochetto spitted and
broiled on a rapier-like instrument that could be used as a Brooklyn
ice-pick.  There were medium-sized shrimps, grey and opalescent,
awaiting their turn, too, for the boiling water and their immortality,
to have their shucked carcasses float out easily on an ebb tide on the
Grand Canal.

The speedy shrimp, the Colonel thought, with tentacles longer than the
moustaches of that old Japanese admiral, comes here now to die for our
benefit.  Oh Christian shrimp, he thought, master of retreat, and with
your wonderful intelligence service in those two light whips, why did
they not teach you about nets and that lights are dangerous?

Must have been some slip-up, he thought.

Now he looked at the many small crustaceans, the razor-edge clams you
only should eat raw if you had your typhoid shots up to date, and all
the small delectables.

He went past these, stopping to ask one seller where his clams came
from.  They came from a good place, without sewerage, and the Colonel
asked to have six opened.  He drank the juice and cut the clam out,
cutting close against the shell with the curved knife the man handed
him.  The man had handed him the knife because he knew from experience
the Colonel cut closer to the shell than he had been taught to cut.

The Colonel paid him the pittance that they cost, which must have been
much greater than the pittance those received who caught them, and he
thought, now I must see the stream and canal fishes and get back to the
hotel.




Chapter XXIII

The colonel arrived at the lobby of the Hotel Gritti-Palace.  His
gondolieres were paid off and, now, inside the hotel, there was no wind.

It had taken two men to bring the gondola up the Grand Canal from the
market.  They had both worked hard, and he had paid them what it was
worth, and some more.

'Are there any calls for me?' he asked the concierge, who was now in
attendance.

The concierge was light, fast, sharp-faced, intelligent and polite,
always, without subservience.  He wore the crossed keys of his office
on the lapels of his blue uniform without ostentation.  He was the
concierge.  It is a rank very close to that of Captain, the Colonel
thought.  An officer and not a Gentleman.  Make it top sergeant in the
old days; except he's dealing always with the brass.

'My lady has called twice,' the concierge said in English.  Or whatever
that language should be called we all speak, the Colonel thought.
Leave it at English.  That is about what they have left.  They should
be allowed to keep the name of the language.  Cripps will probably
ration it shortly, anyway.

'Please put me through to her at once,' he told the concierge.

The concierge commenced to dial numbers.

'You may talk over there, my Colonel,' he said.  'I have made the
connection.'

'You're fast.'

'Over there,' the concierge said.

Inside the booth the Colonel lifted the receiver and said,
automatically, 'Colonel Cantwell speaking.'

'I called twice, Richard,' the girl said.  'But they explained that you
were out.  Where were you?'

'At the market.  How are you, my lovely?'

'No one listens on this phone at this hour.  I am your lovely.  Whoever
that is.'

'You.  Did you sleep well?'

'It was like ski-ing in the dark.  Not really ski-ing but really dark.'

'That's the way it should be.  Why did you wake so early?  You've
frightened my concierge.'

'If it is not un-maidenly, how soon can we meet, and where?'

'Where you wish and when you wish.'

'Do you still have the stones and did Miss Portrait help any?'

'Yes to both questions.  The stones are in my upper left-hand pocket
and buttoned down.  Miss Portrait and I talked late and early and it
made everything much easier.'

'Do you love her more than me?'

'I'm not abnormal yet.  Perhaps that's bragging.  But she's lovely.'

'Where should we meet?'

'Should we have breakfast at the Florian, on the right-hand side of the
square?  The square should be flooded and it will be fun to watch.'

'I'll be there in twenty minutes if you want me.'

'I want you,' the Colonel said and hung up.

Coming out of the telephone booth he, suddenly, did not feel good and
then he felt as though the devil had him in an iron cage, built like an
iron lung or an iron maiden, and he walked, grey-faced, to the
concierge's desk and said, in Italian, 'Domenico, Ico, could you get me
a glass of water, please?'

The concierge was gone and he leaned on the desk resting.  He rested
lightly and without illusion.  Then the concierge was back with the
glass of water, and he took four tablets of the type that you take two,
and he continued resting as lightly as a hawk rests.

'Domenico,' he said.

'Yes.'

'I have something here in an envelope that you can put in the safe.  It
may be called for either by myself, in person, or in writing, or by the
person you have just put that call through to.  Would you like that in
writing?'

'No.  It would be unnecessary.'

'But what about you, boy?  You're not immortal, are you?'

'Fairly so,' the concierge told him.  'But I will put it in writing,
and after me, comes the Manager and the Assistant Manager.'

'Both good men,' the Colonel agreed.

'Wouldn't you like to sit down, my Colonel?'

'No.  Who sits down except men and women in change of life hotels?  Do
you sit down?'

'No.'

'I can rest on my feet, or against a God-damned tree.  My countrymen
sit down, or lie down, or fall down.  Give them a few energy crackers
to stall their whimpers.'

He was talking too much to regain confidence quickly.

'Do they really have energy crackers?'

'Sure.  It has something in it that keeps you from getting excited.
It's like the atomic bomb, only played backwards.'

'I can't believe it.'

'We have the most terrific military secrets that one General's wife
ever told another.  Energy crackers is the least of it.  Next time we
will give all Venice botulism from 56,000 feet.  There's nothing to
it,' the Colonel explained.  'They give you anthrax, and you give them
botulism.'

'But it will be horrible.'

'It will be worse than that,' the Colonel assured him.  'This isn't
classified.  It's all been published.  And while it goes on you can
hear Margaret, if you tune in right, singing the Star Spangled Banner
on the radio.  I think that could be arranged.  The voice I would not
describe as a big one.  Not as we know voices who have heard the good
ones in our time.  But everything is a trick now.  The radio can almost
make the voice.  And the Star Spangled Banner is fool-proof until
towards the last.'

'Do you think they will drop anything here?'

'No.  They never have.'

The Colonel, who was four star general now, in his wrath and in his
agony and in his need for confidence, but secured temporarily through
the absorption of the tablets, said, '_Ciao_, Domenico,' and left the
Gritti.

He figured it took twelve and one half minutes to reach the place where
his true love would probably arrive a little late.  He walked it
carefully and at the speed he should walk it.  The bridges were all the
same.




Chapter XXIV

His true love was at the table at the exact time that she said she
would be.  She was as beautiful as always In the hard, morning light
that came across the flooded square, and she said, 'Please, Richard.
Are you all right?  Please?'

'Sure,' the Colonel said.  'You wonder beauty.'

'Did you go to all our places in the market?'

'Only a few of them.  I did not go where they have the wild ducks.'

'Thank you.'

'For nothing,' the Colonel said.  'I never go there when we are not
together.'

'Don't you think I should go to the shoot?'

'No.  I am quite sure.  Alvarito would have asked you if he wanted you.'

'He might not have asked me because he wanted me.'

'That's true,' the Colonel said, and pondered that for two seconds.
'What do you want for breakfast?'

'Breakfast is worthless here, and I don't like the square when it is
flooded.  It is sad and the pigeons have no place to alight.  It is
only really fun towards the last when the children play.  Should we go
and have breakfast at the Gritti?'

'Do you want to?'

'Yes.'

'Good.  We'll have breakfast there.  I've had mine already.'

'Really?'

'I'll have some coffee and hot rolls, and only feel them with my
fingers.  Are you awfully hungry?'

'Awfully,' she said, truly.

'We'll give breakfast the full treatment,' the Colonel said.  'You'll
wish you had never heard of breakfast.'

As they walked, with the wind at their back, and her hair blowing
better than any banner, she asked him, holding close, 'Do you still
love me in the cold, hard Venice light of morning?  It is really cold
and hard, isn't it?'

'I love you and it is cold and hard.'

'I loved you all night when I was ski-ing in the dark.'

'How do you do that?'

'It is the same runs except that it is dark and the snow is dark
instead of light.  You ski the same; controlled and good.'

'Did you ski all night?  That would be many runs.'

'No.  Afterwards I slept soundly and well and I woke happy.  You were
with me and you were asleep like a baby.'

'I wasn't with you and I was not asleep.'

'You're with me now,' she said and held close and tight.

'And we are almost there.'

'Yes.'

'Have I told you, yet, properly, that I love you?'

'You told me.  But tell me again.'

'I love you,' he said.  'Take it frontally and formally please.'

'I take it anyway you want as long as it is true.'

'That's the proper attitude,' he said.  'You good, brave, lovely girl.
Turn your hair sideways once on top of this bridge and let it blow
obliquely.'

He had made a concession, with obliquely, instead of saying, correctly,
oblique.

'That's easy,' she said.  'Do you like it?'

He looked and saw the profile and the wonder early morning colour and
her chest upstanding in the black sweater and her eyes in the wind and
he said, 'Yes, I like it.'

'I'm very glad,' she said.




Chapter XXV

At the Gritti, the _Gran Maestro_ seated them at the table which was
beside the window that looked out on the Grand Canal.  There was no one
else in the dining-room.

The _Gran Maestro_ was festive and well with the morning.  He took his
ulcers day by day, and his heart the same way.  When they did not hurt
he did not hurt either.

'Your pitted compatriot eats in bed at his hotel, my colleague tells
me,' he confided to the Colonel.  'We may have a few Belgians.  "The
bravest of these were the Belgians,"' he quoted.  'There is a pair of
_pescecani_ from you know where.  But they are exhausted and I believe
they will eat, as pigs, in their room.'

'An excellent situation report,' the Colonel said.  'Our problem, _Gran
Maestro_, is that I have already eaten in my room as pitted does and as
the _pescecani_ will.  But this lady----'

'Young girl,' interrupted the _Gran Maestro_ with his whole-face smile.
He was feeling very good since it was a completely new day.

'This very young lady wants a breakfast to end breakfasts.'

'I understand,' the _Gran Maestro_ said, and he looked at Renata and
his heart rolled over as a porpoise does in the sea.  It is a beautiful
movement and only a few people in this world can feel it and accomplish
it.

'What do you want to eat, Daughter?' the Colonel asked, looking at her
early morning, un-retouched dark beauty.

'Everything.'

'Would you give any suggestions?'

'Tea instead of coffee and whatever the _Gran Maestro_ can salvage.'

'It won't be salvage, Daughter,' said the _Gran Maestro_.

'I'm the one who calls her Daughter.'

'I said it honestly,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'We can make or
_fabricar rognons_ grilled with _champignons_ dug by people I know.
Or, raised in damp cellars.  There can be an omelet with truffles dug
by pigs of distinction.  There can be real Canadian bacon from maybe
Canada, even.'

'Wherever that is,' the girl said happily and unillusioned.

'Wherever that is,' said the Colonel seriously.  'And I know damn well
where it is.'

'I think we should stop the jokes now and get to the breakfast.'

'If it is not un-maidenly I think so too.'

'Mine is a decanted flask of the Valpolicella.'

'Nothing else?'

'Bring me one ration of the alleged Canadian bacon,' the Colonel said.

He looked at the girl, since they were alone now, and he said, 'How are
you, my dearest?'

'Quite hungry, I suppose.  But thank you for being good for so long a
time.'

'It was easy,' the Colonel told her in Italian.




Chapter XXVI

They sat there at the table and watched the early stormy light over the
Canal.  The grey had turned to a yellow-grey now, with the sun, and the
waves were working against the outgoing tide.

'Mummy says she can't live here too long at any time because there are
no trees,' the girl said.  'That's why she goes to the country.'

'That's why everyone goes to the country,' the Colonel said.  'We could
plant a few trees if we found a place with a big enough garden.'

'I like Lombardy poplars and plane trees the best, but I am still quite
uneducated.'

'I like them, and cypresses and chestnut trees.  The real chestnut and
the horse-chestnut.  But you will never see trees, Daughter, until we
go to America.  Wait till you see a white pine or a ponderosa pine.'

'Will we see them when we make the long trip and stop at all the
filling stations or comfort stations or whatever they are called?'

'Lodges and Tourist Camps,' the Colonel said.  'Those others we stop
at; but not for the night.'

'I want so much for us to roll up to a comfort station and plank down
my money and tell them to fill her up and check the oil, Mac, the way
it is in American books or in the films.'

'That's a filling station.'

'Then what is a comfort station?'

'Where you go, you know----'

'Oh,' the girl said and blushed.  'I'm sorry.'

'I want to learn American so much.  But I suppose I shall say barbarous
things the way you do sometimes in Italian.'

'It is an easy language.  The further West you go the straighter and
the easier it becomes.'

The _Gran Maestro_ brought the breakfast and the odour of it, although
it did not spread through the room, due to the silver covers on the
dishes, came to them steady and as broiled bacon and kidneys, with the
dark lustreless smell of grilled mushrooms added.

'It looks lovely,' the girl said.  'Thank you very much, _Gran
Maestro_.  Should I talk American?' she asked the Colonel.  She
extended her hand to the _Gran Maestro_ lightly, and fastly, so that it
darted as a rapier does, and said, 'Put it there, Pal.  This grub is
tops.'

The _Gran Maestro_ said, 'Thank you, my lady.'

'Should I have said chow instead of grub?' the girl asked the Colonel.

'They are really interchangeable.'

'Did they talk like that out West when you were a boy?  What would you
say at breakfast?'

'Breakfast was served, or offered up, by the cook.  He would say, "Come
and get it, you sons of bitches, or I'll throw it away."'

'I must learn that for in the country.  Sometimes when we have the
British Ambassador and his dull wife for dinner I will teach the
footman, who will announce dinner, to say, "Come and get it, you sons
of bitches, or we will throw it away."'

'He'd devaluate,' the Colonel said.  'At any rate, it would be an
interesting experiment.'

'Tell me something I can say in true American to the pitted one if he
comes in.  I will just whisper it in his ear as though I were making a
rendezvous, as they did in the old days.'

'It would depend on how he looks.  If he is very dejected looking, you
might whisper to him, "Listen, Mac.  You hired out to be tough, didn't
you?"'

'That's lovely,' she said, and repeated it in a voice she had learned
from Ida Lupino.  'Can I say it to the _Gran Maestro_?'

'Sure.  Why not.  _Gran Maestro_!'

The _Gran Maestro_ came over and leaned forward attentively.

'Listen, Mac.  You hired out to be tough, didn't you?' the girl
hard-worded him.

'I did indeed,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'Thank you for stating it so
exactly.'

'If that one comes in and you wish to speak to him after he has eaten,
just whisper in his ear, "Wipe the egg off your chin, Jack, and
straighten up and fly right."'

'I'll remember it and I'll practise it at home.'

'What are we going to do after breakfast?'

'Should we go up and look at the picture and see if it is of any value;
I mean any good; in the daylight?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.




Chapter XXVII

Upstairs the room was already done and the Colonel, who had anticipated
a possible messiness of locale, was pleased.

'Stand by it once,' he said.  Then remembered to add, 'Please.'

She stood by it, and he looked at it from where he had looked at it
last night.

'There's no comparison, of course,' he said.  'I don't mean likeness.
The likeness is excellent.'

'Was there supposed to be a comparison?' the girl asked, and swung her
head back and stood there with the black sweater of the portrait.

'Of course not.  But last night, and at first light, I talked to the
portrait as though it were you.'

'That was nice of you and shows it has served some useful purpose.'

They were lying now on the bed and the girl said to him, 'Don't you
ever close windows?'

'No.  Do you?'

'Only when it rains.'

'How much alike are we?'

'I don't know.  We never had much of a chance to find out.'

'We've never had a fair chance.  But we've had enough of a chance for
me to know.'

'And when you know what the hell have you got?' the Colonel asked.

'I don't know.  Something better than there is, I suppose.'

'Sure.  We ought to try for that.  I don't believe in limited
objectives.  Sometimes you're forced to, though.'

'What is your great sorrow?'

'Other people's orders,' he said.  'What's yours?'

'You.'

'I don't want to be a sorrow.  I've been a sorry son of a bitch many
times.  But I never was anybody's sorrow.'

'Well you are mine now.'

'All right,' he said.  'We'll take it that way.'

'You're nice to take it that way.  You're very kind this morning.  I'm
so ashamed about how things are.  Please hold me very close and let's
not talk, or think, about how things might have been different.'

'Daughter, that's one of the few things I know how to do.'

'You know many, many things.  Don't say such a thing.'

'Sure,' the Colonel said.  'I know how to fight forwards and how to
fight backwards and what else?'

'About pictures and about books and about life.'

'That's easy.  You just look at the pictures without prejudice, and you
read the books with as open a mind as you have, and you live life.'

'Don't take off your tunic, please.'

'All right.'

'You do anything when I say please.'

'I have done things without.'

'Not very often.'

'No,' the Colonel agreed.  'Please is a pretty word.'

'Please, please, please.'

'_Per Piacere_.  It means for pleasure.  I wish we always talked
Italian.'

'We could in the dark.  Although there are things that say better in
English.

'I love you my last true and only love,' she quoted.  'When lilacs last
in the door-yard bloomed.  And out of the cradle endlessly rocking.
And come and get it, you sons of bitches, or I'll throw it away.  You
don't want those in other languages, do you, Richard?'

'No.'

'Kiss me again, please.'

'Unnecessary please.'

'I would probably end up as an unnecessary please myself.  That is the
good thing about you going to die that you can't leave me.'

'That's a little rough,' the Colonel said.  'Watch your beautiful mouth
a little on that.'

'I get rough when you get rough,' she said.  'You wouldn't want me to
be completely otherwise?'

'I would not want you to be in any way other than you are and I love
you truly, finally and for good.'

'You say nice things very clearly sometimes.  What was it happened with
you and your wife, if I may ask?'

'She was an ambitious woman and I was away too much.'

'You mean she went away, from ambition, when you only were away from
duty?'

'Sure,' the Colonel said and remembered, as unbitterly as he could.
'She had more ambition than Napoleon and about the talent of the
average High School Valedictorian.'

'Whatever that is,' the girl said.  'But let's not speak about her.
I'm sorry I asked the question.  She must be sad that she is not with
you.'

'No.  She is too conceited ever to be sad, and she married me to
advance herself in Army circles, and have better contacts for what she
considered her profession, or her art.  She was a journalist.'

'But they are dreadful,' the girl said.

'I agree.'

'But you couldn't have married a woman journalist that kept on being
that?'

'I told you I made mistakes,' the Colonel said.

'Let's talk about something nice.'

'Let's.'

'But that was terrible.  How could you have done such a thing?'

'I don't know.  I could tell you in detail but let's skip it.'

'Please let's skip it.  But I had no idea it was something as awful as
that.  You wouldn't do such a thing now, would you?'

'I promise you, my sweet.'

'But you don't ever write to her?'

'Of course not.'

'You wouldn't tell her about us, so she could write about it?'

'No.  I told her about things once, and she wrote about them.  But that
was in another country and besides the wench is dead.'

'Is she really dead?'

'Deader than Phoebus the Phoenician.  But she doesn't know it yet.'

'What would you do if we were together in the Piazza and you saw her?'

'I'd look straight through her to show her how dead she was.'

'Thank you very much,' the girl said.  'You know that another woman, or
a woman in memory, is a terrible thing for a young girl to deal with
when she is still without experience.'

'There isn't any other woman,' the Colonel told her, and his eyes were
bad and remembering.  'Nor is there any woman of memory.'

'Thank you, very much,' the girl said.  'When I look at you I believe
it truly.  But please never look at me nor think of me like that.'

'Should we hunt her down and hang her to a high tree?' the Colonel said
with anticipation.

'No.  Let us forget her.'

'She is forgotten,' the Colonel said.  And, strangely enough, she was.
It was strange because she had been present in the room for a moment,
and she had very nearly caused a panic; which is one of the strangest
things there is, the Colonel thought.  He knew about panics.

But she was gone now, for good and for ever; cauterized; exorcized and
with the eleven copies of her re-classification papers, in which was
included the formal, notarized act of divorcement, in triplicate.

'She is forgotten,' the Colonel said.  It was quite true.

'I'm so pleased,' the girl said.  'I don't know why they ever let her
into the hotel.'

'We're enough alike,' the Colonel said.  'We better not carry it too
God-damned far.'

'You can hang her if you wish because she is why we cannot marry.'

'She's forgotten,' the Colonel told her.  'Maybe she will take a good
look at herself in the mirror sometime and hang herself.'

'Now that she is out of the room we should wish her no bad luck.  But,
as a good Venetian, I wish that she were dead.'

'So do I,' the Colonel said.  'And now, since she is not, let us forget
her for keeps.'

'For keeps and for always,' the girl said.  'I hope that is the correct
diction.  Or in Spanish _para sempre_.'

'_Para sempre_ and his brother,' the Colonel said.




Chapter XXVIII

They lay together now and did not speak and the Colonel felt her heart
beat.  It is easy to feel a heart beat under a black sweater knitted by
someone in the family, and her dark hair lay, long and heavy, over his
good arm.  It isn't heavy, he thought, it is lighter than anything
there is.  She lay, quiet and loving, and whatever it was that they
possessed was in complete communication.  He kissed her on the mouth,
gently and hungrily, and then it was as though there was static,
suddenly, when communications had been perfect.

'Richard,' she said.  'I'm sorry about things.'

'Never be sorry,' the Colonel said.  'Never discuss casualties,
Daughter.'

'Say it again.'

'Daughter.'

'Will you tell me some happy things I can have for during the week and
some more of war for my education?'

'Let's skip war.'

'No.  I need it for my education.'

'I do too,' the Colonel said.  'Not manoeuvres.  You know, in our army
once, a general officer through chicanery obtained the plan of the
manoeuvre.  He anticipated every move of the enemy force and comported
himself so brilliantly that he was promoted over many better men.  And
that was why we got smacked one time.  That and the prevalence of
week-ends.'

'We're on a week-end now.'

'I know,' the Colonel said.  'I can still count up to seven.'

'But are you bitter about everything?'

'No.  It is just that I am half a hundred years old and I know things.'

'Tell me something more about Paris because I love to think of you and
Paris in the week.'

'Daughter, why don't you lay off Paris?'

'But I've been in Paris, and I will go back there again, and I want to
know.  It is the loveliest city in the world, next to our own, and I
want to know some things truly to take with me.'

'We will go together and I will tell you there.'

'Thank you.  But tell me a little now for this week only.'

'Leclerc was a high-born jerk as I think that I've explained.  Very
brave, very arrogant and extremely ambitious.  He is dead, as I said.'

'Yes, you told me.'

'They say you should never speak ill of the dead.  But I think it is
the best time to speak truly of them.  I have never said anything of a
dead that I would not say to his face,' and he added, 'in spades.'

'Let's not talk about him.  I have re-classified him in my mind.'

'What do you want then; picturesque?'

'Yes please.  I have bad taste from reading the illustrated papers.
But I will read Dante all week while you are gone.  I'll go to mass
each morning.  That should be enough.'

'Go to Harry's before lunch too.'

'I will,' she said.  'Please tell me some picturesque.'

'Don't you think we might better just go to sleep?'

'How can we go to sleep now when we have so little time?  Feel this,'
she said and pushed her whole head up under his chin until she forced
his head back.

'All right, I'll talk.'

'Give me your hand first to hold.  I'll have it in my hand when I read
the Dante and do the other things.'

'Dante was an execrable character.  More conceited than Leclerc.'

'I know.  But he did not write execrably.'

'No.  Leclerc could fight too.  Excellently.'

'Now tell me.'

Her head was on his chest now, and the Colonel said, 'Why did you not
want me to take off the tunic?'

'I like to feel the buttons.  Is it wrong?'

'I'll be a sad son of a bitch,' the Colonel said.  'How many people
fought in your family?'

'Everybody,' she said.  'Always.  They were traders as well and several
of them were Doges of this city as you know.'

'But they all fought?'

'All,' she said.  'As far as I know.'

'O.K.,' the Colonel said.  'I'll tell you any God-damn thing you want
to know.'

'Just something picturesque.  As bad or worse than in the illustrated
papers.'

'_Domenica Del Corriere_ or _Tribuna Illustrata_?'

'Worse, if possible.'

'Kiss me first.'

She kissed him kind, and hard, and desperately, and the Colonel could
not think about any fights or any picturesque or strange incidents.  He
only thought of her and how she felt and how close life comes to death
when there is ecstasy.  And what the hell is ecstasy and what's
ecstasy's rank and serial number?  And how does her black sweater feel?
And who made all her smoothness and delight and the strange pride and
sacrifice and wisdom of a child?  Yes, ecstasy is what you might have
had and instead you draw sleep's other brother.

Death is a lot of ----, he thought.  It comes to you in small fragments
that hardly show where it has entered.  It comes, sometimes,
atrociously.  It can come from unboiled water; an un-pulled-up mosquito
boot, or it can come with the great, white-hot, clanging roar we have
lived with.  It comes in small cracking whispers that precede the noise
of the automatic weapon.  It can come with the smoke-emitting arc of
the grenade, or the sharp, cracking drop of the mortar.

I have seen it come, loosening itself from the bomb rack, and falling
with that strange curve.  It comes in the metallic rending crash of a
vehicle, or the simple lack of traction on a slippery road.

It comes in bed to most people, I know, like love's opposite number.  I
have lived with it nearly all my life and the dispensing of it has been
my trade.  But what can I tell this girl now on this cold, windy
morning in the Gritti Palace Hotel?

'What would you like to know, Daughter?' he asked her.

'Everything.'

'All right,' the Colonel said.  'Here goes.'




Chapter XXIX

They lay on the pleasantly hard, new-made bed with their legs pressed
tight against one another, and her head was on his chest, and her hair
spread across his old hard neck; and he told her.

'We landed without much opposition.  They had the true opposition at
the other beach.  Then we had to link up with the people who had been
dropped, and take and secure various towns, and then we took Cherbourg.
This was difficult, and had to be done very fast, and the orders were
from a General called Lightning Joe that you never would have heard of.
Good General.'

'Go on, please.  You spoke about Lightning Joe before.'

'After Cherbourg we had everything.  I took nothing but an admiral's
compass because I had a small boat at that time on Chesapeake Bay.  But
we had all the Wehrmacht stamped Martell and some people had as much as
six million German-printed French francs.  They were good until a year
ago, and at that time they were worth fifty to the dollar, and many a
man has a tractor now instead of simply one mule who knew how to send
them home through his Esses, or sometimes his Gs.

'I never stole anything except the compass because I thought it was bad
luck to steal, unnecessarily, in war.  But I drank the cognac and I
used to try to figure out the different corrections on the compass when
I had time.  The compass was the only friend I had, and the telephone
was my life.  We had more wire strung than there are ---- in Texas.'

'Please keep telling me and be as little rough as you can.  I don't
know what the word means and I don't want to know.'

'Texas is a big state,' the Colonel said.  'That is why I used it and
its female population as a symbol.  You cannot say more ---- than
Wyoming because there are less than thirty thousand there, perhaps,
hell, make it fifty, and there was a lot of wire, and you kept
stringing it and rolling it up, and stringing it again.'

'Go on.'

'We will cut to the break-through,' the Colonel said.  'Please tell me
if this bores you.'

'No.'

'So we made the mucking break-through,' the Colonel said, and now his
head was turned to her head, and he was not lecturing; he was
confessing.

'The first day most of them came over and dropped the Christmas tree
ornaments that confuse the other people's radar and it was called off.
We were ready to go but they called it off.  Quite properly I am sure.
I love the very high brass like I love the pig's you know.'

'Tell it to me and don't be bad.'

'Conditions were not propitious,' the Colonel said.  'So the second day
we were for it, as our British cousins, who could not fight their way
out of a wet tissue towel, say, and over came the people of the wild,
blue yonder.

'They were still taking off from the fields where they lived on that
green-grassed aircraft carrier that they called England, when we saw
the first of them.

'Shining, bright and beautiful, because they had scraped the invasion
paint by then, or maybe they had not.  My memory is not exact about
this part.

'Anyway, Daughter, you could see the line of them going back towards
the east further than you could see.  It was like a great train.  They
were high in the sky and never more beautiful.  I told my S-2 that we
should call them the Valhalla Express.  Are you tired of it?'

'No.  I can see the Valhalla Express.  We never saw it in such numbers.
But we saw it.  Many times.'

'We were back two thousand yards from where we were to take off from.
You know what two thousand yards is, Daughter, in a war when you are
attacking?'

'No.  How could I?'

'Then the front part of the Valhalla Express dropped coloured smoke and
turned and went home.  This smoke was dropped accurately, and clearly
showed the target which was the Kraut positions.  They were good
positions and it _might_ have been impossible to move him out of them
without something mighty and picturesque such as we were experiencing.

'Then, Daughter, the next sections of the Valhalla Express dropped
everything in the world on the Krauts and where they lived and worked
to hold us up.  Later it looked as though all of the earth had erupted
and the prisoners that we took shook as a man shakes when his malaria
hits him.  They were very brave boys from the Sixth Parachute Division
and they all shook and could not control it though they tried.

'So you can see it was a good bombing.  Just the thing we always need
in this life.  Make them tremble in the fear of justice and of might.

'So then, Daughter, not to bore you, the wind was from the east and the
smoke began to blow back in our direction.  The heavies were bombing on
the smoke line and the smoke line was now over us.  Therefore they
bombed us the same as they had bombed the Krauts.  First it was the
heavies, and no one need ever worry about hell who was there that day.
Then, to really make the break-through good and to leave as few people
as possible on either side, the mediums came over and bombed who was
left.  Then we made the break-through as soon as the Valhalla Express
had gone home, stretching in its beauty and its majesty from that part
of France to all over England.'

If a man has a conscience, the Colonel thought, he might think about
air-power some time.

'Give me a glass of that Valpolicella,' the Colonel said, and
remembered to add, 'please.'

'Excuse me,' he said.  'Be comfortable, honey dog, please.  You asked
me to tell you.'

'I'm not your honey dog.  That must be someone else.'

'Correct.  You're my last and true and only love.  Is that correct?
But you asked me to tell you.'

'Please tell me,' the girl said.  'I'd like to be your honey dog if I
knew how to do it.  But I am only a girl from this town that loves you.'

'We'll operate on that,' the Colonel said.  'And I love you.  I
probably picked up that phrase in the Philippines.'

'Probably,' the girl said.  'But I would rather be your straight girl.'

'You are,' the Colonel said.  'Complete with handles and with the flag
on top.'

'Please don't be rough,' she said.  'Please love me true and tell me as
true as you can, without hurting yourself in any way.'

'I'll tell you true,' he said.  'As true as I can tell and let it hurt
who it hurts.  It is better that you hear it from me if you have
curiosity on this subject, than that you read it in some book with
stiff covers.'

'Please don't be rough.  Just tell me true and hold me tight and tell
me true until you are purged of it; if that can be.'

'I don't need to purge,' he said.  'Except heavies being used
tactically.  I have nothing against them if they use them right even if
they kill you.  But for ground support give me a man like Pete Quesada.
There is a man who will boot them in.'

'Please.'

'If you ever want to quit a beat-up character like me that guy could
give you ground support.'

'You are not beat-up, whatever that is, and I love you.'

'Please give me two tablets from that bottle and pour the glass of
Valpolicella that you neglected to pour, and I will tell you some of
the rest of it.'

'You don't have to.  You don't have to tell me and I know now it is not
good for you.  Especially not the Valhalla Express day.  I am not an
inquisitor; or whatever the female of inquisitor is.  Let us just lie
quietly and look out of the window, and watch and see what happens on
our Grand Canal.'

'Maybe we better.  Who gives a damn about the war anyway?'

'You and me, maybe,' she said and stroked his head.  'Here are the two
things from the square bottle.  Here is the glass of decanted vino.
I'll send you better from our own estates.  Please let us sleep a
little while.  Please be a good boy and we just lie together and love
each other.  Please put your hand here.'

'My good or my bad?'

'Your bad,' the girl said.  'The one I love and must think about all
week.  I cannot keep it like you keep the stones.'

'They're in the safe,' the Colonel said.  'In your name,' he added.

'Let's just sleep and not talk about any material things nor any
sorrows.'

'The hell with sorrows,' the Colonel said with his eyes closed and his
head resting lightly on the black sweater that was his fatherland.  You
have to have some damned fatherland, he thought.  Here is mine.

'Why aren't you President?' the girl asked.  'You could be an excellent
president.'

'Me president?  I served in the Montana National Guard when I was
sixteen.  But I never wore a bow tie in my life and I am not, nor ever
have been, an unsuccessful haberdasher.  I have none of the
qualifications for the Presidency.  I couldn't even head the opposition
even though I don't have to sit on telephone books to have my picture
taken.  Nor am I a no-fight general.  Hell, I never even was at SHAEF.
I couldn't even be an elder statesman.  I'm not old enough.  Now we are
governed in some way, by the dregs.  We are governed by what you find
in the bottom of dead beer glasses that whores have dunked their
cigarettes in.  The place has not even been swept out yet and they have
an amateur pianist beating on the box.'

'I don't understand it because my American is so incomplete.  But it
sounds awful.  But don't be angry about it.  Let me be angry for you.'

'Do you know what an unsuccessful haberdasher is?'

'No.'

'It is not discreditable.  There are many of them in our country.
There is at least one in every town.  No, Daughter, I am only a
fighting soldier and that is the lowest thing on earth.  In that you
run for Arlington, if they return the body.  The family has a choice.'

'Is Arlington nice?'

'I don't know,' the Colonel said.  'I was never buried there.'

'Where would you like to be buried?'

'Up in the hills,' he said, making a quick decision.  'On any part of
the high ground where we beat them.'

'I suppose you should be buried on the Grappa.'

'On the dead angle of any shell-pocked slope if they would graze cattle
over me in the summer time.'

'Do they have cattle there?'

'Sure.  They always have cattle where there is good grass in the
summer, and the girls of the highest houses, the strong built ones, the
houses _and_ the girls, that resist the snow in winter, trap foxes in
the fall after they bring the cattle down.  They feed from pole-stacked
hay.'

'And you don't want Arlington or Père Lachaise or what we have here?'

'Your miserable boneyard.'

'I know it is the most unworthy thing about the town.  The city rather.
I learned to call cities towns from you.  But I will see that you go
where you wish to go and I will go with you if you like.'

'I would not like.  That is the one thing we do alone.  Like going to
the bathroom.'

'Please do not be rough.'

'I meant that I would love to have you with me.  But it is very
egotistical and an ugly process.'

He stopped, and thought truly, but off-key, and said, 'No.  You get
married and have five sons and call them all Richard.'

'The lion-hearted,' the girl said, accepting the situation without even
a glance, and playing what there was she held as you put down all the
cards, having counted exactly.

'The louse-hearted,' the Colonel said.  'The unjust bitter criticizer
who speaks badly of everyone.'

'Please don't be rough in talking,' the girl said.  'And remember you
speak worst of all about yourself.  But hold me as close as we can and
let's think about nothing.'

He held her as close as he could and he tried to think about nothing.




Chapter XXX

The colonel and the girl lay quietly on the bed and the Colonel tried
to think of nothing; as he had thought of nothing so many times in so
many places.  But it was no good now.  It would not work any more
because it was too late.

They were not Othello and Desdemona, thank God, although it was the
same town and the girl was certainly better looking than the
Shakespearean character, and the Colonel had fought as many, or more
times than the garrulous Moor.

They are excellent soldiers, he thought.  The damned Moors.  But how
many of them have we killed in my time?  I think we killed more than a
generation if you count the final Moroccan campaign against Abdel Krim.
And each one you have to kill separately.  Nobody ever killed them in
mass, as we killed Krauts before they discovered _Einheit_.

'Daughter,' he said.  'Do you want me to really tell you, so you will
know, if I am not rough telling it?'

'I would rather have you tell me than anything.  Then we can share it.'

'It cuts pretty thin for sharing,' the Colonel said.  'It's all yours,
Daughter.  And it's only the high-lights.  You wouldn't understand the
campaigns in detail, and few others would.  Rommel might.  But they
always had him under wraps in France and, besides, we had destroyed his
communications.  The two tactical air-forces had; ours and the R.A.F.
But I wish I could talk over certain things with him.  I'd like to talk
with him and with Ernst Udet.'

'Just tell me what you wish and take this glass of Valpolicella and
stop if it makes you feel badly.  Or don't tell it at all.'

'I was a spare-parts Colonel at the start,' the Colonel explained
carefully.  'They are hang-around Colonels, which are given to a
Division Commander to replace one that he may have killed, or that is
relieved.  Almost none are killed; but many are relieved.  All the good
ones are promoted.  Fairly fast when the thing starts to move sort of
like a forest fire.'

'Go on, please.  Should you take your medicine?'

'The hell with my medicine,' the Colonel said.  'And the hell with
SHAEF.'

'You explained that to me,' the girl said.

'I wish the hell you were a soldier with your straight true brain and
your beauty memory.'

'I would wish to be a soldier if I could fight under you.'

'Never fight under me,' the Colonel said.  'I'm cagey.  But I'm not
lucky.  Napoleon wanted them lucky and he was right.'

'We've had some luck.'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'Good and bad.'

'But it was all luck.'

'Sure,' the Colonel said.  'But you can't fight on luck.  It is just
something that you need.  The people who fought on luck are all
gloriously dead like Napoleon's horse cavalry.'

'Why do you hate cavalry?  Almost all the good boys I know were in the
three good regiments of cavalry, or in the navy.'

'I don't hate anything, Daughter,' the Colonel said, and drank a little
of the light, dry, red wine which was as friendly as the house of your
brother, if you and your brother are good friends.  'I only have a
point of view, arrived at after careful consideration, and an estimate
of their capabilities.'

'Are they not really good?'

'They are worthless,' the Colonel said.  Then remembering to be kind,
added, 'In our time.'

'Every day is a disillusion.'

'No.  Every day is a new and fine illusion.  But you can cut out
everything phoney about the illusion as though you would cut it with a
straight-edge razor.'

'Please never cut me.'

'You're not cut-able.'

'Would you kiss me and hold me tight, and we both look at the Grand
Canal where the light is lovely now, and you tell me more?'

When they were looking out at the Grand Canal where the light was,
indeed, lovely, the Colonel went on, 'I got a regiment because the
Commanding General relieved a boy that I had known since he was
eighteen years old.  He was not a boy any more, of course.  It was too
much regiment for him and it was all the regiment I ever could have
hoped for in this life until I lost it.'  He added, 'Under orders, of
course.'

'How do you lose a regiment?'

'When you are working around to get up on the high ground and all you
would have to do is send in a flag, and they would talk it over and
come out if you were right.  The professionals are very intelligent and
these Krauts were all professionals; not the fanatics.  The phone rings
and somebody calls from Corps who has his orders from Army or maybe
Army Group or maybe even SHAEF, because they read the name of the town
in a newspaper, possibly sent in from Spa, by a correspondent, and the
order is to take it by assault.  It's important because it got into the
newspapers.  You have to take it.

'So you leave one company dead along a draw.  You lose one company
complete and you destroy three others.  The tanks get smacked even as
fast as they could move and they could move fast both ways.

'They hit them one, two, three, four, five.

'Three men usually get out of the five (that are inside) and they run
like broken-field runners that have been shaken loose in a play when
you are in Minnesota and the others are Beloit, Wisconsin.

'Do I bore you?'

'No.  I do not understand the local allusions.  But you can explain
them when you care to.  Please keep on telling me.'

'You get into the town, and some handsome jerk puts an air mission on
you.  This mission might have been ordered and never cancelled.  Let's
give everyone the benefit of the doubt.  I'm just telling you about
things in a general way.  It is better not to be specific and a
civilian wouldn't understand it.  Not even you.

'This air mission does not help much, Daughter.  Because maybe you
cannot stay in the town because you have got too few people in, and by
now, you are digging them out of rubble; or leaving them in rubble.
There are two schools of thought on that.  So they say to take it by
assault.  They repeat this.

'This has been rigidly confirmed by some politician in uniform who has
never killed in his life, except with his mouth over the telephone, or
on paper, nor ever has been hit.  Figure him as our next President if
you want him.  Figure him any way you like.  But figure him and his
people, the whole great business establishment, so far back that the
best way to communicate with them rapidly would be by racing carrier
pigeons.  Except, with the amount of security they maintained for their
proper persons, they would probably have their anti-aircraft shoot the
pigeons down.  If they could hit them.

'So you do it again.  Then I will tell you what it looks like.'

The Colonel looked up at the play of the light on the ceiling.  It was
reflected, in part, from the Canal.  It made strange, but steady
movements, changing, as the current of a trout stream changes, but
remaining, still changing as the sun moved.

Then he looked at his great beauty, with her strange, dark, grown-up
child's face that broke his heart, that he would be leaving before 1335
(that was sure) and he said, 'Let's not talk about the war, Daughter.'

'Please,' she said.  'Please.  Then I will have it all this week.'

'That's a short sentence.  I mean using the word sentence as a jail
sentence.'

'You don't know how long a week can be when you are nineteen.'

'Several times I have known how long an hour can be,' the Colonel said.
'I could tell you how long two minutes and a half can be.'

'Please tell me.'

'Well, I had two days' leave in Paris between the Schnee-Eifel fight
and this one, and due to my friendship with one or two people I was
privileged to be present at some sort of a meeting, where only the
accredited and trusted were present, and General Walter Bedell Smith
explained to all of us how easy the operation that later took the name
of Hurtgen Forest would be.  It was not really Hurtgen Forest.  That
was only a small sector.  It was the Stadtswald and it was where the
German High Command had figured, exactly, to fight after Aachen had
been taken and the road into Germany breached.  I hope I am not boring
you.'

'You never bore me.  Nothing about fighting bores me except lies.'

'You're a strange girl.'

'Yes,' she said.  'I've known that for quite a long time.'

'Would you really like to fight?'

'I don't know if I could do it.  But I could try if you taught me.'

'I'll never teach you.  I'll just tell you anecdotes.'

'Sad stories of the death of kings.'

'No.  GIs somebody christened them.  God how I hate that word and how
it was used.  Comic book readers.  All from some certain place.  Most
of them there unwillingly.  Not all.  But they all read a paper called
"The Stars and Stripes" and you had to get your unit into it, or you
were unsuccessful as a commander.  I was mostly unsuccessful.  I tried
to like the correspondents and there were some very good ones present
at this meeting.  I will not name names because I might omit some fine
ones and that would be unjust.  There were good ones that I don't
remember.  Then, there were draft dodgers, phonies who claimed that
they were wounded if a piece of spent metal ever touched them, people
who wore the purple heart from jeep accidents, insiders, cowards,
liars, thieves and telephone racers.  There were a few deads missing
from this briefing.  They had deads too.  A big percentage.  But none
of the deads were present as I said.  They had women at it though in
wonderful uniforms.'

'But how did you ever marry one?'

'By mistake as I explained before.'

'Go on and tell me.'

'There were more maps in the room than Our Lord could read on his best
day,' the Colonel continued.  'There were the Big Picture, the Semi-Big
Picture and the Super-Big-Picture.  All these people pretended to
understand them, as did the boys with the pointers, a sort of
half-arsed billiard cue that they used for explanation.'

'Don't say rough words.  I don't know, even, what half-arsed means.'

'Shortened, or abbreviated in an inefficient manner,' the Colonel
explained.  'Or deficient as an instrument, or in character.  It's an
old word.  You could probably find it in Sanscrit.'

'Please tell me.'

'What for?  Why should I perpetuate ignominy just with my mouth?'

'I'll write it if you want.  I can write truly what I hear or think.  I
would make mistakes of course.'

'You are a lucky girl if you can write truly what you hear or think.
But don't you ever write one word of this.'

He resumed, 'The place is full of correspondents dressed according to
their taste.  Some are cynical and some are extremely eager.

'To ride herd on them, and to wield the pointers, there is a group of
pistol-slappers.  We call a pistol-slapper a non-fighting man,
disguised in uniform, or you might even call it costume, who gets
excited every time the weapon slaps against his thighs.  Incidentally,
Daughter, the weapon, not the old pistol, the real pistol, has missed
more people in combat than probably any weapon in the world.  Don't
ever let anyone give you one unless you want to hit people on the head
with it in Harry's Bar.'

'I never wanted to hit anyone; except perhaps Andrea.'

'If you ever hit Andrea, hit him with the barrel; not with the butt.
The butt is awfully slow, and it misses and if it lands you get blood
on your hands when you put the gun away.  Also please do not ever hit
Andrea because he is my friend.  I do not think he would be easy to hit
either.'

'No.  I do not think so either.  Please tell me some more about the
meeting, or the assembly.  I think I could recognize a pistol-slapper
now.  But I would like to be checked out more thoroughly.'

'Well, the pistol-slappers, in all the pride of their pistol-slappery,
were awaiting the arrival of the great General who was to explain the
operation.

'The correspondents were muttering, or twittering, and the intelligent
ones were glum or passively cheerful.  Everybody sat on folding chairs
as for a Chautauqua lecture.  I'm sorry about these local terms; but we
are a local people.

'In comes the General.  He is no pistol-slapper, but a big business
man; an excellent politician, the executive type.  The Army is the
biggest business, at that moment, in the world.  He takes the
half-assed pointer, and he shows us, with complete conviction, and
without forebodings, exactly what the attack will be, why we are making
it, and how facilely it will succeed.  There is no problem.'

'Go on,' the girl said.  'Please let me fill your glass and you, please
look at the light on the ceiling.'

'Fill it and I'll look at the light and I will go on.

'This high pressure salesman, and I say this with no disrespect, but
with admiration for all his talents, or his talent, also told what we
would have of the necessary.  There would be no lack of anything.  The
organization called SHAEF was then based on a town named Versailles
outside of Paris.  We would attack to the east of Aachen a distance of
some 380 kilometres from where they were based.

'An army can get to be huge; but you can close up a little bit.  They
finally went as far forward as Rheims which was 240 kilometres from the
fighting.  That was many months later.

'I understand the necessity of the big executive being removed from
contact with his working people.  I understand about the size of the
army and the various problems.  I even understand logistics which is
not difficult.  But no one ever commanded from that far back in
history.'

'Tell me about the town.'

'I'll tell you,' the Colonel said.  'But I don't want to hurt you.'

'You never hurt me.  We are an old town and we had fighting men,
always.  We respect them more than all others and I hope we understand
them a little.  We also know they are difficult.  Usually, as people,
they are very boring to women.'

'Do I bore you?'

'What do you think?' the girl asked.

'I bore myself, Daughter.'

'I don't think you do, Richard, you would not have done something all
your life if you were bored by it.  Don't lie to me, please, darling,
when we have so little time.

'I won't.'

'Don't you see you need to tell me things to purge your bitterness?'

'I know I tell them to you.'

'Don't you know I want you to die with the grace of a happy death?  Oh,
I'm getting all mixed up.  Don't let me get too mixed up.'

'I won't, Daughter.'

'Tell me some more, please, and be just as bitter as you want.'




Chapter XXXI

'Listen, Daughter,' the Colonel said.  'Now we will cut out all
references to glamour and to high brass, even from Kansas, where the
brass grows higher than osage-orange trees along your own road.  It
bears a fruit you can't eat and it is purely Kansan.  Nobody but
Kansans ever had anything to do with it; except maybe us who fought.
We ate them every day.  Osage oranges,' he added.  'Only we called them
K Rations.  They weren't bad.  C Rations were bad.  Ten in ones were
good.

'So we fought.  It is dull but it is informative.  This is the way it
goes if anyone is ever interested; which I doubt.

'It goes like this: 1300 Red S-3: White jumped off in time.  Red said
they were waiting to tie in behind White.  1305 (that is one o'clock
and five minutes after in the afternoon, if you can remember that,
Daughter) Blue S-3, you know what an S-3 is, I hope, says, "Let us know
when you move."  Red said they were waiting to tie in behind White.

'You can see how easy it is,' the Colonel told the girl.  'Everybody
ought to do it before breakfast.'

'We cannot all be combat infantrymen,' the girl told him softly.  'I
respect it more than anything except good, honest fliers.  Please talk,
I'm taking care of you.'

'Good fliers are very good and should be respected as such,' the
Colonel said.

He looked up at the light on the ceiling and he was completely
desperate at the remembrance of his loss of his battalions, and of
individual people.  He could never hope to have such a regiment, ever.
He had not built it.  He had inherited it.  But, for a time, it had
been his great joy.  Now every second man in it was dead and the others
nearly all were wounded.  In the belly, the head, the feet or the
hands, the neck, the back, the lucky buttocks, the unfortunate chest
and the other places.  Tree burst wounds hit men where they would never
be wounded in open country.  And all the wounded were wounded for life.

'It was a good regiment,' he said.  'You might even say it was a
beautiful regiment until I destroyed it under other people's orders.'

'But why do you have to obey them when you know better?'

'In our army you obey like a dog,' the Colonel explained.  'You always
hope you have a good master.'

'What kind of masters do you get?'

'I've only had two good ones so for.  After I reached a certain level
of command, many nice people, but only two good masters.'

'Is that why you are not a General now?  I would love it if you were a
General.'

'I'd love it too,' the Colonel said.  'But maybe not with the same
intensity.'

'Would you try to sleep, please, to please me?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.

'You see, I thought that if you slept you might get rid of them, just
being asleep.'

'Yes.  Thank you very much,' he said.

There was nothing to it, gentlemen.  All a man need ever do is obey.




Chapter XXXII

'You slept quite well for a time,' the girl told him, lovingly and
gently.  'Is there anything you would like me to do?'

'Nothing,' the Colonel said.  'Thank you.'

Then he turned bad and he said, 'Daughter, I could sleep good straight
up and down in the electric chair with my pants slit and my hair
clipped.  I sleep as, and when, I need it.'

'I can never be like that,' the girl said, sleepily.  'I sleep when I
am sleepy.'

'You're lovely,' the Colonel told her.  'And you sleep better than
anyone ever slept.'

'I am not proud of it,' the girl said, very sleepily.  'It is just
something that I do.'

'Do it, please.'

'No.  Tell me very low and soft and put your bad hand in mine.'

'The hell with my bad hand,' the Colonel said.  'Since when was it so
bad?'

'It's bad,' the girl said.  'Badder, or worse, than you will ever know.
Please tell me about combat without being too brutal.'

'An easy assignment,' the Colonel said.  'I'll skip the times.  The
weather is cloudy and the place is 986342.  What's the situation?  We
are smoking the enemy with artillery and mortar.  S-3 advises that S-6
wants Red to button up by 1700.  S-6 wants you to button up and use
plenty of artillery.  White reports that they are in fair shape.  S-6
informs that A company will swing around and tie in with B.

'B Company was stopped first by enemy action and stayed there of their
own accord.  S-6 isn't doing so good.  This is unofficial.  He wants
more artillery but there isn't any more artillery.

'You wanted combat for what?  I don't know really why.  Or really know
why.  Who wants true combat?  But here it is, Daughter, on the
telephone and later I will put in the sounds and smells and anecdotes
about who was killed when and where if you want them.'

'I only want what you will tell me.'

'I'll tell you how it was,' the Colonel said, 'and General Walter
Bedell Smith doesn't know how it was yet.  Though, probably, I am
wrong, as I have been so many times.'

'I'm glad we don't have to know him or the nylon-smooth man,' the girl
said.

'We won't have to know them this side of hell,' the Colonel assured
her.  'And I will have a detail guarding the gates of hell so that no
such characters enter.'

'You sound like Dante,' she said sleepily.

'I am Mister Dante,' he said.  'For the moment.'

And for a while he was and he drew all the circles.  They were as
unjust as Dante's but he drew them.




Chapter XXXIII

'I will skip the detailed part since you are, justifiably, and should
be, sleepy,' the Colonel said.  He watched, again, the strange play of
the light on the ceiling.  Then he looked at the girl, who was more
beautiful than any girl that he had ever seen, ever.

He had seen them come and go, and they go faster, when they go, than
any other thing that flies.  They can go faster from fair beauty to the
knocker's shop than any other animal, he thought.  But I believe that
this one could hold the pace and stay the course.  The dark ones last
the best, he thought, and looked at the bony structure in that face.
This one has a fine blood line too, and she can go for ever.  Most of
our own lovely beauties come from soda counters, and they do not know
their grandfather's last name, unless, maybe, it was Schultz.  Or
Schlitz, he thought.

This is the wrong attitude to take, he said to himself; since he did
not wish to express any of these sentiments to the girl, who would not
like them anyway, and was soundly sleepy now the way a cat is when it
sleeps within itself.

'Sleep well, my dearest lovely, and I will just tell it for nothing.'

The girl was asleep, still holding his bad hand, that he despised, and
he could feel her breathe, as the young breathe when they are easily
asleep.

The Colonel told her all about it; but he did not utter it.

So after I had the privilege of hearing General Walter Bedell Smith
explain the facility of the attack, we made it.  There was the Big Red
One, who believed their own publicity.  There was the Ninth, which was
a better Division than we were.  There was us, who had always done it
when they asked for you to do it.

We had no time to read comic books, and we had no time for practically
nothing, because we always moved before first light.  This is difficult
and you have to throw away the Big Picture and be a division.

We wore a four-leaf clover, which meant nothing except among ourselves,
who all loved it.  And every time I ever see it the same thing happens
in my inner guts.  Some people thought that it was ivy.  But it was
not.  It was a four-leaf clover disguised as ivy.

The orders were that we would attack with the Big Red One, the First
Infantry Division of the Army of the United States, and they, and their
Calypso singing PRO never let you forget it.  He was a nice guy.  And
it was his job.

But you get fed up with horse-dung unless you like the aroma or the
taste.  I never liked it.  Although I loved to walk through cow-dung
when I was a kid and feel it between my toes.  But horse-dung bores
you.  It bores me very rapidly, and I can detect it at over one
thousand yards.

So we attacked, the three of us in line, exactly where the Germans
wished us to attack.  We will not mention General Walter Bedell Smith
any further.  He is not the villain.  He only made the promises and
explained how it would go.  There are no villains, I presume, in a
Democracy.  He was only just as wrong as hell.  Period, he added in his
mind.

The patches had all been removed even as far back as the rear echelon
so that no Kraut would know that it was us, the three he knew so well,
who were going to attack.  We were going to attack with the three of us
in line and nothing in reserve.  I won't try to explain what that
means, Daughter.  But it isn't any good.  And the place we were going
to fight in, which I had taken a good look at, was going to be
Passchendaele with tree bursts.  I say that too much.  But I think it
too much.

The poor bloody twenty-eighth which was up on our right had been bogged
down for some time and so there was pretty accurate information
available about what conditions in those woods were going to be like.
I think we could conservatively describe them as unfavourable.

Then we were ordered to commit one regiment before the attack started.
That means that the enemy will get at least one prisoner which makes
all the taking off of the Divisional patches silly.  They would be
waiting for the old four-leaf clover people who would go straight to
hell like a mule and do it for one hundred and five days.  Figures of
course mean nothing to civilians.  Nor to the characters from SHAEF we
never saw in those woods.  Incidentally, and of course these
occurrences are always incidental at the SHAEF level, the regiment was
destroyed.  It was no one's bloody fault, especially not the fault of
the man who commanded it.  He was a man I would be glad to spend half
my time in hell with; and may yet.

It certainly would be odd if instead of going to hell, as we always
counted on, we should go to one of those Kraut joints like Valhalla and
not be able to get along with the people.  But maybe we could get a
corner table with Rommel and Udet and it would be just like any
winter-sports hotel.  It will probably be hell though and I don't even
believe in hell.

Well anyway this regiment was rebuilt as American regiments always are
by the replacement system.  I won't describe it since you can always
read about it in a book by somebody who was a replacement.  It boils
down, or distils, to the fact you stay in until you are hit badly or
killed or go crazy and get section-eighted.  But I guess it is logical
and as good as any other, given the difficulties of transport.  However
it leaves a core of certain un-killed characters who know what the
score is and no one of these characters liked the look of these woods
much.

You could sum up their attitude In this phrase, 'Don't ---- me, Jack.'

And since I had been an un-killed character for around twenty-eight
years I could understand their attitude.  But they were soldiers, so
most of them got killed in those woods and when we took the three towns
that looked so innocent and were really fortresses.  They were just
built to tempt us and we had no word on them at all.  To continue to
use the silly parlance of my trade: this could or could not be faulty
intelligence.

'I feel terribly about the regiment,' the girl said.  She had wakened
and spoken straight from sleep.

'Yes,' said the Colonel.  'So do I.  Let's drink to it once.  Then you
go to sleep, Daughter, please.  The war is over and forgotten.'

Please don't think that I am conceited, Daughter, he said, without
speaking.  His true love was sleeping again.  She slept in a different
way than his career girl had slept.  He did not like to remember how
the career girl slept, yet he did.  But he wanted to forget it.  She
did not sleep pretty, he thought.  Not like this girl who slept as
though she were awake and alive; except she was asleep.  Please sleep
well, he thought.

Who the hell are you to criticize career girls?  he thought.  What
miserable career did you attempt and have failed at?

I wished to be, and was, a General Officer in the Army of the United
States.  I have failed and I speak badly of all who have succeeded.

Then his contrition did not last, and he said to himself, 'Except the
brown-nosers, the five and ten and twenty percenters and all the jerks
from wherever who never fought and hold commands.'

They killed several men from the Academy at Gettysburg.  That was the
big kill day of all kill days, when there was a certain amount of
opposition by both sides.

Don't be bitter.  They killed General McNair by mistake the day the
Valhalla Express came over.  Quit being bitter.  People from the
Academy were killed and there are statistics to prove it.

How can I remember if I am not bitter?

Be as bitter as you want.  And tell the girl, now silently, and that
will not hurt her, ever, because she is sleeping so lovely.  He said
lovely to himself since his thinking was often un-grammatical.




Chapter XXXIV

Sleep softly, my true love, and when you wake, this will be over and I
will joke you out of trying to learn details of the _triste metier_ of
war and we will go to buy the little negro, or moor, carved in ebony
with his fine features and his jewelled turban.  Then you will pin him
on and we will go to have a drink at Harry's and see whoever or
whatever of our friends that will be afoot at that hour.

We will lunch at Harry's, or we'll come back here and I will be packed.
We will say good-bye and I will get into the _motoscafo_ with Jackson
and make some cheerful crack to the _Gran Maestro_ and wave to any
other members of the Order and ten to one, the way I feel right now, or
two will get you thirty, we will not ever see one another again.

Hell, he said to no one and certainly not aloud, I've felt this way
before many fights and almost always at some time in the fall of the
year and always when leaving Paris.  Probably it doesn't mean a thing.

Who gives a damn anyway except me and the _Gran Maestro_ and this girl;
I mean at command level.

I give very much of a damn myself.  But I certainly should be trained
and adjusted by this time not to give a much for nothing; like the
definition of a whore.  A woman who does not, etc.

But we won't think about that boy, lieutenant, captain, major, colonel,
general, sir.  We will just lay it on the line once more and the hell
with it and with its ugly face that old Hieronymus Bosch really
painted.  But you can sheathe your scythe, old brother death, if you
have got a sheath for it.  Or, he added, thinking of Hurtgen now, you
can take your scythe and stick it.

It was Passchendaele with tree bursts, he told nobody except the wonder
light on the ceiling.  Then he looked at the girl, to see that she was
sleeping well enough so even his thoughts would not hurt her.

Then he looked at the portrait and he thought, I have her in two
positions, lying down, turned a little on her side and looking at me
straight in front.  I'm a lucky son of a bitch and I should never be
sad about anything.




Chapter XXXV

The first day there, we lost the three battalion commanders.  One
killed in the first twenty minutes and the other two hit later.  This
is only a statistic to a journalist.  But good battalion commanders
have never yet grown on trees; not even Christmas trees which was the
basic tree of that woods.  I do not know how many times we lost company
commanders how many times over.  But I could look it up.

They aren't made, nor grown, as fast as a crop of potatoes is either.
We got a certain amount of replacements but I can remember thinking
that it would be simpler and more effective, to shoot them in the area
where they de-trucked, than to have to try to bring them back from
where they would be killed and bury them.  It takes men to bring them
back and gasoline and men to bury them.  These men might just as well
be fighting and get killed too.

There was snow, or something, rain or fog, all the times and the roads
had been mined as many as fourteen mines deep in certain stretches, so
when the vehicles churned down to a new string deeper, in another part
of the mud, you were always losing vehicles and, of course, the people
that went with them.

Besides just mortaring it all to hell and having all the fire-lanes
taped for machine-gun and automatic weapon fire, they had the whole
thing worked out and canalized so however you out-thought them you ran
right into it.  They also shelled you with heavy artillery fire and
with at least one railway gun.

It was a place where it was extremely difficult for a man to stay alive
even if all he did was be there.  And we were attacking all the time
and every day.

Let's not think about it.  The hell with it.  Maybe two things I will
think about and get rid of them.  One was a bare-assed piece of hill
that you had to cross to get into Grosshau.

Just before you had to make this run, which was under observation with
fires by 88s, there was a little piece of dead ground where they could
only hit you with a howitzer, only interdicting fires, or, from the
right by mortar.  When we cleaned it up we found they had good
observation for their mortars there too.

This was a comparatively safe place, I'm really not lying, not me nor
anybody eke.  You can't fool those that were in Hurtgen and if you lied
they would know it the minute you opened your mouth, Colonel or no
Colonel.

We met a truck at this place and slowed up, and he had the usual grey
face and he said, 'Sir, there is a dead G.I. in the middle of the road
up ahead and every time any vehicle goes through they have to run over
him and I'm afraid it is making a bad impression on the troops.'

'We'll get him off the road.'

So we got him off the road.

And I can remember just how he felt, lifting him, and how he had been
flattened and the strangeness of his flatness.

Then there was one other thing, I remember.  We had put an awful lot of
white phosphorus on the town before we got in for good, or whatever you
would call it.  That was the first time I ever saw a German dog eating
a roasted German Kraut.  Later on I saw a cat working on him too.  It
was a hungry cat, quite nice looking, basically.  You wouldn't think a
good German cat would eat a good German soldier, would you, Daughter?
Or a good German dog eat a good German soldier's ass which had been
roasted by white phosphorus.

How many could you tell like that?  Plenty, and what good would they
do?  You could tell a thousand and they would not prevent war.  People
would say we are not fighting the Krauts and besides the cat did not
eat me nor my brother Gordon, because he was in the Pacific.  Maybe
land crabs ate Gordon.  Or maybe he just deliquesced.

In Hurtgen they just froze up hard; and it was so cold they froze up
with ruddy faces.  Very strange.  They all were grey and yellow like
wax-works, in the summer.  But once the winter really came they had
ruddy faces.

Real soldiers never tell anyone what their own dead looked like, he
told the portrait.  And I'm through with this whole subject.  And what
about that company dead up the draw?  What about them, professional
soldier?

They're dead, he said.  And I can hang and rattle.

Now who would join me in a glass of Valpolicella?  What time do you
think I should wake your opposite number, you girl?  We have to get to
that jewellery place.  And I look forward to making jokes and to
talking of the most cheerful things.

What's cheerful, portrait?  You ought to know.  You're smarter than I
am, although you haven't been around as much.

All right, canvas girl, the Colonel told her, not saying it aloud,
we'll drop the whole thing and in eleven minutes I will wake the live
girl up and we will go out on the town and be cheerful and leave you
here to be wrapped.

I didn't mean to be rude.  I was just joking roughly.  I don't wish to
be rude ever because I will be living with you from now on.  I hope, he
added, and drank a glass of the wine.




Chapter XXXVI

It was a sharp, cold bright day and they stood outside the window of
the jeweller's shop and studied the two small negro heads and torsos
that were carved to ebony and adorned with studded jewels.  One was as
good as the other, the Colonel thought.

'Which do you like the best, Daughter?'

'I think the one on the right.  Don't you think he has the nicer face?'

'They both have nice faces.  But I think I would rather have him attend
you if it was the old days.'

'Good.  We'll take him.  Let's go in and see them.  I must ask the
price.'

'I will go in.'

'No, let me ask the price.  They will charge me less than they would
charge you.  After all you are a rich American.'

'_Et toi_, Rimbaud?'

'You'd make an awfully funny Verlalne,' the girl told him.  'We'll be
some other famous characters.'

'Go on to, Majesty, and we'll buy the God-damn jewel.'

'You wouldn't make a very good Louis XVI either.'

'I'd get up to that tumbril with you and still be able to spit.'

'Let's forget all the tumbrils and everyone's sorrows and buy the small
object and then we can walk to Cipriani's and be famous people.'

Inside the shop they looked at the two heads and she asked the price
and then, there was some very rapid talk and the price was much lower.
But still it was more money than the Colonel had.

'I'll go to Cipriani's and get some money.'

'No,' the girl said.  Then to the clerk, 'Put it in a box and send it
to Cipriani's and say the Colonel said to pay for it and hold it for
him.'

'Please,' the clerk said.  'Exactly as you say.'

They went out into the street and the sunlight and the unremitting wind.

'By the way,' the Colonel said.  'Your stones are in the safe at the
Gritti in your name.'

'Your stones.'

'No,' he told her, not rough, but to make her understand truly.  'There
are some things that a person cannot do.  You know about that.  You
cannot marry me and I understand that, although I do not approve it.'

'Very well,' the girl said.  'I understand.  But would you take one for
a lucky stone?'

'No.  I couldn't.  They are too valuable.'

'But the portrait has value.'

'That is different.'

'Yes,' she agreed.  'I suppose so.  I think I begin to understand.'

'I would accept a horse from you, if I was poor and young and riding
very well.  But I could not take a motor car.'

'I understand it now very well.  Where can we go now, at this minute,
where you can kiss me?'

'In this side alley, if you know no one who lives in it.'

'I don't care who lives in it.  I want to feel you hold me tight and
kiss me.'

They turned into the side street and walked towards its blind end.

'Oh, Richard,' she said.  'Oh, my dear.'

'I love you.'

'Please love me.'

'I do.'

The wind had blown her hair up and around his neck and he kissed her
once more with it beating silkily against both his cheeks.

Then she broke away, suddenly and hard, and looked at him and said, 'I
suppose we had better go to Harry's.'

'I suppose so.  Do you want to play historical personages?'

'Yes,' she said.  'Let us play that you are you and I am me.'

'Let's play,' the Colonel said.




Chapter XXXVII

There was no one in Harry's except some early morning drinkers that the
Colonel did not know and two men that were doing business at the back
of the bar.

There were hours at Harry's when it filled with the people that you
knew, with the same rushing regularity as the tide coming in at Mont
St. Michel.  Except, the Colonel thought, the hours of the tides change
each day with the moon and the hours at Harry's are as the Greenwich
Meridian, or the standard metre in Paris, or the good opinion the
French military hold of themselves.

'Do you know any of these morning drinkers?' he asked the girl.

'No.  I am not a morning drinker so I have never met them.'

'They will be swept out when the tide comes in.'

'No.  They will leave, just as it comes, of their own accord.'

'Do you mind being here out of season?'

'Did you think I was a snob because I come from an old family?  We're
the ones who are not snobs.  The snobs are what you call jerks and the
people with all the new money.  Did you ever see so much new money?'

'Yes,' the Colonel said.  'I saw it in Kansas City when I used to come
in from Fort Riley to play polo at the Country Club.'

'Was it as bad as here?'

'No, it was quite pleasant.  I liked it and that part of Kansas City is
very beautiful.'

'Is it really?  I wish that we could go there.  Do they have the camps
there too?  The ones that we are going to stay at?'

'Surely.  But we'll stay at the Muehlebach hotel which has the biggest
beds in the world and we'll pretend that we are oil millionaires.'

'Where will we leave the Cadillac?'

'Is it a Cadillac now?'

'Yes.  Unless you want to take the big Buick Roadmaster, with the
Dynaflow drive.  I've driven it all over Europe.  It was in that last
_Vogue_ you sent me.'

'We'd probably better just use one at a time,' the Colonel said.
'Whichever one we decide to use we will park in the garage alongside
the Muehlebach.'

'Is the Muehlebach very splendid?'

'Wonderful.  You'll love it.  When we leave town we'll drive north to
St. Joe and have a drink in the bar at the Roubidoux, maybe two drinks
and then we will cross the river and go west.  You can drive and we can
spell each other.'

'What is that?'

'Take turns driving.'

'I'm driving now.'

'Let's skip the dull part and get to Chimney Rock and go on to Scott's
Bluff and Torrington and after that you will begin to see it.'

'I have the road maps and the guides and that man who says where to eat
and the A.A.A. guide to the camps and the hotels.'

'Do you work on this much?'

'I work at it in the evenings, with the things you sent me.  What kind
of a licence will we have?'

'Missouri.  We'll buy the car in Kansas City.  We fly to Kansas City,
don't you remember?  Or we can go on a really good train.'

'I thought we flew to Albuquerque.'

'That was another time.'

'Will we stop early in the afternoons at the best Hotel in the A.A.A.
book and I make you any drinks you want while you read the paper and
_Life_ and _Time_ and _Newsweek_ and I will read the new fresh _Vogue_
and _Harper's Bazaar_?

'Yes.  But we come back here, too.'

'Of course.  With our car.  On an Italian liner; whichever one is best
then.  We drive straight here from Genoa.'

'You don't want to stop anywhere for the night?'

'Why?  We want to get home to our own house.'

'Where will our house be?'

'We can decide that any time.  There are always plenty of houses in
this town.  Would you like to live in the country too?'

'Yes,' said the Colonel.  'Why not?'

'Then we could see the trees when we woke up.  What sort of trees will
we see on this journey?'

'Pine mostly and cotton-wood along the creeks and aspen.  Wait till you
see the aspen turn yellow in the fall.'

'I'm waiting.  Where will we stay in Wyoming?'

'We'll go to Sheridan first and then decide.'

'Is Sheridan nice?'

'It's wonderful.  In the car we'll drive to where they had the
Wagon-Box Fight and I'll tell you about it.  We will drive up, on the
way to Billings, to where they killed that fool George Armstrong Custer
and you can see the markers where everybody died and I'll explain the
fight to you.'

'That will be wonderful.  Which is Sheridan more like; Mantova or
Verona or Vicenza?'

'It isn't like any of those.  It is right up against the mountains,
almost like Schio.'

'Is it like Cortina then?'

'Nothing like.  Cortina is in a high valley in the mountains.  Sheridan
lays right up against them.  There aren't any foothills to the Big
Horns.  They rise high out of the plateau.  You can see Cloud's Peak.'

'Will our cars climb them properly?'

'You're damn right they will.  But I would much rather not have any
hydromatic drive.'

'I can do without it,' the girl said.  Then she held herself straight
and hard not to cry.  'As I can do without everything else.'

'What are you drinking?' the Colonel said.  'We haven't even ordered
yet.'

'I don't think I will drink anything.'

'Two very dry Martinis,' the Colonel said to the bartender, 'and a
glass of cold water.'

He reached into his pocket and unscrewed the top of the medicine bottle
and shook two of the big tablets into his left hand.  With them in his
hand, he screwed the top back on the bottle.  It was no feat for a man
with a bad right hand.

'I said I didn't want to drink anything.'

'I know, Daughter.  But I thought you might need one.  We can leave it
on the bar.  Or I can drink it myself.  Please,' he said.  'I did not
mean to be brusque.'

'We haven't asked for the little negro that will look after me.'

'No.  Because I did not want to ask for him until Cipriani came in and
I could pay for him.'

'Is everything that rigid?'

'With me, I guess,' the Colonel said.  'I'm sorry, Daughter.'

'Say daughter three times straight.'

'_Hija, figlia_, Daughter.'

'I don't know,' she said.  'I think we should just leave here.  I love
to have people see us, but I don't want to see anybody.'

'The box with the negro in it is on top of the cash register.'

'I know.  I've seen it for some time.'

The bar-tender came, with the two drinks, frost cold from the chilled
coldness of the glasses and he brought the glass of water.

'Give me that small packet that came in my name and is on top of the
cash register,' the Colonel said to him.  'Tell Cipriani I will send
him a cheque for it.'

He had made another decision.

'Do you want your drink, Daughter?'

'Yes.  If you don't mind me changing my mind too.'

They drank, after touching glasses very lightly, so lightly that the
contact was almost imperceptible.

'You were right,' she said, feeling its warmth and its momentary
destruction of sorrow.

'You were right too,' he said, and palmed the two tablets.

He thought taking them with the water now, was in bad taste.  So, when
the girl turned her head a moment to watch a morning drinker go out to
the door, he swallowed them with the Martini.

'Should we go, Daughter?'

'Yes.  By all means.'

'Bar-tender,' the Colonel said.  'How much are these drinks?  And do
not forget to tell Cipriani I am sending him a cheque for this
nonsense.'




Chapter XXXVIII

They ate lunch at the Gritti and the girl had unwrapped the small ebony
negro's head and torso and pinned it high on her left shoulder.  It was
about three inches long and was quite lovely to look at if you liked
that sort of thing.  And if you don't you are stupid, the Colonel
thought.

But do not even think rough, he told himself.  You have to be good now
in every way until you say good-bye.  What a word, he thought, good-bye.

It sounds like a Valentine slogan.

Good-bye and _bonne chance_ and _hasta la vista_.  We always just said
_merde_ and let it go at that.  Farewell, he thought, that is a nice
word.  It sings well, he thought.  Farewell, a long farewell and take
it with you where you go.  With handles, he thought.

'Daughter,' he said.  'How long has it been since I told you that I
loved you?'

'Not since we sat at the table.'

'I tell you now.'

She had combed her hair with patience when they came into the hotel and
she had gone into the room for women.  She disliked such rooms.

She had used lipstick to make the sort of mouth she knew he most
desired and she had said to herself, making the mouth correctly, 'Don't
think at all.  Don't think.  Above all don't be sad because he is going
now.'

'You look beautiful.'

'Thank you.  I would like to be beautiful for you if I could and if I
could be beautiful.'

'Italian is a lovely language.'

'Yes.  Mister Dante thought so.'

'_Gran Maestro_,' the Colonel said.  'What is there to eat in this
_Wirtschaft_?'

The _Gran Maestro_ had been observing, without observing, with
affection and without envy.

'Do you want meat, or fish?'

'It's Saturday,' the Colonel said.  'Fish is not compulsory.  So I'll
take it.'

'It is sole,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'What do you want, my Lady?'

'Whatever you decide.  You know more about food than I do and I like it
all.'

'Make a decision, Daughter.'

'No.  I would rather leave it to someone who knows more than me.  I
have a boarding-school appetite.'

'It will come as a surprise,' the _Gran Maestro_ said with his long and
loving face with the grey eyebrows over the softly hooded eyes and the
ever happy face of the old soldier who is still alive and appreciates
it.

'Is there any news from the Order?' the Colonel asked.

'Only that our leader, Himself, is in trouble.  They have confiscated
everything he owns.  Or at any rate they have intervened.'

'I hope it is not serious.'

'We will have confidence in our leader.  He has ridden out worse
tempests than this.'

'To our leader,' the Colonel said.

He raised his glass, which had been filled with the decanted new and
true Valpolicella.  'Drink to him, Daughter.'

'I can't drink to that swine,' the girl said.  'Besides I do not belong
to the Order.'

'You are a member now,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  '_Por merito di
guerra_.'

'I'll drink to him then,' she said.  'Am I really a member of the
Order?'

'Yes,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.  'You have not received your parchment
yet but I appoint you Super Honorary Secretary.  My Colonel will reveal
to you the secrets of the Order.  Reveal, please, my Colonel.'

'I reveal', the Colonel said.  'There are no pitted folk about?'

'No.  He is out with his Lady.  Miss Baedeker.'

'O.K.  then,' the Colonel said.  'I will reveal.  There is only the
major secret that you must know.  Correct me, _Gran Maestro_, if I fall
into error.'

'Proceed to reveal,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.

'I proceed to reveal,' the Colonel said.  'Listen carefully, Daughter.
This is the Supreme Secret.  Listen.  'Love is love and fun is fun.
But it is always so quiet when the gold fish die.'

'It has been revealed,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.

'I am very proud and happy to be a member of the Order,' the girl said.
'But it is, in a way, a rather rough Order.'

'It is indeed,' the Colonel said.  'And now, _Gran Maestro_, what do we
actually eat; without mysteries?'

'Some crab _enchillada_, in the style of this town, but cold, first.
Served in the shell.  Then sole for you and for my lady a mixed grill.
What vegetables?'

'Whatever you have,' the Colonel said.

The _Gran Maestro_ was gone and the Colonel looked at the girl and then
at the Grand Canal outside the window and he saw the magic spots and
changes of light that were even here, in the end of the bar, which had
now by skilful handling been made into a dining-room, and he said, 'Did
I tell you, Daughter, that I love you?'

'You haven't told me for quite a long time.  But I love you.'

'What happens to people that love each other?'

'I suppose they have whatever they have and they are more fortunate
than others.  Then one of them gets the emptiness for ever.'

'I won't be rough,' the Colonel said.  'I could have made a rough
response.  But please don't have any emptiness.'

'I'll try,' the girl said.  'I've been trying ever since I woke up.
I've tried ever since we knew each other.'

'Keep on trying, Daughter,' the Colonel said.

Then to the Grand Maestro, who had reappeared, having given his orders,
the Colonel said, 'A bottle of that _vino secco_, from Vesuvius, for
the small soles.  We have the Valpolicella for the other things.'

'Can't I drink the Vesuvius wine with my mixed grill?' the girl asked.

'Renata, Daughter,' the Colonel said.  'Of course.  You can do
anything.'

'I like to drink the same wines as you if I drink wine.'

'Good white wine is good with a mixed grill, at your age,' the Colonel
told her.

'I wish there was not such a difference in ages.'

'I like it very much,' the Colonel said.  'Except,' he added.  Then he
did not continue and said, 'Let's be _fraîche et rose comme au jour de
bataille_.'

'Who said that?'

'I haven't the slightest idea.  I picked it up when I took a course at
the _Collège des Maréchaux_.  A rather pretentious title.  But I
graduated.  What I know best I learned from the Krauts, studying them
and opposing them.  They are the best soldiers.  But they always
over-reach.'

'Let's be like you said and please tell me that you love me.'

'I love you,' he said.  'That's what you can base on.  I tell you
truly.'

'It is Saturday,' she said.  'And when is next Saturday?'

'Next Saturday is a movable feast, Daughter.  Find me a man who can
tell me about next Saturday.'

'You could tell me if you would.'

'I'll ask the _Gran Maestro_, maybe he knows.  _Gran Maestro_, when
will next Saturday come?'

'_A Pâques ou à la Trinité_,' the _Gran Maestro_ said.

'Why don't we have any smells from the kitchen to cheer us up?'

'Because the wind is from the wrong direction.'

Yes, the Colonel thought.  The wind is from the wrong direction and how
lucky I would have been to have had this girl instead of the woman that
I pay alimony to, who could not even make a child.  She hired out for
that.  But who should criticize whose tubes?  I only criticize Goodrich
or Firestone or General.

Keep it clean, he said to himself.  And love your girl.

She was there beside him, wishing to be loved, if he had any love to
give.

It came back, as it always had, when he saw her and he said, 'How are
you with the crow wing hair and the break-heart face?'

'I'm fine.'

'_Gran Maestro_,' the Colonel said.  'Produce a few smells or something
from your off-stage kitchen, even if the wind is against us.'




Chapter XXXIX

The hall porter had telephoned, under the direction of the concierge,
and it was the same motor boat that they had ridden in before.

T5 Jackson was in the boat with the luggage and the portrait, which had
been well and sturdily wrapped.  It was still blowing hard.

The Colonel had paid his bill and made the proper tips.  The people of
the hotel had put the luggage and the picture in the boat and seen that
Jackson was seated properly.  Then they had retired.

'Well, Daughter,' the Colonel said.

'Can't I ride with you to the garage?'

'It would be just as bad at the garage.'

'Please let me ride to the garage.'

'All right,' the Colonel said.  'It's your show, really.  Get in.'

They did not talk at all and the wind was a stern wind so that, with
what speed the old calamity of a motor made, there seemed almost to be
no wind at all.

At the landing place, where Jackson was handing the luggage to a porter
and looking after the portrait himself, the Colonel said, 'Do you want
to say good-bye here?'

'Do I have to?'

'No.'

'May I come up to the bar in the garage while they are getting the car
down?'

'That will be worse.'

'I do not care.'

'Get that stuff up to the garage and have somebody look after it until
you get the car down,' the Colonel said to Jackson.  'Check on my guns
and pack this stuff in a way to give the maximum space in the rear
seat.'

'Yes, sir,' Jackson said.

'Am I going then?' the girl asked.

'No,' the Colonel told her.

'Why can't I go?'

'You know very well.  You weren't invited.'

'Please don't be bad.'

'Christ, Daughter, if you knew how hard I am trying not to be.  It's
easy if you're bad.  Let's pay this good man off and go over and sit on
the bench there under the tree.'

He paid the owner of the motor boat and told him that he had not
forgotten about the jeep engine.  He also told him not to count on it,
but that there was a good chance that he could get it.

'It will be a used engine.  But it will be better than that coffee pot
you have in there now.'

They went up the worn stone steps and walked across the gravel and sat
on a bench under the trees.

The trees were black and moved in the wind and there were no leaves on
them.  The leaves had fallen early that year and been swept up long ago.

A man came over to offer postcards for sale and the Colonel told him,
'Run along, son.  We don't need you now.'

The girl was crying, finally, although she had made the decision never
to cry.

'Look, Daughter,' the Colonel said.  'There isn't anything to say.
They didn't instal shock-absorbers in this vehicle we ride in now.'

'I've stopped,' she said.  'I'm not an hysterical.'

'I wouldn't say you were.  I'd say you were the loveliest and most
beautiful girl that ever lived.  Any time.  Any place.  Anywhere.'

'If it were true, what difference would it make?'

'You have me there,' the Colonel said.  'But it is true.'

'So now what?'

'So now we stand up and kiss each other and say good-bye.'

'What's that?'

'I don't know,' the Colonel said.  'I guess that is one of the things
everybody has to figure out for themselves.'

'I'll try to figure it.'

'Just take it as easy as you can, Daughter.'

'Yes,' the girl said.  'In the vehicle without the shock-absorbers.'

'You were tumbril bait from the start.'

'Can't you do anything kindly?'

'I guess not.  But I've tried.'

'Please keep on trying.  That's all the hope we have.'

'I'll keep on trying.'

So they held each other close and kissed each other hard and true and
the Colonel took the girl across the stretch of gravel and down the
stone steps.

'You ought to take a good one.  Not that old displaced engine boat.'

'I'd rather take the displaced engine boat if you don't mind.'

'Mind?' the Colonel said.  'Not me.  I only give orders and obey
orders.  I don't mind.  Good-bye, my dear, lovely, beautiful.'

'Good-bye,' she said.




Chapter XL

He was in the sunken oak hogshead that they used in the Veneto for
blinds.  A blind is any artifice you use to hide the shooter from that
which he is attempting to shoot, which, in this case, were ducks.

It had been a good trip out with the boys, once they had met in the
garage and a good evening with excellent food cooked on the old
open-hearth kitchen.  Three shooters rode in the rear seat, on the way
to the shooting place.  Those who did not lie had permitted themselves
a certain amount of exaggeration and the liars had never been in fuller
flower.

A liar, in full flower, the Colonel had thought, is as beautiful as
cherry trees, or apple trees when they are in blossom.  Who should ever
discourage a liar, he thought, unless he is giving you co-ordinates?

The Colonel had collected liars all his life, as some men gather
postage stamps.  He did not classify them, except at the moment, nor
treasure them truly.  He just enjoyed, completely, hearing them lie at
the moment, unless, of course, something concerned with duty was
involved.  Last night there had been a fair amount of good lying after
the grappa had been passed around and the Colonel had enjoyed it.

There had been smoke in the room from the open charcoal fire; no, there
were logs, he thought.  Anyway a liar lies best when there is a little
smoke or when the sun has set.

He had come close to lying twice himself and had held it up and merely
exaggerated.  I hope anyway, he thought.

Now here was the frozen lagoon to ruin everything.  But it was not
ruined.

A pair of pin-tails came, suddenly, from nowhere, slanting down fast in
a dive no aeroplane ever made, and the Colonel heard their feathered
trajectory and swung and killed the drake.  He lay on the ice, hitting
it as solid as a duck can hit ice and, before he was down, the Colonel
had killed his mate, who was climbing, long-necked and fast.

She fell alongside the drake.

So it is murder, the Colonel thought.  And what isn't nowadays?  But,
boy, you can still shoot.

Boy, hell, he thought.  You beat-up old bastard.  But look at them come
now.

They were widgeon and they came in a whisp that coagulated and then
stretched to nothing.  Then they coagulated again and the treacherous
duck on the ice started to talk to them.

Let them turn once more, the Colonel said to himself.  Keep your head
down and do not move even your eyes.  They are going to come in.

They came in well, with treachery speaking to them.

Their wings were suddenly set to alight, as when you lower the flaps.
Then they saw it was ice and they rose, climbing.

The shooter, who was not a Colonel now, nor anything but a gun handler,
rose in the wooden barrel and got two.  They hit the ice almost as
solidly as the big ducks.

Two is enough from one family, the Colonel said.  Or was it one tribe?

The Colonel heard a shot behind him, where he knew there was no other
blind and turned his head to look across the frozen lagoon to the far,
sedge-lined shore.

That does it, he thought.

A bunch of mallards, that had been coming in low, were flaring up into
the sky, seeming to stand on their tails as they climbed.

He saw one fall, then heard another shot.

It was the sullen boatman shooting at the ducks that would have come to
the Colonel.

How, how can he do that? The Colonel thought.

The man had a shot-gun to shoot any cripples that might be escaping
where the dog could not get them.  For him to fire at ducks that were
coming to the Colonel's blind was, in shooting, as bad a thing as one
man could do to another.

The boatman was too far away to hear a shout.  So the Colonel fired at
him twice.

It is too far for the pellets to reach, he thought, but at least he
will know that I know what he is doing.  What the hell is this all
about?  On a beautifully run shoot like this one too?  This is the best
organized and best run duck shoot I have ever shot at and I have had as
much fun shooting here as I ever had in my life.  What is the matter
with that son of a bitch?

He knew how bad his anger was for him.  So he took two of the pills and
washed them down with a drink of Gordon's gin from his flask since
there was no water.

He knew the gin was bad for him too and he thought, everything is bad
for me except rest and very light exercise.  O.K., rest and light
exercise, boy.  Do you suppose that is light exercise?

You, beauty, he said to himself.  I wish you were here now and we were
in the double blind and if we could only just feel the backs of our
shoulders touch.  I'd look around and see you and I would shoot the
high ducks well, to show off and try to put one in the blind without
having it hit you.  I'd try to pull one down like this, he said,
hearing the wings in the air.  He rose, turned, saw the single drake,
long-necked and beautiful, the wings fast moving and travelling to the
sea.  He saw him sharp and clear and in the sky with the mountains
behind him.  He met him, covered him and pulled as he swung as far back
as he could swing the gun.

The drake came down on the ice, just outside the perimeter of the blind
and broke the ice as he fell.  It was the ice that had been broken to
put out the decoys and it had re-frozen lightly.  The calling hen
looked at him as he lay and shifted her feet.

'You never saw him before in your life,' the Colonel said to the hen.
'I don't believe you even saw him coming.  Though you may have.  But
you didn't say anything.'

The drake had hit with his head down and his head was under the ice.
But the Colonel could see the beautiful winter plumage on his breast
and wings.

I'd like to give her a vest made of the whole plumage the way the old
Mexicans used to ornament their gods, he thought.  But I suppose these
ducks have to go to the market and no one would know how to skin and
cure the skins anyway.  It could be beautiful, though, with mallard
drake skins for the back and sprig for the front with two longitudinal
stripes of teal.  One coming down over each breast.  Be a hell of a
vest.  I'm pretty sure she'd like it.

I wish they would fly, the Colonel thought.  A few fool ducks might
come in.  I have to stay ready for them if they do.  But none came in
and he had to think.

There were no shots from the other blinds and only occasional shots
from the sea.

With the good light, the birds could see the ice and they no longer
came in and instead went out to the open sea to raft up.  So he had no
shooting and he thought without intention, trying to find what had made
it at the first.  He knew he did not deserve it and he accepted it and
he lived by it, but he sought, always, to understand it.

One time it had been two sailors when he had been walking with the girl
at night.  They had whistled at her and, the Colonel thought, that was
a harmless enough thing and he should have let it go.

But there was something wrong with it.  He sensed it before he knew it.
Then he knew it solidly, because he had stopped under a light, in order
that they might see what he wore on his shoulders, so that they might
take the other side of the street.

What he wore on each shoulder was a small eagle with wings
outstretched.  It was embroidered on to the coat he wore in silver
thread.  It was not conspicuous and it had been there a long time.  But
it was visible.

The two sailors whistled again.

'Stay over there against the wall if you want to watch it,' the Colonel
had said to the girl.  'Or look away.'

'They are very big and young.'

'They won't be big for long,' the Colonel promised her.

The Colonel walked over to the whistlers.

'Where is your shore patrol?' he asked.

'How would I know?' the biggest whistler said.  'All I want is a good
look at the dame.'

'Do people like you have names and serial numbers?'

'How would I know?' said one.

The other said, 'I wouldn't tell a chicken Colonel if I had.'

Old army boy, the Colonel thought, before he hit him.  Sea lawyer.
Knows all his rights.

But he hit him with a left from nowhere and hit him three times as he
started to go.

The other one, the first whistler, had closed fast and well, for a man
who had been drinking, and the Colonel gave him the elbow in the mouth
and then, under the light, had a good right hand shot at him.  When it
was in, he glanced at the second whistler and saw that was okay.

Then he threw a left hook.  Then he put the right way into the body,
coming up.  He threw another left hook and then turned away and walked
towards the girl because he did not want to hear the head hit the
pavement.

He checked on the one that had it first and noted he slept peacefully,
chin down, with the blood coming out of his mouth.  But it was still
the right colour, the Colonel noted.

'Well, there goes my career,' he said to the girl.  'Whatever that was.
But those people certainly wear funny pants.'

'How are you?' the girl asked.

'I'm fine.  Did you watch it?'

'Yes.'

'I'll have bad hands in the morning,' he said absent mindedly.  'But I
think we can walk away from it all right.  But let's walk slowly.'

'Please walk slowly.'

'I did not mean it that way.  I mean let's not be hurried in our
departure.'

'We will walk as slowly as two people can walk.'

So they walked.

'Do you want to try an experiment?'

'Of course.'

'Let's walk so we make even the backs of our legs look dangerous.'

'I'll try.  But I don't think I can.'

'Well, let's just walk then.'

'But didn't they hit you?'

'One pretty good right behind the ear.  The second boy when he came in.'

'Is that what fighting's like?'

'When you're lucky.'

'And when you're not lucky?'

'Your knees bend too.  Either forward or backward.'

'Do you still care for me after you have fought?'

'I love you much more than before if it were possible.'

'Can't it be possible?  It would be nice.  I love you more since I saw
that thing.  Am I walking slowly enough?'

'You walk like a deer in the forest and sometimes you walk as well as a
wolf, or an old, big coyote when he is not hurried.'

'I'm not sure I wish to be an old big coyote.'

'Wait till you see one,' the Colonel said.  'You'll wish.  You walk
like all the great predators, when they walk softly.  And you are not a
predator.'

'That I can promise.'

'Walk a little ahead so I can see.'

She walked ahead and the Colonel said, 'You walk like a champion before
he is the champion.  If you were a horse I would buy you if I had to
borrow the money at twenty per cent a month.'

'You don't have to buy me.'

'I know about that.  That was not what we were discussing.  We were
discussing your gait.'

'Tell me,' she said.  'What happens to those men?  That's one of the
things I don't know about fighting.  Shouldn't I have stayed and cared
for them?'

'Never,' the Colonel told her.  'Remember that; never.  I hope they
split a good concussion between them.  They can rot.  They caused the
accident.  There is no question of civil responsibility.  We were all
insured.  If I can tell you one thing, Renata, about fighting.'

'Tell me, please.'

'If you ever fight, then you must win it.  That's all that counts.  All
the rest is cabbage, as my old friend Dr. Rommel put it.'

'Did you really like Rommel?'

'Very much.'

'But he was your enemy.'

'I love my enemies, sometimes, more than my friends.  And the Navy, you
know, wins all their fights always.  This I learned in a place called
the Pentagon building when I was still permitted to enter that building
by the front door.  If you like we can stroll back down this street, or
walk it fast and ask those two that question.'

'I tell you truly, Richard.  I have seen enough fighting for one night.'

'Me too, to tell the truth,' the Colonel said.  But he said it in
Italian and it started, '_Anche io_.  Let's go to Harry's for one, and
then I will walk you home.'

'Didn't you hurt your bad hand?'

'No,' he explained.  'I only threw it once to the head.  The other
times I punched to the body with it.'

'May I feel it?'

'If you will feel very softly.'

'But it is terribly swollen.'

'There is nothing broken in it and that sort of swelling always goes
down.'

'Do you love me?'

'Yes.  I love you with two moderately swollen hands and all my heart.'




Chapter XLI

So that was that and maybe it was that day or maybe it was another that
made the miracle.  You never knew, he thought.  There was the great
miracle and he had never consciously implemented it.  Nor, he thought,
you son of a bitch, did you ever oppose it.

It was colder than ever and the broken ice re-froze and the calling
duck did not even look up now.  She had abandoned treachery for an
attempt at security.

You bitch, the Colonel thought.  Though that is unjust.  It is your
trade.  But why is it a hen calls better than a drake.  You ought to
know, he thought.  And even that's not true.  What the hell is true?
Drakes actually call better.

Now don't think of her.  Don't think of Renata because it won't do you
any good, boy.  It might even be bad for you.  Also you said good-bye.
What a good-bye that was.  Complete with tumbrils.  And she would have
climbed up in the damned tumbril with you too.  Just so long as it was
a real tumbril.  Very rough trade, he thought.  Loving and leaving.
People can get hurt at it.

Who gave you a right to know a girl like that?

Nobody, he answered.  But Andrea introduced me to her.

But how could she love a sad son of a bitch like you?

I do not know, he thought truly.  I truly do not know.

He did not know, among other things, that the girl loved him because he
had never been sad one waking morning of his life; attack or no attack.
He had experienced anguish and sorrow.  But he had never been sad in
the morning.

They make almost none like that and the girl, although she was a young
girl, knew one when she saw one.

Now she is at home and sleeping, the Colonel thought.  That is where
she ought to be and not in any god-damn duck blind with the decoys
frozen up on us.

I wish to hell she was here though, if this were a double blind and
have her looking to the west just in case one string did come in.  It
would be nice if she were warm enough.  Maybe I can trade somebody out
of one of these real down jackets that nobody ever sold that had one.
The kind they issued to the Air Force once by mistake.

I could find out how they are quilted and make one with duck down from
here, he thought.  I'd get a good tailor to cut it and we would make it
double-breasted with no pocket on the right and lay in a chamois
shooting patch so the gun butt would never catch.

I'll do it, he said to himself.  I'll do it, or I will get one off some
joker and have it cut down for her.  I'd like to get her a good Purdey
12, not too damn light, or a pair of Boss over and unders.  She should
have guns as good as she is.  I suppose a pair of Purdey's, he thought.

Just then he heard the light swish of pinions, fast beating in the air,
and looked up.  But they were too high.  He only looked up with his
eyes.  But they were so high they could see the barrel with him in it
and the frozen-in decoys with the dejected hen, who saw them too and
quacked hard in her loyal treachery.  The ducks, they were pin-tails,
continued on their flight out towards the sea.


I never gave her anything, as she pointed out.  There was the small
moor's head.  But it does not mean anything.  She selected it and I
bought it.  That is no way to give a gift.

What I would like to give her is security, which does not exist any
more; all my love, which is worthless; all my worldly goods, which are
practically non-existent except for two good shot-guns, my soldier
suits, the medals and decorations with the citations and some books.
Also a retired Colonel's pay.

With all my worldly goods I thee endow, he thought.

And she gave me her love, some hard stones, which I returned, and the
picture.  Well, I can always give her back the picture.  I could give
her my ring from V.M.I., he thought, but where the hell did I lose that?

She wouldn't want a D.S.C. with cluster, nor two silver stars, nor the
other junk, nor the medals of her own country.  Nor those of France.
Nor those of Belgium.  Nor the trick ones.  That would be morbid.

I better just give her my love.  But how the hell do you send it?  And
how do you keep it fresh?  They can't pack it in dry ice.

Maybe they can.  I must inquire.  But how do I get that condemned jeep
engine to that old man?

Figure it out, he thought.  Figuring things out has been your trade.
Figuring things out when they were shooting at you, he added.

I wish that son of a bitch that is lousing up the duck shooting had a
rifle and I had a rifle.  We would find out pretty soon who could
figure things out.  Even in a lousy barrel in a marsh where you can't
manoeuvre.  He'd have to come to get me.

Stop that, he said to himself, and think about your girl.  You do not
want to kill anyone any more; ever.

Who are you feeding that to, he told himself.  You going to run as a
Christian?  You might give it an honest try.  She would like you better
that way.  Or would she?  I don't know, he said frankly.  I honest to
God don't know.

Maybe I will get Christian towards the end.  Yes, he said, maybe you
will.  Who wants to make a bet on that?

'You want to bet on that?' he asked the calling duck.  But she was
looking up at the sky behind him and had commenced her small chuckling
talk.

They came over too high and never circled.  They only looked down and
went on towards the open sea.

They must really be rafted up out there, the Colonel thought.  There's
probably some punt gunner trying to sneak up on them now.  They will be
pretty close into the lee with the wind and someone is sneaking on to
them now surely.  Well, when he makes his shot some may break back this
way.  But with it frozen-up I suppose I really ought to pull out
instead of staying here like a fool.

I have killed enough and I have shot as well or better than I can
shoot.  Better hell, he thought.  Nobody shoots better than you here
except Alvarito and he's a kid and shoots faster.  But you kill fewer
ducks than many bad and fair shots.

Yes, I know about that.  I know about that and why and we don't go by
the numbers any more and we threw away the book too, remember?

He remembered how, by some miracle of chance in a war, he had been with
his best friend for a moment in action in the Ardennes and they were
pursuing.

It was early fall and it was on a high upland with sandy roads and
trails and the trees were scrub oak and pines.  The enemy tank and half
track prints showed clearly in the moist sand.

It had rained the day before, but now it was clearing and visibility
was good and you could see well across all the high, rolling country
and he and his friend were glassing it as carefully as though they were
hunting game.

The Colonel, who was a General then and an assistant divisional
commander, knew the individual print of each tracked vehicle they were
pursuing.  He also knew when the enemy vehicles had run out of mines
and approximately the number of rounds that remained to them.  He also
had figured where they had to fight before they reached the Siegfried.
He was sure they would not fight at either of these two places but
would race for where they were going.

'We're pretty far up for people of our exalted rank, George,' he said
to his best friend.

'Ahead of the point, General.'

'It's okay,' the Colonel had said.  'Now we throw away the book and
chase for keeps.'

'I couldn't agree more fully, General.  Because I wrote the book
myself,' his best friend said.  'But suppose they had left something
there?'

He pointed to the logical place to defend.

'They didn't leave anything there,' the Colonel had said.  'They
haven't enough stuff left even for a fire-fight.'

'Everybody's right until he's wrong,' his best friend said, adding,
'General.'

'I'm right,' the Colonel said.  He was right, too, although in
obtaining his exact knowledge he had not fulfilled the complete spirit
of the Geneva Convention which was alleged to govern the operation of
war.

'Let's really chase,' his best friend had said.

'There's nothing holding us up and I guarantee they won't stop at
either of those two.  I didn't get that from any Kraut either.  That's
from my head.'

He looked over the country once more, and heard the wind in the trees
and smelled the heather under their boots and looked once more at the
tracks in the wet sand and that was the end of that story.

I wonder if she'd like that? he thought.  No.  It builds me up too
much.  I'd like to get somebody else to tell it to her though and build
me solid.  George can't tell it to her.  He's the only one that could
tell it to her and he can't.  He sure as hell can't.

I've been right over ninety-five per cent of the time and that's a hell
of a batting average even in something as simple as war.  But that five
per cent when you are wrong can certainly be something.

I'll never tell you about that, Daughter.  That's just a noise heard
off stage in my heart.  My lousy chicken heart.  That bastard heart
certainly couldn't hold the pace.

Maybe he will, he thought, and took two of the tablets and a swallow of
gin and looked across the grey ice.

I'm going to get that sullen character in now and pick up and get the
hell to the farm house or the lodge, I suppose that I should call it.
The shooting's over.




Chapter XLII

The colonel had signalled the boatman in by standing up, in the sunken
barrel, firing two shots towards the empty sky, and then waving him
towards the blind.

The boat came in slowly, breaking ice all the way, and the man picked
up the wooden decoys, caught the calling hen and put her in her sack,
and, with the dog slithering on the ice, picked up the ducks.  The
boatman's anger seemed to be gone and to be replaced by a solid
satisfaction.

'You shot very few,' he said to the Colonel.

'With your help.'

That was all they said and the boatman placed the ducks carefully,
breasts up, on the bow of the boat, and the Colonel handed his guns and
the combination cartridge box and shooting stool into the boat.

The Colonel got into the boat and the boatman checked the blind and
unhooked the pocketed, apron-like device which had hung on the inside
of the blind to hold shells.  Then he got into the boat too and they
commenced their slow and laborious progress out through the ice to the
open water of the brown canal.  The Colonel worked as hard with the
poling oar as he had worked coming in.  But now, in the bright
sunlight, with the snow mountains to the north, and the line of the
sedge that marked the canal ahead of them, they worked together in
complete co-ordination.

Then they were into the canal, slipping breakingly in from the last
ice; then, suddenly, light-borne and the Colonel handed the big oar to
the boatman and sat down.  He was sweating.

The dog, who had been shivering at the Colonel's feet, pawed his way
over the gunwale of the boat and swam to the canal bank.  Shaking the
water from his white bedraggled coat, he was into the brown sedge and
brush, and the Colonel watched his progress towards home by the
movement of the brush.  He had never received his sausage.

The Colonel, feeling himself sweating, although he knew he was
protected from the wind by his field jacket, took two tablets from the
bottle and a sip of gin from his flask.

The flask was flat and of silver with a leather cover.  Under the
leather cover, which was worn and stained, it was engraved, on one
side, to Richard From Renata With Love.  No one had ever seen this
inscription except the girl, the Colonel and the man who had engraved
it.  It had not been engraved in the same place it was purchased.  That
was in the earliest days, the Colonel thought.  Now who cared?

On the screw-on top of the flask was engraved From R. to R.C.

The Colonel offered the flask to the boatman who looked at him, at the
flask, and said, 'What is it?'

'English grappa.'

'I'll try it.'

He took a long drink of it; the type of drink peasants take from a
flask.

'Thank you.'

'Did you have good shooting?'

'I killed four ducks.  The dog found three cripples shot by other
people.'

'Why did you shoot?'

'I'm sorry that I shot.  I shot in anger.'

I have done that myself sometimes, the Colonel thought, and did not ask
him what the anger was about.

'I am sorry they did not fly better.'

'That's the way things go,' the Colonel said.

The Colonel was watching the movement the dog made in the high grass
and sedge.  Suddenly he saw him stop; he was quite still.  Then he
pounced.  It was a high leap and a dive forward and down.

'He has a crippled,' he said to the boatman.

'Bobby,' the boatman called.  'Bring.  Bring.'

The sedge moved and the dog came out with a mallard drake in his jaws.
The grey-white neck and the green head were swaying up and down as a
snake's might move.  It was a movement without hope.

The boatman put the boat in sharp for shore.

'I'll take him,' the Colonel said.  'Bobby!'

He took the duck from the dog's light-holding mouth and felt him intact
and sound and beautiful to hold, and with his heart beating and his
captured, hopeless eyes.

He looked at him carefully, gentling him as you might gentle a horse.

'He's only wing-tipped,' he said.  'We'll keep him for a caller or to
turn loose in the spring.  Here, take him and put him in the sack with
the hen.'

The boatman took him carefully and put him in the burlap bag that was
under the bow.  The Colonel heard the hen speak to him.  Or, maybe she
is protesting, he thought.  He could not understand duck-talk through a
burlap bag.

'Take a shot of this,' he said to the boatman.  'It's damned cold
to-day.'

The boatman took the flask and drank deeply again.

'Thank you,' he said.  'Your grappa is very, very good.'




Chapter XLIII

At the landing, before the long low stone house by the side of the
canal, there were ducks laid out on the ground In rows.

They were laid in groups that were never of the same number.  There
were a few platoons, no companies, and, the Colonel drought, I barely
have a squad.

The head game-keeper was standing on the bank in his high boots, his
short jacket and his pushed back old felt hat, and he looked critically
at the number of ducks on the bow of the boat as they came alongshore.

'It was frozen-up at our post,' the Colonel said.

'I suspected so,' the head keeper said.  'I'm sorry.  It was supposed
to be the best post.'

'Who was top gun?'

'The Barone killed forty-two.  There was a little current there that
kept it open for a while.  You probably did not hear the shooting
because it was against the wind.'

'Where is everyone?'

'They're all gone except the Barone who is waiting for you.  Your
driver is asleep in the house.'

'He would be,' the Colonel said.

'Spread those out properly,' the head-keeper told the boatman who was a
game-keeper too.  'I want to put them to the game book.'

'There is one green-head drake in the bag who is only wing-tipped.'

'Good.  I will take good care of him.'

'I will go inside and see the Barone.  I'll see you later.'

'You must get warm,' the head keeper said.  'It's been a bitter day, my
Colonel.'

The Colonel started to walk towards the door of the house.

'I'll see you later,' he said to the boatman.

'Yes, my Colonel,' the boatman said.

Alvarito, the Barone, was standing by the open fire in the middle of
the room.  He smiled his shy smile and said to his low-pitched voice,
'I am sorry you did not have better shooting.'

'We froze up completely.  I enjoyed what there was very much.'

'Are you very cold?'

'Not too cold.'

'We can have something to eat.'

'Thank you.  I'm not hungry.  Have you eaten?'

'Yes.  The others went on and I let them take my car.  Can you give me
a lift to Latisana or just above?  I can get transportation from there.'

'Of course.'

'It was a shame that it should freeze.  The prospects were so good.'

'There must have been a world of ducks outside.'

'Yes.  But now they won't stay with their feed frozen over.  They will
be on their way south to-night.'

'Will they all go?'

'All except our local ducks that breed here.  They'll stay as long as
there is any open water.'

'I'm sorry for the shoot.'

'I'm sorry you came so far for so few ducks.'

'I always love the shoot,' the Colonel said.  'And I love Venice.'

The Barone Alvarito looked away and spread his hands towards the fire.
'Yes,' he said.  'We all love Venice.  Perhaps you do the best of all.'

The Colonel made no small talk on this but said, 'I love Venice as you
know.'

'Yes.  I know,' the Barone said.  He looked at nothing.  Then he said,
'We must wake your driver.'

'Has he eaten?'

'Eaten and slept and eaten and slept.  He has also read a little in
some illustrated books he brought with him.'

'Comic books,' the Colonel said.

'I should learn to read them,' the Barone said.  He smiled the shy,
dark smile.  'Could you get me some from Trieste?'

'Any amount,' the Colonel told him.  'From superman on up into the
improbable.  Read some for me.  Look, Alvarito, what was the matter
with that game-keeper who poled my boat?  He seemed to have a hatred
for me at the start.  Pretty well through, too.'

'It was the old battle-jacket.  Allied uniform affects him that way.
You see he was a bit over-liberated.'

'Go on.'

'When the Moroccans came through here they raped both his wife and his
daughter.'

'I think I'd better have a drink,' the Colonel said.

'There is grappa there on the table.'




Chapter XLIV

They had dropped the Barone off at a villa with great gates, a
gravelled drive and a house, which, since it was over six miles from
any military objective, had the good fortune not to have been bombed.

The Colonel had said good-bye and Alvarito had told him to come down
and shoot any, or every, week-end.

'You're sure you won't come in?'

'No.  I must get back to Trieste.  Will you give my love to Renata?'

'I will.  Is that her portrait that you have wrapped up in the back of
the car?'

'It is.'

'I'll tell her that you shot very well and that the portrait was in
good condition.'

'Also my love.'

'Also your love.'

'_Ciao_, Alvarito, and thank you very much.'

'_Ciao_, my Colonel.  If one can say _ciao_ to a Colonel.'

'Consider me not a Colonel.'

'It is very difficult.  Good-bye, my Colonel.'

'In case of any unforeseen contingencies would you ask her to have the
portrait picked up at the Gritti?'

'Yes, my Colonel.'

'That's all, I guess.'

'Good-bye, my Colonel.'




Chapter XLV

They were out on the road now and the early darkness was beginning.

'Turn left,' the Colonel said.

'That's not the road for Trieste, sir,' Jackson said.

'The hell with the road to Trieste.  I ordered you to turn left.  Do
you think there is only one way in the world to get to Trieste?'

'No, sir.  I was only pointing out to the Colonel----'

'Don't you point me out a God-damn thing and until I direct you
otherwise, don't speak to me until you are spoken to.'

'Yes, sir.'

'I'm sorry, Jackson.  What I mean is I know where I'm going and I want
to think.'

'Yes, sir.'

They were on the old road that he knew so well and the Colonel thought,
well, I sent four of the ducks I promised to those I promised them to
at the Gritti.  There wasn't enough shooting to be enough feathers to
do that boy's wife any good with feathers.  But they are all big ducks
and fat and they will be good eating.  I forgot to give Bobby the
sausage.

There was no time to write Renata a note.  But what could I say, in a
note, that we did not say?

He reached into his pocket and found a pad and pencil.  He put on the
map-reading light, and with his bad hand, printed a short message in
block letters.

'Put that in your pocket, Jackson, and act on it if necessary.  If the
circumstances described occur, it is an order.'

'Yes, sir,' Jackson said, and took the folded order blank with one hand
and put it in the top left-hand pocket of his tunic.

Now take it easy, the Colonel said to himself.  Any further concern you
may have is about yourself and that is just a luxury.

You are no longer of any real use to the Army of the United States.
That has been made quite clear.

You have said good-bye to your girl and she has said good-bye to you.
That is certainly simple.

You shot well and Alvarito understands.  That is that.

So what the hell do you have to worry about, boy?  I hope you're not
the type of jerk who worries about what happens to him when there's
nothing to be done.  Let's certainly hope not.

Just then it hit him as he had known it would since they had picked up
the decoys.

Three strikes is out, he thought, and they gave me four.  I've always
been a lucky son of a bitch.

It hit him again badly.

'Jackson,' he said.  'Do you know what General Thomas J. Jackson said
on one occasion?  On the occasion of his unfortunate death.  I
memorized it once.  I can't respond for its accuracy of course.  But
this is how it was reported: "Order A. P. Hill to prepare for action."
Then some more delirious stuff.  Then he said, "No, no, let us cross
over the river and rest under the shade of the trees."'

'That's very interesting, sir,' Jackson said.  'That must have been
Stonewall Jackson, sir.'

The Colonel started to speak but he stopped while it hit him the third
time and gripped bun so he knew he could not live.

'Jackson,' the Colonel said.  'Pull up at the side of the road and cut
to your parking lights.  Do you know the way to Trieste from here?'

'Yes, sir, I have my map.'

'Good.  I'm now going to get into the large back seat of this
god-damned, over-sized luxurious automobile.'

That was the last thing the Colonel ever said.  But he made the back
seat all right and he shut the door.  He shut it carefully and well.

After a while Jackson drove the car down the ditch and willow lined
road with the car's big lights on, looking for a place to turn.  He
found one, finally, and turned carefully.  When he was on the
right-hand side of the road, facing south towards the road junction
that would put him on the highway that led to Trieste, the one he was
familiar with, he put his map light on and took out the order blank and
read:


IN THE EVENT OF MY DEATH THE WRAPPED PAINTING AND THE TWO SHOT GUNS IN
THIS CAR WILL BE RETURNED TO THE HOTEL GRITTI WHERE THEY WILL BE
CLAIMED BY THEIR RIGHTFUL OWNER SIGNED RICHARD CANTWELL, COL.,
INFANTRY, U.S.A.


'They'll return them all right, through channels,' Jackson thought, and
put the car in gear.
